a delicious frozen treat that comes from cows. Ice cream comes in many different flavours and can often be found at your local grociery store.A relitively new shoe on the market. Created by Pharell Williams from the Neptunes (N.E.R.D) and Nigo, the creator of the Bathing Apes clothing and shoe line. They are marketed by Reebok. Only 3000 are currently in the market, ranging from around $300-$500 dollars.crack. hell even Master P calls it ice cream, and no one is more right them him.• The flavored cream of ice
• A common cure for broken hearted females
• A cold and delicious treat, perfect on hot summer daysflavored frozen cream that comes in different flavors.Release 4.0 of Google's [Android].

Although [Gingerbread] and [Honeycomb] are not yet available, Google is said to be already working on Android 4.0.

No idea what it will look like, but it will be greater than great!!

[Froyo] and [Gingerbread] are said to perform great with a 1 Ghz processor, [Honeycomb] and Ice Cream for sure will have a big impact on hardware.

Apple and Microsoft: be afraid, very afraid.code word for sexual pleasures when you are not behind closed doors and need to talk about the type of ice cream you had whether it be chocolate vanilla or better yet mocha.crack dope powder candyThe plural of [Ice Cream]The stuff that makes my head hurt when i eat too much of it... stupid fuckerA person that simply cannot be happy for another person's success.  So rather than be happy they make a point of exposing a flaw in that person.

Hating, the result of being a hater, is not exactly jealousy.  The hater doesnt really want to be the person he or she hates, rather the hater wants to knock somelse down a notch.Overused word that people like to use just because someone else expresses a dislike for a certain individual.most of the people in this siteA term used by others, usually being suburban "gangsters", whose lives are absolutely and undeniably defined by what others think.  These people "rumble" often and think  of themselves as original and/or indestructable.  People that use the term "haters" are the lowest stage of the evolutionary scale.  They bleed the fastest and have thought processes similar to that of a mentally underdeveloped cat.to be a hater is to descriminate or hate something, someone, or a certain type of something. 

If the world didn't have haters then it would be a better place. a much better place.

I mean not that there aren't assholes in the world. to hate somethings is good. i hate poverty, war, and bad shit like that. just try to have some morals, people.A person that develops a strong dislike for another, solely basing their own opinion on personal judgment rather than objective merit. The formation of a hater's contempt commonly arises from jealously and/or resentment. Individuals that make fun of, or "hate," others for justified reasons cannot be legitimately classified as "haters;" although many faggots attempt to rationalize their own situations by doing so. Additionally, the word "hater" is frequently overused, mainly by members of the rap and hip-hop communities.A person who feels anger and/or jealousy for someone who has succeeded in something they have worked hard for.
  A being who speaks badly,and/or takes negative actions in attempt to create problems for a successful person.Anyone with a opinion.The most non-insulting "insult" in existence. It's a waste of breath to say it and a waste of energy to type it. This term is often used by pre-teen girls whenever someone insults their favorite teeny bopper singers. If you ever call somene a hater, find the nearest knife and use it pierce your lungs for polluting our air with that fucking stupid word.People that make up reasons to hate certain people just because they aren't as wealthy or successfull as them. People are often hating:

1. [Bill Gates]
2. [Blink 182]
3. [George W. Bush]
4. [Halle Barry]
5. [Ben Affleck]P-Person
I-Into
M-Marketing
P-ProstitutesA man who beats up women and owns over a thousand sex slaves.one who brokers the sexual favors of women for profits1. Protection, Instruction, & Management of Prostitutes
2. Protectional Instructor Managing Professional
3. Prostitute's Instructional Management Professional
4. Professional In Management of Prostitutes 
5. Prostitute's Infamous Management Professional
6. Professionally Instructing Many Prostitutes
7. Professional Illegally Managing Prostitutes

Optional, but not recommended:
*Professional- replaced by Pro, Player, or Playa
*Into        - replaced by Intwined or Into
*Managing    - replaced by Marketing

Slang: noun or verb
1. Player(s/z)/Playa(s/z) Interested in(to) Making Progress/Prostitutes
2. (Put/Place It) or (Paper) in My/Men's Pants/Pocket(s)/Places
3. Party In My/Men's Pants/Panties
4. Pissin(g)/Peein(g) In(to) My Pants/Place/Partner/Potty 
5. Pissin(g)/Peein(g) In(to) Mouths of People/Prostitutes/Potty
6. People/Prostituts In Many/Money-filled Places/People
7. Perfect Independent Marvelous Playa(s/z) or Player(s/z)
8. Pooping In(to) My Place/Pants/Partner/Potty
9. Pennys In My Pocket/Place/Palace/Prostitutes
10. Put/Place It in My Pussy/Prostitute
11. Pussy Is My/Mens Prerogative/Purpose/PlaymateThe people wearing the purple suits on street corners who use dirt poor women to get money.  And later blowing it all on spinner's and gold lining for their three wheeled cycles.To make better, to fix up,some dumass middle school teenager who is as rich as hell and wear clothes like he's from the ghetto.Thinks he has he has hoes but the only one who he would lose his virginity to is his mom. Thinks rock is "for losers". Listens to too much 50 cent and tells everyone he used to live in "the projects". friends consist of a bunch of airheads who say LOL!! the whole time and his own dim-witted speciesPride Intelligence Money Power1. someone who profits off the money prostitutes make from selling their bodies
2. to seek out hookers to make a profit off of them selling their bodies.
3. to hit on several different girls
4. a guy who has alot of girlfriends or has been with alot women.
5. something that is really cool.v. Live off the earnings of a prostitutea machine for downloading pornWhat you are on nowThe most useful and most frustrating thing any human being will ever work with.If you're looking up this word, kill yourself.a very, very expensive punching bagA tool that is supposed to save time but intead wastes time.The most boring and frustrating thing in the world-however, I keep coming back.the thing people use to:
1. Go on MySpace or any other blog-related sites
2. download porn
3. illegally download music
4. play games
5. and use to look up the word "computer" on Urbandictionary.comThe answer to every single question.A $1000 facebook machineOne whose IQ exceeds his weight.An individual persecuted for his superior skills or intellect, most often by people who fear and envy him.An 'individual', i.e. a person who does not conform to society's beliefs that all people should follow trends and do what their peers do. Often highly intelligent but socially rejected because of their obesssion with a given subject, usually computers. Unfortunately, nerds seem to have problems breeding, to the detriment of mankind as a whole.Never
Ending
Radical
Dude.A stereotypical label used to describe a person that is socially inadequate.  A four letter word, but a six figure income.A person who gains pleasure from amassing large quantities of knowledge about subjects often too detailed or complicated for most other people to be bothered with.

Often mistaken for Geeks, who aspire to become nerds, yet lack the intelligence, and end up giving nerds a bad name due to their poor social skills.

Non-nerds are often scared of nerds, due to their detailed knowledge, and therefore seemingly high levels of intelligence - and subsequently denegrate them as much as possible as often as possible.

Nerds exist covertly within the fabric of society, often choosing to 'nerd it up' in private or in the company of fellow nerds.  It is for this reason they are feared the most - unlike geeks, who are easily identified, nerds can only be found out when casual conversation reaches a subject that they like nerding.the group of people who will most likely make a life changing invention that will radically change the world. the computer was invented by a nerd. the macintosh/apple and windows were invetned by nerds. jocks and normal people have no claim to civilization except for being the hard labor. nerds actually do the thinking. so jocks, fuck you, and go eat your steroidsThe person you will one day call "Boss"Guys with IQ higher than your weight. You made fun of them when you were at school but you would be lucky if you get employed as janitors in their businesses.A delicious candy made by Wonka.  They are pretty much crystalized sugar in a color coating that people love to give out on halloween.An individual who deals with the complex systems of todays military/civilian aircraft. Their entire mission is to make bricks "fly", and fix leaking electrons from parts, and they do it damn well. Usually pissed off individuals who are the be all end all of the sortie cock, they take and stride. Because one day, their enlistment will come to an end.Stands for AVIation electrONICSNot the best state in the country, but very far from the worst.  Home to three million people, some really sweet cities, three great univerties, a whole bunch of stellar small private colleges and a ton of true natural beauty in its lush northeast bluff country and statewide river valleys, lakes, and yes, rolling fields.  Iowa is a national leader in education (students in many other states including Texas take the Iowa Test of Basic Skills, and everyone's heard of the ACT, based in Iowa City) and is leading the way in biofuels to reduce the nation's dependence on oil.  To dispel the ignorance displayed elsewhere on this post, here's a state breakdown of cities and topography.  If seventy synonyms for boobs is alright to post, so is this.

Central Iowa:  [Des Moines], located at the intersection of I-80 and I-35, is the largest city with a metro of a half million and is the state capital, second only to London for the title of insurance capital of the world.  [Ames] (80,000 metro) is about a half hour north of Des Moines and is home to [Iowa State University], a land grant school of 30,000 respected around the world for its engineering and agricultural programs.  Central Iowa is, outside of river vallies, very flat, and outside of the Des Moines area and Ames is very sparsely populated.

Eastern Iowa:  The most densely populated area of the state.  Ethnically diverse [Iowa City] (115,000 metro) was Iowa's first state capital, was the first city in the world to elect a female mayor, has been named the most cultured city per capita in the nation, is always in the top five cities in the country for education, and is home to the [University of Iowa], 30,000, nationally renowned for its Carver College of Medicine and Iowa Hawkeye athletics.  The music departments of Iowa City's two large public high schools have won a total of five Grammy awards.  [Cedar Rapids], (200,000 metro) just twenty minutes north of Iowa City in the beautiful Cedar River valley, is the second largest single city, is the economic hub of eastern Iowa, has two private colleges, and is best known for being the place you get any of your Quaker Oats brand ceral from.  [Waterloo/Cedar Falls], two conjoined cities (130,000 metro) is where the [Unviersity of Northern Iowa], 18,000, is located.  The [Quad Cities], (375,000 metro) two in Iowa and two in Illinois, straddle the Mississippi and form the largest metro between Des Moines and Chicago.  The largest of the four cities is [Davenport], IA, home to the Bix 7 foot race whose hilly course and large prize attract runners from every part of the globe.  [Dubuque], (90,000 metro) on the Mississippi where Iowa meets Illinois and Wisconsin, is Iowa's oldest city. It is home to a ton of beautiful architecture, four private colleges, a far-reaching ELCA Lutheran seminary, and the Smithsonion affiliated National Mississippi River Musem and Aquarium.  Eastern Iowa's topography is for the most part very rolling farmland, with the exception of the hillier Iowa river valley, Cedar river valley, and the bluffs and hills skirting the whole eastern border along the Mississippi.  The northeast corner of the state is all bluffland, home to small town Decorah and reputed Luther College.

Western Iowa:  The vast majority of Iowa west of I-35 is flat farmland with the exception of the very westernmost strip.  [Sioux City] on the Missouri river (the western border) is a good sized city with nice amenities and lots of historyt.  [Council Bluffs] is the largest suburb of Omaha, just across the river in Nebraska.  The Iowa Great Lakes region contains many large lakes, most notably lake Okoboji, one of only three blue water lakes in the world.  The Loess Hills state park runs along the whole westernmost strip of the state, and offers lots of hilly hiking and some of the state's largest forests.

Iowa's motto should be "Iowa: Not as bad as you picture it."Pretty much the shit.  Make sure you're clear on the fact that the word "the" is in there, or else you'll get the meaning all wrong.  Iowa is home to the three million nicest people in the United States, probably in the world.  A leader in education, and home to some of the most beautiful scenery into the world.  It's a traquil beauty, and if you're into that, you'll love Iowa.  And if you're not into that, you can go take California or wherever you're from and fuck it.a farming state that isnt a bunch of dumb farmers thats [montana]A state that quietly grows corn and takes care of its own affairs. Residents think Des Moines compares to New York.People who dont live in Iowa refer to Iowa is full of corn and farmers. Its full of things pretty much from other states. 3 million awesome people live there. And its probably 3 million people you would never forget because they are so nice. Iowa is also one of the most beautiful places to live and only cool people can live in Iowa. Because Iowa is THE SHITT. Also home to the best college football team the IOWA HAWKEYES!The greatest state in the Union with education, and the ability to function with agriculture and good morals,When western civilization comes crashing down around you other 49 inferior states (Illinois is ok).BEST State in the entire united states of america!

Most, cocky dumbasses hate on iowa, and say that all there is is corn.. Thats completley wrong! EVERY state has agriculture and just about every state grows corn and has corn fields.
So what if iowa has corn, that dosnt mean thats the only thing to do!

Iowa is the best! Our hot chicks and all of our sports teams..

Iowa will fuck up anyone who tries to talk shit on us! were no pussys, we will fight any mother fucker who tries to hate on us!

Iowa has the best state fair too! The IOWA State Fair is possibly the best state fair in all of the US.

We have everything, Demo Derbys, Mudding, So much shit, youd just have to come here and check it out!State in the midwest, mostly farmland, but has a fantastic balance of rural, suberban, and highly populated areas. It is named after the Soux indian name meaning land between 2 rivers(missouri, Mississippi). Produces more corn and pork than any other state, and is not home to a bunch of hicks. in fact Iowa has the highest % of leteracy in the United states. statisticly its largest city, Des Moines, is in a perfect location for trade because it lies on interstate 35 and interstate 80, 2 of the buisiest highways in the US. however, because of Chicago's close proximity there isnt quite as many large factorys as there should be. Iowa is a beautiful state with hilly reigons in the east and hundreds of rivers and streams. The people are known for being friendly, usually hard working, and down to earth.

***to readers in the Northeast and california specificly***
No, just because someone lives in Iowa does not mean that they live on a farm. enough said. and another thing, stop mistaking Iowa for Idaho and Ohio. yes, they do sound the same but seriously, get it right its not that hardWhat the hell is this
I - Idiots

O - Out

W - Wondering

A - Around
shit?
We're the smartest state in the U.S!
For Christ's sake, stop your bitching about our "terrible driving" and go to New York, give me a review about their shitty driving.

God damn, Iowa has some of the nicest people, and there isn't corn EVERY WHERE.
To be honest, there isn't even as much corn as you think there would be, there are more cities than corn.

Plus, if you hate Iowa then promise me you'll never eat corn and or barilla noodles again.
So, all you more suberban suburban states can suck it because Iowa is the shit!A state full of beauty and 3 million of the nicest people in the universe. Also a pioneer in education, with the Iowa Test of Basic Skills and ACT being based in Iowa City. Is home to a ton of natural beauty: Ledgers State Park near Boone, the Des Moines, Missouri, and Mississippi Rivers, as well as numerous forests and woods. Tends to be judged by people who have never visited it.Place of extreme weather.A state of the south-central United States. It was admitted as the 28th state in 1845. Explored by the Spanish in the 16th and 17th centuries, the region became a province of Mexico in the early 19th century. Texans won their independence in 1836 after a gallant but losing stand at the Alamo in February and a defeat of Santa Anna's forces at the Battle of San Jacinto (April 21). Denied admission as a state by antislavery forces in the U.S. Congress, the leaders of Texas formed an independent republic that lasted until 1845. Austin is the capital and Houston the largest city. Population: 17,059,805. 

The Lonestar State, The State that still believes that criminals should be punished, Home of the Wataburger, home of Southern Hospitality, HTown, And Everythang thats bigger and better.

AND NO!! We Dont all walk around with cowboy hats and boots, and we're all not rednecks....for that...see oklahoma.The best Mexican food. Dr. Pepper on tap. Beautiful ladies. Awesomeness everywhere you turn. The best fucking place on earth. Move there now!the only state in the union that can fly its flag at the same height as the american flag.....
and the only reason texas doesnt fall into the gulf of mexico... is because oklahoma sucksHome to Dr. Pepper, several modern and well respected singers, activists, and the like, Sam Houston, and other great men and women before him, numerous plantlife and animals, and a few horrid idiots who give the rest of us a bad name-ie: George Bush.The biggest and baddest state of them all(15 states can be put into Texas and we'd still have 1000 miles left) where everything is bigger and much better than places such as California. Home of a Ranch bigger than Rhode Island,the home of trunk poppin, Dr.Pepper,home of the first word spoken from the moon which was Houston,home of swangin on 84's and vogues, chopped and screwed music, SA Town, D Town, and H Town which are all 3 in the top 10 most populated cities in the U.S.
The Lone Star State was the only state that was its own country, and the only state worthy of even making a definition of. 


If you aint a Texan, you wish you were.The greatest state everOkay.
I was born and raised in Houston.
So lets tell the truth.
-The weather in Texas changes very rapidly, and we get a bit of everything, except snow. That doesn't come around very often.
-We don't get married to our sisters or even distant cousins. A shock. I know. If you want to see some of that go to Oklahoma.
-Not everyone here talks with a distinct country accent.
You have to go to the smaller towns for that. Lufkin, Etoile, Waco, etc. It all depends on what area of Texas you were born in. People move here from New York and California all the time, and we don't sound any diffrent.
Our slang is the only true thing that seperates us.
-Yes, we have racism here. Just like any other state, but it's not as bad as people make it sound. The Africans, Mexicans, and Orientals, etc. out number us by more the 50%.
-Taking hits to our pride by informing us we cuss to much (yes, 'cuss') is low. We cuss just as much as anyone in California, or Florida would.
-No one walks around here in in full cowboy uniform. So if you think we do, maybe you should visit before opening your mouth.A state in the southern USA. Its in the south. There are billboards about Jesus. One can buy [waffles] there.The best damn state in the country!  That's all you need to know.The greatest and most popular sport in history with more than 5 times the TV audience of the next most popular (cricket - every radio and TV in the sub-continent is permanently tuned to Pakistan/India cricket matches - that's a big audience).

Only Americans call it 'soccer' owing to their vast ignorance of what goes on outside their national boundaries and the misnomer which has them thinking than a corruption of rugby, with all the danger and most of the skill removed can also be called 'football'. 

'The Beautiful Game' can be played anywhere, on almost any surface, by any number of players, for almost any length of time. And is. There is no country on earth that doesn't play. It has inspired more passion, more courage and more excitement than any other sport in history and dwarfs everything else.When a girl is playing footsie with you, and her foot travels up to your crotch.A name given to two different sports in which America and the rest of the world use to waste their lives away constantly arguing over which is better. Honestly, I'm an American. And I love the game of American football. But notice how I haven't said that I hate football (aka soccer). In fact, I love that sport, too. I just totally suck at it. Haha. C'mon, be real ya'll. Both games are cool. Even rugby too. It's cool. I have no idea how to play it, but I enjoy trying. It's all preference. For all ya'll that say football is whack cause we wear padding, go ahead and say whatever the fuck you want to say. That padding protects us so we can stay a little safer to enjoy the game a little longer. I don't care if I don't use it, I've tackled mofos twice my size without any padding on. The point I'm trying to make; All three games are great. They all require stratedgy, strength, speed, and endurance. So just shut the fuck up, grab the ball that suits you, and play your damn game already. You got that? Kay, just helping out. I'm just a 15yr old from a small town. Yeah, yeah... What do I know? Honestly? I know it's fucking pointless for ya'll to fight over sports. So just save your shit for someone who's still too much of a punk to simply enjoy a game of American football, football, or rugby. Peace people! Damn. Haha.Football - Only the best damn sport ever. Played with a round ball and feet. However, Americans tend to mistake it for American Football (which should truthfully be called tackleball for all that matters).Also Known As the BEAUTIFUL GAME. A real sport played with your FEET and an actual round BALL, hence the name FOOTBALL. This term should never be used to refer to our silly american game of putting on 30 pounds of armor and carrying a cone shaped piece of rubber while trying not to be touched by other guys. You'll note the lack of definitions calling this silly game football. And there is a reason for that. Some silly americans give us a bad name by not noticing what is going on in the rest of the world and don't realize that there was already a real sport called football when we made up our game, but everyone else in the world knows whats up.
P.S. Please, if you are American please stop saying the S word (s****r)and saying that our american game is better than real football. If you are not american just know that not all of us are confused faggots.A lovely game that alot of people play.
Also the most importmant sport in the world.
Very famous, but also fun for people who like football.
If you dont play football yet, i would say:
Give it a try!

Ofcourse if you start at older age, you wont get as good as Ronaldo, Messi, ...
But doesnt matter, its just for fun! ( Mostly )A variety of games that which Europeans and Americans tend to argue over pointlessly till the end of time as to which version is "right" never minding the fact that due to Cultural Mutation different words can mean different things in other places
Typically Americans profess love for the version that involves padding and an ovoid ball in which the point of the game is to move the ball ten yards down the field at a time through either rushing or passing before passing into the plain of the "End Zone" placed at either ends of a 100 Yard Field to score points
Europeans tend to extol the virtues of a much simpler sport that only requires a pair of goals placed at either end of a field and is played with a checkered Spherical BallOK, here goes... slowly:
The word describes a very populare game, which is played all over the world.
The word consists of two parts, which quite accurately descibes the game:
1) Foot
2) Ball

Part 1) Foot. This means that the foot is the main body part involved when playing this game.
Part 2) Ball. This means that the game is played with a spheric (globe-shaped) object.

This definition seems to be understood all over the world, except in the US, where they have misunderstood both parts of the word. Instead of using their feet, they mainly use their hands. And, instead of using a ball, they use an egg-shaped object.The round form of the drug Zanax that also comes in another form called [sticks] this form is in the shape of a football.A place on urbandictionary.com where obnoxious [eurofags] bitch about how Americans call football soccer and vice versa.A tongue of which the user speaks of something the complete opposite of what the user means. It often has the best comedic value.the bastard stepchild of ironyYour body's natural defense against stupid.A word that gives you the possibility to play with your imagination when asked stupid questions.Something that nobody on the internet can ever recognize.God's gift to man.
Incredibly humourous if used correctly.Noun.  A very British form of humour which derives laughs from saying something while really meaning something else.  Often (though not always, contrary to popular belief) used in scathing remarks.

The word 'Sarcasm' is derived from a Greek word meaning 'tearing flesh', which is why sarcastic vegetarians are so ironic.

See also [irony].The ability to insult idiots without them realizing it.A verbal reflex against stupidity. In my opinion one of the best types of humour.When one says something, but usually means the opposite.
Used sometimes in order to belittle someone and make them seem retarded... or equally to amuse and impress them with your mind. Indeed.Humorous name for oral sex.To drink an entire beverage in one goplace where brain livesOral sex, head.The nickname for members of the Phi Kappa Sigma fraternity.Another word for a female sucking cock. " Oh baby, give me some skull!!" It's the same thing as saying give me some head, or give me some brain. Cock-sucking words are great!!what the hardcore kids give instead of head.

see [skull fuck].to give or recieve oral sexTo bash another in the head,Created in an attempt to imagine what in the world someone could have going on in their head when they say or do something absolutely ridiculous/ illogical/ or straight up retarded. This person must be lacking a brain in their head i.e having nothing more than a flesh covered skull resting on their neck. Skull.A coat that makes you invisibleOne who lacks the skill to contribute balanced team work in an MMO. Also known as train mobber, skill-less peon and fearless noob.Cloak is another way of leaving without anyone else knowing.to smoke marijuana.To have sex, or to [fuck]. In the context of the vagina's ability to envelope, engulf or cover the penis like a piece of clothing. Perhaps a term originating from Canada.an extremely beautiful women/girl who everyone loves and will never forget. she has many friends and people feel they can always go to her for help, no matter what the situation is. cloaks is a great listener and speaker, she is also very creative and imaginative. She tends to be very artistic and athletic. Cloaks enjoys acting, dancing and singing, she is also very good at them. Cloaks is also a great lover in the bedroom, Every man thinks she is irresistible and falls in lover with her at first sight.a super gay homofag queer fairy buttpiratea friend or aqauntancethe result unprotected [sex] of a male and a female of the same species; also can be known as [offspring] and [brats]things that interupt you while your banging you wife.Anyone below the age of 18 (or 21, in some circles.) Don't listen to the idiotic fools who hate on little kids because they think it's "hip and cool".The stuff that gets shot all over the place during sex.the worst STD you can get.1.Something REALLY old people desire to be when their backs start breaking and their hearing and eyesight get poor.Krazy Individuals Destroying Societywhat teenagers claim they are notA baby goatThe word people use when you've done something that isn't technically "bad" or "wrong" but they still don't like it anyway and expect you to conform to their personal tastes.What your mom says when she catches you masturbating.The current euphemism for "wrong" or "bad." It is supposed to sound more objective than "wrong" and "bad," but it is not.putting it simply, not [appropriate]the [definition] of [urban dictionary]not suitable or proper in the circumstances. Action could be used in a talking, visual, or sexual manner.In high school settings, short skirts, low cut tops, see through clothing and skin tight jeans.  The student handbook says not to wear this, but many girls still wear it anyway to look skanky.The act of saying something irrelevant to the topic or becoming mad feisty with another person without an apparent reason. Usually accompanied with the action of standing up and pointing your hand down to the person it pertains to.The word that used to actually mean something, but doesn't mean anything anymore.To [curse] or '[cuss]'. Swears are considered inappropriate to use in public places, but are less offensive than other profanities. These '[bad word]s' are often referenced by pre-adolescents by their first letter (the 'f' word, the 's' word, even 'h-e-double-hockey-sticks').Any word that a person says when they can't think of anything intelligent to sayTo verbally abuse, or to rape an object with hatred wordsWords that people get offended by for some unexplained reason.when something is weird or funny and you sont have anything to say, you just point and say swear! swear this, omg swear that.

or it can be used like the world "seriously"Swear is used often for cursing someone, often with any consequences.

Perfect swearing language: Russian language is also the 5th officially used language over the world, aside English or Spanish. Russian language has more swear words in them, than any other language.

According to the infamous Taboo vocabulary, you can literally talk and swear in Russian and make lines, that make sense.Word that makes your sentence mean something, and actually prove a point.cannot really be defined but in terms to understand it can be understood as being dumb, stupid, retarded, saying something that is absurd.(verb) when someone thinks they're SO much better than others; someone who is conceited and vain, and definately wants others to notice.[fuck]
[ass]
[damn]
[hell]
[shit]
[bastard]
[bitch]
[crap]
All [racist] words.When someone else gets hurt.1. Something that causes you to laugh
2. A person who isn't quite rightA way of describing the girl you really like, either to said girl or your friends, without hinting too much. Either used by shy men who have a hard time admitting they really like someone or describing the girl you like to your friend that proclaims himself the matchmaker or love finder (yes, this is a stereotyped friend that every bro has, you may even be this person - if so, you have learned the secret code of bro hinting (ha, and you only thought girls spoke in hint))When someone else gets hurt.The only part of a newspaper worth looking at.  Located beside or near the crossword puzzles and cryptoquote.  Famous funnies include Garfield, Family Circus, Andy Capp, and Peanuts.Makes you laugh, oddA plural exclamation of extreme humourosity.  

OR

When followed by a question mark, a needy request to find out whether a joke has been accepted or not.The fact that you're wasting time looking up "funny".Definitions on urbandictionary tagged with 'funny', usually aren't.If you have to look up funny your probably a fag.Big
Gigantic
HugeA compliment- referring to either muscles or more commonly, the mail genitalia. Also associated with terms such as "biggie" or "bigs". Add "particularly", "fairly", or "rather" for added enjoyment.Something of excessive size.  Normally associated with [heavy] as well.the state of the penis when arousedone thousand United States dollarsa thousand dollars - they say it all the time in the Sopranosaka, huge, masssiv, ownageIn sarcasm, to refer to something as unworthwhile, lacking merit or otherwise derogatory.

Can be used with prefixes "fairly" and "particulary" for added effect.

See also: [small]Really good, excellent. Used by DJs and dance music fans to describe a track.When you are 'avin' it in a collosal fashion. One size fits all. It is possible to say "how are you avin' it?" as this means the same thing due to the fact that there is only one size to 'ave' itA good fun alternative to life.crack, in CD-ROM form.The most highly addictive game ever played. It will consume your soul and poison your water supply.A highly entertaining mmorpg that is played by a wide variety of people. some get addicted to it like its crack cocaine, and some only play it a few times a month. The level of addiction all depends on the person playing it.The world's most effective form of birth control.A computer game whose participants apparently don't know how to correctly make words plural.

Hint for WoW players: it doesn't involve an apostrophe.Taken mistakenly as a peer to EverQuest or EverQuest II, it is an entertaining game in which a player learns how to cooperate as a team, and harnesses competition, unlike EverQuest II. The irony behind half of the definitions under this category is this: If you'd read the back of the box, you would realize that it states "even if you only have a couple of minutes, World of Warcraft's superior quest system offers quick gameplay." The sad truth is that people don't want to accept the fact that many of the players on this game have lives, jobs, spouses, ect. They see that it is an MMORPG, and automatically assume that it's a parallel to EQ and EQ2.A game were nobody but the company taking your money wins. Often replaces one's social life.A game that manages by some divine power to completely waste your life and lets you have fun while doing so.World of Warcraft- WoW is kind of like smoking. You don't see what all the fuss is about in the beginning, until one of your friends gives you a free taste. Still, you can't see how addicting it is until you have tried it a few times. Then you start buying it, and using it by the bundle, and you can't seem to stop. You'll do anything just to get a few good hours in with your favorite pasttime. You slowly start to lose touch with former friends and family, and meet lots of strange new people with a similar addiction. Prolonged use can lead to death. It's very difficult to get out of your system, you must rely on the strangth of others, for your willpower has ben sapped.
General Surgeons Warning- Not intended for oral or anal use. WoW shouldn't be used if you suffer from seizures or are an expectant mother. Side effects include obsession, nausea, vomiting, and pink eye. Ask you doctor before using.Somebody who finds great pleasure in the art of Computer Programming.

Synonymous with: Hacker, ProgrammerThe low end of the scale as far as [software engineers] go.Slang word, used by idiots, for the term 'programmer'. Often used by communities for Private Servers. There are related words such as 'Code' or 'Coding'.a bitchy old, pregnant man with a beer belly. not just old but he ancient, he was in the same class as jesus when they were kids.short for code infraction, used at [Delbarton], get three and you're strongly encouraged to leave the school.Fake Fag Slang for ProgrammerJail guard, cop, security guard, etc.
Someone with power over you in a controlled surroundingswhen you lose your virginity or just has sex and you can't say it out loud you say you wore a "blue shirt"an extremely hot guy with a nice bodyA huge spokkerjones that will never know the embrace of a womanThe opposite of a Red Shirt. A character in a fictional series that will simply not die, regardless of fans hating them or the amount of injuries they sustain. Some true Blue Shirts even die and are resurrected through some means, just to spite the viewers.The opposite of a Red Shirt. A character in a fictional series that will simply not die, regardless of fans hating them or the amount of injuries they sustain. Some true Blue Shirts even die and are resurrected through some means, just to spite the viewers.The opposite of a Red Shirt. A character in a fictional series that will simply not die, regardless of fans hating them or the amount of injuries they sustain. Some true Blue Shirts even die and are resurrected through some means, just to spite the viewers.Someone under the 25th percentile for stature for their age, sex, and country.
(5'7" and under for men and 5'2" and under for women in the US)what i am.1.) noun, A cigarrette, having been previously smoked, but not completely, suggesting the later use and finish of said cigarette.The small coffee size at Starbuck's; the only size on the menu there that makes any sense (et al [Tall], [Grande], [Vente]).Comfy and easy to wear.Military and prison adjective for describing someone nearing the end of their tour of duty, enlistment or incarceration.  A [short-timer] is someone who has less then 90 days to serve.  A Korean War veteran told me these terms were in wide use in the late 1940s; they have been in continuous wide use in the military since then.outta luckto be not tall. under 5" tallsnoun; used by a third party person to express when somebody has insulted or humiliated another personShort was used long before there were compact cars.  It goes back to at least the Forties on the Southside of Chicago.  It means ANY car.  It was from the vernacular of hotrodders and black gangsters. It probably derives from "hot short", which evolved to "hotwire" ... a car.1. The Good Part - The woman you marry and live with for the rest of your life.

2. The Bad Part - The woman you marry and live with for the rest of your life.extreme hardcore version of a girlfriendThe beautiful, inteligent, classy and fulfilling companion of a man that is wise enough to notice such qualities. Usually despised and hated on by the [baby momma].A prostitute with a life-long contract to a single client.A woman that a man is married to.The person that is there for you whenever you need them, the person that makes you want to be better, the person that you love and cherish forever.

(Hint: getting married to a woman you don't love isn't a good idea, don't do it.)w.i.f.e.
wash, iron, fuck, ect.The reason I drink so much.The name of someone that is on a vendetta to make you regret ever choosing her as a partner.term used in reference to the woman in which a man is the most emotionally involved with & who he feels the most obligation toward. she typically has characteristics which would make her a desirable long-term partner.The cause of, and solution to all life's problems.Any of a class of chemical compounds having the general formula ROH, where R represents an alkyl group and -OH a hydroxyl group. Most commonly refers to ethanol, which you can drink to forget how much your life sucks, and methanol, which you can drink when you remember.Liquid Panty RemoverA substance found in beer (except American beer) and several other beverages that makes you excessively happy, sad, belligerent or horny.  It allows white men to dance and ugly men to get laid (when given to their victim).Alcohol. What most of your university/college life will revolve around.The buffer between reality and a good night. Has been known to make people seem more attractive and make obviously stupid idea's seem like good sense.The antidote to reality.The answer to the question "What made you move to North Dakota?"1) The active ingredient in alcohol is ethyl alcohol, which is produced by yeast. Working much like [ether], alcohol puts the brain to sleep. Alcohol functions as a depressant to the central nervous system and slows down body functions. In large amounts, alcohol causes sedation, intoxication, unconsciousness, and possible death. Aside from significant negative physical consequences, chronic use of alcohol can lead to physical and psychological addiction. 

2) Colorless, volatile liquid obtained by distillation and fermentation of carbohydrates (grain, molasses, potatoes [irish]). Alcohol is antiseptic and cooling but is also very drying to the hair and skin; care should thus be taken not to use too much. 

3) This constituent of wine is a natural by-product of fermentation. It is one of the main pillars of perceived flavor, the others being "Acid", "residual Sugar" (and/or "Glycerin") and "Tannin". The presence of these components define a wine that has "good balance". For tablewines the wine label must, by law, state the alcohol content of the wine within the bottle, usually expressed as a percentage of the volume. Table wines do not usually exceed 14% alcohol content - (11% to 12.5% is generally considered the optimum amount) - although a few, such as Zinfandel, can go up to a 17% level. Sweet dessert wines fall in the same range. Fortified wines - (eg: Sherry, Port etc) - range from 17% to 21% alcohol content. 

4) Ethanol or ethyl alcohol (C2H5OH), the liquid produced from sugar by fermentation that can make you drunk 

5) A chemical compound formed by the action of yeast on the sugar content of grapes during fermentation. Most wines have between 7 and 25 percent alcohol, which gives wine is vinosity. If wine has too much alcohol for its body weight, it is unbalanced, and will taste uncharacteristically heavy or hot. The quality will be noticeable in aroma and aftertaste. 

6) A general class of hydrocarbons that contain a hydroxyl group (OH). The term "alcohol" is often used interchangeably with the term "ethanol," even though there are many types of alcohol. (See Butanol, Ethanol, Methanol.)liquid stamina in a bottleA holiday that no Black people I know celebrate.
Well , one year my Uncle tried to , but we all laughed at him.A holiday developed by a Dr. Maulana "Ron" Karenga, a black militant, Marxist, and convicted felon.
Just five years after this, he was convicted of torturing two black women to death. 

Observed from December 26 to January 1, Kwanzaa is based on a mixture of East African harvest rituals, called "first fruits" by Karenga and 1960's radicalism. This is in spite of the fact most slaves came from West Africa.

Viewed as an "alternative" to Christmas, it, nonetheless, is based on race, and not in faith.1)A made up piece of shit holiday steeped in all the deepest traditions of Sweetest Day  or Secretary's Day. 

2)A holiday for African Americans that no African American observes or understands.It's the right-on power handshake of the 1990s.  Yet another politically correct tactic to get whites to pay attention to non-whites, primarily blacks.  It's a fabricated holiday based on race, invented by a convicted felon, which is too third world for most black Americans, too jewish for black muslims, and too stupid for everyone else.  Now that's a fine example for the ghetto children of the world!Kwanzaa is a Counterfeit made up, holiday started by a black convicted kidnaper, rapist, Karenga, whose criminal record includes having been convicted and jailed on charges of assault and false imprisonment for the torture of two black women.

There is no nothing ethnically African about it, it is all fake andObviously a manufactured holiday created by African Americans in the late 1980s/early 1990s, when the fad of that time was to be "African", which is why Eddie Murphy's "Coming to America" was a blockbuster hit in 1988, when in reality it was a [racist] shit movie that made fun of people from Africa.A fake and gay holiday made up by some random black guy in the 60's.A popular file sharing program for African-Americans.An African-American holiday that celebrates the deeds of a brave little boy who saved his village from man-eating tigers by having them follow each others tails until they turned into butter.
Flapjacks with loads of butter are served at the holiday meal.The black [Hanukkah]God's gift to the world.  Brings peace when used wisely.An ancient plant, refrenced biblically {the Holy Herb}.

Gets you rocked, and has been proven to be less harmful then alcohol or cigarettes. It has never been conclusively proven to have caused a single death in the entire world, ever.

Easily avalible in most forign countries, and Alaska, where everybody grows it anyway.

Can be purchased by the (if you're lucky) gram, or (not so lucky) by standard measurements. (1/8th of an ounce, 1/4er, 1/2, ect. An eigth usually weighs 3.75, depending on the weight of the baggie and weather or not you're buying from an asshole. There are dealers, and then there are professionals.) usual prices for the sticky-icky-icky (Not that cheap mexican shite, but tanqueray-and-chronic-chronic) can run from $30 to $50 and even $60 an eigth. I even heard it ran eighty an eigth out on Kodiack Island, but you gotta look at the market from a local poiont of view.

It's easier to get then liquor if you're under 21. 

It will not cause you to shoot your friend with the gun you found in your parent's bedroom while they weren't home. (That's shitty parenting, folks, not the pot!)

It's healthier then Xanax if you're just looking to ignore your troules for a few hours.

A biennial Youth Risk Behavior Survey, released May 21 by the U.S. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention stated that more of america's youth smoke pot then cigarettes.

It's a step in the right direction, folks!the answer to all in this horrible world of oursmarijuanaweed not a drug!the dried leaves and flowering tops of pistillate hemp plant that yeild cannabin and are sometimes smoked in cigarette form for its intoxicating effect   

aka

fucking awesomeweed is marijuana, stupid. here's some names i've collected
weed
chron or chronic
dro (hydroponics)
sticks and stems (shitty weed)
sticky-icky (dripping with THC)
mauie wowie
jamaican red hair
blueberry
strawberry
AK-47
kind bud
snowflake
skunk and super skunk
mary jane
MJ
grass (no one calls it that anymore)
ganga (pronounced GAHN-JAH)
herb or herbal
dank
trees
mids or middies (average weed)
damn, there's a ton more, i just can't remember from smoking all of the above.a beautiful thing if used properly. all it does is make you happy.an essential substance in most people's lives.A green plant god put on the earth for me and you.Type of [Christianity] that places authority in the Bible as the infallible word of God. This does not necessarily mean a literal interpretation of everything in the Bible (cf. [creationism]). Not to be confused with [evangelism], which means something entirely different.A generalization of multiple groups of Protestant Christianity. It's not actually a denomination, but a category that churches of many denominations fall under, ranging from some baptist churches in the south to non-denominational churches in the north and along the coastline. Using that criteria, the majority of protestant Christians in the US probably fall under the "Evangelical" category. Despite popular belief, they are real, tangible people, who are just as capable of being discriminated against as the people who they are frequently (and usually, falsely) accused of being discriminated against. An Evangelical Christian is best characterized as someone who wants to spread the Gospel of Christ by being living examples to the people around them. Real Evangelicals do not believe in forcing people who are not Christians to act like Christians, because they believe that Christ his followers to only come of their own free will.

Evangelical Christians should NOT be confused with "fundamentalists," a term that has come to mean someone who is far more mental than fun. Evangelicals tend to believe in more literal interpretations of the bible, but that does not mean that they are against scientific study or using critical thinking (after all, how can you understand how the Bible applies to your life without critical thinking?). Also, they do not want religion to control the government, because as [Martin Luther] figured out during the dark ages, religion controlling government is actually a cheap disguise for the government controlling religion. True Evangelicals want freedom of religion, and that includes the freedom to share the gospel with others.

Evangelical Christians are a large, and unfortunately, misunderstood part of the global population. They are constantly stereotyped as being hateful, bigoted people, even though many of them have done many great works for bringing rights to people and sending help to places. Evangelicals want to change their communities for the better by changing the people, one person at a time. Maybe if people came to realize that the large majority of Evangelical Christians are actually legitimately nice people who enjoy life and are happy to share their happiness with others, they'd realize that the mainstream perception of "evangelical" is merely an aggressively propagated stereotype that aims to strip Christians of their legitimacy as human beings.Comes from the word 'evangelism', which means spreading the good news about jesus christ.

So inturn evangelical is living your life in the way that god wants you to, so that others may see you and see how god has worked in your life. It is not a way of forcing a religion on someone.

It can also mean to speak to people about jesus.A sect of christianity that is full of mindless, brainwashed followers who spend their entire life in misery when they aren't spreading the gospel. The whole sect is full of middle class/rich white folks who want to go to church to be entertained by crying, hysterical preachers and find new prejudices to be in support of. They believe that their religion is the only way of life and refuse to accept any other ways.  There is no 'conversation' with evangelicals...they only convert. BEWARE.According to society, the only demographic that should feel ashamed of themselves when campaigning or when casting a vote.The Andromeda Strain of Christianity. Often called "conservative Christianity", when in reality it is a very modern radical version. Evangelicalism has no true theology, substituting apologetics for theology, and far more concerned with what will draw in people than in actual beliefs.

Evangelicals are often mistaken for Protestants, however the two groups a quite different. Protestantism is based on the idea that people can read and understand the Bible for themselves, without need of a mediator. In Evangelicalism, your minister is the final authority of what the Bible means.

Evangelicals gather to worship in thousands or tens of thousands in the belief that their minister is an intermediary to God, and that it is very important to get their religion directly from him.Describes Christians who try to uphold the tenants of the Protestant Reformation, but without all that courage, conviction, and critical-thinking baggage that got their 16th and 17th century forefathers burned at the stake.  Also known as "Evan-jelly-fish" due to apparent lack of brain and spine.christians who like to argue and force their ideas of religion on others. sometimes resulting in violence and always voice raising.Modern day nazi's. They brainwash there followers using group hysteria, which Hitler used. They try to convert everything that moves by forcing people to beleive what they think. They consider themselves an army of god, ready to fight for his bidding.

They are also hypocrite's. E.G. Ted haggard , who is one of the pastor's at a mega church i colorado, paid a male prostitute to butt fuck him after condeming gays and homosexual activity. He asked forgiveness and was forgiven and "cured", but if any one else who wasnt evangelical did that they would not be forgiven ( like Bill Clinton).1. an adjective synonymous with "mindless."

2. a noun synonymous with "fucking idiot."a broke ass mutha fucka who relies on crack to sustain daily life.  Often seen running at full speed for a multitude of reasons.People of any race that live to hit that nasty-ass rock. Usually real thin, dirty and smell like warm trash and/or spoiled milk, fecal matter, rotting corpses etc. Frequently bobbing, weaving, twitching and glitching. Large periodic spurts of energy. Always got something for sale or knows somebody that has just what you need. The most severe crackheads can be viewed in the wild missing standard items such as shoes, socks and teeth. If you come into contact with a crackhead it is suggested to secure all valuables and avoid any physical contact or direct contact with their breath (could cause dizzyness and/or vomitting).  If you lose property to a crackhead, accept the loss. If you find yourself chasing a crackhead, accept the loss .. crackheads are fast, they be gittin somewheres.. You ain't catching no crackhead...1.a person on crack
2.a moron1. one who does excessive amounts of crack.

2. one who acts as though they do excessive amounts of crack.Someone who smokes crack and will lie cheat and steal from anyone to get a hit1.one who is highly addicted to the euphoria brought on by crack cocaine.
2. one who does stupid things.1. one who partakes in smoking crack cocaine.
2. One who can run like the wind when s/he believes that quazimotto is chasing him/her.
3. one who will try to sell thier dog on e-bay.
4. If you live in a hotel, have no food, are pregnant, and your only worry is when/how to score...you are a crackhead.
5. one who acts "crackish"
6. A Jarrod or an Izatt.
7. A "parent" of a Crack baby.
8. The person who robbed you.A crackhead is the lowest form of a drug user. They abuse the drug crack cocaine. They are often liars, traitors, and thiefs. 

Crackheads are often paranoid and fidgety. 

Crackheads can be anyone, any race, any gender.

Crackheads will sell everything and anything to fuel their addiction. 

Crackheads cannot be trusted. If you ever find yourself to a person who is a known crackhead, try to get away as fast as possible, otherwise you may lose valauble jewerly, wallet, etc. 

Unless you don't mind having any of your prized possessions disappear, it is not wise to let a crackhead into your home. Never leave a crackhead unnattended to, or you will find things mysteriously go missing. 

It is important to never let a crackhead get to you, don't ever let them get under your skin. You are the stronger person in the situation, unless you too are a crackhead.

Crackheads are pathetic.Somebody who does [crack] regulary and gets addicted. Thus becoming a crackhead.The lowest form of a drug-user.The infamous act of a girl getting fucked by a donkey cock, whilst paying gentlemen gather around and watch.as stated above, refers to a woman getting fucked by a donkey, often performed for the pleasure of refined gentleman.  

one variation (specifically found in tijuana) is a competition in which different whores fuck the donkey.  the depth to which they are penetrated is marked by tying a red ribbon (a la tony orlando and dawn) 'round the donkey's cock.  the girl who takes it the deepest wins (i guess?).A sex act involving a woman and a donkey in which the woman fornicates with said donkey, typically performed in rural Mexican cities.An act where a horny woman gets corn-holed by a raging horny assa show where a woman has sex with a jackass1. A form of entertainment most commonly associated with being presented in Tijuana, in which (usually) men pay to observe a male donkey have sex with a female human.

2. A popular Oregon radio show, broadcast from Eugene with a transmitter powerful enough to be heard even outside the state depending on how good the receiving radio is (Vancouver, WA is an example). Syndicated in Medford (south of Eugene) at night time, though the hours the show is actually done is 2-6 PM. Broadcast on 101.5 KFLY FM, the show plays little music compared to most FM radio, and is mainly composed of the two co-hosts Tanner and Drew sharing their often humorous opinions and satires of current events and people currently in the news; as well as other commonly done humor-based radio bits. They refer to their listeners as throbbits (from a pornographic parody of Lord of the Rings).a live show in which a woman has sex (oral, anal, vaginal) with a mule or donkey. they are usually found in seedy areas of border towns in Mexico.  yes they really do exist and aren't terribly hard to findSomething you really don't want to be a part of or see.Donkey shows usually take place in TJ.  It is when a donkey's penis penetrates a (sometimes kidnapped) women.an obscene performance in which a woman copulates with a [literal] jackassthe police (see also [fuzz station])Comes from the fact that a lot of police back in the 60's joined straight of the military and they brought with them the very short military haircut that gave them the appearance of fuzz on their heads. When they took their hats off, your first comment might be, hey look, it's the fuzz. It's a style of haircut that made wearing a police hat more comfortable and cooler to wear......still in vogue today and used by many police officers around the world.A slang word for the police used by poor greasers.the fuzz refers to the polices like [the heat] i think the word is derived from the police always being on your ass or in you face like [peach fuzz]The fuzz is a word used when your so frikkin high that when the cops come to bust your ass that u call them the fuzz because the crack and chron are blurring your vision.Means "son of" (hence all the English surnames like Fitzpatrick, Fitzhenry) but can also refer to an illegitimate child, a bastard, someone born out of wedlock etc.A nick name for someone with the last name Fitzpatrick or Fitzgerald.1. noun- full retard

2. verb- to instantaneously lose control of your bowels in an unannounced fashion. Usually resulting in going commando for the remainder of the day.

3. adj.- awesomer than everybody and everything around you.

4. adj- The inability to come up with a response to an insult, usually resulting in threats of sodomy.1.  A suitable name to dipsnap to.
2.  A kid who is popular because his name sounds cool if you say it loud enough.A boy who used to be hot, but glowed down a lot!When someone agrees to do something and changes their mind five seconds laterthe art of coordinating clothing and accessories with name brand shoesTo take your workload and pass it on to an unsuspecting co-worker.a cut on your thumb or a cut on any finger(V) Otherwise known as pulling a Terry Tate, to tackle a coworker in a surprising manner across a row of cubicles. The tackle might be as aggressive as a flying pile-driver or as subtle as kicking another's leg out from underneath him.Analagous to their malevolent movie counterparts, the modern-day Gremlin is most often found on weekends in between the hours of 1800 and 0400. When in its passive form, the Gremlin is most often a well-intentioned and meaningful contributor to society. However, when provoked (usually by means of an ex-girlfriend or obnoxious fool at the bar), the Gremlin first becomes forlorn and introspective, then mischevious, and in some cases violent.

If you encounter a fully manifested Gremlin, you are advised to stay clear (especially when the Gremlin is in a doorway). If you feel the need to intervene, it has been said a trip to Burger King can passify the creature.

The Gremlin will return to its natural state by morning, usually feeling embarassed and apologetic.1.) Little meshevious devils that cause problems with everything around you.
2.) Little red men with horns you see when you are stoned.
3.) Imaginary little devils you can blame shit on.A Gremlin is a woman who a man likes to fuck but doesn't want to go out past dark to eat with......because shes a beast to look at or emotionally unstable.The gremlin is a furry critter that will use her petit stature and nubile appearance to gain the trust of others. Upon making the mistake of trusting a gremlin, she will then lurk in dark corners and attack at any given moment. This evil hobbit will engage in acts of deceit and general tomfoolery as a means of social interaction. Characteristics of the gremlin will include:
-Rage blackouts
-Violent attacks from behind, especially on the knees
-Full speed bodychecks
-Stealing food from gardens
-The belief that she is average height, when she is in fact, gremlin height
-The use of such phrases as "frig-a-mug" and "go S a D"A drunk friend after midnight. You don't feed them.Girl doesn't get wet for you.Making weird or distractive noices revolving around food.
Being generally weird and always hungry and wanting foods such as chocolate or spaghetti bolognese!A small ginger creature, usually found in a darkened room eating ham sandwiches. She sleeps for most of her life and only wakes to scuttle to the kitchen to make a sandwich. Gremlins can be located in the London area and on a quiet night you can here the high pitch cackle when she is amused. By all means stay out of Gremlins way in the mornings.Your girls fucking clingy ass best friend. Have you ever wanted to do something with your girl but her clingy ass best friend is just jealous of you, and doesn't want your girl whom is her best friend doing something because she can't so she tells her not to and your girl listens to her? That right there is being a fucking GREMLIN! GREMLINS are needy as hell and their jealousy of you grows exponentially. You're basically fucked when it comes to gremlins...there's no cure to this shit.The small pieces of [weed] that sometimes don't get smoked because they got stuck to the top inside edges of your [bowl].What this fucking definition is, asshole.1. [n]  the action of attacking the enemy

2. [adj]  of an offensive substitute for inoffensive terminology; "`nigger' is a dysphemistic term for `African-American'"

3. [adj]  unpleasant or disgusting especially to the senses; "offensive odors"

4. [adj]  morally offensive; "an unsavory reputation"; "an unsavory scandal"

5. [adj]  causing anger or annoyance; "offensive remarks"

6. [adj]  for the purpose of attack rather than defense; "offensive weapons"
   
7. [adj]  violating or tending to violate or offend against; "violative of the principles of liberty"; "considered such depravity offensive against all laws of humanity"
   
8. [adj]  causing or able to cause nausea; "a nauseating smell"; "nauseous offal"; "a sickening stench"

 
 	Synonyms:	 	abhorrent, abusive, antipersonnel, assault(a), assaultive, attack(a), attacking(a), charnel, creepy, detestable, disgustful, disgusting, distasteful, dysphemistic, foul, ghastly, ghoulish, hideous, hit-and-run, horrid, horrific, incursive, insulting, invading, invasive, loathly, loathsome, marauding, morbid, nauseating, nauseous, noisome, objectionable, obnoxious, obscene, odoriferous, offence, offending, offense, on the offensive(p), opprobrious, outrageous, predatory, raiding, rank, repellant, repellent, repelling, repugnant, repulsive, revolting, scornful, scrimy, scurrilous, sepulchral, sickening, skanky, tip-and-run, unpleasant, unsavory, unsavoury, unwholesome, verminous, vile, violative, wicked, yucky
 
 	Antonyms:	 	defensive, euphemistic, inoffensive, savory, savoury, unoffending, ylbissopA highly subjective interpretation of something real, imagined, or interpreted as being demeaning; very often the use of complaint to attack someone while paradoxically assuming both authority and victimhood; the use of complaint as a sociopolitical weapon or vehicle to often unmerited benefit, privilege, or compensation.Describes a statement politically or ideologically inconvenient, esp. in the judgment of one having no knowledge of the matter at hand.  Often used to stifle further discussion or pander to the lowest common denominator.  Cf: [fair and balanced].What you see that you don't like when you look in the mirror.The act of attacking & destroying an enemy's self esteem; utilizing unconventional remarks, stirring the enemy's emotions making them unable to network an insult measuring to your ego. If done correctly, the enemy will leave in anger to cry or to write about it in their diary, resulting in a successful response: rage quitting.1. merely mentioning anything about your "lifestyle and/or preference to women"
2. reading a book for class that has the word gay on the cover(that in no way to sexuality)
3. watching a movie where a girl says she loves another girl in a friend way
4.anything having to do with gay rights1. To take a stance or position against a percieved [assault].

2. The quality of an [attack] used against an [opponent] or [enemy] during [battle].

3. To find an [opinion], [act], [object] or [situation] to be [detestable].ANYTHING. LITERALLY ANYTHING THESE DAYS. ANGSTY TEENS GET OFFENDED BY EVERYTHING. IT'S ANNOYING. TAKE A JOKE.a person on social media-especially ifunny-who hates on and/or reports fandoms, furries, bronies, emos, porn, lgbtq, and anything else they don't like. also known as a hater.having no shame.A person who has no shame in getting what they want...often on there knees for best resultswhen someone makes a really stupid mistake, normaly blondes (like me n terri)1) Short for the drug, Cocaine.
2) Short for the beverage, Coca Cola.An addictive soda.

An addictive drug.1. A popular short term for the popular soft drink Coca Cola.

2. A popular short term for the popular, a illegal, drug Cocaine.Any drink served in the SouthWhat I would live the rest of my life on if I had enough money1* soda
2* short for coca cola
3* cocaineA highly addicted substance that ravages both mind and body!

....also the name of a powdered narcotic.1. Hard arse stimulant.  White powder derived from the Coca plant, native of Sth. America.  Very expensive but in small quantities is a fine buzz...

2. Short for Coca Cola - essence of American capitalist pigdog.  Made from [bumsweat] and sugar.1.What kept Tony Montana standing in the last 10 minutes of "Scarface."

2.Warm, its the best rust remover on the planet. (Put a little Coke in a cup and put a nail or small piece of sandwich meat on top. In the morning, meat is gone, wipe off rust.)

3. More popular than you think. I mean cocaine.Always available at bars, both over the counter as a soft drink or mixer and everywhere from the guest lounge to the toilets.

Often the word media or media bar means coke freindly, due to the common opinion that any person working in the media profession is a coke user.One of the smartest medical dramas to ever have aired, House, M.D. features the maverick, anti-social doctor Gregory House (Hugh Laurie) who specializes in infectious diseases and does whatever it takes to solve the puzzling cases that come his way.  

A show that should rob this year's Emmys if not for its sheer quality then for Laurie's brilliant acting.n. a style of electronic music originating in the late 80's in the USA characterized by four-on-the-floor bpms between 110-140, synthesized melodies and bass lines.A slang word with a hundred different definitions, 90% that were made up on the fly here at urbandictionary.com, to the point where it could be substituted for so many words you have no idea what the f**k someone would be talking about if he/she used each and every one.probably one of the best medical dramas ever to hit television, features Hugh Laurie, who plays the anti-social, sarcastic, pain in the ass doctor, who specializes in recognizing infectious diseases. He and his team of doctors take on extremely hard cases, House usually ends being right about the disease at the end of the day.

This show is truly great and it murders Scrubs.Nothing more or less than the best TV show that ever was or ever will be. HOUSE FTW!!the MOST awesome show on television! (well, next to Scrubs) which stars the wonderful British actor, Hugh Lauire, as the genius, pain in the ass, Gregory House.1. (v) to consume a substantial quantity quickly, completely, and with purpose.
2. (v) to beat in competition.
3. (v) to dominate.Pronunciation  (hous)

House Music: The original electronic incarnation from disco. House typically runs around 120 beats per minute (BPM) and uses a 4/4 time sequence and an eight bar repeating cycle. The beat is maintained by a heavy kick drum that alternates in a 1-3 pattern with a high hat accent. Like its disco roots, house often features vocal choruses, real instrumentation, and a more traditional song structure.A fucking wooden or brick fucking place where you live eat and sleep in.A bigger older woman with sexual desires towards younger men. (Usually a housewife.)To run over on a football fieldA vehicle of a redneck, which he drives to a date with his girlfriend instead of carring grass for cows.another four-wheeled vehicle with a flat bed in the back used for storage of equipment, groceries, small recreational vehicles, tools, or extra people. The pickup truck (as previously described) is the most popular automobile among men.A large vechile presumably with a bed for hauling, moving, towing, or even storing what needs be.

The absolute worst thing a person could do to a truck would include the following (these are all sins of god, and you will be punished accordingly):
-lowering it 'til it's an inch or less from the ground
-adding neon lights
-adding a fuckin ricer exhaust system... which most of time would just include tips or some other retarded peice of chrome
-PUTTIN A FUCKIN SPOILER ON IT
-adding giant ass rims to it, then stretching these tiny ass treads over'em that look like they'll pop any second


A real fuckin truck would include the following:
-A "body-on-frame"
-A real fuckin engine, varies from size of the truck (ex. an S10 with a small block, a brand new giant Ram 2500 with a Cummins Diesel)
-Four wheel drive... because some of us have the balls to get off the blacktop, just for fun or required for certain jobs, which most of you BMW pricks would be afraid of, don't wanna raw up them soft hands
-bedliner

optional:
-a nice leveling kit and/or lift kit
-some differential lockers with some beefy axles
-winch
-good ol' 15"/16"/17" wrapped with some treads depending on what terrian you work/play in (crawlers, boggers, LT's, swampers, AT's, 32"-40", etc.)
-sway bars, roll bars
-engine upgrades

Trucks are great vehicles. They are designed to do things cars can't, and most of them are built solid like a rock. Last long. Work hard and play hard. Besides the MPG... why wouldn't you want a truck?The metal part underneath a skateboard that holds the wheels in place (kind of like an axle on a car).  Used for grinding (riding on rails or waxed services).They are the device that attaches the wheels to the [skateboard].When a person does something that you didn't expect or you are so amazed at what happend your speechless.Someone who draws negative attention by not having their shit together. Most commonly used in jail.a word to describe someone/things extreme greatness. it is also a multi use term and can mean anything. it also can be used as an action word.Connection, association, or interaction with a person/place/thing; usually used in a negative sense.The hair on the back of you neck that is nappy, un-tameableA woman's natural habitat.The room where grandma hides her shotgun shells.A mysterious place full of sharp, pointed objects, deadly gas-operated incinerators, things that go 'ping' and a big, cold wardrobe full of beer which is the only true incentive for entering the room in the first placeA nickname for the holdem hand ten three (T-3) offsuit, a term used by many prominent online poker players, and coined by the professional online poker player Jamie Armstrong, aka pokerjamersa word used to describe nappy-naps in the back of a females head...On the sitcom "Martin" he often uses this word to insult the character "Pam"...because her back edges are apparently nappy and rough...Where the goods are cooked, things are shipped/delivered, people get swerved, and basically all the dope shit happens. Sometimes referred to as the bakery.a sammich factorythe back of the nape. (usually used in the phrase nape of the neck).Afro-amerain women or southen women call it"The Kitchen"(Traditional) The place in a home where a woman belongssomething that happens when the condom breaks on prom nightThe worst STD ever.  Causes pain, poverty, and eighteen year of torture.Carrying developing offspring within the body.your end of life...

you are totally fucked.

OWNEDSupposed to be the happiest moment in a couples lives but the dumb asses who conceived by accident just ruin the definition.

Don't have sex until your ready for the consequences.The condition of being able to make twice as much money in the porn industry due to supply and demand.The blossoming of a new life...in your life.When are girl has a baby growing inside her! After she has had unprotected sex!This is what happens when a male and a female have sexual intercourse and the sperm fertilises one of the woman's eggs after ovulation.

Contrary to popular (male) belief, pregnancy is not the woman's fault, it takes 2 to tango if you know what I mean...

Women also do not get pregnant to 'trap' a man. Because if he was indeed worth holding onto, she would not need to get pregnant to keep him, nor would a rubbish guy stick around if he got a woman pregnant either. (See scum or coward)

Pregnancy is the aprox 40 weeks of gestation in which it takes a human being to develop and grow inside his or her mothers body before birth.

It is in 3 stages (known as trimesters)
Pregnancy is divided into three stages called trimesters, each of which lasts three months. The first trimester covers the first 12 weeks of your pregnancy. This stage is often the worst with morning sickness and fatigue as common symptoms.

The baby grows inside the uterus, gaining it's nutrition from the placenta and kept safe and protected by the amniotic sack.

The woman's body goes through serious changes both physical and mental.

The mental changes include, hormonal, she may feel depressed,anxious,happy and angry, her mood changes often, she is not going mad, she is just pregnant!

the physical changes include: her tummy growing (obviously)
her breasts growing and producing milk ready for the babies arrival, usually in later stages of pregnancy she may leak milk.
Her nipples will also swell and darken, her breasts will grow larger, she may also get other skin conditions depending on hormone levels.
Aside from good changes to her body she may also find her immune system is weak, leaving her susceptible to colds,flu and other virus' and infections. When a woman is pregnant, her immune system is in over drive to stop her body from rejecting the unborn baby.

Pregnancy can be both a wonderful and horrible experience for someone. (including the babies daddy who has to put up with a very hormonal pregnant lady)

And before any man can insult a pregnant woman let me just say, if you get a girl pregnant and blame her for it, she is not going to want or need you anyway, so don't think your so great :)
A baby growing up with one parent is better than a baby growing up with an asshole for a father.

Not all pregnancies end with a baby though.
Some women for what ever reason choose to terminate the pregnancy, this does not make a woman a bad person, If she is not ready or in a good position to have a child, or say she became pregnant after rape, then she may choose to abort. No one has the right to judge someone for terminating pregnancy. Abortion is neither right or wrong.
Some pregnancies also end in miscarriage, and some pregnancies are ectopic.

Pregnancy is a natural thing and without it the life of all species would cease to exist.1. A state a woman may find herself in after having unprotected sex with a man.  Involves a child growing within her body and can be discovered by the absence of menstruation.  May cause illness.

2. Bloated, held out, prolonged.

I'd also like to say something to all the men out there who think that getting a girl pregnant is a death sentence!
Being pregnant is a wonderful and painful experience that you'll never have, so just shut the hell up about your selfish views.  Women don't trap men by getting pregnant.  It's not their choice!The act of receiving a serious butt whoopin at the hands of a person or group of persons.A severe beating delivered with the hands and feet; a pummeling so bad, the recipient needs to use his health insurance; see [open a can of whup ass]A good, old-fashioned ass kickin',Assault by the police after being arrested1. To beat someone up very badly, to the point of them being on the ground. This can happen with a combination of the following:

* Punching
* Kicking
* Kicking [Balls]
* [Curbstomping]
* [Fist Fight]ing

After the victim is on the ground, various forms of abuse may happen. Beatdown is then concurred, and a broken limb is required before it's real beatdown.

2. Another way of expressing utter defeat of someone. Can be used in celebration or defeat.v. (1) to verbally berate into submission (publicly) (2) to physically rough up or convincingly administer authority over another person or thing (3) the exercise of legitimate authority, rules, or known customs which leaves a person or persons in a poor position and often disappointed.
n. the act of beating down (2) a disappointing and unexpected result to an attempted action1. A fistfight where the odds are stacked highly in one of the two participants favours, commonly resulting in broken bones and softening of the face.

2. The climax of a hardcore song, usually a down-tempo combination of palm muted open strings/extensive pinch harmonics and low end chords, where crowd participant's can quite simply unleash the beast on one another.

3. fucking awesome.To receive a BEAT DOWN would be equivalent to getting your ass seriously beaten by another person or persons; to have one's ass handed to them; to be "pounded into the ground" by someone who doesn't like you.the dance of the hardcore kid.... it is when the guitarist simply stums the D or C string open.....The act of pumbling, destroying, and smashing a disgusting creature, especially ostriches, salamanders, junebugs, armadillos, and orangutang. Beat downs are given if and only if the act of being crusty or ugly is committed. They are given very often and involve fists and feet, or anything wet.Yellow bread made from cornmeal ubiquitous in Southern cuisine; it is slightly sweet, and usually served with butter.A baked foodstuff for which the primary ingredient is maize, which many people call corn, a grain.  Tradition holds that the Pilgrims ate corn bread because it was a plentiful grain - and the only grain - readily available where they settled in Massachusetts.1. A food commonly eaten by big booty black bitches.

2. Ur ass cherry(virginity),A girl with an extremely large ass, this refers to the fact that she must "eat her cornbread" in order to obtain such a fine ass.Money a prostitute makes from performing anal sex acts, as in getting [cornholed].a staple in African-American cuisine, often served with greens, coated with yam juice.The most delicious bread on the planet that was invented by Indians and is made out of corn.A name that no one will take seriouslyReference to the song "No sex in the champagne room" by Chris Rock. In it he says "Cornbread. Ain't nothin' wrong with that." So this word means that someone is perfect and you can't find anything wrong with her, just like cornbread.An affirmative statement.  A word mumbled when in acquiescence with another.  Used in place of the words: agreed or indeed.

It can also be used in random outbursts when feeling elated or quirky.Where you sleep when you get your girlfriend mad; but not mad enough to be kicked out of the house.when a girl sits on your lap and subtly grinds your cock with her ass in public, pretending that shes not (like a couch dance)the second best thing to use next to the bed ;)One's system of morals or beliefsA piece of furniture more diverse than a coffee table.A word used to replace words such as "fuck", or "shit", and has multiple uses as saying "back off". Or it is a piece of furniture that is ussually sat on.referrers  to the "sit-able" [plateau] of an excessively [fat] [booty]couch - an offensive term used to diminish someones social standing. Inferring that the person in question enjoys anus on his/her face.

A amicable term in some social spheres.The place where young children get ston'd in the morning.A lazy person.The reproductive system (gender neutral).Bhe act of saving a life when a person is drowning or choking by repetitively thrusting one's penis in and out of the person's throat. The thrusting creates a plumbing effect that forces the obstruction to move up the throat. This action is in no way sexual; it should only be used during times of grave danger.The act of purposefully stopping up your toilet so that the plumber will come to your house and unclog it.Wearing one's pants so low as to display one's asscrack. Derived from the state of many a fat plumber's pants.(verb) Very deep anal penetration
Deep-sea plumbing: Anal penetration over 10 inchesGeneric term for the bars of a jail cellTo forcefully insert a hollow metal pipe into the rectum of a woman and suck out all of faecal matter. It is similar to a [filthy fiddler].Plumbing is a sexual act involving a man and a female. The aforementioned male pops his penis in the girl's vagina, lubricating her ring, tickling and widening the said orifice. When that there hole is at maximum size, the man pops the scrotum and both balls in that bottomless pit of love.Any brass wind instrument, because of the appearance of the tubing.A Farm-veihicle that can pull farm-implements.  Tractors are usually used to pull items, and often have a [Front-end Loader] attacthed.Something you like, alot, think is attractive.A really, really fat girl that you bang because your stupid/high/desperate.A Techie, and a Actor; this person does both on stage and behind stage work, for theater.  This term was invented by WMHS Techie/Actors who needed a name in MoCoSomething really good. Mostly used in Kansas but also widely used throughout the midwest.An insult describing, someone who is slow and annoying.Big ass black bitch screwing a little white man while intoxicated.One who has ways from the rural Southern U.S., particularly Texas and most particularly, the town of Thorton, TX.word for female genitals.
aka. twat lol.(TRAK-tor) Used with [trash] to create [tractor trash]. Describes [white trash] from predominantly farming communities.Any opposite sex escort taken to an event in an effort to give a homosexaul person the apperance of being out on a date with a person of the opposite sex.a man or woman used as a cover for a gay partnerA female or male(though,mainly female) who is used as a cover-up for a homosexual.The single most manly, and great thing a man can do. To have a beard is to be a true man. If you have a beard, show it off proudly, and enjoy the satisfaction of the envy in the eyes of people around you who don't have beards. If you don't have a beard, grow one. If you cant grow one and your not past puberty yet, hold out my young friend, your time will come. If you don't have a beard and your past puberty, go get that sex change you know you need.The best solution to any problem. A sort of spiritual band-aid that's only effective when used by men.A common word used to address a homosexual's female friend who he takes around town; he normally calls this companion his "girlfriend" to prove to the world that he is a masculine, football watching, titty grabbing heterosexual male. Although, he may think that this so called 'image' is working, he's actually fooling himself. It's completely obvious to on-lookers that he is a flamboyant homo. Gayer than a chihuahua in pink shades. 

Here are some warning signs that you may be a beard...

1. He wears more makeup than you.
2. He looks fucking FIERCE in pictures 'cause he smiles wit' his eyes.
3. Uses bronzer as blush
4. Plucks his own eyebrows and his eyebrows look more groomed than yours.
5. Stands with hands on his hips.A condition that causes hair to grow from the chin and lower face. Symptoms include itching, divinity and gratuitous awesomeness.

Synonyms include: Jesus.The term 'Beard' is used to describe a person who is being used by another person to cover something up. This can range from gay men using a girlfriend as a beard to make people think he is straight, or someone using a friend to make people think they are hanging out with them when really they are with someone else.1. A boy or girl hired as a celebritys boyfriend/girlfriend by that celebritys management, usually for publicity.when a gay man and a gay woman date each other to hide that fact that they're gaya woman's hair arranged at the back of her head, held together with a band and to be used by a man as a handle while receiving oral sex from a willing female.

A straight ponytail is grasped near the base in a male's fist, medium grip. This allows nice control of the female's head, but is limiting due to awkward bending of the male's wrist. It is a carpal tunnel syndrome hazard for men who receive a high volume of blowjobs. The height of the ponytail on the back of the woman's head can be adjusted for better torque.

Another type of ponytail is the balled ponytail. The straight ponytail is simply folded under itself and tucked back into the band, resembling a ball of hair. Grasped with an open palm, the fingers should meet at the band, thus the "ball" is contained in the man's hand. Called the "palm sander" grip, it allows full control of the woman's head with no wrist strain.

A third type of ponytail is the double ponytail. Two tails are formed toward the rear left and right sides of the female's head. A favorite among bikers as each tail can be grasped by a separate hand. The willing lady's head is steered like a motorcycle.

Caution: though clearly sexual stimuli for men, it is important for men to remember women do not always view it in the same context. Women often use ponytails just to keep hair out of their faces. The confused male should never just assume when a woman's hair is in a ponytail her head is ready for mounting. He should always ask first.Ponytail; verb.  To grab a girl by her ponytail and remove her from whatever current situation she is in.1) the thing that's on a ponies butt

2) when a person with long hair puts it in a singular hair elasticA meme that took the Bioware Social Network by storm in anticipation for Dragon Age 2.

The second day of live feed from gamescom in Germany proved to be nothing but slow, dull hours of people standing by the DA2 booth and taking pictures in front of its poster.

Bored, the online viewers took note of one booth workers' Godly hairstyle of a long, blonde ponytail-braid. So enthralled were they that within just a couple hours; a Facebook page, several threads, a Chant of Ponytail (parody of DA:O's Chant of Light) and a social group on the Bioware forums had been created in honor of her.

Bioware remarked on it via Twitter, and Ponytail occasionally waved at the camera and appeared generally entertained by her sudden popularity from her self-titled army.Where a girl puts her hair up in a single rubber band.
why:
So she can smack a bitch
So she can smack someone in the face with her hair
To try and impress someone
To give head

It also the most impossible thing to do when you have messy, snarled hair i do not reccomend it you will look terrible unless you have bobby pins to fix that shitGetting alot of head.Basically it is a term used for people whose skin color is darker than most. Normally referred to as "nigger", "negro", "knee's grow", or "samo-niggaz". They are typically found wandering around in Compton shooting down samo-niggaz, also if you are trying to find them in the dark, say a funny joke it will make them laugh and you will see their teeth. For example: "What do you get when you cross a samoan and a negro?" -pause- and then say "SAMO-NIGGGGAAZZ!!!!!" in a very niggerish accent. When you come across a ponytail you have to holler at them for example...When someone has a cock stuck on the back of their head that resembles a cleft of hair being draped down the back of their neck.(from a hairstyle popular with the people described, usage invented by Kaecyy in 2005)

A generally amiable but hopelessly nerdy person-- not necessarily possessing an actual ponytail or even long hair-- who is usually immersed in a combination of science fiction and fantasy literature (and their derivatives), roleplaying games (often in their live action varieties), the gothic-industrial subculture, and/or the historical reenactment of pre-industrial periods of European history (often at what are called "Renaissance fairs")-- among other influences-- to or nearly to the point of lifestyle.Ponytail is when a gay or bi guy gets mad at his balding lover for not satisfying him sexually. When his lover falls asleep, he jacks off on the guy's bald spot and then  affixes a tube sock to it. The guy wakes up with a "ponytail". A variation of the [superman].A man who is fascinated with large breasted women, who as a child was deprived of his mother's breast milk and was a bottle fed baby.Heroin supplier; a penny balloon that contains narcoticsa heroin dealerslang for [condom]; slang for protection during sex.A woman's breasts, AKA [boobs], [tits], [jugs], [hooters], [knockers].Elegant strip club located at 233 Porno Ave in Providence, RI. Famous for allowing men (and women) of all ages, including those 15-17.  Home of the infamous "referee" (bouncer) who also offers lap dances for a discounted price.A fool; a person who has just made a pretty obvious mistakeBalloons are used to hold heroin (usually low grade H). A dealer will use un-filled balloons (the multi-colored, water balloons, most of the time) to place a small, universal weight, amount of heroin into. The weight of the heroin inside each balloon can vary depending on who packaged or "tied" them. The amount is usually about .1grams per balloon. People buy them in packs of 10 or more, and rarely buy/sell a single "balloon." Rumor has it, the reason heroin was originally put into these balloons, was so you could swallow them if need be, and not need medical attention.Another name for [breasts].A very weird thing that is basically a colored plastic sack of your breath to give your friend on their birthday.1. A source of information.

2. A source of entertainment.

3. A tool barely used by todays societies, because it is not 'cool' to read a book.verb meaning to run or to leave in a hurryan object used as a coaster, increase the hight of small children, or increase the stability of poorly built furniture.What people don't read enough today.cool: the first option given when trying to type 'cool' in a text message using t9Did you know there HAVE been books printed since the fifties and the new ones are cool?  They have them so anyone can understand them.  Books can be about video games, sex, drugs, sports, people, pretty much everything.  They come with cuss words, funny characters and you might understand some more of you those weird things...that's right. Words.Something we stopped caring about after the [internet] came along.Portable sanctuaries.Words assembled on pages. They usually tell stories of things the reader is interested in. That is, unless you're reading in [school]. Then, you have to read books nobody cares about or even likes. Maybe more people would like reading if they weren't forced to read books that they didn't like. I know I would.cool.

In the T9 predictive text on cell phones, the numbers 2665 spell both "book" and "cool," but "book" is the first word to display. To save time, it is left and understood to mean "cool."The best thing in the worldthe reason you need a new hard drive.The traditional way for young female Americans to afford university education (those not from wealthy families).A great American pastime.something that both sexes can enjoy.Arousing materials usually employed for masturbatory purposes.

It's often said that the most senstive part of your body during a porn session is your ears - no one likes getting busted with their undies around their ankles.

But, the use of porn doesn't need to be such an ugly experience.  'The Big Wank' (see below) is an example of how you can add more mystique and romance to your evening at home alone.peas and corn mixed together in a bowln. Reading and viewing material, otherwise known as 'cliterature'.Will never die, as long as there are folks willing to strip for the camera, the people who wish to browse it, and the assholes who wish to destroy it.something that the user loses interest in after masturbation has occurredhairy mofo.Heartless, 
Having no emotions,v. used to describe something awesome or nice ; something worthy of hatinBetter than [cool]
To be cooler than cool
The coolest level of coolwhat a girl says she is when she wants to snuggle :]plain, obviously, flat out, straight upan annoying and contagious illness that causes sniffling, sneezing, coughing, and other symptomsharsh, mean, icyCold was a rock band that started in 1986. They released 4 cd's: Cold, 13 ways to bleed on stage, year of the spider, and a different kind of pain. They also released an ep called Oddity. The band consisted of lead singer Scooter Ward, Matt Louhgran, Zachary Gilbert, both guitarists, Jeremy Marshall on bass, and Sam McCandless on drums. Former members included Mike Booth, Sean Lay, Terry Balsamo, Kelly Hayes and Eddie Rendini.
On February 27, 2006, Ward left a message on their official website saying they had disbanded. However, he said he and Sam will continue writing music.An infectious disease that usually spreads like wildfire around people, because people don't give a shit worth about others. They would yawn cough and not wash their hands properly to prevent others from catching the cold. If you catch a fucking cold, don't cough, cover your fucking mouth, and if you go to either 1-12 grades, go to the back of the class, and don't spread your fucking cold.Pretty, beautiful, hot1- *FRIDGE; - ph-ry-dJG ; verb- the action of destroying or assassinating a persons anus with a penis of considerable magnitude often resembling a 57 bus. The action, ususally performed in a violatory sense, produces the aftermath of either one of the following symptoms; laseration and/or complete tearing of the anal orifice, the dissemination of part or the entirety of the subjects' internal organs where the giant girder cock forced its entry, and/or the complete annihliation of the victims existance to the extent where it would be more appropriate to use the remains to bury the compost that would have been used to otherwise bury the remains.

2- As above but via a huge hit during a Football game.

3- Literally a Football player of such magnitude that he resembles a walking samsung fridge/freezer combo.someone who has never french kissedshort version of refridgeratorAn extremely cool person, the phrase was coined by BriBry (A YouTuber with 21,000+ subscribers) on a blogTV show in April 2011.A girl who is frigid and only hangs out with girls. Perhaps the date, but they are too scared to do anything.

They also are overly sacarstic.someone who hasn't got on (french kissed) anyone yet.place to store cold drinks and food

since when do u keep ice-cream in da fridge-noun, /frɪdʒ/: A common kitchen appliance used to store and preserve dead human bodies and body parts for consumption.Anyone from Shenendehowa HS knows that the fridge is 'a place to go sit and chill'A very appealing being full of human desires. When the fridge is full, it can make anyone very happy. But when not full, it has the potential to kill.A maker of [trouble] is not one who "causes" trouble, but who achieves a level of trouble by being [Mischievous], [Stunning]!, [Sensational]! and [Smart]...1. When knowingly, and consciously getting into trouble with no regard or care for the potential repercussions.

2. When one said person has one or more warrants for their arrest at one time.
3. If your name is Brittany Rivera.(n). 1. A poo that is very stubborn, requires a lot of force to eject., 2. Hardened feces which is lodged at the anus, preventing soft feces behind it to pass.

Example. "Where's a magazine? I've got a trouble-maker to work out."A troublemaker is someone who expresses a view on a forum that differs from those of the Administrator and/or, as is more common, a moderator of a forum. The person deemed to be a troublemaker will usually be 100% correct in their statements, but the moderator will object, making statements that could be classified as being a [bigland].

As a result the troublemaker will then be told to go and form their own forum, even though everything they said was both reasonable and correct.When you pair a shot of tequila with a Guinness.[Spike],the troublemaker. Generally considered out to [lunch]. Known for wildly outlandish behavior. Highly unstable antisocial personality however incredibly sexy.a person who escalates a situation.Someone who brings about or initiates something.A person who starts fights or arguments.A blow up alligator; short for instant gator.A person who instigates.  To instigate is to conspire, plan and prank the local populationtype of person that gets information from people by overhearin wat they say ...and then tell their bestfriend <3Bunty, officially known as the instigator.1. (before 1997) Something really bad; a failure

2. (after 1997) Something considered excellent and/or the best (uses modifier "the")something very cool/ goodA graffitti slang wordrefers to a person male/female who's attractive , on they steez and or carries themselves well .Fast Graffiti Pieces, more than two colors, uses all of your letters. not much details just enough to look good and be on your way.(verb) the act of writing a grafitti tag in a highly visible public place.To fail spectacularly.Something you never say on air airplane.Slang for Ecstasy pillscool, awesome. Also see shita baby cat! sometimes they can't meow properly yet and they are sooo cute!An baby [cat]. Also known as a [kitty]. They have sharp little claws and teeth and can be nasty sometimes, but they are soft, cute, and totally lovable. Their meow is just precious to hear. Be gentle; kittens are delicate.1.  An immature cat.
2.  An adorable ball of fur with big eyes that uses its powers of cuteness to manipulate human beings into submission and slavery.
3.  An adorable, yet insane, tiny monster with teeth and claws.Cute little fluffballskitten (kit'en) n. 

 A small, sometimes domesticated animal; usually a pet; a member of the cat family, wants to grow up to be a lion, tiger, leopard, etc; thinks the world revolves around her; is probably right.little fluffy bastardsa woman who likes to date men older than her, usually by about 10 years, or more depending on the woman. Also the opposite of a cougar.The casualties of masturbation.(n) Term of coolness for a female from the 1950's and still used in [rockabilly] circles.Small balls of fluff that people perceive as being "cute". Everytime you do something naughty, they die.random weather patterns. makeing meteorology nearly imposibleThe 17th state of the United States -- in 1803. Contains 13,000,000 people and its chief cities are Cleveland, Cincinnati, and the capital of Columbus. Ohio is known for being the home of the Wright Brothers, the first man in space, more presidents than any other state, and Generals William T. Sherman and U.S. Grant. Also home of the champion OSU Buckeyes. Unlike what others may tell you, there are larger hellholes in the universe. Ohio has a lot to offer and is a decent place full of decent people.A land of shifting mists, Ohio is the most mysterious state in America.  There are some who claim that it does not exist at all, but is merely a hoax perpetrated by a strong core of dedicated jokesters in the "neighboring" states of Michigan, Pennsylvania, Indiana, and West Virginia (we're pretty sure no one tells Kentucky anything).  

Most people believe, however, that Ohio DOES in fact exists, and that its mystery is due solely to the mysterious mists that seem to enshroud the entirety of the state in...well...mystery, deterring all but the most stalwart of travelers.  Constituents to this belief also hold that Ohio is, in fact, the last home of the dinosaurs, and that Ohioan economy is based almost solely on quarrying and agricultural works using highly-trained dinosaurs as the primary (and literal) beasts of burden.The Buckeye State. One of the best states to live in, and all around best in the Union. We have 3 major cities: our Capital; [Columbus] (aka C-Bus, Bus Town), [Cincinnati] (aka the dirty/nasty Nati) and [Cleveland] (the Mistake by the Lake). Home to smaller cities such as; Dayton, Toledo and Akron. 1 NBA team, 1 NHL team, 1 MLS team, 2 NFL teams, 2 MLB teams. We are also home to THE Ohio State University Buckeyes, one of the largest/best universities in the country. Also home to Ohio University, which is filled with raging alcoholics that refer to themselves as "students". Most of us in Ohio, (especially us in Columbus) were born and raised with the Bucks. We bleed Scarlett & Grey. We say things like "you guys" and a drive-thru liquor store is not strange to us. It's the beach, not the shore, and pop, not soda. We are the Eastern most state in the MidWest, and have some of the friendliest people around. Ohio girls are some of the coolest/nicest you will ever meet. We are a big football state, but Lacrosse is another sport everyone plays. We play a little game called [Cornhole] anywhere we can. We love our corn & we love our beer. We are Ohio. The Heart of it All, and you'd be nothing without us.The only place in the world where you can experience all four seasons in one week.A chant that occurs in Columbus, Ohio between 2 individuals or 2 groups of people who are too stupid to get that not everyone they see gives a rat's ass about sports and can't spell the name of the four letter state they live in without help from other idiots. Proof that OSU students don't learn anything but how to get arrested, drink, fight, watch football and date rape each other. Anyone who yells "O-H" at you in Columbus is a complete waste of flesh and deserves to get their ass kicked.1) One of the states of the United States of America.
Home to a bunch of formerly bad but now improving pro sports teams, a ton of colleges, the OSU Buckeyes, actual buckeyes, part of the Rust Belt, Cedar Point and a lot of soybeans, cows, and corn.
Ohio contains a little bit of all the typical Midwestern environments- college towns, suburbs, cities, urban areas trying to reinvent themseles, farmlands, etc.  It also contains part of Appalachia, and a large number of "swing voters".  It has quite a few ardent liberals and conservatives, and has been the home and/or birthplace of eight presidents.  The weather, it being part of the Midwest region, is often "crazy" and swings between hot, mild, cold, and freezing.  The four seasons are widely known to be "winter, still winter, almost winter, and construction" or something to that effect (believed to be taken from a Jeff Foxworthy chain email).
There's definitely a lot more there than bad drivers, "hicks", and cows, and just driving through the state does not really do it justice.  You've got to experience it to really understand it, and then you can pass judgement.
2) A song written by Neil Young (while he was working with Crosby, Stills, Nash, and Young) in response to the [Kent State Massacre], which occured at Kent State University in Ohio on May 4, 1970 when National Guardsmen opened fire on student protesters on the KSU campus.I used to think that this state was propably the most suckish, boring state EVER.
I think a lot differently now.
Here are a few things about this Awesome state.

HISTORRRYYY
This was one of the first states of the Northeast, Established in 1803. The three main cities are Columbus, the capitol, Cleveland, and Cinncinati.
The Wright Brothers were raised in Ohio.
So were eight of America's presidents.
Aaand the first man to walk on the moon.
Akron was the first town to use police cars.
Cleveland was the first fully electric powered city.
Also the first state to use traffic lights.
And many many other things that I can't remember.

TIPS, HINT, AND INFO FOR ANY TOURIST...

1; STAY. AWAY. FROM. SPRINGFEILD. TOWNSHIP. This is basically the cespoo of Ohio. Unless you are crazy, like everyone else that lives in that weird place :D

2; ..I suggest dont go to Toledo.

3; If you have the courage to yell, 'I LOVE MICHIGAN' in a public area...You. Will. Be. Eaten. Alive. Unless you're in Toledo.

4; When you hear someone yell, 'O-H', you yell 'I-O'. Dont ask questions. Just do it. 

5; Don't. Diss. OSU. You will also be eaten alive for that also. Again, unless you're in Toledo

6; In response to number one, stay away from Ellet too.

7; Our weather is crap and very unpredictable. Deal with it. I suggest bringing snowboots in the middle of summer and shorts in the dead of winter.

8; Only we can diss our state. If you diss it, we'll agree with you for that second, then again, eat you alive.

9; There's a 3/4 chance you will be eaten alive.

So, that's only 1/4 of the stuff in Ohio. Come here to figure out the rest for yourself :D
But...Try not to be eaten alive...America is the melting pot of the world; Ohio is the melting pot of America.  There will never be a pot more melting than Ohio.  Some say this makes Ohio a blurry combination of everything, and that it is not very distinct among the states, but this is cantrary to the truth.  No other state is like Ohio, in that it is a melting pot.  Also, Ohio's flag is one of only three non-rectangular significant world flags, and the only non-rectangular flag of the states.  Ohio's also cool cuz I live there.Ohio is the heart of America and is well known for it's amusement park in Sandusky Ohio called Cedar Point, which has over fourteen rides and loads of tourists come summer.

Ohio also has a huge historical background which can be seen almost everywhere you go.

Ohio is one of the states with the most American accent.

It's pronounced, OH-HIGH-OH, not OH-HAI-UH. If you go to any person who was raised in Ohio they will laugh at you for pronouncing it differently than 99% of America.

Ohio rivals with Michigan about sports, and they don't like each other because Michigan thinks Ohioan's drive slow -- while Ohioans think they drive like bats out of hell. (Which they do.)

Most of Ohio is taken up by farms and fields, but don't judge it by the land, for there is many neat things you can discover in Ohio.The religious belief that every word of the sacred texts is literally true; stereotypically in Christianity and taken to such extremes. See also: [fundamentalist].A group of people comprising 0.002% of the world's population yet drawing unproportional amount of media coverage (especially Israeli Jews).1. Someone who practices Judaism.

2. Derogatory term for someone tight with their money or someone not very generous.The only people in the world that are simultaneously hated by both the extreme Left and the extreme Right.

Synonym: [scapegoat]A person of the jewish faith.Let's Clear up some of the Misconceptions in these postings.

A Jew is a person who's mother is Jewish. (Some streams of Judaism argue that Jewish patrimony can be acquired through the father as well). 
Jews are not a race but an eclectic mix of different races, nationalities, and cultures; they are a truly multi-cultural and multi-ethnic people. However, within this mix, there are distinct ethnic groups such as the Ashkenazic and Sephardic Jews that make up the overwhelming majority of the Jewish People. 
Most American Jews are of Ashkenazic origin -- usually originating from Eastern Europe or the former Soviet Union. Therefore, American Jews could largely be classified as an ethnic group, hence the characteristic stereotypes, although there are exceptions.
 A Jew is not a person who practices Judaism, although most Jews do adhere to some form of Jewish practice or cultural tradition.
 A Jew is not an Israeli and an Israeli is not a Jew. An Israeli is a citizen of the state of Israel. While most Israeli's are Jewish, there are also non-Jewish citizens of Israel. 
A Jew is not automatically a citizen of the state of Israel. A Jew must apply for and be granted citizenship to the state just like everyone else, although most are awarded citizenship rather easily.1) someone who practises judaism

2) is also a culture/ethnicity, that is to say it has a certain sense of humour, certain type of food and music etc.

3) A person who Mel Gibson talks smack about after he has had too much to drink.A southern bastardization and contraction of the two words "did you".Something you blame something.Like Christians, but without all that Jesus stuffone who practices the world's oldest monotheistic religionLacking any class. Dumb and unartful, like most of the words in this dictionary.
[fool]the classy way of saying awkward. use it.Adjective

gauche (comparative more gauche, superlative most gauche)

Positive
gauche
		

Comparative
more gauche
		

Superlative
most gauche

   1. Awkward or lacking in social graces; bumbling.

          Quotations:
              * "Seeking by vulgar pomp and gauche display" — Samuel Griswold (1793-1860)nuveau riche, "cursi", expensive but tackySocially ackward and lacking Social experienceThe hair on a dogs cock after the lipstick has been withdrawn.Male genitalia. Pronounced "gooch".A girl's boyfriend/crusha classy, sophisticated manner, much like audrey hepburn. it is classy, glamorous, without being a pushover, and without being flashy. its an element of class.Glam without being trampy - attention grabbing class! It is sophisticated, intelligent, and gorgeous.Chic is an elegant fashion sense, that is also very glamorous, and does NOT mean a girl, thats CHICK!Hard to define, a certain eliment of style and sophistication in your fashion sense. Almost artisticly stylish (don't ask).An abbreviation for Cherry Coke. Commonly herd in the hood.It's simply just another word for stylish.

FACTVery attractive lady with an air of elegance flowing around her but at the same time she is very friendly and approachable.

She is a very genuine character and there's nothing pretentious about her.

Very sexy but not slutty, not a skank. She dresses herself decently, and appropriately.To be super stylish. One of the cool people. Effortlessly awesome.An abbreviation of the word chica that close girlfriends or besties say to one another. Usually girls who are called this are hot, sassy and feisty!One of the tightest disco-funk band of all time.to groom a man.  Shaving, waxing, cleaning up the superfluous fur.A term used to define male grooming below the belt. A male can use both an electric razor or a regular razor. A Mach 3 is preferable with the ladies on the testicular area. No female likes to deal with hairy balls, so men must education themselves on proper manscaping and maintenance techniquesWhen men shave or trim their cock and ballsA mans grooming of his body hair.  Like landscaping, but for the body."I have no idea what this is."

- Jonathan GoldsmithA fine artform exclusive to men;  the continued upkeep of exceptional hygeine and strategic hair removal as they pertain to the male body.For a guy to trim his pubic hair or to style it fashionably.To trim male pubes back to a reasonable bush."I have no idea what this is"
- Jonathan GoldsmithA word used to discribe the shaving of a Males pubic /chest/ and back hairs.

-Its pronounced like Landscaping but with a (man) instead of (land).Describes the complicated love and affection shared by two straight males.-noun
1. A [non-sexual] [relationship] between two men that are unusually close.

-verb  -mans-ing
1. The act of wooing a fellow male friend for the purpose of becoming closer.
2. Going to unusual lengths in an attempt to become closer with another male friend.

also: "Bromancing the Stone"
1. The act of truly and thoroughly  enjoying the process of getting and/or being high/stoned. 

Provenance/Origin: "Bromance" is a [portmanteau] of the two words "brother" and "romance". Originally coined by author/editor Dave Carnie in "Big Brother Magazine." [Big Brother] was a sort of R rated [skateboarding]/skate culture magazine that was eventually purchased by [Larry Flynt]'s [Hustler] [conglomerate] and consequently taken out of [circulation] due to unsatisfactory sales [performance]. Carnie used the word on several occasions to describe relationships between [skate-buddies] who spent a lot of time together and/or shared hotel rooms on every tour/skate [road trip].A close relationship between two bros to such a point where they start to seem like a couple.The relationship between two straight guys. They enjoy each others company and even though they may constantly joke about being gay they are not.a highly formed friendship between male friends, or "bro's".(N) The intense complicated love shared between two heterosexual males that consists of but not limited to wrestling, numerous man-dates, and tons of other stories that will only remain between the two.

Also a form of male bonding to such a point where they start to seem like a couple.

This bond is normally only shared between two males that have a deeper understanding of each other, in a way no woman could ever realize.Bromance

-noun

A strictly non-sexual relationship between two completely heterosexual men that are close and enjoy eachothers company but still enjoy the company of women.What House and Wilson or George Clooney and Brad Pitt have.

Dating back to Plato and Socrates, a close but non-sexual relationship between two men. The whole is greater than the sum of the individual parts.

To girls this means, George Clooney + Brad Pitt>George Clooney or Brad Pittwhen two guys have a very close bond, to the point where they act like a couple, except that they are both straight. Signs of a bromance include, but are not limited to: knowing what the other is thinking, hanging out 27/7, hugging, extensive high-fiving, and sharing clothes. Some famous examples include Sherlock Holmes and Watson, and Captain Kirk and Spock.Noun- An intense and extreme non-sexual bond between two straight males. Said to be a “deep emotional bond” that no woman could satisfy.As a rule of thumb, it is profoundly unwise to take crack-cocaine. The brain has evolved a truly vicious set of negative feedback mechanisms. Their functional effect is to stop us from being truly happy for long. Nature is cruelly parsimonious with pleasure. The initial short-lived euphoria of a reinforcer as powerful as crack will be followed by a "crash". This involves anxiety, depression, irritability, extreme fatigue and possibly paranoia. Physical health may deteriorate. An intense craving for more cocaine develops. In heavy users, stereotyped compulsive and repetitive patterns of behaviour may occur. So may tactile hallucinations of insects crawling underneath the skin ("formication"). Severe depressive conditions may follow; agitated delirium; and also a syndrome sometimes known as toxic paranoid psychosis. The neural aftereffects of chronic cocaine use include changes in monoamine metabolites and uptake transporters. There is down-regulation of dopamine D2 receptors to compensate for their drug-induced overstimulation. Thus the brain's capacity to experience pleasure is diminished.Crack is something that is sold by both drug dealers and prostitutes. The only difference is that a prostitute can wash her crack and sell it again.Another form of cocaine:  2 parts cocaine to one part baking soda, with a little water, heat gently until a precipitate forms: this is your crack1. Smokeable cocain 
2. A program to unlock trial versions of programs 
3. "[butt cleavage]"Otherwise known as crack-cocaine, this illegal drug is a mixture of two parts cocaine and one part baking soda. This chemical process reverts the powder-cocaine mkaing process by one step, producing a smokable form of the naturally found alkaloid cocaine. Because of its nature as an inhalable substance, the high is quicker and more intense, leading to a larger number of addicts. In present society, it is considered to be much more distasteful to use crack-cocaine then powder-cocaine as crack is mainly viewed as a drug for poor people whereas powder cocaine is used by a richer constituancy. Contrary to popular belief, crack-cocaine is not freebase cocaine. Freebase cocaine is a mixture of cocaine, ether, and other dangerous and combustable materials. Baking soda was replaced as the ingredient in the 1980's to make production easier and less dangerous. Either way, crack and freebase cocaine produce the same smokable form of the drug.A small, illegal program who's sole purpose is to trick another program (by editting, imputting a registration key, or some other method) into thinking it has been registered.The area between the ass cheeks and, in females, including the crevices of the genitalia.Basically, crack is silly, intentionally non-serious, and has a high tendency to be extremely crazy and unfounded, such as purposeful [OOC]-ness or playing on cliches, inside jokes, and/or [fanon].
  
The term crack probably stems from crack as in crack cocaine, as opposed to a crack in a wall. As in, so horrendously unfounded/silly that only one could have come up with it while under the influence of crack.Something that is great, awesome, good.NOUN:
1. The solid form of the illicit, recreational drug, cocaine.
2. A small gap on the surface of an object.
3. An illegally obtained password or file to a copyrighted computer program.

ADJECTIVE:
1. The quality or state of excellence. (often used to describe music)
2. Having a small gap on the surface of an object. [-ed]

VERB:
1. To make a small gap on the surface of an object.
2. To illegally pass through some form of passive security (often used with computer programs, see NOUN-3).
3. To punch someone in an altercation.
4. To start. [-ing]
5. To be occurring. (often used in the greeting, "What's crackin'?!")An abbreviation for methamphetamine, a drug that stimulates the central nervous system by causing it to release more dopamine, a neurotransmitter that gives someone a feeling of satisfaction.a horrible drug that ruins lives, breaks up families, and does considerable damage to one's looks (its true, look at the before and after pictures). All the people who write definitions promoting it have no idea, and will be o-so-happy when all of their teeth fall out :)the stupidest shit EVERAn abbreviation for [methamphetamine], a drug that stimulates the central nervous system by causing it to release more dopamine, a neurotransmitter that gives someone a feeling of satisfaction.A stupid drug made used and made by [white trash] that's made out of cold medicine and other easily obtained chemicals.The lonely situation you find yourself in, after using methamphetamine. Typically, broke, with no job, falling apart, stuttering, wondering why you pulled into this parking lot "What the hell was I doing just now?" when all your "new best friends" have left you for better and you feel like it's the end of the world.A drug for fuckups.. Invented by some japenese guy approx. 80 years ago.. The hippie version is speed...Will fuck up ones life and their love ones; HIGHLY addictive, probably the most addictive drug; not only popular with so called "white trash" but very big in the Filipino community all across USA. (esp. cali, vegas, NY & JERSEY). Most users/dealers/runners and THE SOURCE know or have "heard" of one another.

They say, "don't knock it, until you TRY it" or "Try anything once", etc. etc. CRYSTAL METH does NOT apply to these sayings! DO NOT TRY IT!1. The reason why it is so hard to get decent over the counter meds for your freaking hayfever. 2. [Crack] for [rural] and [suburban] white people.Short for methamphetamines. The most highly addictive illicit narcotic made from all sorts of deadly toxins: metals, cold medicines, rat poison, chlorine, bleach, etc. The drug is so dangerous and deadly, that it can explode when being produced incorrectly. Unfortunately, the drug has a strangle hold on America and destroys cities, families, and eventually the addict themself. It makes the addict lose their looks, teeth, health, personality, etc. On the streets its known as ICE, SPEED and CRYSTAL METH. The drug turns you into a loser and eventually a criminal and convict. It is highly addictive because it stimulates the central nervous system, giving a feeling of euphoria and relaxation. Meth is the fastest-growing illegal drug in the United States, and is actually growing the fastest among caucasians in upper middle-class suburbs and rural areas.Gin is an unaged [liquor] made by [distill]ing [grain]s such as [barley], [corn] or [rye]. Its [bouquet] comes from [juniper] berries, [coriander], [herb]s and [spice]s, usually added to the grain mash during [distillation]. The gin is stored in [glass], [earthenware] or [stainless steel] containers, but does not mature in these. The storage time serves only to harmonize the product.

Someone once said that "A [bar] without gin is like an Italian kitchen without pasta". No other [liquor] provides for the creation of so many classic [cocktail]s. Gin is in fact a liquor that is harmonious with almost anything.

Without gin the king of [cocktail]s, the dry [Martini], would not exist.An often strong liquor, usually clear but with a strong smell, much like rubbing alcohol. Sold under brands like Gordon's 'London Dry Gin' and Bombay 'Sapphire'. Often used to escape life temporarily or make high skool more interesting.An archaeic word for Aboriginal Females
considered offensive but curiosly still allowed to be used to name Australian places. Gin-Gin Falls for example(n) An individual of aboriginal origin. (Offensive)(n) in poker, drawing/flopping/turning the best card or combination of cards (typically it gives one a very strong hand and one's opponent a strong but second-best hand); frequently used with the verb 'to hit' and occasionally followed by 'card(s)'

etymology: probably originating from the card game of the same namePronounced "gĭn" not "jĭn" -Bahamian slang meaning "going to".A grain liquor that smells and tastes like pine needles.Slang for the female genitalia.In hold 'em poker: Describes a hand's relationship to a flop when conditions exist where not only is the hand likely the strongest, but can also easily improve to the [nuts] (aka best hand possible).a girl who is ready to suck any nigga up just for popularity or cause they happen to be real thirsty.The surest way of getting nothing from something.when your not sure if you have to fart or shit and you take the chance any way thats what gambling is all aboutGiving money to native americans.1. An improvident activity in which winning gleefully proceeds losing. 2. The saddled process of chasing one's loses or blowing one's winnings. 3. Chinese finger cuffs. 4. An insatiable itch erroneously believed to be satisfied by scratching. 5. The willingness to ask Chance for Certainty.just a way to get ahead.v., intransitive

A quick way to riches and power.

It's a sure thing.the act of masturbating. the reference is to the hand gesture made to imply masturbation, which greatly resembles the shaking of dice.custom-made; looking like it cost a million bucksOne of the powerful masculin [trends] for 2008 in fashion. Bespoke [tailoring] reffers to a particularity of british fashion, but the term 'bespoke' is now extended to all life's domains, as a powerful mark of [luxury], an anti-brand/ anti-globalisation reaction.The act of shoving a bicycle pump up a woman's rectum while going down on her.a delicious frozen treat that comes from cows. Ice cream comes in many different flavours and can often be found at your local grociery store.A relitively new shoe on the market. Created by Pharell Williams from the Neptunes (N.E.R.D) and Nigo, the creator of the Bathing Apes clothing and shoe line. They are marketed by Reebok. Only 3000 are currently in the market, ranging from around $300-$500 dollars.crack. hell even Master P calls it ice cream, and no one is more right them him.• The flavored cream of ice
• A common cure for broken hearted females
• A cold and delicious treat, perfect on hot summer daysflavored frozen cream that comes in different flavors.Release 4.0 of Google's [Android].

Although [Gingerbread] and [Honeycomb] are not yet available, Google is said to be already working on Android 4.0.

No idea what it will look like, but it will be greater than great!!

[Froyo] and [Gingerbread] are said to perform great with a 1 Ghz processor, [Honeycomb] and Ice Cream for sure will have a big impact on hardware.

Apple and Microsoft: be afraid, very afraid.code word for sexual pleasures when you are not behind closed doors and need to talk about the type of ice cream you had whether it be chocolate vanilla or better yet mocha.crack dope powder candyThe plural of [Ice Cream]The stuff that makes my head hurt when i eat too much of it... stupid fuckerA person that simply cannot be happy for another person's success.  So rather than be happy they make a point of exposing a flaw in that person.

Hating, the result of being a hater, is not exactly jealousy.  The hater doesnt really want to be the person he or she hates, rather the hater wants to knock somelse down a notch.Overused word that people like to use just because someone else expresses a dislike for a certain individual.most of the people in this siteA term used by others, usually being suburban "gangsters", whose lives are absolutely and undeniably defined by what others think.  These people "rumble" often and think  of themselves as original and/or indestructable.  People that use the term "haters" are the lowest stage of the evolutionary scale.  They bleed the fastest and have thought processes similar to that of a mentally underdeveloped cat.to be a hater is to descriminate or hate something, someone, or a certain type of something. 

If the world didn't have haters then it would be a better place. a much better place.

I mean not that there aren't assholes in the world. to hate somethings is good. i hate poverty, war, and bad shit like that. just try to have some morals, people.A person that develops a strong dislike for another, solely basing their own opinion on personal judgment rather than objective merit. The formation of a hater's contempt commonly arises from jealously and/or resentment. Individuals that make fun of, or "hate," others for justified reasons cannot be legitimately classified as "haters;" although many faggots attempt to rationalize their own situations by doing so. Additionally, the word "hater" is frequently overused, mainly by members of the rap and hip-hop communities.A person who feels anger and/or jealousy for someone who has succeeded in something they have worked hard for.
  A being who speaks badly,and/or takes negative actions in attempt to create problems for a successful person.Anyone with a opinion.The most non-insulting "insult" in existence. It's a waste of breath to say it and a waste of energy to type it. This term is often used by pre-teen girls whenever someone insults their favorite teeny bopper singers. If you ever call somene a hater, find the nearest knife and use it pierce your lungs for polluting our air with that fucking stupid word.People that make up reasons to hate certain people just because they aren't as wealthy or successfull as them. People are often hating:

1. [Bill Gates]
2. [Blink 182]
3. [George W. Bush]
4. [Halle Barry]
5. [Ben Affleck]P-Person
I-Into
M-Marketing
P-ProstitutesA man who beats up women and owns over a thousand sex slaves.one who brokers the sexual favors of women for profits1. Protection, Instruction, & Management of Prostitutes
2. Protectional Instructor Managing Professional
3. Prostitute's Instructional Management Professional
4. Professional In Management of Prostitutes 
5. Prostitute's Infamous Management Professional
6. Professionally Instructing Many Prostitutes
7. Professional Illegally Managing Prostitutes

Optional, but not recommended:
*Professional- replaced by Pro, Player, or Playa
*Into        - replaced by Intwined or Into
*Managing    - replaced by Marketing

Slang: noun or verb
1. Player(s/z)/Playa(s/z) Interested in(to) Making Progress/Prostitutes
2. (Put/Place It) or (Paper) in My/Men's Pants/Pocket(s)/Places
3. Party In My/Men's Pants/Panties
4. Pissin(g)/Peein(g) In(to) My Pants/Place/Partner/Potty 
5. Pissin(g)/Peein(g) In(to) Mouths of People/Prostitutes/Potty
6. People/Prostituts In Many/Money-filled Places/People
7. Perfect Independent Marvelous Playa(s/z) or Player(s/z)
8. Pooping In(to) My Place/Pants/Partner/Potty
9. Pennys In My Pocket/Place/Palace/Prostitutes
10. Put/Place It in My Pussy/Prostitute
11. Pussy Is My/Mens Prerogative/Purpose/PlaymateThe people wearing the purple suits on street corners who use dirt poor women to get money.  And later blowing it all on spinner's and gold lining for their three wheeled cycles.To make better, to fix up,some dumass middle school teenager who is as rich as hell and wear clothes like he's from the ghetto.Thinks he has he has hoes but the only one who he would lose his virginity to is his mom. Thinks rock is "for losers". Listens to too much 50 cent and tells everyone he used to live in "the projects". friends consist of a bunch of airheads who say LOL!! the whole time and his own dim-witted speciesPride Intelligence Money Power1. someone who profits off the money prostitutes make from selling their bodies
2. to seek out hookers to make a profit off of them selling their bodies.
3. to hit on several different girls
4. a guy who has alot of girlfriends or has been with alot women.
5. something that is really cool.v. Live off the earnings of a prostitutea machine for downloading pornWhat you are on nowThe most useful and most frustrating thing any human being will ever work with.If you're looking up this word, kill yourself.a very, very expensive punching bagA tool that is supposed to save time but intead wastes time.The most boring and frustrating thing in the world-however, I keep coming back.the thing people use to:
1. Go on MySpace or any other blog-related sites
2. download porn
3. illegally download music
4. play games
5. and use to look up the word "computer" on Urbandictionary.comThe answer to every single question.A $1000 facebook machineOne whose IQ exceeds his weight.An individual persecuted for his superior skills or intellect, most often by people who fear and envy him.An 'individual', i.e. a person who does not conform to society's beliefs that all people should follow trends and do what their peers do. Often highly intelligent but socially rejected because of their obesssion with a given subject, usually computers. Unfortunately, nerds seem to have problems breeding, to the detriment of mankind as a whole.Never
Ending
Radical
Dude.A stereotypical label used to describe a person that is socially inadequate.  A four letter word, but a six figure income.A person who gains pleasure from amassing large quantities of knowledge about subjects often too detailed or complicated for most other people to be bothered with.

Often mistaken for Geeks, who aspire to become nerds, yet lack the intelligence, and end up giving nerds a bad name due to their poor social skills.

Non-nerds are often scared of nerds, due to their detailed knowledge, and therefore seemingly high levels of intelligence - and subsequently denegrate them as much as possible as often as possible.

Nerds exist covertly within the fabric of society, often choosing to 'nerd it up' in private or in the company of fellow nerds.  It is for this reason they are feared the most - unlike geeks, who are easily identified, nerds can only be found out when casual conversation reaches a subject that they like nerding.the group of people who will most likely make a life changing invention that will radically change the world. the computer was invented by a nerd. the macintosh/apple and windows were invetned by nerds. jocks and normal people have no claim to civilization except for being the hard labor. nerds actually do the thinking. so jocks, fuck you, and go eat your steroidsThe person you will one day call "Boss"Guys with IQ higher than your weight. You made fun of them when you were at school but you would be lucky if you get employed as janitors in their businesses.A delicious candy made by Wonka.  They are pretty much crystalized sugar in a color coating that people love to give out on halloween.An individual who deals with the complex systems of todays military/civilian aircraft. Their entire mission is to make bricks "fly", and fix leaking electrons from parts, and they do it damn well. Usually pissed off individuals who are the be all end all of the sortie cock, they take and stride. Because one day, their enlistment will come to an end.Stands for AVIation electrONICSNot the best state in the country, but very far from the worst.  Home to three million people, some really sweet cities, three great univerties, a whole bunch of stellar small private colleges and a ton of true natural beauty in its lush northeast bluff country and statewide river valleys, lakes, and yes, rolling fields.  Iowa is a national leader in education (students in many other states including Texas take the Iowa Test of Basic Skills, and everyone's heard of the ACT, based in Iowa City) and is leading the way in biofuels to reduce the nation's dependence on oil.  To dispel the ignorance displayed elsewhere on this post, here's a state breakdown of cities and topography.  If seventy synonyms for boobs is alright to post, so is this.

Central Iowa:  [Des Moines], located at the intersection of I-80 and I-35, is the largest city with a metro of a half million and is the state capital, second only to London for the title of insurance capital of the world.  [Ames] (80,000 metro) is about a half hour north of Des Moines and is home to [Iowa State University], a land grant school of 30,000 respected around the world for its engineering and agricultural programs.  Central Iowa is, outside of river vallies, very flat, and outside of the Des Moines area and Ames is very sparsely populated.

Eastern Iowa:  The most densely populated area of the state.  Ethnically diverse [Iowa City] (115,000 metro) was Iowa's first state capital, was the first city in the world to elect a female mayor, has been named the most cultured city per capita in the nation, is always in the top five cities in the country for education, and is home to the [University of Iowa], 30,000, nationally renowned for its Carver College of Medicine and Iowa Hawkeye athletics.  The music departments of Iowa City's two large public high schools have won a total of five Grammy awards.  [Cedar Rapids], (200,000 metro) just twenty minutes north of Iowa City in the beautiful Cedar River valley, is the second largest single city, is the economic hub of eastern Iowa, has two private colleges, and is best known for being the place you get any of your Quaker Oats brand ceral from.  [Waterloo/Cedar Falls], two conjoined cities (130,000 metro) is where the [Unviersity of Northern Iowa], 18,000, is located.  The [Quad Cities], (375,000 metro) two in Iowa and two in Illinois, straddle the Mississippi and form the largest metro between Des Moines and Chicago.  The largest of the four cities is [Davenport], IA, home to the Bix 7 foot race whose hilly course and large prize attract runners from every part of the globe.  [Dubuque], (90,000 metro) on the Mississippi where Iowa meets Illinois and Wisconsin, is Iowa's oldest city. It is home to a ton of beautiful architecture, four private colleges, a far-reaching ELCA Lutheran seminary, and the Smithsonion affiliated National Mississippi River Musem and Aquarium.  Eastern Iowa's topography is for the most part very rolling farmland, with the exception of the hillier Iowa river valley, Cedar river valley, and the bluffs and hills skirting the whole eastern border along the Mississippi.  The northeast corner of the state is all bluffland, home to small town Decorah and reputed Luther College.

Western Iowa:  The vast majority of Iowa west of I-35 is flat farmland with the exception of the very westernmost strip.  [Sioux City] on the Missouri river (the western border) is a good sized city with nice amenities and lots of historyt.  [Council Bluffs] is the largest suburb of Omaha, just across the river in Nebraska.  The Iowa Great Lakes region contains many large lakes, most notably lake Okoboji, one of only three blue water lakes in the world.  The Loess Hills state park runs along the whole westernmost strip of the state, and offers lots of hilly hiking and some of the state's largest forests.

Iowa's motto should be "Iowa: Not as bad as you picture it."Pretty much the shit.  Make sure you're clear on the fact that the word "the" is in there, or else you'll get the meaning all wrong.  Iowa is home to the three million nicest people in the United States, probably in the world.  A leader in education, and home to some of the most beautiful scenery into the world.  It's a traquil beauty, and if you're into that, you'll love Iowa.  And if you're not into that, you can go take California or wherever you're from and fuck it.a farming state that isnt a bunch of dumb farmers thats [montana]A state that quietly grows corn and takes care of its own affairs. Residents think Des Moines compares to New York.People who dont live in Iowa refer to Iowa is full of corn and farmers. Its full of things pretty much from other states. 3 million awesome people live there. And its probably 3 million people you would never forget because they are so nice. Iowa is also one of the most beautiful places to live and only cool people can live in Iowa. Because Iowa is THE SHITT. Also home to the best college football team the IOWA HAWKEYES!The greatest state in the Union with education, and the ability to function with agriculture and good morals,When western civilization comes crashing down around you other 49 inferior states (Illinois is ok).BEST State in the entire united states of america!

Most, cocky dumbasses hate on iowa, and say that all there is is corn.. Thats completley wrong! EVERY state has agriculture and just about every state grows corn and has corn fields.
So what if iowa has corn, that dosnt mean thats the only thing to do!

Iowa is the best! Our hot chicks and all of our sports teams..

Iowa will fuck up anyone who tries to talk shit on us! were no pussys, we will fight any mother fucker who tries to hate on us!

Iowa has the best state fair too! The IOWA State Fair is possibly the best state fair in all of the US.

We have everything, Demo Derbys, Mudding, So much shit, youd just have to come here and check it out!State in the midwest, mostly farmland, but has a fantastic balance of rural, suberban, and highly populated areas. It is named after the Soux indian name meaning land between 2 rivers(missouri, Mississippi). Produces more corn and pork than any other state, and is not home to a bunch of hicks. in fact Iowa has the highest % of leteracy in the United states. statisticly its largest city, Des Moines, is in a perfect location for trade because it lies on interstate 35 and interstate 80, 2 of the buisiest highways in the US. however, because of Chicago's close proximity there isnt quite as many large factorys as there should be. Iowa is a beautiful state with hilly reigons in the east and hundreds of rivers and streams. The people are known for being friendly, usually hard working, and down to earth.

***to readers in the Northeast and california specificly***
No, just because someone lives in Iowa does not mean that they live on a farm. enough said. and another thing, stop mistaking Iowa for Idaho and Ohio. yes, they do sound the same but seriously, get it right its not that hardWhat the hell is this
I - Idiots

O - Out

W - Wondering

A - Around
shit?
We're the smartest state in the U.S!
For Christ's sake, stop your bitching about our "terrible driving" and go to New York, give me a review about their shitty driving.

God damn, Iowa has some of the nicest people, and there isn't corn EVERY WHERE.
To be honest, there isn't even as much corn as you think there would be, there are more cities than corn.

Plus, if you hate Iowa then promise me you'll never eat corn and or barilla noodles again.
So, all you more suberban suburban states can suck it because Iowa is the shit!A state full of beauty and 3 million of the nicest people in the universe. Also a pioneer in education, with the Iowa Test of Basic Skills and ACT being based in Iowa City. Is home to a ton of natural beauty: Ledgers State Park near Boone, the Des Moines, Missouri, and Mississippi Rivers, as well as numerous forests and woods. Tends to be judged by people who have never visited it.Place of extreme weather.A state of the south-central United States. It was admitted as the 28th state in 1845. Explored by the Spanish in the 16th and 17th centuries, the region became a province of Mexico in the early 19th century. Texans won their independence in 1836 after a gallant but losing stand at the Alamo in February and a defeat of Santa Anna's forces at the Battle of San Jacinto (April 21). Denied admission as a state by antislavery forces in the U.S. Congress, the leaders of Texas formed an independent republic that lasted until 1845. Austin is the capital and Houston the largest city. Population: 17,059,805. 

The Lonestar State, The State that still believes that criminals should be punished, Home of the Wataburger, home of Southern Hospitality, HTown, And Everythang thats bigger and better.

AND NO!! We Dont all walk around with cowboy hats and boots, and we're all not rednecks....for that...see oklahoma.The best Mexican food. Dr. Pepper on tap. Beautiful ladies. Awesomeness everywhere you turn. The best fucking place on earth. Move there now!the only state in the union that can fly its flag at the same height as the american flag.....
and the only reason texas doesnt fall into the gulf of mexico... is because oklahoma sucksHome to Dr. Pepper, several modern and well respected singers, activists, and the like, Sam Houston, and other great men and women before him, numerous plantlife and animals, and a few horrid idiots who give the rest of us a bad name-ie: George Bush.The biggest and baddest state of them all(15 states can be put into Texas and we'd still have 1000 miles left) where everything is bigger and much better than places such as California. Home of a Ranch bigger than Rhode Island,the home of trunk poppin, Dr.Pepper,home of the first word spoken from the moon which was Houston,home of swangin on 84's and vogues, chopped and screwed music, SA Town, D Town, and H Town which are all 3 in the top 10 most populated cities in the U.S.
The Lone Star State was the only state that was its own country, and the only state worthy of even making a definition of. 


If you aint a Texan, you wish you were.The greatest state everOkay.
I was born and raised in Houston.
So lets tell the truth.
-The weather in Texas changes very rapidly, and we get a bit of everything, except snow. That doesn't come around very often.
-We don't get married to our sisters or even distant cousins. A shock. I know. If you want to see some of that go to Oklahoma.
-Not everyone here talks with a distinct country accent.
You have to go to the smaller towns for that. Lufkin, Etoile, Waco, etc. It all depends on what area of Texas you were born in. People move here from New York and California all the time, and we don't sound any diffrent.
Our slang is the only true thing that seperates us.
-Yes, we have racism here. Just like any other state, but it's not as bad as people make it sound. The Africans, Mexicans, and Orientals, etc. out number us by more the 50%.
-Taking hits to our pride by informing us we cuss to much (yes, 'cuss') is low. We cuss just as much as anyone in California, or Florida would.
-No one walks around here in in full cowboy uniform. So if you think we do, maybe you should visit before opening your mouth.A state in the southern USA. Its in the south. There are billboards about Jesus. One can buy [waffles] there.The best damn state in the country!  That's all you need to know.The greatest and most popular sport in history with more than 5 times the TV audience of the next most popular (cricket - every radio and TV in the sub-continent is permanently tuned to Pakistan/India cricket matches - that's a big audience).

Only Americans call it 'soccer' owing to their vast ignorance of what goes on outside their national boundaries and the misnomer which has them thinking than a corruption of rugby, with all the danger and most of the skill removed can also be called 'football'. 

'The Beautiful Game' can be played anywhere, on almost any surface, by any number of players, for almost any length of time. And is. There is no country on earth that doesn't play. It has inspired more passion, more courage and more excitement than any other sport in history and dwarfs everything else.When a girl is playing footsie with you, and her foot travels up to your crotch.A name given to two different sports in which America and the rest of the world use to waste their lives away constantly arguing over which is better. Honestly, I'm an American. And I love the game of American football. But notice how I haven't said that I hate football (aka soccer). In fact, I love that sport, too. I just totally suck at it. Haha. C'mon, be real ya'll. Both games are cool. Even rugby too. It's cool. I have no idea how to play it, but I enjoy trying. It's all preference. For all ya'll that say football is whack cause we wear padding, go ahead and say whatever the fuck you want to say. That padding protects us so we can stay a little safer to enjoy the game a little longer. I don't care if I don't use it, I've tackled mofos twice my size without any padding on. The point I'm trying to make; All three games are great. They all require stratedgy, strength, speed, and endurance. So just shut the fuck up, grab the ball that suits you, and play your damn game already. You got that? Kay, just helping out. I'm just a 15yr old from a small town. Yeah, yeah... What do I know? Honestly? I know it's fucking pointless for ya'll to fight over sports. So just save your shit for someone who's still too much of a punk to simply enjoy a game of American football, football, or rugby. Peace people! Damn. Haha.Football - Only the best damn sport ever. Played with a round ball and feet. However, Americans tend to mistake it for American Football (which should truthfully be called tackleball for all that matters).Also Known As the BEAUTIFUL GAME. A real sport played with your FEET and an actual round BALL, hence the name FOOTBALL. This term should never be used to refer to our silly american game of putting on 30 pounds of armor and carrying a cone shaped piece of rubber while trying not to be touched by other guys. You'll note the lack of definitions calling this silly game football. And there is a reason for that. Some silly americans give us a bad name by not noticing what is going on in the rest of the world and don't realize that there was already a real sport called football when we made up our game, but everyone else in the world knows whats up.
P.S. Please, if you are American please stop saying the S word (s****r)and saying that our american game is better than real football. If you are not american just know that not all of us are confused faggots.A lovely game that alot of people play.
Also the most importmant sport in the world.
Very famous, but also fun for people who like football.
If you dont play football yet, i would say:
Give it a try!

Ofcourse if you start at older age, you wont get as good as Ronaldo, Messi, ...
But doesnt matter, its just for fun! ( Mostly )A variety of games that which Europeans and Americans tend to argue over pointlessly till the end of time as to which version is "right" never minding the fact that due to Cultural Mutation different words can mean different things in other places
Typically Americans profess love for the version that involves padding and an ovoid ball in which the point of the game is to move the ball ten yards down the field at a time through either rushing or passing before passing into the plain of the "End Zone" placed at either ends of a 100 Yard Field to score points
Europeans tend to extol the virtues of a much simpler sport that only requires a pair of goals placed at either end of a field and is played with a checkered Spherical BallOK, here goes... slowly:
The word describes a very populare game, which is played all over the world.
The word consists of two parts, which quite accurately descibes the game:
1) Foot
2) Ball

Part 1) Foot. This means that the foot is the main body part involved when playing this game.
Part 2) Ball. This means that the game is played with a spheric (globe-shaped) object.

This definition seems to be understood all over the world, except in the US, where they have misunderstood both parts of the word. Instead of using their feet, they mainly use their hands. And, instead of using a ball, they use an egg-shaped object.The round form of the drug Zanax that also comes in another form called [sticks] this form is in the shape of a football.A place on urbandictionary.com where obnoxious [eurofags] bitch about how Americans call football soccer and vice versa.A tongue of which the user speaks of something the complete opposite of what the user means. It often has the best comedic value.the bastard stepchild of ironyYour body's natural defense against stupid.A word that gives you the possibility to play with your imagination when asked stupid questions.Something that nobody on the internet can ever recognize.God's gift to man.
Incredibly humourous if used correctly.Noun.  A very British form of humour which derives laughs from saying something while really meaning something else.  Often (though not always, contrary to popular belief) used in scathing remarks.

The word 'Sarcasm' is derived from a Greek word meaning 'tearing flesh', which is why sarcastic vegetarians are so ironic.

See also [irony].The ability to insult idiots without them realizing it.A verbal reflex against stupidity. In my opinion one of the best types of humour.When one says something, but usually means the opposite.
Used sometimes in order to belittle someone and make them seem retarded... or equally to amuse and impress them with your mind. Indeed.Humorous name for oral sex.To drink an entire beverage in one goplace where brain livesOral sex, head.The nickname for members of the Phi Kappa Sigma fraternity.Another word for a female sucking cock. " Oh baby, give me some skull!!" It's the same thing as saying give me some head, or give me some brain. Cock-sucking words are great!!what the hardcore kids give instead of head.

see [skull fuck].to give or recieve oral sexTo bash another in the head,Created in an attempt to imagine what in the world someone could have going on in their head when they say or do something absolutely ridiculous/ illogical/ or straight up retarded. This person must be lacking a brain in their head i.e having nothing more than a flesh covered skull resting on their neck. Skull.A coat that makes you invisibleOne who lacks the skill to contribute balanced team work in an MMO. Also known as train mobber, skill-less peon and fearless noob.Cloak is another way of leaving without anyone else knowing.to smoke marijuana.To have sex, or to [fuck]. In the context of the vagina's ability to envelope, engulf or cover the penis like a piece of clothing. Perhaps a term originating from Canada.an extremely beautiful women/girl who everyone loves and will never forget. she has many friends and people feel they can always go to her for help, no matter what the situation is. cloaks is a great listener and speaker, she is also very creative and imaginative. She tends to be very artistic and athletic. Cloaks enjoys acting, dancing and singing, she is also very good at them. Cloaks is also a great lover in the bedroom, Every man thinks she is irresistible and falls in lover with her at first sight.a super gay homofag queer fairy buttpiratea friend or aqauntancethe result unprotected [sex] of a male and a female of the same species; also can be known as [offspring] and [brats]things that interupt you while your banging you wife.Anyone below the age of 18 (or 21, in some circles.) Don't listen to the idiotic fools who hate on little kids because they think it's "hip and cool".The stuff that gets shot all over the place during sex.the worst STD you can get.1.Something REALLY old people desire to be when their backs start breaking and their hearing and eyesight get poor.Krazy Individuals Destroying Societywhat teenagers claim they are notA baby goatThe word people use when you've done something that isn't technically "bad" or "wrong" but they still don't like it anyway and expect you to conform to their personal tastes.What your mom says when she catches you masturbating.The current euphemism for "wrong" or "bad." It is supposed to sound more objective than "wrong" and "bad," but it is not.putting it simply, not [appropriate]the [definition] of [urban dictionary]not suitable or proper in the circumstances. Action could be used in a talking, visual, or sexual manner.In high school settings, short skirts, low cut tops, see through clothing and skin tight jeans.  The student handbook says not to wear this, but many girls still wear it anyway to look skanky.The act of saying something irrelevant to the topic or becoming mad feisty with another person without an apparent reason. Usually accompanied with the action of standing up and pointing your hand down to the person it pertains to.The word that used to actually mean something, but doesn't mean anything anymore.To [curse] or '[cuss]'. Swears are considered inappropriate to use in public places, but are less offensive than other profanities. These '[bad word]s' are often referenced by pre-adolescents by their first letter (the 'f' word, the 's' word, even 'h-e-double-hockey-sticks').Any word that a person says when they can't think of anything intelligent to sayTo verbally abuse, or to rape an object with hatred wordsWords that people get offended by for some unexplained reason.when something is weird or funny and you sont have anything to say, you just point and say swear! swear this, omg swear that.

or it can be used like the world "seriously"Swear is used often for cursing someone, often with any consequences.

Perfect swearing language: Russian language is also the 5th officially used language over the world, aside English or Spanish. Russian language has more swear words in them, than any other language.

According to the infamous Taboo vocabulary, you can literally talk and swear in Russian and make lines, that make sense.Word that makes your sentence mean something, and actually prove a point.cannot really be defined but in terms to understand it can be understood as being dumb, stupid, retarded, saying something that is absurd.(verb) when someone thinks they're SO much better than others; someone who is conceited and vain, and definately wants others to notice.[fuck]
[ass]
[damn]
[hell]
[shit]
[bastard]
[bitch]
[crap]
All [racist] words.When someone else gets hurt.1. Something that causes you to laugh
2. A person who isn't quite rightA way of describing the girl you really like, either to said girl or your friends, without hinting too much. Either used by shy men who have a hard time admitting they really like someone or describing the girl you like to your friend that proclaims himself the matchmaker or love finder (yes, this is a stereotyped friend that every bro has, you may even be this person - if so, you have learned the secret code of bro hinting (ha, and you only thought girls spoke in hint))When someone else gets hurt.The only part of a newspaper worth looking at.  Located beside or near the crossword puzzles and cryptoquote.  Famous funnies include Garfield, Family Circus, Andy Capp, and Peanuts.Makes you laugh, oddA plural exclamation of extreme humourosity.  

OR

When followed by a question mark, a needy request to find out whether a joke has been accepted or not.The fact that you're wasting time looking up "funny".Definitions on urbandictionary tagged with 'funny', usually aren't.If you have to look up funny your probably a fag.Big
Gigantic
HugeA compliment- referring to either muscles or more commonly, the mail genitalia. Also associated with terms such as "biggie" or "bigs". Add "particularly", "fairly", or "rather" for added enjoyment.Something of excessive size.  Normally associated with [heavy] as well.the state of the penis when arousedone thousand United States dollarsa thousand dollars - they say it all the time in the Sopranosaka, huge, masssiv, ownageIn sarcasm, to refer to something as unworthwhile, lacking merit or otherwise derogatory.

Can be used with prefixes "fairly" and "particulary" for added effect.

See also: [small]Really good, excellent. Used by DJs and dance music fans to describe a track.When you are 'avin' it in a collosal fashion. One size fits all. It is possible to say "how are you avin' it?" as this means the same thing due to the fact that there is only one size to 'ave' itA good fun alternative to life.crack, in CD-ROM form.The most highly addictive game ever played. It will consume your soul and poison your water supply.A highly entertaining mmorpg that is played by a wide variety of people. some get addicted to it like its crack cocaine, and some only play it a few times a month. The level of addiction all depends on the person playing it.The world's most effective form of birth control.A computer game whose participants apparently don't know how to correctly make words plural.

Hint for WoW players: it doesn't involve an apostrophe.Taken mistakenly as a peer to EverQuest or EverQuest II, it is an entertaining game in which a player learns how to cooperate as a team, and harnesses competition, unlike EverQuest II. The irony behind half of the definitions under this category is this: If you'd read the back of the box, you would realize that it states "even if you only have a couple of minutes, World of Warcraft's superior quest system offers quick gameplay." The sad truth is that people don't want to accept the fact that many of the players on this game have lives, jobs, spouses, ect. They see that it is an MMORPG, and automatically assume that it's a parallel to EQ and EQ2.A game were nobody but the company taking your money wins. Often replaces one's social life.A game that manages by some divine power to completely waste your life and lets you have fun while doing so.World of Warcraft- WoW is kind of like smoking. You don't see what all the fuss is about in the beginning, until one of your friends gives you a free taste. Still, you can't see how addicting it is until you have tried it a few times. Then you start buying it, and using it by the bundle, and you can't seem to stop. You'll do anything just to get a few good hours in with your favorite pasttime. You slowly start to lose touch with former friends and family, and meet lots of strange new people with a similar addiction. Prolonged use can lead to death. It's very difficult to get out of your system, you must rely on the strangth of others, for your willpower has ben sapped.
General Surgeons Warning- Not intended for oral or anal use. WoW shouldn't be used if you suffer from seizures or are an expectant mother. Side effects include obsession, nausea, vomiting, and pink eye. Ask you doctor before using.Somebody who finds great pleasure in the art of Computer Programming.

Synonymous with: Hacker, ProgrammerThe low end of the scale as far as [software engineers] go.Slang word, used by idiots, for the term 'programmer'. Often used by communities for Private Servers. There are related words such as 'Code' or 'Coding'.a bitchy old, pregnant man with a beer belly. not just old but he ancient, he was in the same class as jesus when they were kids.short for code infraction, used at [Delbarton], get three and you're strongly encouraged to leave the school.Fake Fag Slang for ProgrammerJail guard, cop, security guard, etc.
Someone with power over you in a controlled surroundingswhen you lose your virginity or just has sex and you can't say it out loud you say you wore a "blue shirt"an extremely hot guy with a nice bodyA huge spokkerjones that will never know the embrace of a womanThe opposite of a Red Shirt. A character in a fictional series that will simply not die, regardless of fans hating them or the amount of injuries they sustain. Some true Blue Shirts even die and are resurrected through some means, just to spite the viewers.The opposite of a Red Shirt. A character in a fictional series that will simply not die, regardless of fans hating them or the amount of injuries they sustain. Some true Blue Shirts even die and are resurrected through some means, just to spite the viewers.The opposite of a Red Shirt. A character in a fictional series that will simply not die, regardless of fans hating them or the amount of injuries they sustain. Some true Blue Shirts even die and are resurrected through some means, just to spite the viewers.Someone under the 25th percentile for stature for their age, sex, and country.
(5'7" and under for men and 5'2" and under for women in the US)what i am.1.) noun, A cigarrette, having been previously smoked, but not completely, suggesting the later use and finish of said cigarette.The small coffee size at Starbuck's; the only size on the menu there that makes any sense (et al [Tall], [Grande], [Vente]).Comfy and easy to wear.Military and prison adjective for describing someone nearing the end of their tour of duty, enlistment or incarceration.  A [short-timer] is someone who has less then 90 days to serve.  A Korean War veteran told me these terms were in wide use in the late 1940s; they have been in continuous wide use in the military since then.outta luckto be not tall. under 5" tallsnoun; used by a third party person to express when somebody has insulted or humiliated another personShort was used long before there were compact cars.  It goes back to at least the Forties on the Southside of Chicago.  It means ANY car.  It was from the vernacular of hotrodders and black gangsters. It probably derives from "hot short", which evolved to "hotwire" ... a car.1. The Good Part - The woman you marry and live with for the rest of your life.

2. The Bad Part - The woman you marry and live with for the rest of your life.extreme hardcore version of a girlfriendThe beautiful, inteligent, classy and fulfilling companion of a man that is wise enough to notice such qualities. Usually despised and hated on by the [baby momma].A prostitute with a life-long contract to a single client.A woman that a man is married to.The person that is there for you whenever you need them, the person that makes you want to be better, the person that you love and cherish forever.

(Hint: getting married to a woman you don't love isn't a good idea, don't do it.)w.i.f.e.
wash, iron, fuck, ect.The reason I drink so much.The name of someone that is on a vendetta to make you regret ever choosing her as a partner.term used in reference to the woman in which a man is the most emotionally involved with & who he feels the most obligation toward. she typically has characteristics which would make her a desirable long-term partner.The cause of, and solution to all life's problems.Any of a class of chemical compounds having the general formula ROH, where R represents an alkyl group and -OH a hydroxyl group. Most commonly refers to ethanol, which you can drink to forget how much your life sucks, and methanol, which you can drink when you remember.Liquid Panty RemoverA substance found in beer (except American beer) and several other beverages that makes you excessively happy, sad, belligerent or horny.  It allows white men to dance and ugly men to get laid (when given to their victim).Alcohol. What most of your university/college life will revolve around.The buffer between reality and a good night. Has been known to make people seem more attractive and make obviously stupid idea's seem like good sense.The antidote to reality.The answer to the question "What made you move to North Dakota?"1) The active ingredient in alcohol is ethyl alcohol, which is produced by yeast. Working much like [ether], alcohol puts the brain to sleep. Alcohol functions as a depressant to the central nervous system and slows down body functions. In large amounts, alcohol causes sedation, intoxication, unconsciousness, and possible death. Aside from significant negative physical consequences, chronic use of alcohol can lead to physical and psychological addiction. 

2) Colorless, volatile liquid obtained by distillation and fermentation of carbohydrates (grain, molasses, potatoes [irish]). Alcohol is antiseptic and cooling but is also very drying to the hair and skin; care should thus be taken not to use too much. 

3) This constituent of wine is a natural by-product of fermentation. It is one of the main pillars of perceived flavor, the others being "Acid", "residual Sugar" (and/or "Glycerin") and "Tannin". The presence of these components define a wine that has "good balance". For tablewines the wine label must, by law, state the alcohol content of the wine within the bottle, usually expressed as a percentage of the volume. Table wines do not usually exceed 14% alcohol content - (11% to 12.5% is generally considered the optimum amount) - although a few, such as Zinfandel, can go up to a 17% level. Sweet dessert wines fall in the same range. Fortified wines - (eg: Sherry, Port etc) - range from 17% to 21% alcohol content. 

4) Ethanol or ethyl alcohol (C2H5OH), the liquid produced from sugar by fermentation that can make you drunk 

5) A chemical compound formed by the action of yeast on the sugar content of grapes during fermentation. Most wines have between 7 and 25 percent alcohol, which gives wine is vinosity. If wine has too much alcohol for its body weight, it is unbalanced, and will taste uncharacteristically heavy or hot. The quality will be noticeable in aroma and aftertaste. 

6) A general class of hydrocarbons that contain a hydroxyl group (OH). The term "alcohol" is often used interchangeably with the term "ethanol," even though there are many types of alcohol. (See Butanol, Ethanol, Methanol.)liquid stamina in a bottleA holiday that no Black people I know celebrate.
Well , one year my Uncle tried to , but we all laughed at him.A holiday developed by a Dr. Maulana "Ron" Karenga, a black militant, Marxist, and convicted felon.
Just five years after this, he was convicted of torturing two black women to death. 

Observed from December 26 to January 1, Kwanzaa is based on a mixture of East African harvest rituals, called "first fruits" by Karenga and 1960's radicalism. This is in spite of the fact most slaves came from West Africa.

Viewed as an "alternative" to Christmas, it, nonetheless, is based on race, and not in faith.1)A made up piece of shit holiday steeped in all the deepest traditions of Sweetest Day  or Secretary's Day. 

2)A holiday for African Americans that no African American observes or understands.It's the right-on power handshake of the 1990s.  Yet another politically correct tactic to get whites to pay attention to non-whites, primarily blacks.  It's a fabricated holiday based on race, invented by a convicted felon, which is too third world for most black Americans, too jewish for black muslims, and too stupid for everyone else.  Now that's a fine example for the ghetto children of the world!Kwanzaa is a Counterfeit made up, holiday started by a black convicted kidnaper, rapist, Karenga, whose criminal record includes having been convicted and jailed on charges of assault and false imprisonment for the torture of two black women.

There is no nothing ethnically African about it, it is all fake andObviously a manufactured holiday created by African Americans in the late 1980s/early 1990s, when the fad of that time was to be "African", which is why Eddie Murphy's "Coming to America" was a blockbuster hit in 1988, when in reality it was a [racist] shit movie that made fun of people from Africa.A fake and gay holiday made up by some random black guy in the 60's.A popular file sharing program for African-Americans.An African-American holiday that celebrates the deeds of a brave little boy who saved his village from man-eating tigers by having them follow each others tails until they turned into butter.
Flapjacks with loads of butter are served at the holiday meal.The black [Hanukkah]God's gift to the world.  Brings peace when used wisely.An ancient plant, refrenced biblically {the Holy Herb}.

Gets you rocked, and has been proven to be less harmful then alcohol or cigarettes. It has never been conclusively proven to have caused a single death in the entire world, ever.

Easily avalible in most forign countries, and Alaska, where everybody grows it anyway.

Can be purchased by the (if you're lucky) gram, or (not so lucky) by standard measurements. (1/8th of an ounce, 1/4er, 1/2, ect. An eigth usually weighs 3.75, depending on the weight of the baggie and weather or not you're buying from an asshole. There are dealers, and then there are professionals.) usual prices for the sticky-icky-icky (Not that cheap mexican shite, but tanqueray-and-chronic-chronic) can run from $30 to $50 and even $60 an eigth. I even heard it ran eighty an eigth out on Kodiack Island, but you gotta look at the market from a local poiont of view.

It's easier to get then liquor if you're under 21. 

It will not cause you to shoot your friend with the gun you found in your parent's bedroom while they weren't home. (That's shitty parenting, folks, not the pot!)

It's healthier then Xanax if you're just looking to ignore your troules for a few hours.

A biennial Youth Risk Behavior Survey, released May 21 by the U.S. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention stated that more of america's youth smoke pot then cigarettes.

It's a step in the right direction, folks!the answer to all in this horrible world of oursmarijuanaweed not a drug!the dried leaves and flowering tops of pistillate hemp plant that yeild cannabin and are sometimes smoked in cigarette form for its intoxicating effect   

aka

fucking awesomeweed is marijuana, stupid. here's some names i've collected
weed
chron or chronic
dro (hydroponics)
sticks and stems (shitty weed)
sticky-icky (dripping with THC)
mauie wowie
jamaican red hair
blueberry
strawberry
AK-47
kind bud
snowflake
skunk and super skunk
mary jane
MJ
grass (no one calls it that anymore)
ganga (pronounced GAHN-JAH)
herb or herbal
dank
trees
mids or middies (average weed)
damn, there's a ton more, i just can't remember from smoking all of the above.a beautiful thing if used properly. all it does is make you happy.an essential substance in most people's lives.A green plant god put on the earth for me and you.Type of [Christianity] that places authority in the Bible as the infallible word of God. This does not necessarily mean a literal interpretation of everything in the Bible (cf. [creationism]). Not to be confused with [evangelism], which means something entirely different.A generalization of multiple groups of Protestant Christianity. It's not actually a denomination, but a category that churches of many denominations fall under, ranging from some baptist churches in the south to non-denominational churches in the north and along the coastline. Using that criteria, the majority of protestant Christians in the US probably fall under the "Evangelical" category. Despite popular belief, they are real, tangible people, who are just as capable of being discriminated against as the people who they are frequently (and usually, falsely) accused of being discriminated against. An Evangelical Christian is best characterized as someone who wants to spread the Gospel of Christ by being living examples to the people around them. Real Evangelicals do not believe in forcing people who are not Christians to act like Christians, because they believe that Christ his followers to only come of their own free will.

Evangelical Christians should NOT be confused with "fundamentalists," a term that has come to mean someone who is far more mental than fun. Evangelicals tend to believe in more literal interpretations of the bible, but that does not mean that they are against scientific study or using critical thinking (after all, how can you understand how the Bible applies to your life without critical thinking?). Also, they do not want religion to control the government, because as [Martin Luther] figured out during the dark ages, religion controlling government is actually a cheap disguise for the government controlling religion. True Evangelicals want freedom of religion, and that includes the freedom to share the gospel with others.

Evangelical Christians are a large, and unfortunately, misunderstood part of the global population. They are constantly stereotyped as being hateful, bigoted people, even though many of them have done many great works for bringing rights to people and sending help to places. Evangelicals want to change their communities for the better by changing the people, one person at a time. Maybe if people came to realize that the large majority of Evangelical Christians are actually legitimately nice people who enjoy life and are happy to share their happiness with others, they'd realize that the mainstream perception of "evangelical" is merely an aggressively propagated stereotype that aims to strip Christians of their legitimacy as human beings.Comes from the word 'evangelism', which means spreading the good news about jesus christ.

So inturn evangelical is living your life in the way that god wants you to, so that others may see you and see how god has worked in your life. It is not a way of forcing a religion on someone.

It can also mean to speak to people about jesus.A sect of christianity that is full of mindless, brainwashed followers who spend their entire life in misery when they aren't spreading the gospel. The whole sect is full of middle class/rich white folks who want to go to church to be entertained by crying, hysterical preachers and find new prejudices to be in support of. They believe that their religion is the only way of life and refuse to accept any other ways.  There is no 'conversation' with evangelicals...they only convert. BEWARE.According to society, the only demographic that should feel ashamed of themselves when campaigning or when casting a vote.The Andromeda Strain of Christianity. Often called "conservative Christianity", when in reality it is a very modern radical version. Evangelicalism has no true theology, substituting apologetics for theology, and far more concerned with what will draw in people than in actual beliefs.

Evangelicals are often mistaken for Protestants, however the two groups a quite different. Protestantism is based on the idea that people can read and understand the Bible for themselves, without need of a mediator. In Evangelicalism, your minister is the final authority of what the Bible means.

Evangelicals gather to worship in thousands or tens of thousands in the belief that their minister is an intermediary to God, and that it is very important to get their religion directly from him.Describes Christians who try to uphold the tenants of the Protestant Reformation, but without all that courage, conviction, and critical-thinking baggage that got their 16th and 17th century forefathers burned at the stake.  Also known as "Evan-jelly-fish" due to apparent lack of brain and spine.christians who like to argue and force their ideas of religion on others. sometimes resulting in violence and always voice raising.Modern day nazi's. They brainwash there followers using group hysteria, which Hitler used. They try to convert everything that moves by forcing people to beleive what they think. They consider themselves an army of god, ready to fight for his bidding.

They are also hypocrite's. E.G. Ted haggard , who is one of the pastor's at a mega church i colorado, paid a male prostitute to butt fuck him after condeming gays and homosexual activity. He asked forgiveness and was forgiven and "cured", but if any one else who wasnt evangelical did that they would not be forgiven ( like Bill Clinton).1. an adjective synonymous with "mindless."

2. a noun synonymous with "fucking idiot."a broke ass mutha fucka who relies on crack to sustain daily life.  Often seen running at full speed for a multitude of reasons.People of any race that live to hit that nasty-ass rock. Usually real thin, dirty and smell like warm trash and/or spoiled milk, fecal matter, rotting corpses etc. Frequently bobbing, weaving, twitching and glitching. Large periodic spurts of energy. Always got something for sale or knows somebody that has just what you need. The most severe crackheads can be viewed in the wild missing standard items such as shoes, socks and teeth. If you come into contact with a crackhead it is suggested to secure all valuables and avoid any physical contact or direct contact with their breath (could cause dizzyness and/or vomitting).  If you lose property to a crackhead, accept the loss. If you find yourself chasing a crackhead, accept the loss .. crackheads are fast, they be gittin somewheres.. You ain't catching no crackhead...1.a person on crack
2.a moron1. one who does excessive amounts of crack.

2. one who acts as though they do excessive amounts of crack.Someone who smokes crack and will lie cheat and steal from anyone to get a hit1.one who is highly addicted to the euphoria brought on by crack cocaine.
2. one who does stupid things.1. one who partakes in smoking crack cocaine.
2. One who can run like the wind when s/he believes that quazimotto is chasing him/her.
3. one who will try to sell thier dog on e-bay.
4. If you live in a hotel, have no food, are pregnant, and your only worry is when/how to score...you are a crackhead.
5. one who acts "crackish"
6. A Jarrod or an Izatt.
7. A "parent" of a Crack baby.
8. The person who robbed you.A crackhead is the lowest form of a drug user. They abuse the drug crack cocaine. They are often liars, traitors, and thiefs. 

Crackheads are often paranoid and fidgety. 

Crackheads can be anyone, any race, any gender.

Crackheads will sell everything and anything to fuel their addiction. 

Crackheads cannot be trusted. If you ever find yourself to a person who is a known crackhead, try to get away as fast as possible, otherwise you may lose valauble jewerly, wallet, etc. 

Unless you don't mind having any of your prized possessions disappear, it is not wise to let a crackhead into your home. Never leave a crackhead unnattended to, or you will find things mysteriously go missing. 

It is important to never let a crackhead get to you, don't ever let them get under your skin. You are the stronger person in the situation, unless you too are a crackhead.

Crackheads are pathetic.Somebody who does [crack] regulary and gets addicted. Thus becoming a crackhead.The lowest form of a drug-user.The infamous act of a girl getting fucked by a donkey cock, whilst paying gentlemen gather around and watch.as stated above, refers to a woman getting fucked by a donkey, often performed for the pleasure of refined gentleman.  

one variation (specifically found in tijuana) is a competition in which different whores fuck the donkey.  the depth to which they are penetrated is marked by tying a red ribbon (a la tony orlando and dawn) 'round the donkey's cock.  the girl who takes it the deepest wins (i guess?).A sex act involving a woman and a donkey in which the woman fornicates with said donkey, typically performed in rural Mexican cities.An act where a horny woman gets corn-holed by a raging horny assa show where a woman has sex with a jackass1. A form of entertainment most commonly associated with being presented in Tijuana, in which (usually) men pay to observe a male donkey have sex with a female human.

2. A popular Oregon radio show, broadcast from Eugene with a transmitter powerful enough to be heard even outside the state depending on how good the receiving radio is (Vancouver, WA is an example). Syndicated in Medford (south of Eugene) at night time, though the hours the show is actually done is 2-6 PM. Broadcast on 101.5 KFLY FM, the show plays little music compared to most FM radio, and is mainly composed of the two co-hosts Tanner and Drew sharing their often humorous opinions and satires of current events and people currently in the news; as well as other commonly done humor-based radio bits. They refer to their listeners as throbbits (from a pornographic parody of Lord of the Rings).a live show in which a woman has sex (oral, anal, vaginal) with a mule or donkey. they are usually found in seedy areas of border towns in Mexico.  yes they really do exist and aren't terribly hard to findSomething you really don't want to be a part of or see.Donkey shows usually take place in TJ.  It is when a donkey's penis penetrates a (sometimes kidnapped) women.an obscene performance in which a woman copulates with a [literal] jackassthe police (see also [fuzz station])Comes from the fact that a lot of police back in the 60's joined straight of the military and they brought with them the very short military haircut that gave them the appearance of fuzz on their heads. When they took their hats off, your first comment might be, hey look, it's the fuzz. It's a style of haircut that made wearing a police hat more comfortable and cooler to wear......still in vogue today and used by many police officers around the world.A slang word for the police used by poor greasers.the fuzz refers to the polices like [the heat] i think the word is derived from the police always being on your ass or in you face like [peach fuzz]The fuzz is a word used when your so frikkin high that when the cops come to bust your ass that u call them the fuzz because the crack and chron are blurring your vision.Means "son of" (hence all the English surnames like Fitzpatrick, Fitzhenry) but can also refer to an illegitimate child, a bastard, someone born out of wedlock etc.A nick name for someone with the last name Fitzpatrick or Fitzgerald.1. noun- full retard

2. verb- to instantaneously lose control of your bowels in an unannounced fashion. Usually resulting in going commando for the remainder of the day.

3. adj.- awesomer than everybody and everything around you.

4. adj- The inability to come up with a response to an insult, usually resulting in threats of sodomy.1.  A suitable name to dipsnap to.
2.  A kid who is popular because his name sounds cool if you say it loud enough.A boy who used to be hot, but glowed down a lot!When someone agrees to do something and changes their mind five seconds laterthe art of coordinating clothing and accessories with name brand shoesTo take your workload and pass it on to an unsuspecting co-worker.a cut on your thumb or a cut on any finger(V) Otherwise known as pulling a Terry Tate, to tackle a coworker in a surprising manner across a row of cubicles. The tackle might be as aggressive as a flying pile-driver or as subtle as kicking another's leg out from underneath him.Analagous to their malevolent movie counterparts, the modern-day Gremlin is most often found on weekends in between the hours of 1800 and 0400. When in its passive form, the Gremlin is most often a well-intentioned and meaningful contributor to society. However, when provoked (usually by means of an ex-girlfriend or obnoxious fool at the bar), the Gremlin first becomes forlorn and introspective, then mischevious, and in some cases violent.

If you encounter a fully manifested Gremlin, you are advised to stay clear (especially when the Gremlin is in a doorway). If you feel the need to intervene, it has been said a trip to Burger King can passify the creature.

The Gremlin will return to its natural state by morning, usually feeling embarassed and apologetic.1.) Little meshevious devils that cause problems with everything around you.
2.) Little red men with horns you see when you are stoned.
3.) Imaginary little devils you can blame shit on.A Gremlin is a woman who a man likes to fuck but doesn't want to go out past dark to eat with......because shes a beast to look at or emotionally unstable.The gremlin is a furry critter that will use her petit stature and nubile appearance to gain the trust of others. Upon making the mistake of trusting a gremlin, she will then lurk in dark corners and attack at any given moment. This evil hobbit will engage in acts of deceit and general tomfoolery as a means of social interaction. Characteristics of the gremlin will include:
-Rage blackouts
-Violent attacks from behind, especially on the knees
-Full speed bodychecks
-Stealing food from gardens
-The belief that she is average height, when she is in fact, gremlin height
-The use of such phrases as "frig-a-mug" and "go S a D"A drunk friend after midnight. You don't feed them.Girl doesn't get wet for you.Making weird or distractive noices revolving around food.
Being generally weird and always hungry and wanting foods such as chocolate or spaghetti bolognese!A small ginger creature, usually found in a darkened room eating ham sandwiches. She sleeps for most of her life and only wakes to scuttle to the kitchen to make a sandwich. Gremlins can be located in the London area and on a quiet night you can here the high pitch cackle when she is amused. By all means stay out of Gremlins way in the mornings.Your girls fucking clingy ass best friend. Have you ever wanted to do something with your girl but her clingy ass best friend is just jealous of you, and doesn't want your girl whom is her best friend doing something because she can't so she tells her not to and your girl listens to her? That right there is being a fucking GREMLIN! GREMLINS are needy as hell and their jealousy of you grows exponentially. You're basically fucked when it comes to gremlins...there's no cure to this shit.The small pieces of [weed] that sometimes don't get smoked because they got stuck to the top inside edges of your [bowl].What this fucking definition is, asshole.1. [n]  the action of attacking the enemy

2. [adj]  of an offensive substitute for inoffensive terminology; "`nigger' is a dysphemistic term for `African-American'"

3. [adj]  unpleasant or disgusting especially to the senses; "offensive odors"

4. [adj]  morally offensive; "an unsavory reputation"; "an unsavory scandal"

5. [adj]  causing anger or annoyance; "offensive remarks"

6. [adj]  for the purpose of attack rather than defense; "offensive weapons"
   
7. [adj]  violating or tending to violate or offend against; "violative of the principles of liberty"; "considered such depravity offensive against all laws of humanity"
   
8. [adj]  causing or able to cause nausea; "a nauseating smell"; "nauseous offal"; "a sickening stench"

 
 	Synonyms:	 	abhorrent, abusive, antipersonnel, assault(a), assaultive, attack(a), attacking(a), charnel, creepy, detestable, disgustful, disgusting, distasteful, dysphemistic, foul, ghastly, ghoulish, hideous, hit-and-run, horrid, horrific, incursive, insulting, invading, invasive, loathly, loathsome, marauding, morbid, nauseating, nauseous, noisome, objectionable, obnoxious, obscene, odoriferous, offence, offending, offense, on the offensive(p), opprobrious, outrageous, predatory, raiding, rank, repellant, repellent, repelling, repugnant, repulsive, revolting, scornful, scrimy, scurrilous, sepulchral, sickening, skanky, tip-and-run, unpleasant, unsavory, unsavoury, unwholesome, verminous, vile, violative, wicked, yucky
 
 	Antonyms:	 	defensive, euphemistic, inoffensive, savory, savoury, unoffending, ylbissopA highly subjective interpretation of something real, imagined, or interpreted as being demeaning; very often the use of complaint to attack someone while paradoxically assuming both authority and victimhood; the use of complaint as a sociopolitical weapon or vehicle to often unmerited benefit, privilege, or compensation.Describes a statement politically or ideologically inconvenient, esp. in the judgment of one having no knowledge of the matter at hand.  Often used to stifle further discussion or pander to the lowest common denominator.  Cf: [fair and balanced].What you see that you don't like when you look in the mirror.The act of attacking & destroying an enemy's self esteem; utilizing unconventional remarks, stirring the enemy's emotions making them unable to network an insult measuring to your ego. If done correctly, the enemy will leave in anger to cry or to write about it in their diary, resulting in a successful response: rage quitting.1. merely mentioning anything about your "lifestyle and/or preference to women"
2. reading a book for class that has the word gay on the cover(that in no way to sexuality)
3. watching a movie where a girl says she loves another girl in a friend way
4.anything having to do with gay rights1. To take a stance or position against a percieved [assault].

2. The quality of an [attack] used against an [opponent] or [enemy] during [battle].

3. To find an [opinion], [act], [object] or [situation] to be [detestable].ANYTHING. LITERALLY ANYTHING THESE DAYS. ANGSTY TEENS GET OFFENDED BY EVERYTHING. IT'S ANNOYING. TAKE A JOKE.a person on social media-especially ifunny-who hates on and/or reports fandoms, furries, bronies, emos, porn, lgbtq, and anything else they don't like. also known as a hater.having no shame.A person who has no shame in getting what they want...often on there knees for best resultswhen someone makes a really stupid mistake, normaly blondes (like me n terri)1) Short for the drug, Cocaine.
2) Short for the beverage, Coca Cola.An addictive soda.

An addictive drug.1. A popular short term for the popular soft drink Coca Cola.

2. A popular short term for the popular, a illegal, drug Cocaine.Any drink served in the SouthWhat I would live the rest of my life on if I had enough money1* soda
2* short for coca cola
3* cocaineA highly addicted substance that ravages both mind and body!

....also the name of a powdered narcotic.1. Hard arse stimulant.  White powder derived from the Coca plant, native of Sth. America.  Very expensive but in small quantities is a fine buzz...

2. Short for Coca Cola - essence of American capitalist pigdog.  Made from [bumsweat] and sugar.1.What kept Tony Montana standing in the last 10 minutes of "Scarface."

2.Warm, its the best rust remover on the planet. (Put a little Coke in a cup and put a nail or small piece of sandwich meat on top. In the morning, meat is gone, wipe off rust.)

3. More popular than you think. I mean cocaine.Always available at bars, both over the counter as a soft drink or mixer and everywhere from the guest lounge to the toilets.

Often the word media or media bar means coke freindly, due to the common opinion that any person working in the media profession is a coke user.One of the smartest medical dramas to ever have aired, House, M.D. features the maverick, anti-social doctor Gregory House (Hugh Laurie) who specializes in infectious diseases and does whatever it takes to solve the puzzling cases that come his way.  

A show that should rob this year's Emmys if not for its sheer quality then for Laurie's brilliant acting.n. a style of electronic music originating in the late 80's in the USA characterized by four-on-the-floor bpms between 110-140, synthesized melodies and bass lines.A slang word with a hundred different definitions, 90% that were made up on the fly here at urbandictionary.com, to the point where it could be substituted for so many words you have no idea what the f**k someone would be talking about if he/she used each and every one.probably one of the best medical dramas ever to hit television, features Hugh Laurie, who plays the anti-social, sarcastic, pain in the ass doctor, who specializes in recognizing infectious diseases. He and his team of doctors take on extremely hard cases, House usually ends being right about the disease at the end of the day.

This show is truly great and it murders Scrubs.Nothing more or less than the best TV show that ever was or ever will be. HOUSE FTW!!the MOST awesome show on television! (well, next to Scrubs) which stars the wonderful British actor, Hugh Lauire, as the genius, pain in the ass, Gregory House.1. (v) to consume a substantial quantity quickly, completely, and with purpose.
2. (v) to beat in competition.
3. (v) to dominate.Pronunciation  (hous)

House Music: The original electronic incarnation from disco. House typically runs around 120 beats per minute (BPM) and uses a 4/4 time sequence and an eight bar repeating cycle. The beat is maintained by a heavy kick drum that alternates in a 1-3 pattern with a high hat accent. Like its disco roots, house often features vocal choruses, real instrumentation, and a more traditional song structure.A fucking wooden or brick fucking place where you live eat and sleep in.A bigger older woman with sexual desires towards younger men. (Usually a housewife.)To run over on a football fieldA vehicle of a redneck, which he drives to a date with his girlfriend instead of carring grass for cows.another four-wheeled vehicle with a flat bed in the back used for storage of equipment, groceries, small recreational vehicles, tools, or extra people. The pickup truck (as previously described) is the most popular automobile among men.A large vechile presumably with a bed for hauling, moving, towing, or even storing what needs be.

The absolute worst thing a person could do to a truck would include the following (these are all sins of god, and you will be punished accordingly):
-lowering it 'til it's an inch or less from the ground
-adding neon lights
-adding a fuckin ricer exhaust system... which most of time would just include tips or some other retarded peice of chrome
-PUTTIN A FUCKIN SPOILER ON IT
-adding giant ass rims to it, then stretching these tiny ass treads over'em that look like they'll pop any second


A real fuckin truck would include the following:
-A "body-on-frame"
-A real fuckin engine, varies from size of the truck (ex. an S10 with a small block, a brand new giant Ram 2500 with a Cummins Diesel)
-Four wheel drive... because some of us have the balls to get off the blacktop, just for fun or required for certain jobs, which most of you BMW pricks would be afraid of, don't wanna raw up them soft hands
-bedliner

optional:
-a nice leveling kit and/or lift kit
-some differential lockers with some beefy axles
-winch
-good ol' 15"/16"/17" wrapped with some treads depending on what terrian you work/play in (crawlers, boggers, LT's, swampers, AT's, 32"-40", etc.)
-sway bars, roll bars
-engine upgrades

Trucks are great vehicles. They are designed to do things cars can't, and most of them are built solid like a rock. Last long. Work hard and play hard. Besides the MPG... why wouldn't you want a truck?The metal part underneath a skateboard that holds the wheels in place (kind of like an axle on a car).  Used for grinding (riding on rails or waxed services).They are the device that attaches the wheels to the [skateboard].When a person does something that you didn't expect or you are so amazed at what happend your speechless.Someone who draws negative attention by not having their shit together. Most commonly used in jail.a word to describe someone/things extreme greatness. it is also a multi use term and can mean anything. it also can be used as an action word.Connection, association, or interaction with a person/place/thing; usually used in a negative sense.The hair on the back of you neck that is nappy, un-tameableA woman's natural habitat.The room where grandma hides her shotgun shells.A mysterious place full of sharp, pointed objects, deadly gas-operated incinerators, things that go 'ping' and a big, cold wardrobe full of beer which is the only true incentive for entering the room in the first placeA nickname for the holdem hand ten three (T-3) offsuit, a term used by many prominent online poker players, and coined by the professional online poker player Jamie Armstrong, aka pokerjamersa word used to describe nappy-naps in the back of a females head...On the sitcom "Martin" he often uses this word to insult the character "Pam"...because her back edges are apparently nappy and rough...Where the goods are cooked, things are shipped/delivered, people get swerved, and basically all the dope shit happens. Sometimes referred to as the bakery.a sammich factorythe back of the nape. (usually used in the phrase nape of the neck).Afro-amerain women or southen women call it"The Kitchen"(Traditional) The place in a home where a woman belongssomething that happens when the condom breaks on prom nightThe worst STD ever.  Causes pain, poverty, and eighteen year of torture.Carrying developing offspring within the body.your end of life...

you are totally fucked.

OWNEDSupposed to be the happiest moment in a couples lives but the dumb asses who conceived by accident just ruin the definition.

Don't have sex until your ready for the consequences.The condition of being able to make twice as much money in the porn industry due to supply and demand.The blossoming of a new life...in your life.When are girl has a baby growing inside her! After she has had unprotected sex!This is what happens when a male and a female have sexual intercourse and the sperm fertilises one of the woman's eggs after ovulation.

Contrary to popular (male) belief, pregnancy is not the woman's fault, it takes 2 to tango if you know what I mean...

Women also do not get pregnant to 'trap' a man. Because if he was indeed worth holding onto, she would not need to get pregnant to keep him, nor would a rubbish guy stick around if he got a woman pregnant either. (See scum or coward)

Pregnancy is the aprox 40 weeks of gestation in which it takes a human being to develop and grow inside his or her mothers body before birth.

It is in 3 stages (known as trimesters)
Pregnancy is divided into three stages called trimesters, each of which lasts three months. The first trimester covers the first 12 weeks of your pregnancy. This stage is often the worst with morning sickness and fatigue as common symptoms.

The baby grows inside the uterus, gaining it's nutrition from the placenta and kept safe and protected by the amniotic sack.

The woman's body goes through serious changes both physical and mental.

The mental changes include, hormonal, she may feel depressed,anxious,happy and angry, her mood changes often, she is not going mad, she is just pregnant!

the physical changes include: her tummy growing (obviously)
her breasts growing and producing milk ready for the babies arrival, usually in later stages of pregnancy she may leak milk.
Her nipples will also swell and darken, her breasts will grow larger, she may also get other skin conditions depending on hormone levels.
Aside from good changes to her body she may also find her immune system is weak, leaving her susceptible to colds,flu and other virus' and infections. When a woman is pregnant, her immune system is in over drive to stop her body from rejecting the unborn baby.

Pregnancy can be both a wonderful and horrible experience for someone. (including the babies daddy who has to put up with a very hormonal pregnant lady)

And before any man can insult a pregnant woman let me just say, if you get a girl pregnant and blame her for it, she is not going to want or need you anyway, so don't think your so great :)
A baby growing up with one parent is better than a baby growing up with an asshole for a father.

Not all pregnancies end with a baby though.
Some women for what ever reason choose to terminate the pregnancy, this does not make a woman a bad person, If she is not ready or in a good position to have a child, or say she became pregnant after rape, then she may choose to abort. No one has the right to judge someone for terminating pregnancy. Abortion is neither right or wrong.
Some pregnancies also end in miscarriage, and some pregnancies are ectopic.

Pregnancy is a natural thing and without it the life of all species would cease to exist.1. A state a woman may find herself in after having unprotected sex with a man.  Involves a child growing within her body and can be discovered by the absence of menstruation.  May cause illness.

2. Bloated, held out, prolonged.

I'd also like to say something to all the men out there who think that getting a girl pregnant is a death sentence!
Being pregnant is a wonderful and painful experience that you'll never have, so just shut the hell up about your selfish views.  Women don't trap men by getting pregnant.  It's not their choice!The act of receiving a serious butt whoopin at the hands of a person or group of persons.A severe beating delivered with the hands and feet; a pummeling so bad, the recipient needs to use his health insurance; see [open a can of whup ass]A good, old-fashioned ass kickin',Assault by the police after being arrested1. To beat someone up very badly, to the point of them being on the ground. This can happen with a combination of the following:

* Punching
* Kicking
* Kicking [Balls]
* [Curbstomping]
* [Fist Fight]ing

After the victim is on the ground, various forms of abuse may happen. Beatdown is then concurred, and a broken limb is required before it's real beatdown.

2. Another way of expressing utter defeat of someone. Can be used in celebration or defeat.v. (1) to verbally berate into submission (publicly) (2) to physically rough up or convincingly administer authority over another person or thing (3) the exercise of legitimate authority, rules, or known customs which leaves a person or persons in a poor position and often disappointed.
n. the act of beating down (2) a disappointing and unexpected result to an attempted action1. A fistfight where the odds are stacked highly in one of the two participants favours, commonly resulting in broken bones and softening of the face.

2. The climax of a hardcore song, usually a down-tempo combination of palm muted open strings/extensive pinch harmonics and low end chords, where crowd participant's can quite simply unleash the beast on one another.

3. fucking awesome.To receive a BEAT DOWN would be equivalent to getting your ass seriously beaten by another person or persons; to have one's ass handed to them; to be "pounded into the ground" by someone who doesn't like you.the dance of the hardcore kid.... it is when the guitarist simply stums the D or C string open.....The act of pumbling, destroying, and smashing a disgusting creature, especially ostriches, salamanders, junebugs, armadillos, and orangutang. Beat downs are given if and only if the act of being crusty or ugly is committed. They are given very often and involve fists and feet, or anything wet.Yellow bread made from cornmeal ubiquitous in Southern cuisine; it is slightly sweet, and usually served with butter.A baked foodstuff for which the primary ingredient is maize, which many people call corn, a grain.  Tradition holds that the Pilgrims ate corn bread because it was a plentiful grain - and the only grain - readily available where they settled in Massachusetts.1. A food commonly eaten by big booty black bitches.

2. Ur ass cherry(virginity),A girl with an extremely large ass, this refers to the fact that she must "eat her cornbread" in order to obtain such a fine ass.Money a prostitute makes from performing anal sex acts, as in getting [cornholed].a staple in African-American cuisine, often served with greens, coated with yam juice.The most delicious bread on the planet that was invented by Indians and is made out of corn.A name that no one will take seriouslyReference to the song "No sex in the champagne room" by Chris Rock. In it he says "Cornbread. Ain't nothin' wrong with that." So this word means that someone is perfect and you can't find anything wrong with her, just like cornbread.An affirmative statement.  A word mumbled when in acquiescence with another.  Used in place of the words: agreed or indeed.

It can also be used in random outbursts when feeling elated or quirky.Where you sleep when you get your girlfriend mad; but not mad enough to be kicked out of the house.when a girl sits on your lap and subtly grinds your cock with her ass in public, pretending that shes not (like a couch dance)the second best thing to use next to the bed ;)One's system of morals or beliefsA piece of furniture more diverse than a coffee table.A word used to replace words such as "fuck", or "shit", and has multiple uses as saying "back off". Or it is a piece of furniture that is ussually sat on.referrers  to the "sit-able" [plateau] of an excessively [fat] [booty]couch - an offensive term used to diminish someones social standing. Inferring that the person in question enjoys anus on his/her face.

A amicable term in some social spheres.The place where young children get ston'd in the morning.A lazy person.The reproductive system (gender neutral).Bhe act of saving a life when a person is drowning or choking by repetitively thrusting one's penis in and out of the person's throat. The thrusting creates a plumbing effect that forces the obstruction to move up the throat. This action is in no way sexual; it should only be used during times of grave danger.The act of purposefully stopping up your toilet so that the plumber will come to your house and unclog it.Wearing one's pants so low as to display one's asscrack. Derived from the state of many a fat plumber's pants.(verb) Very deep anal penetration
Deep-sea plumbing: Anal penetration over 10 inchesGeneric term for the bars of a jail cellTo forcefully insert a hollow metal pipe into the rectum of a woman and suck out all of faecal matter. It is similar to a [filthy fiddler].Plumbing is a sexual act involving a man and a female. The aforementioned male pops his penis in the girl's vagina, lubricating her ring, tickling and widening the said orifice. When that there hole is at maximum size, the man pops the scrotum and both balls in that bottomless pit of love.Any brass wind instrument, because of the appearance of the tubing.A Farm-veihicle that can pull farm-implements.  Tractors are usually used to pull items, and often have a [Front-end Loader] attacthed.Something you like, alot, think is attractive.A really, really fat girl that you bang because your stupid/high/desperate.A Techie, and a Actor; this person does both on stage and behind stage work, for theater.  This term was invented by WMHS Techie/Actors who needed a name in MoCoSomething really good. Mostly used in Kansas but also widely used throughout the midwest.An insult describing, someone who is slow and annoying.Big ass black bitch screwing a little white man while intoxicated.One who has ways from the rural Southern U.S., particularly Texas and most particularly, the town of Thorton, TX.word for female genitals.
aka. twat lol.(TRAK-tor) Used with [trash] to create [tractor trash]. Describes [white trash] from predominantly farming communities.Any opposite sex escort taken to an event in an effort to give a homosexaul person the apperance of being out on a date with a person of the opposite sex.a man or woman used as a cover for a gay partnerA female or male(though,mainly female) who is used as a cover-up for a homosexual.The single most manly, and great thing a man can do. To have a beard is to be a true man. If you have a beard, show it off proudly, and enjoy the satisfaction of the envy in the eyes of people around you who don't have beards. If you don't have a beard, grow one. If you cant grow one and your not past puberty yet, hold out my young friend, your time will come. If you don't have a beard and your past puberty, go get that sex change you know you need.The best solution to any problem. A sort of spiritual band-aid that's only effective when used by men.A common word used to address a homosexual's female friend who he takes around town; he normally calls this companion his "girlfriend" to prove to the world that he is a masculine, football watching, titty grabbing heterosexual male. Although, he may think that this so called 'image' is working, he's actually fooling himself. It's completely obvious to on-lookers that he is a flamboyant homo. Gayer than a chihuahua in pink shades. 

Here are some warning signs that you may be a beard...

1. He wears more makeup than you.
2. He looks fucking FIERCE in pictures 'cause he smiles wit' his eyes.
3. Uses bronzer as blush
4. Plucks his own eyebrows and his eyebrows look more groomed than yours.
5. Stands with hands on his hips.A condition that causes hair to grow from the chin and lower face. Symptoms include itching, divinity and gratuitous awesomeness.

Synonyms include: Jesus.The term 'Beard' is used to describe a person who is being used by another person to cover something up. This can range from gay men using a girlfriend as a beard to make people think he is straight, or someone using a friend to make people think they are hanging out with them when really they are with someone else.1. A boy or girl hired as a celebritys boyfriend/girlfriend by that celebritys management, usually for publicity.when a gay man and a gay woman date each other to hide that fact that they're gaya woman's hair arranged at the back of her head, held together with a band and to be used by a man as a handle while receiving oral sex from a willing female.

A straight ponytail is grasped near the base in a male's fist, medium grip. This allows nice control of the female's head, but is limiting due to awkward bending of the male's wrist. It is a carpal tunnel syndrome hazard for men who receive a high volume of blowjobs. The height of the ponytail on the back of the woman's head can be adjusted for better torque.

Another type of ponytail is the balled ponytail. The straight ponytail is simply folded under itself and tucked back into the band, resembling a ball of hair. Grasped with an open palm, the fingers should meet at the band, thus the "ball" is contained in the man's hand. Called the "palm sander" grip, it allows full control of the woman's head with no wrist strain.

A third type of ponytail is the double ponytail. Two tails are formed toward the rear left and right sides of the female's head. A favorite among bikers as each tail can be grasped by a separate hand. The willing lady's head is steered like a motorcycle.

Caution: though clearly sexual stimuli for men, it is important for men to remember women do not always view it in the same context. Women often use ponytails just to keep hair out of their faces. The confused male should never just assume when a woman's hair is in a ponytail her head is ready for mounting. He should always ask first.Ponytail; verb.  To grab a girl by her ponytail and remove her from whatever current situation she is in.1) the thing that's on a ponies butt

2) when a person with long hair puts it in a singular hair elasticA meme that took the Bioware Social Network by storm in anticipation for Dragon Age 2.

The second day of live feed from gamescom in Germany proved to be nothing but slow, dull hours of people standing by the DA2 booth and taking pictures in front of its poster.

Bored, the online viewers took note of one booth workers' Godly hairstyle of a long, blonde ponytail-braid. So enthralled were they that within just a couple hours; a Facebook page, several threads, a Chant of Ponytail (parody of DA:O's Chant of Light) and a social group on the Bioware forums had been created in honor of her.

Bioware remarked on it via Twitter, and Ponytail occasionally waved at the camera and appeared generally entertained by her sudden popularity from her self-titled army.Where a girl puts her hair up in a single rubber band.
why:
So she can smack a bitch
So she can smack someone in the face with her hair
To try and impress someone
To give head

It also the most impossible thing to do when you have messy, snarled hair i do not reccomend it you will look terrible unless you have bobby pins to fix that shitGetting alot of head.Basically it is a term used for people whose skin color is darker than most. Normally referred to as "nigger", "negro", "knee's grow", or "samo-niggaz". They are typically found wandering around in Compton shooting down samo-niggaz, also if you are trying to find them in the dark, say a funny joke it will make them laugh and you will see their teeth. For example: "What do you get when you cross a samoan and a negro?" -pause- and then say "SAMO-NIGGGGAAZZ!!!!!" in a very niggerish accent. When you come across a ponytail you have to holler at them for example...When someone has a cock stuck on the back of their head that resembles a cleft of hair being draped down the back of their neck.(from a hairstyle popular with the people described, usage invented by Kaecyy in 2005)

A generally amiable but hopelessly nerdy person-- not necessarily possessing an actual ponytail or even long hair-- who is usually immersed in a combination of science fiction and fantasy literature (and their derivatives), roleplaying games (often in their live action varieties), the gothic-industrial subculture, and/or the historical reenactment of pre-industrial periods of European history (often at what are called "Renaissance fairs")-- among other influences-- to or nearly to the point of lifestyle.Ponytail is when a gay or bi guy gets mad at his balding lover for not satisfying him sexually. When his lover falls asleep, he jacks off on the guy's bald spot and then  affixes a tube sock to it. The guy wakes up with a "ponytail". A variation of the [superman].A man who is fascinated with large breasted women, who as a child was deprived of his mother's breast milk and was a bottle fed baby.Heroin supplier; a penny balloon that contains narcoticsa heroin dealerslang for [condom]; slang for protection during sex.A woman's breasts, AKA [boobs], [tits], [jugs], [hooters], [knockers].Elegant strip club located at 233 Porno Ave in Providence, RI. Famous for allowing men (and women) of all ages, including those 15-17.  Home of the infamous "referee" (bouncer) who also offers lap dances for a discounted price.A fool; a person who has just made a pretty obvious mistakeBalloons are used to hold heroin (usually low grade H). A dealer will use un-filled balloons (the multi-colored, water balloons, most of the time) to place a small, universal weight, amount of heroin into. The weight of the heroin inside each balloon can vary depending on who packaged or "tied" them. The amount is usually about .1grams per balloon. People buy them in packs of 10 or more, and rarely buy/sell a single "balloon." Rumor has it, the reason heroin was originally put into these balloons, was so you could swallow them if need be, and not need medical attention.Another name for [breasts].A very weird thing that is basically a colored plastic sack of your breath to give your friend on their birthday.1. A source of information.

2. A source of entertainment.

3. A tool barely used by todays societies, because it is not 'cool' to read a book.verb meaning to run or to leave in a hurryan object used as a coaster, increase the hight of small children, or increase the stability of poorly built furniture.What people don't read enough today.cool: the first option given when trying to type 'cool' in a text message using t9Did you know there HAVE been books printed since the fifties and the new ones are cool?  They have them so anyone can understand them.  Books can be about video games, sex, drugs, sports, people, pretty much everything.  They come with cuss words, funny characters and you might understand some more of you those weird things...that's right. Words.Something we stopped caring about after the [internet] came along.Portable sanctuaries.Words assembled on pages. They usually tell stories of things the reader is interested in. That is, unless you're reading in [school]. Then, you have to read books nobody cares about or even likes. Maybe more people would like reading if they weren't forced to read books that they didn't like. I know I would.cool.

In the T9 predictive text on cell phones, the numbers 2665 spell both "book" and "cool," but "book" is the first word to display. To save time, it is left and understood to mean "cool."The best thing in the worldthe reason you need a new hard drive.The traditional way for young female Americans to afford university education (those not from wealthy families).A great American pastime.something that both sexes can enjoy.Arousing materials usually employed for masturbatory purposes.

It's often said that the most senstive part of your body during a porn session is your ears - no one likes getting busted with their undies around their ankles.

But, the use of porn doesn't need to be such an ugly experience.  'The Big Wank' (see below) is an example of how you can add more mystique and romance to your evening at home alone.peas and corn mixed together in a bowln. Reading and viewing material, otherwise known as 'cliterature'.Will never die, as long as there are folks willing to strip for the camera, the people who wish to browse it, and the assholes who wish to destroy it.something that the user loses interest in after masturbation has occurredhairy mofo.Heartless, 
Having no emotions,v. used to describe something awesome or nice ; something worthy of hatinBetter than [cool]
To be cooler than cool
The coolest level of coolwhat a girl says she is when she wants to snuggle :]plain, obviously, flat out, straight upan annoying and contagious illness that causes sniffling, sneezing, coughing, and other symptomsharsh, mean, icyCold was a rock band that started in 1986. They released 4 cd's: Cold, 13 ways to bleed on stage, year of the spider, and a different kind of pain. They also released an ep called Oddity. The band consisted of lead singer Scooter Ward, Matt Louhgran, Zachary Gilbert, both guitarists, Jeremy Marshall on bass, and Sam McCandless on drums. Former members included Mike Booth, Sean Lay, Terry Balsamo, Kelly Hayes and Eddie Rendini.
On February 27, 2006, Ward left a message on their official website saying they had disbanded. However, he said he and Sam will continue writing music.An infectious disease that usually spreads like wildfire around people, because people don't give a shit worth about others. They would yawn cough and not wash their hands properly to prevent others from catching the cold. If you catch a fucking cold, don't cough, cover your fucking mouth, and if you go to either 1-12 grades, go to the back of the class, and don't spread your fucking cold.Pretty, beautiful, hot1- *FRIDGE; - ph-ry-dJG ; verb- the action of destroying or assassinating a persons anus with a penis of considerable magnitude often resembling a 57 bus. The action, ususally performed in a violatory sense, produces the aftermath of either one of the following symptoms; laseration and/or complete tearing of the anal orifice, the dissemination of part or the entirety of the subjects' internal organs where the giant girder cock forced its entry, and/or the complete annihliation of the victims existance to the extent where it would be more appropriate to use the remains to bury the compost that would have been used to otherwise bury the remains.

2- As above but via a huge hit during a Football game.

3- Literally a Football player of such magnitude that he resembles a walking samsung fridge/freezer combo.someone who has never french kissedshort version of refridgeratorAn extremely cool person, the phrase was coined by BriBry (A YouTuber with 21,000+ subscribers) on a blogTV show in April 2011.A girl who is frigid and only hangs out with girls. Perhaps the date, but they are too scared to do anything.

They also are overly sacarstic.someone who hasn't got on (french kissed) anyone yet.place to store cold drinks and food

since when do u keep ice-cream in da fridge-noun, /frɪdʒ/: A common kitchen appliance used to store and preserve dead human bodies and body parts for consumption.Anyone from Shenendehowa HS knows that the fridge is 'a place to go sit and chill'A very appealing being full of human desires. When the fridge is full, it can make anyone very happy. But when not full, it has the potential to kill.A maker of [trouble] is not one who "causes" trouble, but who achieves a level of trouble by being [Mischievous], [Stunning]!, [Sensational]! and [Smart]...1. When knowingly, and consciously getting into trouble with no regard or care for the potential repercussions.

2. When one said person has one or more warrants for their arrest at one time.
3. If your name is Brittany Rivera.(n). 1. A poo that is very stubborn, requires a lot of force to eject., 2. Hardened feces which is lodged at the anus, preventing soft feces behind it to pass.

Example. "Where's a magazine? I've got a trouble-maker to work out."A troublemaker is someone who expresses a view on a forum that differs from those of the Administrator and/or, as is more common, a moderator of a forum. The person deemed to be a troublemaker will usually be 100% correct in their statements, but the moderator will object, making statements that could be classified as being a [bigland].

As a result the troublemaker will then be told to go and form their own forum, even though everything they said was both reasonable and correct.When you pair a shot of tequila with a Guinness.[Spike],the troublemaker. Generally considered out to [lunch]. Known for wildly outlandish behavior. Highly unstable antisocial personality however incredibly sexy.a person who escalates a situation.Someone who brings about or initiates something.A person who starts fights or arguments.A blow up alligator; short for instant gator.A person who instigates.  To instigate is to conspire, plan and prank the local populationtype of person that gets information from people by overhearin wat they say ...and then tell their bestfriend <3Bunty, officially known as the instigator.1. (before 1997) Something really bad; a failure

2. (after 1997) Something considered excellent and/or the best (uses modifier "the")something very cool/ goodA graffitti slang wordrefers to a person male/female who's attractive , on they steez and or carries themselves well .Fast Graffiti Pieces, more than two colors, uses all of your letters. not much details just enough to look good and be on your way.(verb) the act of writing a grafitti tag in a highly visible public place.To fail spectacularly.Something you never say on air airplane.Slang for Ecstasy pillscool, awesome. Also see shita baby cat! sometimes they can't meow properly yet and they are sooo cute!An baby [cat]. Also known as a [kitty]. They have sharp little claws and teeth and can be nasty sometimes, but they are soft, cute, and totally lovable. Their meow is just precious to hear. Be gentle; kittens are delicate.1.  An immature cat.
2.  An adorable ball of fur with big eyes that uses its powers of cuteness to manipulate human beings into submission and slavery.
3.  An adorable, yet insane, tiny monster with teeth and claws.Cute little fluffballskitten (kit'en) n. 

 A small, sometimes domesticated animal; usually a pet; a member of the cat family, wants to grow up to be a lion, tiger, leopard, etc; thinks the world revolves around her; is probably right.little fluffy bastardsa woman who likes to date men older than her, usually by about 10 years, or more depending on the woman. Also the opposite of a cougar.The casualties of masturbation.(n) Term of coolness for a female from the 1950's and still used in [rockabilly] circles.Small balls of fluff that people perceive as being "cute". Everytime you do something naughty, they die.random weather patterns. makeing meteorology nearly imposibleThe 17th state of the United States -- in 1803. Contains 13,000,000 people and its chief cities are Cleveland, Cincinnati, and the capital of Columbus. Ohio is known for being the home of the Wright Brothers, the first man in space, more presidents than any other state, and Generals William T. Sherman and U.S. Grant. Also home of the champion OSU Buckeyes. Unlike what others may tell you, there are larger hellholes in the universe. Ohio has a lot to offer and is a decent place full of decent people.A land of shifting mists, Ohio is the most mysterious state in America.  There are some who claim that it does not exist at all, but is merely a hoax perpetrated by a strong core of dedicated jokesters in the "neighboring" states of Michigan, Pennsylvania, Indiana, and West Virginia (we're pretty sure no one tells Kentucky anything).  

Most people believe, however, that Ohio DOES in fact exists, and that its mystery is due solely to the mysterious mists that seem to enshroud the entirety of the state in...well...mystery, deterring all but the most stalwart of travelers.  Constituents to this belief also hold that Ohio is, in fact, the last home of the dinosaurs, and that Ohioan economy is based almost solely on quarrying and agricultural works using highly-trained dinosaurs as the primary (and literal) beasts of burden.The Buckeye State. One of the best states to live in, and all around best in the Union. We have 3 major cities: our Capital; [Columbus] (aka C-Bus, Bus Town), [Cincinnati] (aka the dirty/nasty Nati) and [Cleveland] (the Mistake by the Lake). Home to smaller cities such as; Dayton, Toledo and Akron. 1 NBA team, 1 NHL team, 1 MLS team, 2 NFL teams, 2 MLB teams. We are also home to THE Ohio State University Buckeyes, one of the largest/best universities in the country. Also home to Ohio University, which is filled with raging alcoholics that refer to themselves as "students". Most of us in Ohio, (especially us in Columbus) were born and raised with the Bucks. We bleed Scarlett & Grey. We say things like "you guys" and a drive-thru liquor store is not strange to us. It's the beach, not the shore, and pop, not soda. We are the Eastern most state in the MidWest, and have some of the friendliest people around. Ohio girls are some of the coolest/nicest you will ever meet. We are a big football state, but Lacrosse is another sport everyone plays. We play a little game called [Cornhole] anywhere we can. We love our corn & we love our beer. We are Ohio. The Heart of it All, and you'd be nothing without us.The only place in the world where you can experience all four seasons in one week.A chant that occurs in Columbus, Ohio between 2 individuals or 2 groups of people who are too stupid to get that not everyone they see gives a rat's ass about sports and can't spell the name of the four letter state they live in without help from other idiots. Proof that OSU students don't learn anything but how to get arrested, drink, fight, watch football and date rape each other. Anyone who yells "O-H" at you in Columbus is a complete waste of flesh and deserves to get their ass kicked.1) One of the states of the United States of America.
Home to a bunch of formerly bad but now improving pro sports teams, a ton of colleges, the OSU Buckeyes, actual buckeyes, part of the Rust Belt, Cedar Point and a lot of soybeans, cows, and corn.
Ohio contains a little bit of all the typical Midwestern environments- college towns, suburbs, cities, urban areas trying to reinvent themseles, farmlands, etc.  It also contains part of Appalachia, and a large number of "swing voters".  It has quite a few ardent liberals and conservatives, and has been the home and/or birthplace of eight presidents.  The weather, it being part of the Midwest region, is often "crazy" and swings between hot, mild, cold, and freezing.  The four seasons are widely known to be "winter, still winter, almost winter, and construction" or something to that effect (believed to be taken from a Jeff Foxworthy chain email).
There's definitely a lot more there than bad drivers, "hicks", and cows, and just driving through the state does not really do it justice.  You've got to experience it to really understand it, and then you can pass judgement.
2) A song written by Neil Young (while he was working with Crosby, Stills, Nash, and Young) in response to the [Kent State Massacre], which occured at Kent State University in Ohio on May 4, 1970 when National Guardsmen opened fire on student protesters on the KSU campus.I used to think that this state was propably the most suckish, boring state EVER.
I think a lot differently now.
Here are a few things about this Awesome state.

HISTORRRYYY
This was one of the first states of the Northeast, Established in 1803. The three main cities are Columbus, the capitol, Cleveland, and Cinncinati.
The Wright Brothers were raised in Ohio.
So were eight of America's presidents.
Aaand the first man to walk on the moon.
Akron was the first town to use police cars.
Cleveland was the first fully electric powered city.
Also the first state to use traffic lights.
And many many other things that I can't remember.

TIPS, HINT, AND INFO FOR ANY TOURIST...

1; STAY. AWAY. FROM. SPRINGFEILD. TOWNSHIP. This is basically the cespoo of Ohio. Unless you are crazy, like everyone else that lives in that weird place :D

2; ..I suggest dont go to Toledo.

3; If you have the courage to yell, 'I LOVE MICHIGAN' in a public area...You. Will. Be. Eaten. Alive. Unless you're in Toledo.

4; When you hear someone yell, 'O-H', you yell 'I-O'. Dont ask questions. Just do it. 

5; Don't. Diss. OSU. You will also be eaten alive for that also. Again, unless you're in Toledo

6; In response to number one, stay away from Ellet too.

7; Our weather is crap and very unpredictable. Deal with it. I suggest bringing snowboots in the middle of summer and shorts in the dead of winter.

8; Only we can diss our state. If you diss it, we'll agree with you for that second, then again, eat you alive.

9; There's a 3/4 chance you will be eaten alive.

So, that's only 1/4 of the stuff in Ohio. Come here to figure out the rest for yourself :D
But...Try not to be eaten alive...America is the melting pot of the world; Ohio is the melting pot of America.  There will never be a pot more melting than Ohio.  Some say this makes Ohio a blurry combination of everything, and that it is not very distinct among the states, but this is cantrary to the truth.  No other state is like Ohio, in that it is a melting pot.  Also, Ohio's flag is one of only three non-rectangular significant world flags, and the only non-rectangular flag of the states.  Ohio's also cool cuz I live there.Ohio is the heart of America and is well known for it's amusement park in Sandusky Ohio called Cedar Point, which has over fourteen rides and loads of tourists come summer.

Ohio also has a huge historical background which can be seen almost everywhere you go.

Ohio is one of the states with the most American accent.

It's pronounced, OH-HIGH-OH, not OH-HAI-UH. If you go to any person who was raised in Ohio they will laugh at you for pronouncing it differently than 99% of America.

Ohio rivals with Michigan about sports, and they don't like each other because Michigan thinks Ohioan's drive slow -- while Ohioans think they drive like bats out of hell. (Which they do.)

Most of Ohio is taken up by farms and fields, but don't judge it by the land, for there is many neat things you can discover in Ohio.The religious belief that every word of the sacred texts is literally true; stereotypically in Christianity and taken to such extremes. See also: [fundamentalist].A group of people comprising 0.002% of the world's population yet drawing unproportional amount of media coverage (especially Israeli Jews).1. Someone who practices Judaism.

2. Derogatory term for someone tight with their money or someone not very generous.The only people in the world that are simultaneously hated by both the extreme Left and the extreme Right.

Synonym: [scapegoat]A person of the jewish faith.Let's Clear up some of the Misconceptions in these postings.

A Jew is a person who's mother is Jewish. (Some streams of Judaism argue that Jewish patrimony can be acquired through the father as well). 
Jews are not a race but an eclectic mix of different races, nationalities, and cultures; they are a truly multi-cultural and multi-ethnic people. However, within this mix, there are distinct ethnic groups such as the Ashkenazic and Sephardic Jews that make up the overwhelming majority of the Jewish People. 
Most American Jews are of Ashkenazic origin -- usually originating from Eastern Europe or the former Soviet Union. Therefore, American Jews could largely be classified as an ethnic group, hence the characteristic stereotypes, although there are exceptions.
 A Jew is not a person who practices Judaism, although most Jews do adhere to some form of Jewish practice or cultural tradition.
 A Jew is not an Israeli and an Israeli is not a Jew. An Israeli is a citizen of the state of Israel. While most Israeli's are Jewish, there are also non-Jewish citizens of Israel. 
A Jew is not automatically a citizen of the state of Israel. A Jew must apply for and be granted citizenship to the state just like everyone else, although most are awarded citizenship rather easily.1) someone who practises judaism

2) is also a culture/ethnicity, that is to say it has a certain sense of humour, certain type of food and music etc.

3) A person who Mel Gibson talks smack about after he has had too much to drink.A southern bastardization and contraction of the two words "did you".Something you blame something.Like Christians, but without all that Jesus stuffone who practices the world's oldest monotheistic religionLacking any class. Dumb and unartful, like most of the words in this dictionary.
[fool]the classy way of saying awkward. use it.Adjective

gauche (comparative more gauche, superlative most gauche)

Positive
gauche
		

Comparative
more gauche
		

Superlative
most gauche

   1. Awkward or lacking in social graces; bumbling.

          Quotations:
              * "Seeking by vulgar pomp and gauche display" — Samuel Griswold (1793-1860)nuveau riche, "cursi", expensive but tackySocially ackward and lacking Social experienceThe hair on a dogs cock after the lipstick has been withdrawn.Male genitalia. Pronounced "gooch".A girl's boyfriend/crusha classy, sophisticated manner, much like audrey hepburn. it is classy, glamorous, without being a pushover, and without being flashy. its an element of class.Glam without being trampy - attention grabbing class! It is sophisticated, intelligent, and gorgeous.Chic is an elegant fashion sense, that is also very glamorous, and does NOT mean a girl, thats CHICK!Hard to define, a certain eliment of style and sophistication in your fashion sense. Almost artisticly stylish (don't ask).An abbreviation for Cherry Coke. Commonly herd in the hood.It's simply just another word for stylish.

FACTVery attractive lady with an air of elegance flowing around her but at the same time she is very friendly and approachable.

She is a very genuine character and there's nothing pretentious about her.

Very sexy but not slutty, not a skank. She dresses herself decently, and appropriately.To be super stylish. One of the cool people. Effortlessly awesome.An abbreviation of the word chica that close girlfriends or besties say to one another. Usually girls who are called this are hot, sassy and feisty!One of the tightest disco-funk band of all time.to groom a man.  Shaving, waxing, cleaning up the superfluous fur.A term used to define male grooming below the belt. A male can use both an electric razor or a regular razor. A Mach 3 is preferable with the ladies on the testicular area. No female likes to deal with hairy balls, so men must education themselves on proper manscaping and maintenance techniquesWhen men shave or trim their cock and ballsA mans grooming of his body hair.  Like landscaping, but for the body."I have no idea what this is."

- Jonathan GoldsmithA fine artform exclusive to men;  the continued upkeep of exceptional hygeine and strategic hair removal as they pertain to the male body.For a guy to trim his pubic hair or to style it fashionably.To trim male pubes back to a reasonable bush."I have no idea what this is"
- Jonathan GoldsmithA word used to discribe the shaving of a Males pubic /chest/ and back hairs.

-Its pronounced like Landscaping but with a (man) instead of (land).Describes the complicated love and affection shared by two straight males.-noun
1. A [non-sexual] [relationship] between two men that are unusually close.

-verb  -mans-ing
1. The act of wooing a fellow male friend for the purpose of becoming closer.
2. Going to unusual lengths in an attempt to become closer with another male friend.

also: "Bromancing the Stone"
1. The act of truly and thoroughly  enjoying the process of getting and/or being high/stoned. 

Provenance/Origin: "Bromance" is a [portmanteau] of the two words "brother" and "romance". Originally coined by author/editor Dave Carnie in "Big Brother Magazine." [Big Brother] was a sort of R rated [skateboarding]/skate culture magazine that was eventually purchased by [Larry Flynt]'s [Hustler] [conglomerate] and consequently taken out of [circulation] due to unsatisfactory sales [performance]. Carnie used the word on several occasions to describe relationships between [skate-buddies] who spent a lot of time together and/or shared hotel rooms on every tour/skate [road trip].A close relationship between two bros to such a point where they start to seem like a couple.The relationship between two straight guys. They enjoy each others company and even though they may constantly joke about being gay they are not.a highly formed friendship between male friends, or "bro's".(N) The intense complicated love shared between two heterosexual males that consists of but not limited to wrestling, numerous man-dates, and tons of other stories that will only remain between the two.

Also a form of male bonding to such a point where they start to seem like a couple.

This bond is normally only shared between two males that have a deeper understanding of each other, in a way no woman could ever realize.Bromance

-noun

A strictly non-sexual relationship between two completely heterosexual men that are close and enjoy eachothers company but still enjoy the company of women.What House and Wilson or George Clooney and Brad Pitt have.

Dating back to Plato and Socrates, a close but non-sexual relationship between two men. The whole is greater than the sum of the individual parts.

To girls this means, George Clooney + Brad Pitt>George Clooney or Brad Pittwhen two guys have a very close bond, to the point where they act like a couple, except that they are both straight. Signs of a bromance include, but are not limited to: knowing what the other is thinking, hanging out 27/7, hugging, extensive high-fiving, and sharing clothes. Some famous examples include Sherlock Holmes and Watson, and Captain Kirk and Spock.Noun- An intense and extreme non-sexual bond between two straight males. Said to be a “deep emotional bond” that no woman could satisfy.As a rule of thumb, it is profoundly unwise to take crack-cocaine. The brain has evolved a truly vicious set of negative feedback mechanisms. Their functional effect is to stop us from being truly happy for long. Nature is cruelly parsimonious with pleasure. The initial short-lived euphoria of a reinforcer as powerful as crack will be followed by a "crash". This involves anxiety, depression, irritability, extreme fatigue and possibly paranoia. Physical health may deteriorate. An intense craving for more cocaine develops. In heavy users, stereotyped compulsive and repetitive patterns of behaviour may occur. So may tactile hallucinations of insects crawling underneath the skin ("formication"). Severe depressive conditions may follow; agitated delirium; and also a syndrome sometimes known as toxic paranoid psychosis. The neural aftereffects of chronic cocaine use include changes in monoamine metabolites and uptake transporters. There is down-regulation of dopamine D2 receptors to compensate for their drug-induced overstimulation. Thus the brain's capacity to experience pleasure is diminished.Crack is something that is sold by both drug dealers and prostitutes. The only difference is that a prostitute can wash her crack and sell it again.Another form of cocaine:  2 parts cocaine to one part baking soda, with a little water, heat gently until a precipitate forms: this is your crack1. Smokeable cocain 
2. A program to unlock trial versions of programs 
3. "[butt cleavage]"Otherwise known as crack-cocaine, this illegal drug is a mixture of two parts cocaine and one part baking soda. This chemical process reverts the powder-cocaine mkaing process by one step, producing a smokable form of the naturally found alkaloid cocaine. Because of its nature as an inhalable substance, the high is quicker and more intense, leading to a larger number of addicts. In present society, it is considered to be much more distasteful to use crack-cocaine then powder-cocaine as crack is mainly viewed as a drug for poor people whereas powder cocaine is used by a richer constituancy. Contrary to popular belief, crack-cocaine is not freebase cocaine. Freebase cocaine is a mixture of cocaine, ether, and other dangerous and combustable materials. Baking soda was replaced as the ingredient in the 1980's to make production easier and less dangerous. Either way, crack and freebase cocaine produce the same smokable form of the drug.A small, illegal program who's sole purpose is to trick another program (by editting, imputting a registration key, or some other method) into thinking it has been registered.The area between the ass cheeks and, in females, including the crevices of the genitalia.Basically, crack is silly, intentionally non-serious, and has a high tendency to be extremely crazy and unfounded, such as purposeful [OOC]-ness or playing on cliches, inside jokes, and/or [fanon].
  
The term crack probably stems from crack as in crack cocaine, as opposed to a crack in a wall. As in, so horrendously unfounded/silly that only one could have come up with it while under the influence of crack.Something that is great, awesome, good.NOUN:
1. The solid form of the illicit, recreational drug, cocaine.
2. A small gap on the surface of an object.
3. An illegally obtained password or file to a copyrighted computer program.

ADJECTIVE:
1. The quality or state of excellence. (often used to describe music)
2. Having a small gap on the surface of an object. [-ed]

VERB:
1. To make a small gap on the surface of an object.
2. To illegally pass through some form of passive security (often used with computer programs, see NOUN-3).
3. To punch someone in an altercation.
4. To start. [-ing]
5. To be occurring. (often used in the greeting, "What's crackin'?!")An abbreviation for methamphetamine, a drug that stimulates the central nervous system by causing it to release more dopamine, a neurotransmitter that gives someone a feeling of satisfaction.a horrible drug that ruins lives, breaks up families, and does considerable damage to one's looks (its true, look at the before and after pictures). All the people who write definitions promoting it have no idea, and will be o-so-happy when all of their teeth fall out :)the stupidest shit EVERAn abbreviation for [methamphetamine], a drug that stimulates the central nervous system by causing it to release more dopamine, a neurotransmitter that gives someone a feeling of satisfaction.A stupid drug made used and made by [white trash] that's made out of cold medicine and other easily obtained chemicals.The lonely situation you find yourself in, after using methamphetamine. Typically, broke, with no job, falling apart, stuttering, wondering why you pulled into this parking lot "What the hell was I doing just now?" when all your "new best friends" have left you for better and you feel like it's the end of the world.A drug for fuckups.. Invented by some japenese guy approx. 80 years ago.. The hippie version is speed...Will fuck up ones life and their love ones; HIGHLY addictive, probably the most addictive drug; not only popular with so called "white trash" but very big in the Filipino community all across USA. (esp. cali, vegas, NY & JERSEY). Most users/dealers/runners and THE SOURCE know or have "heard" of one another.

They say, "don't knock it, until you TRY it" or "Try anything once", etc. etc. CRYSTAL METH does NOT apply to these sayings! DO NOT TRY IT!1. The reason why it is so hard to get decent over the counter meds for your freaking hayfever. 2. [Crack] for [rural] and [suburban] white people.Short for methamphetamines. The most highly addictive illicit narcotic made from all sorts of deadly toxins: metals, cold medicines, rat poison, chlorine, bleach, etc. The drug is so dangerous and deadly, that it can explode when being produced incorrectly. Unfortunately, the drug has a strangle hold on America and destroys cities, families, and eventually the addict themself. It makes the addict lose their looks, teeth, health, personality, etc. On the streets its known as ICE, SPEED and CRYSTAL METH. The drug turns you into a loser and eventually a criminal and convict. It is highly addictive because it stimulates the central nervous system, giving a feeling of euphoria and relaxation. Meth is the fastest-growing illegal drug in the United States, and is actually growing the fastest among caucasians in upper middle-class suburbs and rural areas.Gin is an unaged [liquor] made by [distill]ing [grain]s such as [barley], [corn] or [rye]. Its [bouquet] comes from [juniper] berries, [coriander], [herb]s and [spice]s, usually added to the grain mash during [distillation]. The gin is stored in [glass], [earthenware] or [stainless steel] containers, but does not mature in these. The storage time serves only to harmonize the product.

Someone once said that "A [bar] without gin is like an Italian kitchen without pasta". No other [liquor] provides for the creation of so many classic [cocktail]s. Gin is in fact a liquor that is harmonious with almost anything.

Without gin the king of [cocktail]s, the dry [Martini], would not exist.An often strong liquor, usually clear but with a strong smell, much like rubbing alcohol. Sold under brands like Gordon's 'London Dry Gin' and Bombay 'Sapphire'. Often used to escape life temporarily or make high skool more interesting.An archaeic word for Aboriginal Females
considered offensive but curiosly still allowed to be used to name Australian places. Gin-Gin Falls for example(n) An individual of aboriginal origin. (Offensive)(n) in poker, drawing/flopping/turning the best card or combination of cards (typically it gives one a very strong hand and one's opponent a strong but second-best hand); frequently used with the verb 'to hit' and occasionally followed by 'card(s)'

etymology: probably originating from the card game of the same namePronounced "gĭn" not "jĭn" -Bahamian slang meaning "going to".A grain liquor that smells and tastes like pine needles.Slang for the female genitalia.In hold 'em poker: Describes a hand's relationship to a flop when conditions exist where not only is the hand likely the strongest, but can also easily improve to the [nuts] (aka best hand possible).a girl who is ready to suck any nigga up just for popularity or cause they happen to be real thirsty.The surest way of getting nothing from something.when your not sure if you have to fart or shit and you take the chance any way thats what gambling is all aboutGiving money to native americans.1. An improvident activity in which winning gleefully proceeds losing. 2. The saddled process of chasing one's loses or blowing one's winnings. 3. Chinese finger cuffs. 4. An insatiable itch erroneously believed to be satisfied by scratching. 5. The willingness to ask Chance for Certainty.just a way to get ahead.v., intransitive

A quick way to riches and power.

It's a sure thing.the act of masturbating. the reference is to the hand gesture made to imply masturbation, which greatly resembles the shaking of dice.custom-made; looking like it cost a million bucksOne of the powerful masculin [trends] for 2008 in fashion. Bespoke [tailoring] reffers to a particularity of british fashion, but the term 'bespoke' is now extended to all life's domains, as a powerful mark of [luxury], an anti-brand/ anti-globalisation reaction.The act of shoving a bicycle pump up a woman's rectum while going down on her.(1)A drink that often burns when consumed by itself, but goes good mixed with various sodas (see: [pepsi], [coke], [7-up]) and sometimes even water. Straight shots are smoother if chilled, and some whiskeys such as Seagram's Seven can be consumed straight by even those with the weakest stomachs.

(2)A drink which makes old men's I.Q.s increase exponentially after every shot, eventually leading to a bar full of omniscient men who can't even begin to consider that for once they might just be wrong.

(3)Something good to come out of Canada.The life giving substance that has intoxicated many a man. (better than eve and that god damn apple)Part of the military phonetic alphabet. As one might expect, Whiskey = W.An alcoholic beverage made from ingredients similar to beer, but intended for grown ups. Suitable for use as an aftershave, by men who consider that perfumed stuff too girly.The best fucking drink in the world. Not too mention the manliest. Mixed with [weed], it can cause one to become fucking [crunk]. Puts hair on your chest.1. The oil of conversation, the philosophic wine, the ale that is consumed when good fellows get together, that puts a song in their hearts and laughter on their lips, and the warm glow of contentment in their eyes;

2. Christmas cheer;

3. The stimulating drink that puts the spring in the old gentleman’s step on a frosty, crispy morning;

4. The drink which enables a man to magnify his joy, and his happiness, and to forget, if only for a little while, life’s great tragedies, and heartaches, and sorrows;The reason I get up in the morning and the reason I pass out at night.Proof that God loves us and wants us to be happy.The cause of and solution to all life's problems!Its the fifth element after water, fire, earth and wind... Nothing exists without it!A magic potion used to make people of the opposite look bettera liquid form of carbohydrates that should be drank as a replacement for all other liquids, especially waterwhat men need to function dailyThe piss of angels.- After Bacon. it's the way of life
- The saver of old lonely men
- It even sounds cool..heh..heh.. Beer.a substance imbibed by males which, in time improves the appearance of ugly women and should be purchased more than makeup cuz it does a whole hell of a lot more for ya if yer really ugly than any makeup ever willA drink which makes you strong and clever.What you put in water bottles and bring to school.Vodka is a clear, colorless, unaged [liquor] "made from [ethyl alcohol] from agricultural origin". It was originally made in [Russia] from [potato]es, but today's vodka, which is almost odorless and tasteless, is usually made from [grain], primarily [barley] and [wheat], and occationally from [rye].

Vodka is integral to many [cocktail]s such as the [Screwdriver], [Bloody Mary] and Vodka [Martini]. If served straight, it should always be icy-cold.

Flavored vodkas have become popular in the [United States] and may be flavored with anything from [fruit]s to hot [pepper]s. Some flavored vodkas are even sweetened slightly.As a Russian who is experienced in the art of vodka consumption i feel obligated to provide the following information about vodka drinking.
A) Vodka should never ever under any circumstances be bought in a plastic bottle
B) Vodka should never be served ice-cold or even moderately could when straight. BUT!!!!! the shoot glass should be ice cold.
C) Just because you have a carton of Tropicana and a bottle of Smirnoff doesn't mean you can make a screwdriver. Screwdrivers never have any plump in them
D) When drinking vodka never sip it, or drink it slowly! This way of drinking vodka leads to loss of taste buds and a reeking smell.
E) Before taking a shot of vodka cheers must be said, then let out all the air you have in your lungs, drink and inhale at the same time.
F) NEVER EVER CHASE VODKA WTH BEAR
G) A good tactic for not getting sick while drinking vodka, is to supplement it with soda and some snacks.
H) Drinking vodka together with bear and champagne leads to short term memory loss.

facts
Vodka a 40% alcoholic drink. In theory it can be made out of anything, even wood or marijuana. The solution to this magnificent drink is extremely simple: a 2/5 ratio of alcohol and water. Non-mass produced vodka, which is available in most of Europe and Russia, is an expensive high quality drink, which went through as many as 8 stages of filtration and sold for more that 100$ a bottle.
Rarely it is mixed in to cocktails, such as vodka martini and the screw driver.
In the United States only commercial, mass produced vodka is available and has a number of flaws. A) it is not made in Russia, even if it is called Smirnoff of Stolichnaya, but New Jersey or in the best case scenario Sweden.
Best brand of Vodka are: VEDA and BELUGA BLACK, these two brands made Stoli and Absolute look like absolute shit!
Please drink responsibly and enjoy.Low cost and effective engine fuel, industrial solvent and poison. Some people also like to drink the stuff.quite strong alocolic liquid (40-60%).
not brewed, like wine, so it doesn`t taste like yeast. what most people will use to get [shitfaced]. To avoid death, it is adviced to mix the vodka with a non-alcohol liquid.Unfortunately it has become a pop culture joke. Most popular vodkas (smirnoff, absolut) are absolut shit and made in Sweden or Finland or something. Real and good vodka must be made in a slavic country. There is an ongoing argument with Poland and Russia over who created the drink. There is more evidence that says Poland coined the term vodka(wódka) for it and first started mass consumption of it. However, it was most likely created by persians or arabs. Slavic and also celtic people have the highest alcohol tolerances.A drink that can be either complete shit or damn fine. Has one of the most delicate tastes if properly filtered. Quartz filtered vodka recomended over a charcoal filterBasically, alcohol mixed with water. An alternative to just plain raw alcohol, invented by people who did not die like 4 seconds after drinking it (and apparently wanted more). Go to any spot in Russia you can buy it for like 50 kopeiks (2 cents) a bottle

Comes from the Russian word "water" (meaning that the Russians practically drink it as if it was water)Has 3 meanings:

1. Clear alcoholic beverage made from fermented grain or potatoes

2. Water in Russia, since most water found in russia that is not frozen is hazordous to your health and may be fatal

3. God in Russia, the Russian God, or, the God of the Russian people, or perhaps just the poor bums on the streets of RussiaWhen you have to hold on to the grass to keep from falling off the earth.A word defining a person who has had too much alcohol.  See also:  hammered, sloshed, shit-faced, tanked, blitzed, bombed, wrecked, three sheets to the wind, drunkened, loose, tipsy, defcon 1, well-done, trashed, jagged up, Irish, canned, smashed, fucked-up, intoxicated, inebriated, aniahalated, laced, (etc.)Chemically incovienencedA sublime way of existing in a world full of idiots.One's alter ego who is blamed for all things of a regrettable nature.The state you're in when you won't give two shits about what you say. You will be fucking uninhibited and won't give a shit what anyone thinks. You will be happy and motherfucking confident. You will be sippin dranks and feeling like a baller. Euphoria on a scale of 1 to 10: a motherfuckign 10................
So give it up to alcohol, bitches. this shit is legit, and deserves fucking respect, (that bottle of sailor jerrys was fucking good by the way)
Nigger. if you dont like alcohol, you can just kill yourself cause your iq is in the negatives!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!1. Past tense of "drink".
2. Your girlfriend's dad.
3. Spinning without moving.when you have to close one eye to keep people from splitting in two.Intoxicated with alcoholic liquor to the point of impairment of physical and mental faculties. 
Caused or influenced by intoxication.a state of being that one can only hope to constantly attainThe magic wand that can make a man dissappearaccident indicatorThe alternative to the orange.THE MOST BADASS FUCKING FRUIT ON THE FUCKING PLANET. SERIOUSLY, THIS MOTHERFUCKER KICKS THE SHIT OUT OF THE PUSSY ORANGE OR BANANA. THIS JUICY, RED MOTHERFUCKER IS THE BEST FUCKING THING THAT GOD HAS EVER CREATED. EAT AN A APPLE AND YOUR DICK WILL GROW 3 INCHES. FUCK.A horrendous company that has somehow managed to stay afloat for years and appeal to a mass of misguided people.  They specialize in taking existing technology, making it all shiny and fancy looking, and re-selling it for double the price.  Ironically, their slogan is "Think Different".

Their latest and greatest gadget that's getting all the attention is, of course, the iPhone, which is basically comparable to any high-quality $150 phone, except it has "innovative" touch screen technology, and it sells for $600.

Apple couldn't quite figure out how to make an operating system, so they just stole the freeBSD kernel and repackaged a bastardized version of it as Mac OS X.  It's funny that Apple brags that it's "Unix-based", since no one with experience in Unix would ever use a Mac.

Apple frequently runs "clever" ads.  Although they've made a ton of them, all the ads boil down to how Windows has viruses and crashes all the time.  Apple also have an enormous, cult-like fanbase that like to remind us of these things every five seconds.  Apple fanboys are generally smug, annoying, and arrogant, despite the fact that most of them don't know jack shit about computers.what the fuck are you looking at the definition of apples for you stupid fuck?The truly heinous name of Chris Martin and Gwenyth Paltrow's lovechild.The result of a mindblowing or humiliating situation in which the victim is posed one question:A greedy-ass company that makes a shit tone of money and over-prices their productsA manufacturer of computers, peripherials, and software with around a 3% share of the pc market. 
Most well-known products include:
imac
ipod
itunes
OS X
final cut pro
ibook

While their operating system's market share may be significantly below that of Microsoft's windows, many still prefer to use Apple's computers and software, especially for graphical design and audio work. 

Many people like to debate over the superiority of macs over pcs and visa versa, such people have no lives.A shortened version of [apples and pears], which is cockneyrhyming slang for stairs.Australian Slang for goodThe kind of guy most girls ACTUALLY want when they say they want a [Nice Guy].

Jerks are selfish, manipulative bastards who see women as little more then sexual conquests to brag about to their buddies or mere objects that are there for their personal pleasure. As to ensure the post-sex breakup will be in their favor, Jerks often play the "sensative guy" early on so the girl will make most of the moves on HIM, and after he's done with her and dumps her for some other girl just like her, he can make it look like she's at fault for coming on too strong, and consequently she'll take him back if he chooses to return for seconds.

Typically are/were [Frat Boy]s, [Jock]s, and [Prep]s in school.Noun. An [idiot] or stupid person. An insensitive, selfish, ignorant, cocky person who is inconsiderate and does stupid things.1.  Final stage of evolution of any male who spent at least one year dating in America, no matter his origin
2.  Mandatory mindset for self-survival within corporate America
3.  At this point of no return, group synonym for an elusive + cocky + self-confident + self-centered + loud + crazy male
4.  A guy that doesn’t give a flyin’ fuck about anything else but his handsome allure and annoying success.
5.  THE abusive attitude that will surely attract any girl’s love in America. For life
6.  A guy that enhances any girl’s low self-esteem and insecurity without meaning it. Then gets blamed for it.
7.  A guy that does not return any “I love you” s but keeps smiling at his girl’s face until she melts down and asks for more of that shit :)
8.  Every bitches’ openly discussed concern. Yet every bitches’ secret love.
9.  A challenge  aka any girl’s biggest turn-on.
10.  A bitch with a dick.1. A mean/heartless person.

2. More common: A guy who perfectly fits the gender stereotype, and is insensitive, controlling, and will treat women like sex objects. Though many women constantly complain about guys like that, most end up with one, because they didn't dig deeper and didn't try to see through the jerk's crap. Instead of going for a [nice guy] who will obviously be there for a girl, most girls choose what's right in front of them, a cold-hearted bastard who happens to look "macho", who is a big-time flirt and wears his penis on his sleeve.An alternative to dating.A very powerful word to call someone... Unlike the f-word, "jerk" doesn't lose it's power the more you say it.A person you really love that just doesn't see how much you care for them, and yet, every so often actually treats you good, only to then act completely different from who they were when you first met them.In medival Europe,masturbation was considered to be on the brink of insanity. So as an insult, people would call each other "jerk-offs", and soon, jerk was enough to get the point across.The man all girls are attracted to.A person who does not use their turn signal.John Seville Higgins (April 14, 1904 - December 28, 1992) was bishop of the Episcopal Diocese of Rhode Island, serving from 1953 to 1954 as coadjutor and from 1955 to 1972 as diocesan.Episcopal Dictionary of the ChurchHarpalus bungii is a species of ground beetle in the subfamily Harpalinae. It was described by Chaudoir in 1844.In graph theory, the Cartesian product G◻{\displaystyle \square }H of graphs G and H is a graph such thatthe vertex set of G◻{\displaystyle \square }H is the Cartesian product V(G) × V(H); andany two vertices (u,u') and (v,v') are adjacent in G◻{\displaystyle \square }H if and only if eitheru = v and u' is adjacent with v' in H, oru' = v' and u is adjacent with v in G.Cartesian product graphs can be recognized efficiently, in linear time. The operation is commutative as an operation on isomorphism classes of graphs, and more strongly the graphs G◻{\displaystyle \square }H and H◻{\displaystyle \square }G are naturally isomorphic, but it is not commutative as an operation on labeled graphs. The operation is also associative, as the graphs (F◻{\displaystyle \square }G)◻{\displaystyle \square }H and F◻{\displaystyle \square }(G◻{\displaystyle \square }H) are naturally isomorphic.The notation G × H is occasionally also used for Cartesian products of graphs, but is more commonly used for another construction known as the tensor product of graphs. The square symbol is the more common and unambiguous notation for the Cartesian product of graphs. It shows visually the four edges resulting from the Cartesian product of two edges.The Cartesian product of two edges is a cycle on four vertices: K2◻{\displaystyle \square }K2 = C4.The Cartesian product of K2 and a path graph is a ladder graph.The Cartesian product of two path graphs is a grid graph.The Cartesian product of n edges is a hypercube:(K2)◻n=Qn.{\displaystyle (K_{2})^{\square n}=Q_{n}.}Thus, the Cartesian product of two hypercube graphs is another hypercube: Qi◻{\displaystyle \square }Qj = Qi+j.The Cartesian product of two median graphs is another median graph.The graph of vertices and edges of an n-prism is the Cartesian product graph K2◻{\displaystyle \square }Cn.The rook's graph is the Cartesian product of two complete graphs.If a connected graph is a Cartesian product, it can be factorized uniquely as a product of prime factors, graphs that cannot themselves be decomposed as products of graphs. However, Imrich & Klavžar (2000) describe a disconnected graph that can be expressed in two different ways as a Cartesian product of prime graphs:(K1 + K2 + K22)◻{\displaystyle \square }(K1 + K23) = (K1 + K22 + K24)◻{\displaystyle \square }(K1 + K2),where the plus sign denotes disjoint union and the superscripts denote exponentiation over Cartesian products.A Cartesian product is vertex transitive if and only if each of its factors is.A Cartesian product is bipartite if and only if each of its factors is. More generally, the chromatic number of the Cartesian product satisfies the equationχ(G◻{\displaystyle \square }H) = max {χ(G), χ(H)}.The Hedetniemi conjecture states a related equality for the tensor product of graphs. The independence number of a Cartesian product is not so easily calculated, but as Vizing (1963) showed it satisfies the inequalitiesα(G)α(H) + min{|V(G)|-α(G),|V(H)|-α(H)} ≤ α(G◻{\displaystyle \square }H) ≤ min{α(G) |V(H)|, α(H) |V(G)|}.The Vizing conjecture states that the domination number of a Cartesian product satisfies the inequalityγ(G◻{\displaystyle \square }H) ≥ γ(G)γ(H).Algebraic graph theory can be used to analyse the Cartesian graph product. If the graphG1{\displaystyle G_{1}}hasn1{\displaystyle n_{1}}vertices and then1×n1{\displaystyle n_{1}\times n_{1}}adjacency matrixA1{\displaystyle \mathbf {A} _{1}}, and the graphG2{\displaystyle G_{2}}hasn2{\displaystyle n_{2}}vertices and then2×n2{\displaystyle n_{2}\times n_{2}}adjacency matrixA2{\displaystyle \mathbf {A} _{2}}, then the adjacency matrix of the Cartesian product of both graphs is given byA1◻2=A1⊗In2+In1⊗A2{\displaystyle \mathbf {A} _{1\square 2}=\mathbf {A} _{1}\otimes \mathbf {I} _{n_{2}}+\mathbf {I} _{n_{1}}\otimes \mathbf {A} _{2}},where⊗{\displaystyle \otimes }denotes the Kronecker product of matrices andIn{\displaystyle \mathbf {I} _{n}}denotes then×n{\displaystyle n\times n}identity matrix.According to Imrich & Klavžar (2000), Cartesian products of graphs were defined in 1912 by Whitehead and Russell. They were repeatedly rediscovered later, notably by Gert Sabidussi (1960).Aurenhammer, F.; Hagauer, J.; Imrich, W. (1992), "Cartesian graph factorization at logarithmic cost per edge", Computational Complexity, 2 (4): 331–349, doi:10.1007/BF01200428, MR 1215316 .Feigenbaum, Joan; Hershberger, John; Schäffer, Alejandro A. (1985), "A polynomial time algorithm for finding the prime factors of Cartesian-product graphs", Discrete Applied Mathematics, 12 (2): 123–138, doi:10.1016/0166-218X(85)90066-6, MR 808453 .Hahn, Geňa; Sabidussi, Gert (1997), Graph symmetry: algebraic methods and applications, NATO Advanced Science Institutes Series, 497, Springer, p. 116, ISBN 978-0-7923-4668-5 .Imrich, Wilfried; Klavžar, Sandi (2000), Product Graphs: Structure and Recognition, Wiley, ISBN 0-471-37039-8 .Imrich, Wilfried; Klavžar, Sandi; Rall, Douglas F. (2008), Graphs and their Cartesian Products, A. K. Peters, ISBN 1-56881-429-1 .Imrich, Wilfried; Peterin, Iztok (2007), "Recognizing Cartesian products in linear time", Discrete Mathematics, 307 (3-5): 472–483, doi:10.1016/j.disc.2005.09.038, MR 2287488 .Kaveh, A.; Rahami, H. (2005), "A unified method for eigendecomposition of graph products", Communications in Numerical Methods in Engineering with Biomedical Applications, 21 (7): 377–388, doi:10.1002/cnm.753, MR 2151527 .Sabidussi, G. (1957), "Graphs with given group and given graph-theoretical properties", Canadian Journal of Mathematics, 9: 515–525, doi:10.4153/CJM-1957-060-7, MR 0094810 .Sabidussi, G. (1960), "Graph multiplication", Mathematische Zeitschrift, 72: 446–457, doi:10.1007/BF01162967, MR 0209177 .Vizing, V. G. (1963), "The Cartesian product of graphs", Vycisl. Sistemy, 9: 30–43, MR 0209178 .Weisstein, Eric W. "Graph Cartesian Product". MathWorld.Clearmont is a town in Sheridan County, Wyoming, United States. The population was 142 at the 2010 census.As of the census of 2010, there were 142 people, 57 households, and 41 families residing in the town. The population density was 887.5 inhabitants per square mile (342.7/km2). There were 66 housing units at an average density of 412.5 per square mile (159.3/km2). The racial makeup of the town was 95.1% White, 3.5% Native American, 0.7% from other races, and 0.7% from two or more races. Hispanic or Latino of any race were 7.7% of the population.There were 57 households of which 40.4% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 52.6% were married couples living together, 12.3% had a female householder with no husband present, 7.0% had a male householder with no wife present, and 28.1% were non-families. 21.1% of all households were made up of individuals and 1.8% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older. The average household size was 2.49 and the average family size was 2.78.The median age in the town was 35.8 years. 30.3% of residents were under the age of 18; 4.1% were between the ages of 18 and 24; 25.3% were from 25 to 44; 34.5% were from 45 to 64; and 5.6% were 65 years of age or older. The gender makeup of the town was 45.1% male and 54.9% female.As of the census of 2000, there were 115 people, 50 households, and 29 families residing in the town. The population density was 763.1 people per square mile (296.0/km²). There were 65 housing units at an average density of 431.3 per square mile (167.3/km²). The racial makeup of the town was 97.39% White, 0.87% from other races, and 1.74% from two or more races. Hispanic or Latino of any race were 3.48% of the population.There were 50 households out of which 28.0% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 36.0% were married couples living together, 14.0% had a female householder with no husband present, and 42.0% were non-families. 40.0% of all households were made up of individuals and 10.0% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older. The average household size was 2.30 and the average family size was 3.00.In the town, the population was spread out with 26.1% under the age of 18, 6.1% from 18 to 24, 32.2% from 25 to 44, 28.7% from 45 to 64, and 7.0% who were 65 years of age or older. The median age was 40 years. For every 100 females there were 105.4 males. For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 93.2 males.The median income for a household in the town was $40,833, and the median income for a family was $44,167. Males had a median income of $26,250 versus $20,500 for females. The per capita income for the town was $12,901. There were 19.4% of families and 20.0% of the population living below the poverty line, including 13.7% of under eighteens and 50.0% of those over 64.Television and radio signals in the region originate from Sheridan and Gillette. Although KLQQ 104.9 FM is licensed to Clearmont, its transmitter is 36 miles west. Gillette stations are weak but receivable in Clearmont and Arvada.Public education in the town of Clearmont is provided by Sheridan County School District #3. Schools serving the town include Clearmont Elementary School (grades PK-6), Arvada-Clearmont Junior High School (grades 7-8), and Arvada-Clearmont High School District (grades 9-12).Clearmont is the location of the lead character's ranch in the Colonial Radio Theatre old west drama series Powder River.Clearmont is located at 44°38′21″N 106°22′48″W (44.639172, -106.380134).According to the United States Census Bureau, the town has a total area of 0.16 square miles (0.41 km2), all of it land.List of municipalities in WyomingPatrick McCarthy is an English conductor and singer.McCarthy trained as a baritone singer at the Guildhall School of Music and Drama and the London Opera Centre, and came to public attention in 1974, during a performance of Carl Orff's Carmina Burana, conducted by André Previn at The Proms in the Royal Albert Hall.McCarthy was in the audience when Thomas Allen (now Sir Thomas), the baritone soloist, fell ill during the performance, collapsing onto his chair and needing to be carried off by members of the orchestra. McCarthy went backstage and offered his services as a professional singer who was experienced with the piece. Given that the understudy for the part – a member of the choir – was, in fact, a doctor and therefore looking after Allen, his offer was accepted and McCarthy went onstage to complete the performance. He received a standing ovation.In 1980, McCarthy re-located from London to Colchester. His voice had changed and he became a tenor singer, before moving to orchestral and choral conducting in 1992.In that year he founded the Colchester Bach Choir and Orchestra, and he has also conducted the Ipswich Bach Choir and Chamber Orchestra, the Colchester Bach Choir and Orchestra and the Colchester Philharmonic, and for many years has been the Musical Director of The Witham Choral Society."Vital Spark of Heav'nly Flame" (Hyperion, 1997)"Haydn and his English Friends" (Hyperion, 1999)Valerio Barigelli (born 19 October 1982), is an Italian futsal player who plays for Lazio and the Italian national futsal team.UEFA profileBelow is a list (in the form of a (statistical) table) of all of the protected areas that were officially established as such in the year of 2012. The table contains each place's/park's/monument's name, country in which the corresponding place/park/monument is located and the total approximate area that the corresponding place/park/monument covers.2012 in the environmentThe Sakha-Korean School is a school in Yakutsk, Sakha Republic. It was founded in 1994 and in 2008 it enrolled roughly 280 students at the primary and middle-school levels (up from roughly 200 in 2002).The origins of the school go back to May 1994; a South Korean ethnographer doing research on the indigenous peoples of Siberia had been in discussions with the government of the Sakha Republic to set up a Korean-language school, and began to look for teachers in South Korea. Gang Deok-su, a professor of Russian at the Hankuk University of Foreign Studies and head of the Sakha-Korea Friendship association, agreed to assist. The Yakutsk Korean Association, founded in 1989, had previously set up Sunday schools for the teaching of the Korean language, but due to the increasing demand for specialists of the language, powerful supporters threw their weight behind the move to set up a full-time school, including president of the Sakha Republic Mikhail Nikolayev. Then-head of the Yakutsk Department of Education Evgeniya Mikhailova provided early local leadership for the project; the Sakha Republic government has continued to provide financial support to the school as part of its wider plan to improve foreign-language education in the republic. Other early local supporters of the school included head of the Institute for Advanced Education Studies Olga Chorosova and chairwoman of the Yakutsk Korean Association Vera Shamayeva.In 2006, the school established a branch in Aldansky Ulus.Roughly 250 students have graduated from the school since its founding. Its fifteenth anniversary, in December 2009, was celebrated in a ceremony attended by Mikhailova (who by then had risen to the position of vice-president of the Sakha Republic), minister of internal affairs Georgy Nikonov, and the South Korean consul-general of Irkutsk, Choi Seok-in.Olga Kimovna Potapova was promoted from vice-principal to principal in 2002, when her predecessor Gennady Kim decided to take another job. The school have a teaching staff of 25 full-time teachers and 5 part-time teachers. Their staff includes four South Korean teachers.Among other subjects, the school offers Korean as a second language, taught by the native Korean teachers; teaching begins in the 5th grade, with three contact hours per week. It is one of two schools in Yakutsk which offers Korean to young students, the other being School #16. The teachers experience some culture shock at the different style of education, including the relative lack of age-based hierarchy at the school. The school also introduces other aspects of Korean culture to students, such as taekwondo, Korean music and Korean cuisine. Japanese and Chinese languages are also taught. Each summer, the school sends about 10 to 20 of its students to Seoul, South Korea, on study-abroad and homestay programmes. Graduates have gone on to work in a variety of Korean-related fields including translation and as language instructors at Yakutsk State University; others have earned places at South Korean universities for further studies.Old websiteNew website"A Limo For A Lame-O" is a commentary delivered by Al Franken during Weekend Update on the May 10, 1980, episode of Saturday Night Live (SNL). Using the framework of his own desire to have a limousine drive him to and from his job at NBC, the network which broadcasts the program, Franken attacked network president Fred Silverman for NBC's poor showing in the Nielsen ratings during his tenure. It has been called "one of the meanest acts of character assassination in—well, the history of mean acts of character assassination."Silverman, who had not been informed of the commentary beforehand due to a series of communication failures, was furious. He believed that SNL producer Lorne Michaels, who was in the midst of negotiating a new contract, had orchestrated it as revenge for Silverman's failure to attend a meeting with Michaels to discuss those talks the previous day. After hundreds of letters and postcards were delivered to Silverman's office the following Monday, he refused to accept a letter of apology offered by Franken, whom he said later he had never liked to begin with.The commentary, and Silverman's reaction to it, had several effects on the show. Michaels and many of the people associated with the show were emotionally exhausted after five seasons, and he had planned for almost everyone to take some time off. Since the show had been one of NBC's few successes under Silverman, the network wanted it to continue that fall. Franken and his writing partner Tom Davis, with Michaels' support, had expressed interest in producing the show while Michaels served as its executive producer. NBC executives were also hoping they could persuade Michaels to stay, an option he was still open to if the contractual provisions he wanted were offered.After Franken's commentary, he and Davis lost any chance they had had of succeeding Michaels as producer. NBC also assumed Michaels was not interested in continuing and began making plans for a future SNL without him. This led to Jean Doumanian, one of the show's associate producers from its inception but never involved in the writing process, being hired to replace Michaels, a decision kept from him since he believed any new producer should have been involved in the writing aspect of the show. She oversaw a wholesale replacement of the cast and writing staff, and was fired before the end of the next season, called the worst in the show's history by author Brian Finamore.In spring 1980, Michaels and Saturday Night Live on the one side, and Silverman and NBC on the other, were in drastically different positions.By its fifth season, SNL was an unqualified success. It had made stars of its cast members and spawned blockbuster movies, hit singles and many lines of merchandise. Two of those stars, Dan Aykroyd and John Belushi, had left. But all the show's other repertory cast members remained, and midway through the season Harry Shearer was promoted from featured player status to replace them; although he soon alienated his colleagues with his attitude. Many of the show's writers, who had long been playing minor roles in sketches, including Al Franken and his longtime partner Tom Davis, were in turn named as featured players.But behind the scenes many of the cast and crew had grown weary of the show. Their celebrity status led them to keep company with each other, and other celebrities who they had become friends with, so that they would not be mobbed as they often were in public by fans who asked them the same questions over and over. Increasing cocaine use, particularly the addictions of Garrett Morris and Laraine Newman, had exacerbated existing interpersonal friction, and stories of egotistical behavior by the stars began to reach the media. Producer Lorne Michaels had felt it necessary to bring the staff up to Mohonk Mountain House in the Hudson Valley for a weekend retreat before the season, the first time that had been necessary, which the senior cast members declined to attend. Competing network ABC had also started a competing sketch-comedy show called Fridays, putting further pressure on Michaels (who was incensed that it was produced by two other clients of his manager, Bernie Brillstein), the cast and crew.Hanging over the show was the question of whether Michaels would renew his contract and continue the show for another season. Many of the cast and crew did not want him to. "Everyone was looking beyond the show," recalled writer Alan Zweibel. Critics complained that, in the absence of its two biggest stars, the show had become less creative, and Lorne joked to the media that that had been his intention all along. "[It]'s going get worse and worse, and eventually it will never be funny again." By Christmas 1979, Michaels' assistant Cherie Fortis said, "everyone just said 'OK, let's get through the rest of this.' People were praying Lorne wouldn't come back. We were waiting for it to end."Michaels' return did not seem likely. From the beginning of his tenure at NBC, Silverman had been convinced that a weekday variety show starring Gilda Radner, who he saw as the next Lucille Ball, could be a hit. Michaels was less certain. Radner told NBC executives she could not do two series at once and did not want to leave her SNL castmates behind. In November 1979, two weeks after Michaels, who had lost his most important ally at the network when Silverman's predecessor Herb Schlosser, an early supporter of SNL, left, stated his refusal clearly and definitely, Silverman called him to his office once again to try to persuade him to do it. The meeting ended in a shouting match, and Silverman's already somewhat negative view of Michaels became much more severe. Michaels and Radner's aversion to a weekly show, however, did not prevent them from mounting a one-woman Broadway show, later filmed as Gilda Live.While SNL, despite its internal conflicts, was still successful, NBC was not. Shows like The Tonight Show (itself embroiled in a contract dispute with host Johnny Carson at the same time) were mainstays of the schedule along with SNL, but the network had had very few of the prime time hits it hoped president Fred Silverman, known until then for his apparently unerring instinct in understanding what audiences would watch, would be able to deliver for them as he had for ABC and CBS earlier in the decade. NBC's weak ratings position was aggravated in early 1980 by its shaky finances—a loss of millions in broadcast fees when President Jimmy Carter decided to boycott that year's Summer Olympics in Moscow in order to protest the Soviet invasion of Afghanistan the preceding fall, and the failure of Supertrain in spring of 1979, the most expensive series in television history at that point, had pushed the network to the verge of bankruptcy.From the beginning of his tenure at NBC, John Belushi had played Silverman in a series of sketches. While Silverman himself was not fond of them, he knew better than to intervene in one of his network's few hits. He also said later that despite his antipathy, he recognized that Belushi was a talented performer and the impersonation got laughs.In the spring of 1980, Michaels began renegotiating his contract. Believing that NBC would, as it had four years earlier, take over Studio 8H, where the show was staged, for coverage of that year's presidential elections, his hope was for a later start to the season, to give everyone a bit more time to rest. When it returned he wanted to totally restructure it, probably with a new cast, and would have filled the role of executive producer, since he had signed a three-picture deal with Warner Brothers, leaving the duties he had handled for the previous five seasons to someone else, possibly Franken and Davis. Most of the cast and crew had wanted to just end the show, but admitted that if Michaels had wanted to continue they would have done so with him. He also had some ideas for side projects, such as Yesterday, a half-hour version of Weekend Update that would air late on weekday nights (an idea soon abandoned when Johnny Carson, in his contract, effectively got the right to approve any show that came on after his; Carson had never been a great fan of SNL's style of humor).On May 8, 1980, Michaels and Brillstein had scheduled an afternoon meeting with Silverman and other network executives. Michaels had previously made clear to the network that he was amenable to staying, even at the same salary, as long as the network accommodated his request for a later start to the season, the restructuring of the show, and technical improvements to 8H. Rather than haggle with the network, he had told the executives to get back to him with the best counteroffer they could put together within 24 hours.Silverman had been up all the previous night putting together the network's fall schedule so he could present it to the network affiliates' board of governors that morning. That meeting had not gone well; many of the affiliates were disappointed with NBC's performance under Silverman, and some of them were openly talking about changing their affiliation. Silverman skipped the afternoon meeting; Brillstein and Michaels were told only that he was ill, and felt disrespected.That feeling of disrespect was further intensified by their interactions with the NBC executives who were at the meeting. Irwin Moss, the network's vice president for business affairs, began by noting the $2.5 million NBC had paid, sight unseen, for the broadcast rights to Gilda Live, which had failed commercially and critically. "So, you're here to gouge us again?" he joked. Brillstein did not think that was funny. Moss then pulled out a copy of Michaels' most recent contract, and asked him what he wanted.Another shouting match, between Brillstein and Moss, ensued. Both Brillstein and Michaels were stunned by how poorly the executives had prepared themselves. They finally left after Moss refused to commit to anymore than six episodes of a possible prime time series; Brillstein and Michaels had wanted 17. Afterwards, Michaels was convinced his relationship with NBC was, at this point in time, over. "They would have had to make me feel special [to come back], and they didn't," he recalled years later.The next day, Silverman called and apologized for his absence, and rescheduled the meeting for the following Monday. He and Lorne met by themselves that afternoon. Silverman offered Michaels more money, primetime shows, anything he wanted, as long as he'd stay at least nominally involved with Saturday Night Live.Franken's was not the first Weekend Update commentary that season to be a self-serving personal attack. Just before Christmas Bill Murray, who had felt abandoned when Aykroyd and Belushi left, leaving the show overly reliant on him for the first half of the season, had used the critical and commercial failure of 1941, Belushi and Aykroyd's first post-SNL film, to taunt them. Murray deliberately misremembered the film's title, and noted that stars Carrie Fisher and Christopher Lee had previously been on the show. "If you ask me they should never have left," he said. "They wouldn't listen and now they have this Christmas turkey on their hands. And now my two old friends are going to have the most miserable Christmas of their lives." He ended by recommending audiences instead go see Meatballs, his film debut from that summer.Shortly before dress rehearsal the next evening for the season's antepenultimate show hosted by Bob Newhart, Barbara Gallagher, NBC vice president for late-night and special programming, who had worked for Silverman at ABC as well, was perusing the scripts for that evening's show when she came across Franken's commentary for that night's Weekend Update, where he had increasingly been making appearances that season as the segment's "social sciences editor", riffing on the concept of the 1980s as the "Al Franken Decade" that he had introduced a few months earlier with the end of the 1970s "Me Decade". In this evening's installment, Franken recounted how, earlier in the week, he had just come up with a great idea for the show while hailing a taxi outside Rockefeller Center when a fan interrupted him, and he forgot it. This led him to wonder why he didn't get limousine service from NBC, while Silverman did, since Franken was on a hit show while the network had done nothing but flounder under Silverman.Knowing how bad the last two days had been for her boss, Gallagher groaned, knowing Silverman would not take this well. After dress, where the commentary drew voluminous laughter from the audience, she went to Michaels, who agreed that it might have been too much (he had not thought it funny when Franken read it to him, but allowed it since it only took up two minutes of airtime). He refused to remove it from the show since that was not how he ran things, and suggested she talk to Franken personally. "Fred's in a really bad way," she told him, "and this is really going to hurt him." She claimed later that Franken responded "Good, because he hurt Lorne."Michaels assured Gallagher and Brandon Tartikoff, NBC vice president for comedy programming, who was also present, that Franken would nevertheless comply with her request and tone the commentary down. Lorne suggested that they still might want to warn Silverman that the attack was coming, as the show had done in past seasons with the Belushi sketches. But whereas in those situations one of Michaels' assistants had called one of Silverman's, on a Saturday night the only way to warn Silverman would have been to call him at his own home and speak to him personally, which neither of them did. Michaels believed that both Gallagher and Tartikoff were afraid to talk to Silverman, who as the pressures on him increased with NBC's failures had been screaming at his subordinates more and more frequently.When the segment actually aired, it was apparent that Franken had responded to Gallagher's plea by making the criticism of Silverman even harsher. Beginning as he had by moving from the "Al Franken Decade" to his travails while hailing the cab, he then moved to noting who else at NBC got their own limousines—other members of the show's cast and stars of other shows like Gary Coleman and Tom Snyder. He felt criticizing anyone in the first group would be "petty" and "taste aside", he understood the latter two.But now, get this—you know who gets complete door-to-door limo service from NBC? Fred Silverman. Now, here's a guy ... who is a total, unequivocal failure. Okay? The guy's been here two years ... and he hasn't done diddly-squat. Okay? And he gets a limo! Okay ... [pulls out a chart] now, here's a list of the top ten-rated shows this season in TV. Now, there's some As there ... some Bs ... some Cs ... uh... some Ss. You see those? You see any Ns? Not one N! [puts the chart down] Why? 'Cause Silverman is a lame-o! But he still gets limousine service. I like to call it "A Limo for the Lame-O."Franken went on to ask the audience to mail in postcards to Silverman's office asking that he "Get Al Franken A Limo". "If enough of you write, Silverman will have to give me the limo." he continued. "Even though I've just decimated him, that's the way things are around here. He's timid, indecisive and easily pressured! He's weak!" The address flashed on the screen once again. Franken signed off, and Jane Curtin ended the segment, sending the show to a commercial.The commentary drew as many laughs as it had in dress rehearsal. It had barely ended when, Warren Littlefield later recalled, an NBC page came up to Tartikoff and told him he had a phone call. "Who is it?" the executive asked. "A screaming Mr. Silverman" responded the page. Tartikoff asked the page if he had told Silverman whether he knew where Tartikoff was. "No," the page answered, "we were just told to find you." Tartikoff then told the page to say that he couldn't be found. "He just couldn't take Fred screaming at him at that hour," Littlefield recalled. "We always thought that was a wonderful lesson that Brandon was imparting to us about survival in the executive ranks."Silverman thought that Michaels had deliberately allowed Franken's attack on him to air as retaliation for the missed Thursday meeting. Reflecting on the episode later, Michaels said that allegation was difficult to respond to "What are you going to say—that it wasn't me? Then he'd think I was such a wuss that I'd allow Al Franken to just steamroll me against my own career instincts." But he agreed too much damage had been done to easily undo. "The upshot of it all was that Fred took it personally, and that put a further strain on the relations between him and me, and we never did meet.""I don't think Lorne put the sketch in there to be mean," Silverman said, also with years of reflection. "He never did a sketch to be mean. That was not his style. I never did blame Lorne personally."Instead of the meeting the two had originally planned, the event of Monday in Silverman's office was the arrival of approximately 5,000 letters and postcards in response to Franken's plea. This further infuriated the executive, and it was suggested that Franken apologize, which he did by internal memorandum. "I did not intend to hurt or offend you with this, admittedly, frontal attack."Instead, Franken urged Silverman to see how he had intended the piece, characterizing it as "brazen small guy attacks the boss." He asked that Silverman "step back and think of the Fred Silverman I talked about as 'the boss' instead of as Fred Silverman, your mother's son, your wife's husband and your children's father." He believed it actually made NBC and Silverman look good as "even the most pointed criticism was allowed on the air by the network and by you, the boss." Franken further implored Silverman not to blame Lorne, who often allowed material on the show that he himself did not personally see the humor of in the name of creative freedom.Silverman was unmoved. "I never liked Al Franken to begin with" he admitted later. "I thought this piece [he] did was just very mean-spirited and not very funny." He recalled writing back to Franken, saying that "in no uncertain terms that I thought that what he did was way off base and that I wasn't going to forget it."Tartikoff told Michaels afterwards that Franken had lost any chance of succeeding him. But he continued to hold out the hope that Michaels himself might yet be persuaded to return in some capacity, as he had suggested he might. The season finale, two weeks later, did little to foster those hopes. While host Buck Henry, doing that duty for what turned out to be the last time, emphatically denied (to loud applause) that the show was ending and even paraded a purported "new cast" (actually longtime backstage crewmembers) across the stage during his opening monologue, the end sent a different message, as the "On Air" sign outside the studio, the show's traditional final shot, flickered and then darkened. Michaels had also left all the castmembers a gift, a cigarette lighter shaped like the 30 Rock building where the show was produced, inscribed with "Nice working with you 1975–1980". He had never done that in previous seasons.Whatever message Michaels was sending, the network very much wanted the show to continue. Tartikoff and Gallagher met with Michaels for the last time at the beginning of June. All the producer would promise was that "even if I don't come back, I'll do my very best to make sure the show doesn't fall apart." They assumed that meant he had no one in mind beyond Franken and Davis, both now off the list, to succeed him that he would recommend.However, he had also made it known that he felt any replacement producer had to be a writer, because he believed that in comedy it took a writer, particularly one with credits, to be able to tell other writers with large egos what was and wasn't funny. Silverman, for his part, had also told his executives that a new producer for SNL had to come from within the group of people already working for the show, as he did not believe an outsider would have credibility with the people Michaels had hired and nurtured. So, during the meeting, it was suggested that longtime associate producer Jean Doumanian, a good friend of Gallagher's, be promoted to the top job.Michaels immediately rejected the idea. Pressed by Gallagher, he explained that Doumanian wasn't a producer, that she had never been part of the show's "core team", and that nobody who ever had been would work for her. He had also invited her to come work for him if he landed a deal with Paramount Pictures he had been considering. He reminded the two executives that she had never been present for any last-minute meetings held between dress and air.Michaels' reservations about Doumanian's ability to work with the core team were rooted in fact. Doumanian had a longtime friendship with Woody Allen, whose movies she would later produce, and they spoke on the telephone almost every day, often more than once. He would sometimes call her in the Studio 8H using the pseudonym "Mo Golden", which eventually fooled no one, and production assistants answering the phone would call to her across the room that Allen was on the phone for her, until she told them to stop. Her friendship with Allen, however, never resulted in him appearing on the show as he did not do television at that point in his career.Al Franken in particular disliked Doumanian. She had ostensibly produced a primetime special with Bob and Ray, whose humor was especially adored by many of the SNL writers and performers, earlier that season. On the basis of a small contribution to one sketch, Doumanian had decided to award herself a writers' credit. Franken had seen it and crossed her name out, assuming it was a mistake. She later reinserted it, and when Franken came to her over the apparent mistake, she insisted on taking it.Tartikoff decided there was no chance of persuading Michaels to return. After the meeting, Tartikoff called Allan Katz, a former Laugh-In writer who'd gone on to write and produce for several successful 1970s sitcoms, including M*A*S*H and Rhoda, to see if he was interested. The following day, Katz declined, saying he did not want to make the necessary changes to his lifestyle.Without any other candidates of his own, Tartikoff turned again to Gallagher. She again made the case for her friend Doumanian. Whatever Michaels had said, she told Tartikoff, Doumanian was indeed an important member of the SNL team—as one of the show's associate producers she knew how the show was put together and run, and she knew enough of the other people to provide the continuity Silverman wanted. The previous year, she had produced a special with Bob and Ray, of whom many of the SNL creative team were fans, that came in under budget, Gallagher noted. Lastly, since it was likely all or most of the cast would be new, the new producer would need to be good at evaluating new talent—which, she said, Doumanian had been doing already as the show's talent coordinator.Tartikoff scheduled a meeting with Doumanian, who had already accepted a job in East Coast production with Paramount, for June 4, two days after the meeting with Michaels. He found her very organized, and very specific about what steps she would take with the show. It was his decision to hire her or not, and he told Gallagher he would. The next day he let Doumanian know the job was hers, but not to tell Michaels yet.Why he told her to remain silent has been a matter of some debate. "They didn't want anyone to know, and if Lorne knew, it would have been all over town," Gallagher said later. "So that was the reason for not telling him. It wasn't a conspiracy to do anything to Lorne." She also has said that she didn't think Tartikoff, who like herself was under enough emotional stress dealing with Silverman's tirades, had it in him at the time for a similarly angry confrontation with Michaels, who for his part believes that the secrecy suggested that Tartikoff hadn't truly given up on persuading him to return, since that way he could easily have retracted the offer.Michaels learned that Doumanian had been hired to replace him the next day. He had been in Houston at the premiere of Urban Cowboy when Paramount head Barry Diller told him that Doumanian had informed Paramount she would not be able to take the job with the studio since she would be succeeding Michaels as producer of SNL. Very soon afterwards Tartikoff called Michaels himself and confirmed this."Really", Michaels told him. "That's an interesting choice." He told Tartikoff the network had "broken faith" with him and that it would regret the decision to replace him with Doumanian, since it would mean a "complete break" with the old show. Doumanian herself called and apologized, and only then did Michaels learn about the secrecy. "That was my moment of growing up," he recalled later, suggesting the talks between her and the network had been going on at the same time he had been imploring her to come to Paramount with him. He was furious at her for what he felt was a betrayal, and the two have reportedly never spoken since.Two weeks later, Michaels signed a one-year "holding agreement" with NBC, which served mainly to prevent him from going to work for another network so soon, while he started his own production company, Broadway Video. In addition to some nominal development commitments, he had the opportunity to produce a special one-hour Weekend Update for the Saturday before the election. Many of the original writers and performers, including Dan Aykroyd, returned. It was never aired, however, when last-minute schedule changes due to a final presidential debate that week led to Silverman pre-empting it for another special.Doumanian had expected to be recasting the show, but to at least keep some of the writers. However, shortly after she took over, all the writers quit. Narratives differ on whether this was on their initiative or Doumanian's. "I did want to keep several writers, but I think everybody was advised not to stay on," she recalled. "Everybody who said they would stay reneged once word got out."But according to Michaels, "Jean didn't want them." He believes she especially had it in for the writers, and Franken and Davis and Jim Downey, whom Michaels had wanted to succeed him, in particular. "Everyone got a memo from Jean to clear out their offices by July," he claims, likening her to "the new broom" which, in a common media adage about management changes, "sweeps clean". "For Franken and those guys, it was the first signal they got that they weren't even being considered to stay." So thoroughly did they clean their offices out that, according to Joe Piscopo, one of the new cast members Doumanian hired later, that not even a pencil was left.Doumanian had to hire an entirely new cast and writing staff in just ten weeks. She also had to cope with the network cutting the show's budget to a third of what it had been the previous season. "Any producer who comes in here now is doomed to fail," Gallagher recalls telling her friend. "It's not going to work."The show under Doumanian, called Saturday Night Live '80, was indeed seen as a failure. Although she claimed to have understood the writing process due to her participation in meetings on the subject, as Michaels had warned the network, she had a particularly difficult time managing the writers due to her inexperience in that area. When it premiered, the reviews were unforgiving and the ratings began to decline, turning what had been a rare success for NBC into yet another problem area for executives.The season was not a total loss. Joe Piscopo's characters drew genuine laughter from the audience, and over the course of the season Eddie Murphy, whom Doumanian had been persuaded to give a chance to despite reservations about his youth, began to emerge as a star. But in February Charles Rocket, whom she had expected to emerge as the show's star, used the word fuck on air while the cast was trying to fill time at the end of a show. Two weeks later, when Bill Murray became the first member of the old cast to host the new version of the show, the show's cold opening had him giving the cast a pep talk, but ended with him apologizing to his former castmates on camera. Doumanian was fired and replaced with Dick Ebersol, who was able to produce just one show before that year's writers' strike forced an early end to the TV season. SNL's sixth season, mostly produced by Jean Doumanian, is remembered as the series' worst.While that season finale had no official host, it had begun with Chevy Chase reflecting on the old days with Mr. Bill. He also returned to read the news on Weekend Update. To great applause, at the end he introduced Franken, who had himself returned to the show for the first time since the previous season ended, for another commentary on the "Al Franken Decade."Franken used the concept as a lead-in for a discussion of the show's turbulent preceding year, telling the audience how NBC had chosen Doumanian, instead of someone who knew how to produce the show like "me, Al Franken", without consulting Michaels or anyone else on the show's staff. The network, too, had realized after 12 episodes that "any English-speaking person" could have done better. But he did not have a much better opinion of Ebersol, who had been in charge of late-night programming for NBC when SNL had been launched in 1975, and thus became "one of the first people to steal credit for the success of Saturday Night Live." He recited a list of failed comedies like The Waverly Wonders that Ebersol had been responsible for, and told the audience the show would improve, but not much.Instead, Franken suggested, it was time to end the show and its "tired old format" altogether. He called on the audience once again to send in postcards, this time urging NBC to "Put SNL to sleep." However, after he concluded, Chase reminded him that he and Davis were supposed to host the next week, and he urged the audience to watch.1980 in American televisionHistory of Saturday Night Live (1975-1980)The Veterans Memorial Bridge is a steel girder bridge in Chattanooga, Tennessee. It was built in 1984 and has a main span of 420 feet (130 m). It carries Georgia Avenue across the Tennessee River, and McLellan Sanctuary at Audubon Island, which is an animal sanctuary on an island on the river. It is one of 4 bridges that cross the Tennessee River at downtown Chattanooga. There are at least 13 other bridges by the name Veterans Memorial Bridge in the United States of America.The Veterans Memorial Bridge was built with the intention to honor American veterans for their time and commitment to the United States of America. The bridge is a testament of the community of Chattanooga, Tennessee’s patriotism as well as shows how strong the community is when it unites. The Veterans Memorial Bridge helps tell the story of veterans by remaining strong and well kept by the community. The bridge also honors veterans by flying American flags, which are replaced twice a year. The flags were originally placed on the Veterans Memorial Bridge by an anonymous donor, who spent over $40,000 out of his own pocket every year to ensure the flags were replaced and in good condition. The flags represent the valor, bravery, and courage of the honored veterans. After the anonymous donor stopped replacing the flags, a local Chattanooga citizen, Scott McKenzie, arranged for the flags to be sponsored by people in the community. Now, the people of Chattanooga can honor individual veterans by donating a flag for the Veterans Memorial Bridge. Organizations of Chattanooga also participate in giving back to veterans by donating flags for the bridge.The Veterans Memorial Bridge is an important part of the Chattanooga community, participating in various events such as the Great Chattanooga Rubber Duck Race and the Girls Preparatory School’s 100th year celebration. The Great Chattanooga Rubber Duck Race is very similar to the Great Knoxville Rubber Duck Race. Both races are fundraisers for children’s clubs in the Tennessee area. The club that Chattanooga’s duck race is fundraising for is the Boys’ Club of Chattanooga, INC. During the Great Chattanooga Rubber Duck Race, portions of the Veterans Memorial Bridge are closed down to allow people to view the duck race from above. When the race is over, the sponsors are responsible for the area on the bridge that was closed; they must replace traffic control devices and clean up trash. Another event that the Veterans Memorial Bridge played an important part in was the Girls Preparatory School’s 100th birthday celebration. During this 2005 celebration, the entire school marched across the Veterans Memorial Bridge to the school’s events, which included speakers and a program of videos. Like the duck race, part of the bridge was closed for the girls to travel safely across to the other side.Due to safety hazards, it is prohibited for citizens to skateboard or roller-skate on the Veterans Memorial Bridge.In order to keep the integrity of the bridge, there is a strict code for advertisements on the Veterans Memorial Bridge. For an advertisement to be placed near the bridge, it has to follow regulations.In 2011, Mr. Dan Johnson purchased lights to exchange for the old ones on Veterans Memorial Bridge; the lights under the bridge are new lighting. The lights will be operated at 50% capacity and Police will have the ability to change the capacity from their computers.List of crossings of the Tennessee RiverChattanooga Bridgesa delicious frozen treat that comes from cows. Ice cream comes in many different flavours and can often be found at your local grociery store.A relitively new shoe on the market. Created by Pharell Williams from the Neptunes (N.E.R.D) and Nigo, the creator of the Bathing Apes clothing and shoe line. They are marketed by Reebok. Only 3000 are currently in the market, ranging from around $300-$500 dollars.crack. hell even Master P calls it ice cream, and no one is more right them him.• The flavored cream of ice
• A common cure for broken hearted females
• A cold and delicious treat, perfect on hot summer daysflavored frozen cream that comes in different flavors.Release 4.0 of Google's [Android].

Although [Gingerbread] and [Honeycomb] are not yet available, Google is said to be already working on Android 4.0.

No idea what it will look like, but it will be greater than great!!

[Froyo] and [Gingerbread] are said to perform great with a 1 Ghz processor, [Honeycomb] and Ice Cream for sure will have a big impact on hardware.

Apple and Microsoft: be afraid, very afraid.code word for sexual pleasures when you are not behind closed doors and need to talk about the type of ice cream you had whether it be chocolate vanilla or better yet mocha.crack dope powder candyThe plural of [Ice Cream]The stuff that makes my head hurt when i eat too much of it... stupid fuckerA person that simply cannot be happy for another person's success.  So rather than be happy they make a point of exposing a flaw in that person.

Hating, the result of being a hater, is not exactly jealousy.  The hater doesnt really want to be the person he or she hates, rather the hater wants to knock somelse down a notch.Overused word that people like to use just because someone else expresses a dislike for a certain individual.most of the people in this siteA term used by others, usually being suburban "gangsters", whose lives are absolutely and undeniably defined by what others think.  These people "rumble" often and think  of themselves as original and/or indestructable.  People that use the term "haters" are the lowest stage of the evolutionary scale.  They bleed the fastest and have thought processes similar to that of a mentally underdeveloped cat.to be a hater is to descriminate or hate something, someone, or a certain type of something. 

If the world didn't have haters then it would be a better place. a much better place.

I mean not that there aren't assholes in the world. to hate somethings is good. i hate poverty, war, and bad shit like that. just try to have some morals, people.A person that develops a strong dislike for another, solely basing their own opinion on personal judgment rather than objective merit. The formation of a hater's contempt commonly arises from jealously and/or resentment. Individuals that make fun of, or "hate," others for justified reasons cannot be legitimately classified as "haters;" although many faggots attempt to rationalize their own situations by doing so. Additionally, the word "hater" is frequently overused, mainly by members of the rap and hip-hop communities.A person who feels anger and/or jealousy for someone who has succeeded in something they have worked hard for.
  A being who speaks badly,and/or takes negative actions in attempt to create problems for a successful person.Anyone with a opinion.The most non-insulting "insult" in existence. It's a waste of breath to say it and a waste of energy to type it. This term is often used by pre-teen girls whenever someone insults their favorite teeny bopper singers. If you ever call somene a hater, find the nearest knife and use it pierce your lungs for polluting our air with that fucking stupid word.People that make up reasons to hate certain people just because they aren't as wealthy or successfull as them. People are often hating:

1. [Bill Gates]
2. [Blink 182]
3. [George W. Bush]
4. [Halle Barry]
5. [Ben Affleck]P-Person
I-Into
M-Marketing
P-ProstitutesA man who beats up women and owns over a thousand sex slaves.one who brokers the sexual favors of women for profits1. Protection, Instruction, & Management of Prostitutes
2. Protectional Instructor Managing Professional
3. Prostitute's Instructional Management Professional
4. Professional In Management of Prostitutes 
5. Prostitute's Infamous Management Professional
6. Professionally Instructing Many Prostitutes
7. Professional Illegally Managing Prostitutes

Optional, but not recommended:
*Professional- replaced by Pro, Player, or Playa
*Into        - replaced by Intwined or Into
*Managing    - replaced by Marketing

Slang: noun or verb
1. Player(s/z)/Playa(s/z) Interested in(to) Making Progress/Prostitutes
2. (Put/Place It) or (Paper) in My/Men's Pants/Pocket(s)/Places
3. Party In My/Men's Pants/Panties
4. Pissin(g)/Peein(g) In(to) My Pants/Place/Partner/Potty 
5. Pissin(g)/Peein(g) In(to) Mouths of People/Prostitutes/Potty
6. People/Prostituts In Many/Money-filled Places/People
7. Perfect Independent Marvelous Playa(s/z) or Player(s/z)
8. Pooping In(to) My Place/Pants/Partner/Potty
9. Pennys In My Pocket/Place/Palace/Prostitutes
10. Put/Place It in My Pussy/Prostitute
11. Pussy Is My/Mens Prerogative/Purpose/PlaymateThe people wearing the purple suits on street corners who use dirt poor women to get money.  And later blowing it all on spinner's and gold lining for their three wheeled cycles.To make better, to fix up,some dumass middle school teenager who is as rich as hell and wear clothes like he's from the ghetto.Thinks he has he has hoes but the only one who he would lose his virginity to is his mom. Thinks rock is "for losers". Listens to too much 50 cent and tells everyone he used to live in "the projects". friends consist of a bunch of airheads who say LOL!! the whole time and his own dim-witted speciesPride Intelligence Money Power1. someone who profits off the money prostitutes make from selling their bodies
2. to seek out hookers to make a profit off of them selling their bodies.
3. to hit on several different girls
4. a guy who has alot of girlfriends or has been with alot women.
5. something that is really cool.v. Live off the earnings of a prostitutea machine for downloading pornWhat you are on nowThe most useful and most frustrating thing any human being will ever work with.If you're looking up this word, kill yourself.a very, very expensive punching bagA tool that is supposed to save time but intead wastes time.The most boring and frustrating thing in the world-however, I keep coming back.the thing people use to:
1. Go on MySpace or any other blog-related sites
2. download porn
3. illegally download music
4. play games
5. and use to look up the word "computer" on Urbandictionary.comThe answer to every single question.A $1000 facebook machineOne whose IQ exceeds his weight.An individual persecuted for his superior skills or intellect, most often by people who fear and envy him.An 'individual', i.e. a person who does not conform to society's beliefs that all people should follow trends and do what their peers do. Often highly intelligent but socially rejected because of their obesssion with a given subject, usually computers. Unfortunately, nerds seem to have problems breeding, to the detriment of mankind as a whole.Never
Ending
Radical
Dude.A stereotypical label used to describe a person that is socially inadequate.  A four letter word, but a six figure income.A person who gains pleasure from amassing large quantities of knowledge about subjects often too detailed or complicated for most other people to be bothered with.

Often mistaken for Geeks, who aspire to become nerds, yet lack the intelligence, and end up giving nerds a bad name due to their poor social skills.

Non-nerds are often scared of nerds, due to their detailed knowledge, and therefore seemingly high levels of intelligence - and subsequently denegrate them as much as possible as often as possible.

Nerds exist covertly within the fabric of society, often choosing to 'nerd it up' in private or in the company of fellow nerds.  It is for this reason they are feared the most - unlike geeks, who are easily identified, nerds can only be found out when casual conversation reaches a subject that they like nerding.the group of people who will most likely make a life changing invention that will radically change the world. the computer was invented by a nerd. the macintosh/apple and windows were invetned by nerds. jocks and normal people have no claim to civilization except for being the hard labor. nerds actually do the thinking. so jocks, fuck you, and go eat your steroidsThe person you will one day call "Boss"Guys with IQ higher than your weight. You made fun of them when you were at school but you would be lucky if you get employed as janitors in their businesses.A delicious candy made by Wonka.  They are pretty much crystalized sugar in a color coating that people love to give out on halloween.An individual who deals with the complex systems of todays military/civilian aircraft. Their entire mission is to make bricks "fly", and fix leaking electrons from parts, and they do it damn well. Usually pissed off individuals who are the be all end all of the sortie cock, they take and stride. Because one day, their enlistment will come to an end.Stands for AVIation electrONICSNot the best state in the country, but very far from the worst.  Home to three million people, some really sweet cities, three great univerties, a whole bunch of stellar small private colleges and a ton of true natural beauty in its lush northeast bluff country and statewide river valleys, lakes, and yes, rolling fields.  Iowa is a national leader in education (students in many other states including Texas take the Iowa Test of Basic Skills, and everyone's heard of the ACT, based in Iowa City) and is leading the way in biofuels to reduce the nation's dependence on oil.  To dispel the ignorance displayed elsewhere on this post, here's a state breakdown of cities and topography.  If seventy synonyms for boobs is alright to post, so is this.

Central Iowa:  [Des Moines], located at the intersection of I-80 and I-35, is the largest city with a metro of a half million and is the state capital, second only to London for the title of insurance capital of the world.  [Ames] (80,000 metro) is about a half hour north of Des Moines and is home to [Iowa State University], a land grant school of 30,000 respected around the world for its engineering and agricultural programs.  Central Iowa is, outside of river vallies, very flat, and outside of the Des Moines area and Ames is very sparsely populated.

Eastern Iowa:  The most densely populated area of the state.  Ethnically diverse [Iowa City] (115,000 metro) was Iowa's first state capital, was the first city in the world to elect a female mayor, has been named the most cultured city per capita in the nation, is always in the top five cities in the country for education, and is home to the [University of Iowa], 30,000, nationally renowned for its Carver College of Medicine and Iowa Hawkeye athletics.  The music departments of Iowa City's two large public high schools have won a total of five Grammy awards.  [Cedar Rapids], (200,000 metro) just twenty minutes north of Iowa City in the beautiful Cedar River valley, is the second largest single city, is the economic hub of eastern Iowa, has two private colleges, and is best known for being the place you get any of your Quaker Oats brand ceral from.  [Waterloo/Cedar Falls], two conjoined cities (130,000 metro) is where the [Unviersity of Northern Iowa], 18,000, is located.  The [Quad Cities], (375,000 metro) two in Iowa and two in Illinois, straddle the Mississippi and form the largest metro between Des Moines and Chicago.  The largest of the four cities is [Davenport], IA, home to the Bix 7 foot race whose hilly course and large prize attract runners from every part of the globe.  [Dubuque], (90,000 metro) on the Mississippi where Iowa meets Illinois and Wisconsin, is Iowa's oldest city. It is home to a ton of beautiful architecture, four private colleges, a far-reaching ELCA Lutheran seminary, and the Smithsonion affiliated National Mississippi River Musem and Aquarium.  Eastern Iowa's topography is for the most part very rolling farmland, with the exception of the hillier Iowa river valley, Cedar river valley, and the bluffs and hills skirting the whole eastern border along the Mississippi.  The northeast corner of the state is all bluffland, home to small town Decorah and reputed Luther College.

Western Iowa:  The vast majority of Iowa west of I-35 is flat farmland with the exception of the very westernmost strip.  [Sioux City] on the Missouri river (the western border) is a good sized city with nice amenities and lots of historyt.  [Council Bluffs] is the largest suburb of Omaha, just across the river in Nebraska.  The Iowa Great Lakes region contains many large lakes, most notably lake Okoboji, one of only three blue water lakes in the world.  The Loess Hills state park runs along the whole westernmost strip of the state, and offers lots of hilly hiking and some of the state's largest forests.

Iowa's motto should be "Iowa: Not as bad as you picture it."Pretty much the shit.  Make sure you're clear on the fact that the word "the" is in there, or else you'll get the meaning all wrong.  Iowa is home to the three million nicest people in the United States, probably in the world.  A leader in education, and home to some of the most beautiful scenery into the world.  It's a traquil beauty, and if you're into that, you'll love Iowa.  And if you're not into that, you can go take California or wherever you're from and fuck it.a farming state that isnt a bunch of dumb farmers thats [montana]A state that quietly grows corn and takes care of its own affairs. Residents think Des Moines compares to New York.People who dont live in Iowa refer to Iowa is full of corn and farmers. Its full of things pretty much from other states. 3 million awesome people live there. And its probably 3 million people you would never forget because they are so nice. Iowa is also one of the most beautiful places to live and only cool people can live in Iowa. Because Iowa is THE SHITT. Also home to the best college football team the IOWA HAWKEYES!The greatest state in the Union with education, and the ability to function with agriculture and good morals,When western civilization comes crashing down around you other 49 inferior states (Illinois is ok).BEST State in the entire united states of america!

Most, cocky dumbasses hate on iowa, and say that all there is is corn.. Thats completley wrong! EVERY state has agriculture and just about every state grows corn and has corn fields.
So what if iowa has corn, that dosnt mean thats the only thing to do!

Iowa is the best! Our hot chicks and all of our sports teams..

Iowa will fuck up anyone who tries to talk shit on us! were no pussys, we will fight any mother fucker who tries to hate on us!

Iowa has the best state fair too! The IOWA State Fair is possibly the best state fair in all of the US.

We have everything, Demo Derbys, Mudding, So much shit, youd just have to come here and check it out!State in the midwest, mostly farmland, but has a fantastic balance of rural, suberban, and highly populated areas. It is named after the Soux indian name meaning land between 2 rivers(missouri, Mississippi). Produces more corn and pork than any other state, and is not home to a bunch of hicks. in fact Iowa has the highest % of leteracy in the United states. statisticly its largest city, Des Moines, is in a perfect location for trade because it lies on interstate 35 and interstate 80, 2 of the buisiest highways in the US. however, because of Chicago's close proximity there isnt quite as many large factorys as there should be. Iowa is a beautiful state with hilly reigons in the east and hundreds of rivers and streams. The people are known for being friendly, usually hard working, and down to earth.

***to readers in the Northeast and california specificly***
No, just because someone lives in Iowa does not mean that they live on a farm. enough said. and another thing, stop mistaking Iowa for Idaho and Ohio. yes, they do sound the same but seriously, get it right its not that hardWhat the hell is this
I - Idiots

O - Out

W - Wondering

A - Around
shit?
We're the smartest state in the U.S!
For Christ's sake, stop your bitching about our "terrible driving" and go to New York, give me a review about their shitty driving.

God damn, Iowa has some of the nicest people, and there isn't corn EVERY WHERE.
To be honest, there isn't even as much corn as you think there would be, there are more cities than corn.

Plus, if you hate Iowa then promise me you'll never eat corn and or barilla noodles again.
So, all you more suberban suburban states can suck it because Iowa is the shit!A state full of beauty and 3 million of the nicest people in the universe. Also a pioneer in education, with the Iowa Test of Basic Skills and ACT being based in Iowa City. Is home to a ton of natural beauty: Ledgers State Park near Boone, the Des Moines, Missouri, and Mississippi Rivers, as well as numerous forests and woods. Tends to be judged by people who have never visited it.Place of extreme weather.A state of the south-central United States. It was admitted as the 28th state in 1845. Explored by the Spanish in the 16th and 17th centuries, the region became a province of Mexico in the early 19th century. Texans won their independence in 1836 after a gallant but losing stand at the Alamo in February and a defeat of Santa Anna's forces at the Battle of San Jacinto (April 21). Denied admission as a state by antislavery forces in the U.S. Congress, the leaders of Texas formed an independent republic that lasted until 1845. Austin is the capital and Houston the largest city. Population: 17,059,805. 

The Lonestar State, The State that still believes that criminals should be punished, Home of the Wataburger, home of Southern Hospitality, HTown, And Everythang thats bigger and better.

AND NO!! We Dont all walk around with cowboy hats and boots, and we're all not rednecks....for that...see oklahoma.The best Mexican food. Dr. Pepper on tap. Beautiful ladies. Awesomeness everywhere you turn. The best fucking place on earth. Move there now!the only state in the union that can fly its flag at the same height as the american flag.....
and the only reason texas doesnt fall into the gulf of mexico... is because oklahoma sucksHome to Dr. Pepper, several modern and well respected singers, activists, and the like, Sam Houston, and other great men and women before him, numerous plantlife and animals, and a few horrid idiots who give the rest of us a bad name-ie: George Bush.The biggest and baddest state of them all(15 states can be put into Texas and we'd still have 1000 miles left) where everything is bigger and much better than places such as California. Home of a Ranch bigger than Rhode Island,the home of trunk poppin, Dr.Pepper,home of the first word spoken from the moon which was Houston,home of swangin on 84's and vogues, chopped and screwed music, SA Town, D Town, and H Town which are all 3 in the top 10 most populated cities in the U.S.
The Lone Star State was the only state that was its own country, and the only state worthy of even making a definition of. 


If you aint a Texan, you wish you were.The greatest state everOkay.
I was born and raised in Houston.
So lets tell the truth.
-The weather in Texas changes very rapidly, and we get a bit of everything, except snow. That doesn't come around very often.
-We don't get married to our sisters or even distant cousins. A shock. I know. If you want to see some of that go to Oklahoma.
-Not everyone here talks with a distinct country accent.
You have to go to the smaller towns for that. Lufkin, Etoile, Waco, etc. It all depends on what area of Texas you were born in. People move here from New York and California all the time, and we don't sound any diffrent.
Our slang is the only true thing that seperates us.
-Yes, we have racism here. Just like any other state, but it's not as bad as people make it sound. The Africans, Mexicans, and Orientals, etc. out number us by more the 50%.
-Taking hits to our pride by informing us we cuss to much (yes, 'cuss') is low. We cuss just as much as anyone in California, or Florida would.
-No one walks around here in in full cowboy uniform. So if you think we do, maybe you should visit before opening your mouth.A state in the southern USA. Its in the south. There are billboards about Jesus. One can buy [waffles] there.The best damn state in the country!  That's all you need to know.The greatest and most popular sport in history with more than 5 times the TV audience of the next most popular (cricket - every radio and TV in the sub-continent is permanently tuned to Pakistan/India cricket matches - that's a big audience).

Only Americans call it 'soccer' owing to their vast ignorance of what goes on outside their national boundaries and the misnomer which has them thinking than a corruption of rugby, with all the danger and most of the skill removed can also be called 'football'. 

'The Beautiful Game' can be played anywhere, on almost any surface, by any number of players, for almost any length of time. And is. There is no country on earth that doesn't play. It has inspired more passion, more courage and more excitement than any other sport in history and dwarfs everything else.When a girl is playing footsie with you, and her foot travels up to your crotch.A name given to two different sports in which America and the rest of the world use to waste their lives away constantly arguing over which is better. Honestly, I'm an American. And I love the game of American football. But notice how I haven't said that I hate football (aka soccer). In fact, I love that sport, too. I just totally suck at it. Haha. C'mon, be real ya'll. Both games are cool. Even rugby too. It's cool. I have no idea how to play it, but I enjoy trying. It's all preference. For all ya'll that say football is whack cause we wear padding, go ahead and say whatever the fuck you want to say. That padding protects us so we can stay a little safer to enjoy the game a little longer. I don't care if I don't use it, I've tackled mofos twice my size without any padding on. The point I'm trying to make; All three games are great. They all require stratedgy, strength, speed, and endurance. So just shut the fuck up, grab the ball that suits you, and play your damn game already. You got that? Kay, just helping out. I'm just a 15yr old from a small town. Yeah, yeah... What do I know? Honestly? I know it's fucking pointless for ya'll to fight over sports. So just save your shit for someone who's still too much of a punk to simply enjoy a game of American football, football, or rugby. Peace people! Damn. Haha.Football - Only the best damn sport ever. Played with a round ball and feet. However, Americans tend to mistake it for American Football (which should truthfully be called tackleball for all that matters).Also Known As the BEAUTIFUL GAME. A real sport played with your FEET and an actual round BALL, hence the name FOOTBALL. This term should never be used to refer to our silly american game of putting on 30 pounds of armor and carrying a cone shaped piece of rubber while trying not to be touched by other guys. You'll note the lack of definitions calling this silly game football. And there is a reason for that. Some silly americans give us a bad name by not noticing what is going on in the rest of the world and don't realize that there was already a real sport called football when we made up our game, but everyone else in the world knows whats up.
P.S. Please, if you are American please stop saying the S word (s****r)and saying that our american game is better than real football. If you are not american just know that not all of us are confused faggots.A lovely game that alot of people play.
Also the most importmant sport in the world.
Very famous, but also fun for people who like football.
If you dont play football yet, i would say:
Give it a try!

Ofcourse if you start at older age, you wont get as good as Ronaldo, Messi, ...
But doesnt matter, its just for fun! ( Mostly )A variety of games that which Europeans and Americans tend to argue over pointlessly till the end of time as to which version is "right" never minding the fact that due to Cultural Mutation different words can mean different things in other places
Typically Americans profess love for the version that involves padding and an ovoid ball in which the point of the game is to move the ball ten yards down the field at a time through either rushing or passing before passing into the plain of the "End Zone" placed at either ends of a 100 Yard Field to score points
Europeans tend to extol the virtues of a much simpler sport that only requires a pair of goals placed at either end of a field and is played with a checkered Spherical BallOK, here goes... slowly:
The word describes a very populare game, which is played all over the world.
The word consists of two parts, which quite accurately descibes the game:
1) Foot
2) Ball

Part 1) Foot. This means that the foot is the main body part involved when playing this game.
Part 2) Ball. This means that the game is played with a spheric (globe-shaped) object.

This definition seems to be understood all over the world, except in the US, where they have misunderstood both parts of the word. Instead of using their feet, they mainly use their hands. And, instead of using a ball, they use an egg-shaped object.The round form of the drug Zanax that also comes in another form called [sticks] this form is in the shape of a football.A place on urbandictionary.com where obnoxious [eurofags] bitch about how Americans call football soccer and vice versa.A tongue of which the user speaks of something the complete opposite of what the user means. It often has the best comedic value.the bastard stepchild of ironyYour body's natural defense against stupid.A word that gives you the possibility to play with your imagination when asked stupid questions.Something that nobody on the internet can ever recognize.God's gift to man.
Incredibly humourous if used correctly.Noun.  A very British form of humour which derives laughs from saying something while really meaning something else.  Often (though not always, contrary to popular belief) used in scathing remarks.

The word 'Sarcasm' is derived from a Greek word meaning 'tearing flesh', which is why sarcastic vegetarians are so ironic.

See also [irony].The ability to insult idiots without them realizing it.A verbal reflex against stupidity. In my opinion one of the best types of humour.When one says something, but usually means the opposite.
Used sometimes in order to belittle someone and make them seem retarded... or equally to amuse and impress them with your mind. Indeed.Humorous name for oral sex.To drink an entire beverage in one goplace where brain livesOral sex, head.The nickname for members of the Phi Kappa Sigma fraternity.Another word for a female sucking cock. " Oh baby, give me some skull!!" It's the same thing as saying give me some head, or give me some brain. Cock-sucking words are great!!what the hardcore kids give instead of head.

see [skull fuck].to give or recieve oral sexTo bash another in the head,Created in an attempt to imagine what in the world someone could have going on in their head when they say or do something absolutely ridiculous/ illogical/ or straight up retarded. This person must be lacking a brain in their head i.e having nothing more than a flesh covered skull resting on their neck. Skull.A coat that makes you invisibleOne who lacks the skill to contribute balanced team work in an MMO. Also known as train mobber, skill-less peon and fearless noob.Cloak is another way of leaving without anyone else knowing.to smoke marijuana.To have sex, or to [fuck]. In the context of the vagina's ability to envelope, engulf or cover the penis like a piece of clothing. Perhaps a term originating from Canada.an extremely beautiful women/girl who everyone loves and will never forget. she has many friends and people feel they can always go to her for help, no matter what the situation is. cloaks is a great listener and speaker, she is also very creative and imaginative. She tends to be very artistic and athletic. Cloaks enjoys acting, dancing and singing, she is also very good at them. Cloaks is also a great lover in the bedroom, Every man thinks she is irresistible and falls in lover with her at first sight.a super gay homofag queer fairy buttpiratea friend or aqauntancethe result unprotected [sex] of a male and a female of the same species; also can be known as [offspring] and [brats]things that interupt you while your banging you wife.Anyone below the age of 18 (or 21, in some circles.) Don't listen to the idiotic fools who hate on little kids because they think it's "hip and cool".The stuff that gets shot all over the place during sex.the worst STD you can get.1.Something REALLY old people desire to be when their backs start breaking and their hearing and eyesight get poor.Krazy Individuals Destroying Societywhat teenagers claim they are notA baby goatThe word people use when you've done something that isn't technically "bad" or "wrong" but they still don't like it anyway and expect you to conform to their personal tastes.What your mom says when she catches you masturbating.The current euphemism for "wrong" or "bad." It is supposed to sound more objective than "wrong" and "bad," but it is not.putting it simply, not [appropriate]the [definition] of [urban dictionary]not suitable or proper in the circumstances. Action could be used in a talking, visual, or sexual manner.In high school settings, short skirts, low cut tops, see through clothing and skin tight jeans.  The student handbook says not to wear this, but many girls still wear it anyway to look skanky.The act of saying something irrelevant to the topic or becoming mad feisty with another person without an apparent reason. Usually accompanied with the action of standing up and pointing your hand down to the person it pertains to.The word that used to actually mean something, but doesn't mean anything anymore.To [curse] or '[cuss]'. Swears are considered inappropriate to use in public places, but are less offensive than other profanities. These '[bad word]s' are often referenced by pre-adolescents by their first letter (the 'f' word, the 's' word, even 'h-e-double-hockey-sticks').Any word that a person says when they can't think of anything intelligent to sayTo verbally abuse, or to rape an object with hatred wordsWords that people get offended by for some unexplained reason.when something is weird or funny and you sont have anything to say, you just point and say swear! swear this, omg swear that.

or it can be used like the world "seriously"Swear is used often for cursing someone, often with any consequences.

Perfect swearing language: Russian language is also the 5th officially used language over the world, aside English or Spanish. Russian language has more swear words in them, than any other language.

According to the infamous Taboo vocabulary, you can literally talk and swear in Russian and make lines, that make sense.Word that makes your sentence mean something, and actually prove a point.cannot really be defined but in terms to understand it can be understood as being dumb, stupid, retarded, saying something that is absurd.(verb) when someone thinks they're SO much better than others; someone who is conceited and vain, and definately wants others to notice.[fuck]
[ass]
[damn]
[hell]
[shit]
[bastard]
[bitch]
[crap]
All [racist] words.When someone else gets hurt.1. Something that causes you to laugh
2. A person who isn't quite rightA way of describing the girl you really like, either to said girl or your friends, without hinting too much. Either used by shy men who have a hard time admitting they really like someone or describing the girl you like to your friend that proclaims himself the matchmaker or love finder (yes, this is a stereotyped friend that every bro has, you may even be this person - if so, you have learned the secret code of bro hinting (ha, and you only thought girls spoke in hint))When someone else gets hurt.The only part of a newspaper worth looking at.  Located beside or near the crossword puzzles and cryptoquote.  Famous funnies include Garfield, Family Circus, Andy Capp, and Peanuts.Makes you laugh, oddA plural exclamation of extreme humourosity.  

OR

When followed by a question mark, a needy request to find out whether a joke has been accepted or not.The fact that you're wasting time looking up "funny".Definitions on urbandictionary tagged with 'funny', usually aren't.If you have to look up funny your probably a fag.Big
Gigantic
HugeA compliment- referring to either muscles or more commonly, the mail genitalia. Also associated with terms such as "biggie" or "bigs". Add "particularly", "fairly", or "rather" for added enjoyment.Something of excessive size.  Normally associated with [heavy] as well.the state of the penis when arousedone thousand United States dollarsa thousand dollars - they say it all the time in the Sopranosaka, huge, masssiv, ownageIn sarcasm, to refer to something as unworthwhile, lacking merit or otherwise derogatory.

Can be used with prefixes "fairly" and "particulary" for added effect.

See also: [small]Really good, excellent. Used by DJs and dance music fans to describe a track.When you are 'avin' it in a collosal fashion. One size fits all. It is possible to say "how are you avin' it?" as this means the same thing due to the fact that there is only one size to 'ave' itA good fun alternative to life.crack, in CD-ROM form.The most highly addictive game ever played. It will consume your soul and poison your water supply.A highly entertaining mmorpg that is played by a wide variety of people. some get addicted to it like its crack cocaine, and some only play it a few times a month. The level of addiction all depends on the person playing it.The world's most effective form of birth control.A computer game whose participants apparently don't know how to correctly make words plural.

Hint for WoW players: it doesn't involve an apostrophe.Taken mistakenly as a peer to EverQuest or EverQuest II, it is an entertaining game in which a player learns how to cooperate as a team, and harnesses competition, unlike EverQuest II. The irony behind half of the definitions under this category is this: If you'd read the back of the box, you would realize that it states "even if you only have a couple of minutes, World of Warcraft's superior quest system offers quick gameplay." The sad truth is that people don't want to accept the fact that many of the players on this game have lives, jobs, spouses, ect. They see that it is an MMORPG, and automatically assume that it's a parallel to EQ and EQ2.A game were nobody but the company taking your money wins. Often replaces one's social life.A game that manages by some divine power to completely waste your life and lets you have fun while doing so.World of Warcraft- WoW is kind of like smoking. You don't see what all the fuss is about in the beginning, until one of your friends gives you a free taste. Still, you can't see how addicting it is until you have tried it a few times. Then you start buying it, and using it by the bundle, and you can't seem to stop. You'll do anything just to get a few good hours in with your favorite pasttime. You slowly start to lose touch with former friends and family, and meet lots of strange new people with a similar addiction. Prolonged use can lead to death. It's very difficult to get out of your system, you must rely on the strangth of others, for your willpower has ben sapped.
General Surgeons Warning- Not intended for oral or anal use. WoW shouldn't be used if you suffer from seizures or are an expectant mother. Side effects include obsession, nausea, vomiting, and pink eye. Ask you doctor before using.Somebody who finds great pleasure in the art of Computer Programming.

Synonymous with: Hacker, ProgrammerThe low end of the scale as far as [software engineers] go.Slang word, used by idiots, for the term 'programmer'. Often used by communities for Private Servers. There are related words such as 'Code' or 'Coding'.a bitchy old, pregnant man with a beer belly. not just old but he ancient, he was in the same class as jesus when they were kids.short for code infraction, used at [Delbarton], get three and you're strongly encouraged to leave the school.Fake Fag Slang for ProgrammerJail guard, cop, security guard, etc.
Someone with power over you in a controlled surroundingswhen you lose your virginity or just has sex and you can't say it out loud you say you wore a "blue shirt"an extremely hot guy with a nice bodyA huge spokkerjones that will never know the embrace of a womanThe opposite of a Red Shirt. A character in a fictional series that will simply not die, regardless of fans hating them or the amount of injuries they sustain. Some true Blue Shirts even die and are resurrected through some means, just to spite the viewers.The opposite of a Red Shirt. A character in a fictional series that will simply not die, regardless of fans hating them or the amount of injuries they sustain. Some true Blue Shirts even die and are resurrected through some means, just to spite the viewers.The opposite of a Red Shirt. A character in a fictional series that will simply not die, regardless of fans hating them or the amount of injuries they sustain. Some true Blue Shirts even die and are resurrected through some means, just to spite the viewers.Someone under the 25th percentile for stature for their age, sex, and country.
(5'7" and under for men and 5'2" and under for women in the US)what i am.1.) noun, A cigarrette, having been previously smoked, but not completely, suggesting the later use and finish of said cigarette.The small coffee size at Starbuck's; the only size on the menu there that makes any sense (et al [Tall], [Grande], [Vente]).Comfy and easy to wear.Military and prison adjective for describing someone nearing the end of their tour of duty, enlistment or incarceration.  A [short-timer] is someone who has less then 90 days to serve.  A Korean War veteran told me these terms were in wide use in the late 1940s; they have been in continuous wide use in the military since then.outta luckto be not tall. under 5" tallsnoun; used by a third party person to express when somebody has insulted or humiliated another personShort was used long before there were compact cars.  It goes back to at least the Forties on the Southside of Chicago.  It means ANY car.  It was from the vernacular of hotrodders and black gangsters. It probably derives from "hot short", which evolved to "hotwire" ... a car.1. The Good Part - The woman you marry and live with for the rest of your life.

2. The Bad Part - The woman you marry and live with for the rest of your life.extreme hardcore version of a girlfriendThe beautiful, inteligent, classy and fulfilling companion of a man that is wise enough to notice such qualities. Usually despised and hated on by the [baby momma].A prostitute with a life-long contract to a single client.A woman that a man is married to.The person that is there for you whenever you need them, the person that makes you want to be better, the person that you love and cherish forever.

(Hint: getting married to a woman you don't love isn't a good idea, don't do it.)w.i.f.e.
wash, iron, fuck, ect.The reason I drink so much.The name of someone that is on a vendetta to make you regret ever choosing her as a partner.term used in reference to the woman in which a man is the most emotionally involved with & who he feels the most obligation toward. she typically has characteristics which would make her a desirable long-term partner.The cause of, and solution to all life's problems.Any of a class of chemical compounds having the general formula ROH, where R represents an alkyl group and -OH a hydroxyl group. Most commonly refers to ethanol, which you can drink to forget how much your life sucks, and methanol, which you can drink when you remember.Liquid Panty RemoverA substance found in beer (except American beer) and several other beverages that makes you excessively happy, sad, belligerent or horny.  It allows white men to dance and ugly men to get laid (when given to their victim).Alcohol. What most of your university/college life will revolve around.The buffer between reality and a good night. Has been known to make people seem more attractive and make obviously stupid idea's seem like good sense.The antidote to reality.The answer to the question "What made you move to North Dakota?"1) The active ingredient in alcohol is ethyl alcohol, which is produced by yeast. Working much like [ether], alcohol puts the brain to sleep. Alcohol functions as a depressant to the central nervous system and slows down body functions. In large amounts, alcohol causes sedation, intoxication, unconsciousness, and possible death. Aside from significant negative physical consequences, chronic use of alcohol can lead to physical and psychological addiction. 

2) Colorless, volatile liquid obtained by distillation and fermentation of carbohydrates (grain, molasses, potatoes [irish]). Alcohol is antiseptic and cooling but is also very drying to the hair and skin; care should thus be taken not to use too much. 

3) This constituent of wine is a natural by-product of fermentation. It is one of the main pillars of perceived flavor, the others being "Acid", "residual Sugar" (and/or "Glycerin") and "Tannin". The presence of these components define a wine that has "good balance". For tablewines the wine label must, by law, state the alcohol content of the wine within the bottle, usually expressed as a percentage of the volume. Table wines do not usually exceed 14% alcohol content - (11% to 12.5% is generally considered the optimum amount) - although a few, such as Zinfandel, can go up to a 17% level. Sweet dessert wines fall in the same range. Fortified wines - (eg: Sherry, Port etc) - range from 17% to 21% alcohol content. 

4) Ethanol or ethyl alcohol (C2H5OH), the liquid produced from sugar by fermentation that can make you drunk 

5) A chemical compound formed by the action of yeast on the sugar content of grapes during fermentation. Most wines have between 7 and 25 percent alcohol, which gives wine is vinosity. If wine has too much alcohol for its body weight, it is unbalanced, and will taste uncharacteristically heavy or hot. The quality will be noticeable in aroma and aftertaste. 

6) A general class of hydrocarbons that contain a hydroxyl group (OH). The term "alcohol" is often used interchangeably with the term "ethanol," even though there are many types of alcohol. (See Butanol, Ethanol, Methanol.)liquid stamina in a bottleA holiday that no Black people I know celebrate.
Well , one year my Uncle tried to , but we all laughed at him.A holiday developed by a Dr. Maulana "Ron" Karenga, a black militant, Marxist, and convicted felon.
Just five years after this, he was convicted of torturing two black women to death. 

Observed from December 26 to January 1, Kwanzaa is based on a mixture of East African harvest rituals, called "first fruits" by Karenga and 1960's radicalism. This is in spite of the fact most slaves came from West Africa.

Viewed as an "alternative" to Christmas, it, nonetheless, is based on race, and not in faith.1)A made up piece of shit holiday steeped in all the deepest traditions of Sweetest Day  or Secretary's Day. 

2)A holiday for African Americans that no African American observes or understands.It's the right-on power handshake of the 1990s.  Yet another politically correct tactic to get whites to pay attention to non-whites, primarily blacks.  It's a fabricated holiday based on race, invented by a convicted felon, which is too third world for most black Americans, too jewish for black muslims, and too stupid for everyone else.  Now that's a fine example for the ghetto children of the world!Kwanzaa is a Counterfeit made up, holiday started by a black convicted kidnaper, rapist, Karenga, whose criminal record includes having been convicted and jailed on charges of assault and false imprisonment for the torture of two black women.

There is no nothing ethnically African about it, it is all fake andObviously a manufactured holiday created by African Americans in the late 1980s/early 1990s, when the fad of that time was to be "African", which is why Eddie Murphy's "Coming to America" was a blockbuster hit in 1988, when in reality it was a [racist] shit movie that made fun of people from Africa.A fake and gay holiday made up by some random black guy in the 60's.A popular file sharing program for African-Americans.An African-American holiday that celebrates the deeds of a brave little boy who saved his village from man-eating tigers by having them follow each others tails until they turned into butter.
Flapjacks with loads of butter are served at the holiday meal.The black [Hanukkah]God's gift to the world.  Brings peace when used wisely.An ancient plant, refrenced biblically {the Holy Herb}.

Gets you rocked, and has been proven to be less harmful then alcohol or cigarettes. It has never been conclusively proven to have caused a single death in the entire world, ever.

Easily avalible in most forign countries, and Alaska, where everybody grows it anyway.

Can be purchased by the (if you're lucky) gram, or (not so lucky) by standard measurements. (1/8th of an ounce, 1/4er, 1/2, ect. An eigth usually weighs 3.75, depending on the weight of the baggie and weather or not you're buying from an asshole. There are dealers, and then there are professionals.) usual prices for the sticky-icky-icky (Not that cheap mexican shite, but tanqueray-and-chronic-chronic) can run from $30 to $50 and even $60 an eigth. I even heard it ran eighty an eigth out on Kodiack Island, but you gotta look at the market from a local poiont of view.

It's easier to get then liquor if you're under 21. 

It will not cause you to shoot your friend with the gun you found in your parent's bedroom while they weren't home. (That's shitty parenting, folks, not the pot!)

It's healthier then Xanax if you're just looking to ignore your troules for a few hours.

A biennial Youth Risk Behavior Survey, released May 21 by the U.S. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention stated that more of america's youth smoke pot then cigarettes.

It's a step in the right direction, folks!the answer to all in this horrible world of oursmarijuanaweed not a drug!the dried leaves and flowering tops of pistillate hemp plant that yeild cannabin and are sometimes smoked in cigarette form for its intoxicating effect   

aka

fucking awesomeweed is marijuana, stupid. here's some names i've collected
weed
chron or chronic
dro (hydroponics)
sticks and stems (shitty weed)
sticky-icky (dripping with THC)
mauie wowie
jamaican red hair
blueberry
strawberry
AK-47
kind bud
snowflake
skunk and super skunk
mary jane
MJ
grass (no one calls it that anymore)
ganga (pronounced GAHN-JAH)
herb or herbal
dank
trees
mids or middies (average weed)
damn, there's a ton more, i just can't remember from smoking all of the above.a beautiful thing if used properly. all it does is make you happy.an essential substance in most people's lives.A green plant god put on the earth for me and you.Type of [Christianity] that places authority in the Bible as the infallible word of God. This does not necessarily mean a literal interpretation of everything in the Bible (cf. [creationism]). Not to be confused with [evangelism], which means something entirely different.A generalization of multiple groups of Protestant Christianity. It's not actually a denomination, but a category that churches of many denominations fall under, ranging from some baptist churches in the south to non-denominational churches in the north and along the coastline. Using that criteria, the majority of protestant Christians in the US probably fall under the "Evangelical" category. Despite popular belief, they are real, tangible people, who are just as capable of being discriminated against as the people who they are frequently (and usually, falsely) accused of being discriminated against. An Evangelical Christian is best characterized as someone who wants to spread the Gospel of Christ by being living examples to the people around them. Real Evangelicals do not believe in forcing people who are not Christians to act like Christians, because they believe that Christ his followers to only come of their own free will.

Evangelical Christians should NOT be confused with "fundamentalists," a term that has come to mean someone who is far more mental than fun. Evangelicals tend to believe in more literal interpretations of the bible, but that does not mean that they are against scientific study or using critical thinking (after all, how can you understand how the Bible applies to your life without critical thinking?). Also, they do not want religion to control the government, because as [Martin Luther] figured out during the dark ages, religion controlling government is actually a cheap disguise for the government controlling religion. True Evangelicals want freedom of religion, and that includes the freedom to share the gospel with others.

Evangelical Christians are a large, and unfortunately, misunderstood part of the global population. They are constantly stereotyped as being hateful, bigoted people, even though many of them have done many great works for bringing rights to people and sending help to places. Evangelicals want to change their communities for the better by changing the people, one person at a time. Maybe if people came to realize that the large majority of Evangelical Christians are actually legitimately nice people who enjoy life and are happy to share their happiness with others, they'd realize that the mainstream perception of "evangelical" is merely an aggressively propagated stereotype that aims to strip Christians of their legitimacy as human beings.Comes from the word 'evangelism', which means spreading the good news about jesus christ.

So inturn evangelical is living your life in the way that god wants you to, so that others may see you and see how god has worked in your life. It is not a way of forcing a religion on someone.

It can also mean to speak to people about jesus.A sect of christianity that is full of mindless, brainwashed followers who spend their entire life in misery when they aren't spreading the gospel. The whole sect is full of middle class/rich white folks who want to go to church to be entertained by crying, hysterical preachers and find new prejudices to be in support of. They believe that their religion is the only way of life and refuse to accept any other ways.  There is no 'conversation' with evangelicals...they only convert. BEWARE.According to society, the only demographic that should feel ashamed of themselves when campaigning or when casting a vote.The Andromeda Strain of Christianity. Often called "conservative Christianity", when in reality it is a very modern radical version. Evangelicalism has no true theology, substituting apologetics for theology, and far more concerned with what will draw in people than in actual beliefs.

Evangelicals are often mistaken for Protestants, however the two groups a quite different. Protestantism is based on the idea that people can read and understand the Bible for themselves, without need of a mediator. In Evangelicalism, your minister is the final authority of what the Bible means.

Evangelicals gather to worship in thousands or tens of thousands in the belief that their minister is an intermediary to God, and that it is very important to get their religion directly from him.Describes Christians who try to uphold the tenants of the Protestant Reformation, but without all that courage, conviction, and critical-thinking baggage that got their 16th and 17th century forefathers burned at the stake.  Also known as "Evan-jelly-fish" due to apparent lack of brain and spine.christians who like to argue and force their ideas of religion on others. sometimes resulting in violence and always voice raising.Modern day nazi's. They brainwash there followers using group hysteria, which Hitler used. They try to convert everything that moves by forcing people to beleive what they think. They consider themselves an army of god, ready to fight for his bidding.

They are also hypocrite's. E.G. Ted haggard , who is one of the pastor's at a mega church i colorado, paid a male prostitute to butt fuck him after condeming gays and homosexual activity. He asked forgiveness and was forgiven and "cured", but if any one else who wasnt evangelical did that they would not be forgiven ( like Bill Clinton).1. an adjective synonymous with "mindless."

2. a noun synonymous with "fucking idiot."a broke ass mutha fucka who relies on crack to sustain daily life.  Often seen running at full speed for a multitude of reasons.People of any race that live to hit that nasty-ass rock. Usually real thin, dirty and smell like warm trash and/or spoiled milk, fecal matter, rotting corpses etc. Frequently bobbing, weaving, twitching and glitching. Large periodic spurts of energy. Always got something for sale or knows somebody that has just what you need. The most severe crackheads can be viewed in the wild missing standard items such as shoes, socks and teeth. If you come into contact with a crackhead it is suggested to secure all valuables and avoid any physical contact or direct contact with their breath (could cause dizzyness and/or vomitting).  If you lose property to a crackhead, accept the loss. If you find yourself chasing a crackhead, accept the loss .. crackheads are fast, they be gittin somewheres.. You ain't catching no crackhead...1.a person on crack
2.a moron1. one who does excessive amounts of crack.

2. one who acts as though they do excessive amounts of crack.Someone who smokes crack and will lie cheat and steal from anyone to get a hit1.one who is highly addicted to the euphoria brought on by crack cocaine.
2. one who does stupid things.1. one who partakes in smoking crack cocaine.
2. One who can run like the wind when s/he believes that quazimotto is chasing him/her.
3. one who will try to sell thier dog on e-bay.
4. If you live in a hotel, have no food, are pregnant, and your only worry is when/how to score...you are a crackhead.
5. one who acts "crackish"
6. A Jarrod or an Izatt.
7. A "parent" of a Crack baby.
8. The person who robbed you.A crackhead is the lowest form of a drug user. They abuse the drug crack cocaine. They are often liars, traitors, and thiefs. 

Crackheads are often paranoid and fidgety. 

Crackheads can be anyone, any race, any gender.

Crackheads will sell everything and anything to fuel their addiction. 

Crackheads cannot be trusted. If you ever find yourself to a person who is a known crackhead, try to get away as fast as possible, otherwise you may lose valauble jewerly, wallet, etc. 

Unless you don't mind having any of your prized possessions disappear, it is not wise to let a crackhead into your home. Never leave a crackhead unnattended to, or you will find things mysteriously go missing. 

It is important to never let a crackhead get to you, don't ever let them get under your skin. You are the stronger person in the situation, unless you too are a crackhead.

Crackheads are pathetic.Somebody who does [crack] regulary and gets addicted. Thus becoming a crackhead.The lowest form of a drug-user.The infamous act of a girl getting fucked by a donkey cock, whilst paying gentlemen gather around and watch.as stated above, refers to a woman getting fucked by a donkey, often performed for the pleasure of refined gentleman.  

one variation (specifically found in tijuana) is a competition in which different whores fuck the donkey.  the depth to which they are penetrated is marked by tying a red ribbon (a la tony orlando and dawn) 'round the donkey's cock.  the girl who takes it the deepest wins (i guess?).A sex act involving a woman and a donkey in which the woman fornicates with said donkey, typically performed in rural Mexican cities.An act where a horny woman gets corn-holed by a raging horny assa show where a woman has sex with a jackass1. A form of entertainment most commonly associated with being presented in Tijuana, in which (usually) men pay to observe a male donkey have sex with a female human.

2. A popular Oregon radio show, broadcast from Eugene with a transmitter powerful enough to be heard even outside the state depending on how good the receiving radio is (Vancouver, WA is an example). Syndicated in Medford (south of Eugene) at night time, though the hours the show is actually done is 2-6 PM. Broadcast on 101.5 KFLY FM, the show plays little music compared to most FM radio, and is mainly composed of the two co-hosts Tanner and Drew sharing their often humorous opinions and satires of current events and people currently in the news; as well as other commonly done humor-based radio bits. They refer to their listeners as throbbits (from a pornographic parody of Lord of the Rings).a live show in which a woman has sex (oral, anal, vaginal) with a mule or donkey. they are usually found in seedy areas of border towns in Mexico.  yes they really do exist and aren't terribly hard to findSomething you really don't want to be a part of or see.Donkey shows usually take place in TJ.  It is when a donkey's penis penetrates a (sometimes kidnapped) women.an obscene performance in which a woman copulates with a [literal] jackassthe police (see also [fuzz station])Comes from the fact that a lot of police back in the 60's joined straight of the military and they brought with them the very short military haircut that gave them the appearance of fuzz on their heads. When they took their hats off, your first comment might be, hey look, it's the fuzz. It's a style of haircut that made wearing a police hat more comfortable and cooler to wear......still in vogue today and used by many police officers around the world.A slang word for the police used by poor greasers.the fuzz refers to the polices like [the heat] i think the word is derived from the police always being on your ass or in you face like [peach fuzz]The fuzz is a word used when your so frikkin high that when the cops come to bust your ass that u call them the fuzz because the crack and chron are blurring your vision.Means "son of" (hence all the English surnames like Fitzpatrick, Fitzhenry) but can also refer to an illegitimate child, a bastard, someone born out of wedlock etc.A nick name for someone with the last name Fitzpatrick or Fitzgerald.1. noun- full retard

2. verb- to instantaneously lose control of your bowels in an unannounced fashion. Usually resulting in going commando for the remainder of the day.

3. adj.- awesomer than everybody and everything around you.

4. adj- The inability to come up with a response to an insult, usually resulting in threats of sodomy.1.  A suitable name to dipsnap to.
2.  A kid who is popular because his name sounds cool if you say it loud enough.A boy who used to be hot, but glowed down a lot!When someone agrees to do something and changes their mind five seconds laterthe art of coordinating clothing and accessories with name brand shoesTo take your workload and pass it on to an unsuspecting co-worker.a cut on your thumb or a cut on any finger(V) Otherwise known as pulling a Terry Tate, to tackle a coworker in a surprising manner across a row of cubicles. The tackle might be as aggressive as a flying pile-driver or as subtle as kicking another's leg out from underneath him.Analagous to their malevolent movie counterparts, the modern-day Gremlin is most often found on weekends in between the hours of 1800 and 0400. When in its passive form, the Gremlin is most often a well-intentioned and meaningful contributor to society. However, when provoked (usually by means of an ex-girlfriend or obnoxious fool at the bar), the Gremlin first becomes forlorn and introspective, then mischevious, and in some cases violent.

If you encounter a fully manifested Gremlin, you are advised to stay clear (especially when the Gremlin is in a doorway). If you feel the need to intervene, it has been said a trip to Burger King can passify the creature.

The Gremlin will return to its natural state by morning, usually feeling embarassed and apologetic.1.) Little meshevious devils that cause problems with everything around you.
2.) Little red men with horns you see when you are stoned.
3.) Imaginary little devils you can blame shit on.A Gremlin is a woman who a man likes to fuck but doesn't want to go out past dark to eat with......because shes a beast to look at or emotionally unstable.The gremlin is a furry critter that will use her petit stature and nubile appearance to gain the trust of others. Upon making the mistake of trusting a gremlin, she will then lurk in dark corners and attack at any given moment. This evil hobbit will engage in acts of deceit and general tomfoolery as a means of social interaction. Characteristics of the gremlin will include:
-Rage blackouts
-Violent attacks from behind, especially on the knees
-Full speed bodychecks
-Stealing food from gardens
-The belief that she is average height, when she is in fact, gremlin height
-The use of such phrases as "frig-a-mug" and "go S a D"A drunk friend after midnight. You don't feed them.Girl doesn't get wet for you.Making weird or distractive noices revolving around food.
Being generally weird and always hungry and wanting foods such as chocolate or spaghetti bolognese!A small ginger creature, usually found in a darkened room eating ham sandwiches. She sleeps for most of her life and only wakes to scuttle to the kitchen to make a sandwich. Gremlins can be located in the London area and on a quiet night you can here the high pitch cackle when she is amused. By all means stay out of Gremlins way in the mornings.Your girls fucking clingy ass best friend. Have you ever wanted to do something with your girl but her clingy ass best friend is just jealous of you, and doesn't want your girl whom is her best friend doing something because she can't so she tells her not to and your girl listens to her? That right there is being a fucking GREMLIN! GREMLINS are needy as hell and their jealousy of you grows exponentially. You're basically fucked when it comes to gremlins...there's no cure to this shit.The small pieces of [weed] that sometimes don't get smoked because they got stuck to the top inside edges of your [bowl].What this fucking definition is, asshole.1. [n]  the action of attacking the enemy

2. [adj]  of an offensive substitute for inoffensive terminology; "`nigger' is a dysphemistic term for `African-American'"

3. [adj]  unpleasant or disgusting especially to the senses; "offensive odors"

4. [adj]  morally offensive; "an unsavory reputation"; "an unsavory scandal"

5. [adj]  causing anger or annoyance; "offensive remarks"

6. [adj]  for the purpose of attack rather than defense; "offensive weapons"
   
7. [adj]  violating or tending to violate or offend against; "violative of the principles of liberty"; "considered such depravity offensive against all laws of humanity"
   
8. [adj]  causing or able to cause nausea; "a nauseating smell"; "nauseous offal"; "a sickening stench"

 
 	Synonyms:	 	abhorrent, abusive, antipersonnel, assault(a), assaultive, attack(a), attacking(a), charnel, creepy, detestable, disgustful, disgusting, distasteful, dysphemistic, foul, ghastly, ghoulish, hideous, hit-and-run, horrid, horrific, incursive, insulting, invading, invasive, loathly, loathsome, marauding, morbid, nauseating, nauseous, noisome, objectionable, obnoxious, obscene, odoriferous, offence, offending, offense, on the offensive(p), opprobrious, outrageous, predatory, raiding, rank, repellant, repellent, repelling, repugnant, repulsive, revolting, scornful, scrimy, scurrilous, sepulchral, sickening, skanky, tip-and-run, unpleasant, unsavory, unsavoury, unwholesome, verminous, vile, violative, wicked, yucky
 
 	Antonyms:	 	defensive, euphemistic, inoffensive, savory, savoury, unoffending, ylbissopA highly subjective interpretation of something real, imagined, or interpreted as being demeaning; very often the use of complaint to attack someone while paradoxically assuming both authority and victimhood; the use of complaint as a sociopolitical weapon or vehicle to often unmerited benefit, privilege, or compensation.Describes a statement politically or ideologically inconvenient, esp. in the judgment of one having no knowledge of the matter at hand.  Often used to stifle further discussion or pander to the lowest common denominator.  Cf: [fair and balanced].What you see that you don't like when you look in the mirror.The act of attacking & destroying an enemy's self esteem; utilizing unconventional remarks, stirring the enemy's emotions making them unable to network an insult measuring to your ego. If done correctly, the enemy will leave in anger to cry or to write about it in their diary, resulting in a successful response: rage quitting.1. merely mentioning anything about your "lifestyle and/or preference to women"
2. reading a book for class that has the word gay on the cover(that in no way to sexuality)
3. watching a movie where a girl says she loves another girl in a friend way
4.anything having to do with gay rights1. To take a stance or position against a percieved [assault].

2. The quality of an [attack] used against an [opponent] or [enemy] during [battle].

3. To find an [opinion], [act], [object] or [situation] to be [detestable].ANYTHING. LITERALLY ANYTHING THESE DAYS. ANGSTY TEENS GET OFFENDED BY EVERYTHING. IT'S ANNOYING. TAKE A JOKE.a person on social media-especially ifunny-who hates on and/or reports fandoms, furries, bronies, emos, porn, lgbtq, and anything else they don't like. also known as a hater.having no shame.A person who has no shame in getting what they want...often on there knees for best resultswhen someone makes a really stupid mistake, normaly blondes (like me n terri)1) Short for the drug, Cocaine.
2) Short for the beverage, Coca Cola.An addictive soda.

An addictive drug.1. A popular short term for the popular soft drink Coca Cola.

2. A popular short term for the popular, a illegal, drug Cocaine.Any drink served in the SouthWhat I would live the rest of my life on if I had enough money1* soda
2* short for coca cola
3* cocaineA highly addicted substance that ravages both mind and body!

....also the name of a powdered narcotic.1. Hard arse stimulant.  White powder derived from the Coca plant, native of Sth. America.  Very expensive but in small quantities is a fine buzz...

2. Short for Coca Cola - essence of American capitalist pigdog.  Made from [bumsweat] and sugar.1.What kept Tony Montana standing in the last 10 minutes of "Scarface."

2.Warm, its the best rust remover on the planet. (Put a little Coke in a cup and put a nail or small piece of sandwich meat on top. In the morning, meat is gone, wipe off rust.)

3. More popular than you think. I mean cocaine.Always available at bars, both over the counter as a soft drink or mixer and everywhere from the guest lounge to the toilets.

Often the word media or media bar means coke freindly, due to the common opinion that any person working in the media profession is a coke user.One of the smartest medical dramas to ever have aired, House, M.D. features the maverick, anti-social doctor Gregory House (Hugh Laurie) who specializes in infectious diseases and does whatever it takes to solve the puzzling cases that come his way.  

A show that should rob this year's Emmys if not for its sheer quality then for Laurie's brilliant acting.n. a style of electronic music originating in the late 80's in the USA characterized by four-on-the-floor bpms between 110-140, synthesized melodies and bass lines.A slang word with a hundred different definitions, 90% that were made up on the fly here at urbandictionary.com, to the point where it could be substituted for so many words you have no idea what the f**k someone would be talking about if he/she used each and every one.probably one of the best medical dramas ever to hit television, features Hugh Laurie, who plays the anti-social, sarcastic, pain in the ass doctor, who specializes in recognizing infectious diseases. He and his team of doctors take on extremely hard cases, House usually ends being right about the disease at the end of the day.

This show is truly great and it murders Scrubs.Nothing more or less than the best TV show that ever was or ever will be. HOUSE FTW!!the MOST awesome show on television! (well, next to Scrubs) which stars the wonderful British actor, Hugh Lauire, as the genius, pain in the ass, Gregory House.1. (v) to consume a substantial quantity quickly, completely, and with purpose.
2. (v) to beat in competition.
3. (v) to dominate.Pronunciation  (hous)

House Music: The original electronic incarnation from disco. House typically runs around 120 beats per minute (BPM) and uses a 4/4 time sequence and an eight bar repeating cycle. The beat is maintained by a heavy kick drum that alternates in a 1-3 pattern with a high hat accent. Like its disco roots, house often features vocal choruses, real instrumentation, and a more traditional song structure.A fucking wooden or brick fucking place where you live eat and sleep in.A bigger older woman with sexual desires towards younger men. (Usually a housewife.)To run over on a football fieldA vehicle of a redneck, which he drives to a date with his girlfriend instead of carring grass for cows.another four-wheeled vehicle with a flat bed in the back used for storage of equipment, groceries, small recreational vehicles, tools, or extra people. The pickup truck (as previously described) is the most popular automobile among men.A large vechile presumably with a bed for hauling, moving, towing, or even storing what needs be.

The absolute worst thing a person could do to a truck would include the following (these are all sins of god, and you will be punished accordingly):
-lowering it 'til it's an inch or less from the ground
-adding neon lights
-adding a fuckin ricer exhaust system... which most of time would just include tips or some other retarded peice of chrome
-PUTTIN A FUCKIN SPOILER ON IT
-adding giant ass rims to it, then stretching these tiny ass treads over'em that look like they'll pop any second


A real fuckin truck would include the following:
-A "body-on-frame"
-A real fuckin engine, varies from size of the truck (ex. an S10 with a small block, a brand new giant Ram 2500 with a Cummins Diesel)
-Four wheel drive... because some of us have the balls to get off the blacktop, just for fun or required for certain jobs, which most of you BMW pricks would be afraid of, don't wanna raw up them soft hands
-bedliner

optional:
-a nice leveling kit and/or lift kit
-some differential lockers with some beefy axles
-winch
-good ol' 15"/16"/17" wrapped with some treads depending on what terrian you work/play in (crawlers, boggers, LT's, swampers, AT's, 32"-40", etc.)
-sway bars, roll bars
-engine upgrades

Trucks are great vehicles. They are designed to do things cars can't, and most of them are built solid like a rock. Last long. Work hard and play hard. Besides the MPG... why wouldn't you want a truck?The metal part underneath a skateboard that holds the wheels in place (kind of like an axle on a car).  Used for grinding (riding on rails or waxed services).They are the device that attaches the wheels to the [skateboard].When a person does something that you didn't expect or you are so amazed at what happend your speechless.Someone who draws negative attention by not having their shit together. Most commonly used in jail.a word to describe someone/things extreme greatness. it is also a multi use term and can mean anything. it also can be used as an action word.Connection, association, or interaction with a person/place/thing; usually used in a negative sense.The hair on the back of you neck that is nappy, un-tameableA woman's natural habitat.The room where grandma hides her shotgun shells.A mysterious place full of sharp, pointed objects, deadly gas-operated incinerators, things that go 'ping' and a big, cold wardrobe full of beer which is the only true incentive for entering the room in the first placeA nickname for the holdem hand ten three (T-3) offsuit, a term used by many prominent online poker players, and coined by the professional online poker player Jamie Armstrong, aka pokerjamersa word used to describe nappy-naps in the back of a females head...On the sitcom "Martin" he often uses this word to insult the character "Pam"...because her back edges are apparently nappy and rough...Where the goods are cooked, things are shipped/delivered, people get swerved, and basically all the dope shit happens. Sometimes referred to as the bakery.a sammich factorythe back of the nape. (usually used in the phrase nape of the neck).Afro-amerain women or southen women call it"The Kitchen"(Traditional) The place in a home where a woman belongssomething that happens when the condom breaks on prom nightThe worst STD ever.  Causes pain, poverty, and eighteen year of torture.Carrying developing offspring within the body.your end of life...

you are totally fucked.

OWNEDSupposed to be the happiest moment in a couples lives but the dumb asses who conceived by accident just ruin the definition.

Don't have sex until your ready for the consequences.The condition of being able to make twice as much money in the porn industry due to supply and demand.The blossoming of a new life...in your life.When are girl has a baby growing inside her! After she has had unprotected sex!This is what happens when a male and a female have sexual intercourse and the sperm fertilises one of the woman's eggs after ovulation.

Contrary to popular (male) belief, pregnancy is not the woman's fault, it takes 2 to tango if you know what I mean...

Women also do not get pregnant to 'trap' a man. Because if he was indeed worth holding onto, she would not need to get pregnant to keep him, nor would a rubbish guy stick around if he got a woman pregnant either. (See scum or coward)

Pregnancy is the aprox 40 weeks of gestation in which it takes a human being to develop and grow inside his or her mothers body before birth.

It is in 3 stages (known as trimesters)
Pregnancy is divided into three stages called trimesters, each of which lasts three months. The first trimester covers the first 12 weeks of your pregnancy. This stage is often the worst with morning sickness and fatigue as common symptoms.

The baby grows inside the uterus, gaining it's nutrition from the placenta and kept safe and protected by the amniotic sack.

The woman's body goes through serious changes both physical and mental.

The mental changes include, hormonal, she may feel depressed,anxious,happy and angry, her mood changes often, she is not going mad, she is just pregnant!

the physical changes include: her tummy growing (obviously)
her breasts growing and producing milk ready for the babies arrival, usually in later stages of pregnancy she may leak milk.
Her nipples will also swell and darken, her breasts will grow larger, she may also get other skin conditions depending on hormone levels.
Aside from good changes to her body she may also find her immune system is weak, leaving her susceptible to colds,flu and other virus' and infections. When a woman is pregnant, her immune system is in over drive to stop her body from rejecting the unborn baby.

Pregnancy can be both a wonderful and horrible experience for someone. (including the babies daddy who has to put up with a very hormonal pregnant lady)

And before any man can insult a pregnant woman let me just say, if you get a girl pregnant and blame her for it, she is not going to want or need you anyway, so don't think your so great :)
A baby growing up with one parent is better than a baby growing up with an asshole for a father.

Not all pregnancies end with a baby though.
Some women for what ever reason choose to terminate the pregnancy, this does not make a woman a bad person, If she is not ready or in a good position to have a child, or say she became pregnant after rape, then she may choose to abort. No one has the right to judge someone for terminating pregnancy. Abortion is neither right or wrong.
Some pregnancies also end in miscarriage, and some pregnancies are ectopic.

Pregnancy is a natural thing and without it the life of all species would cease to exist.1. A state a woman may find herself in after having unprotected sex with a man.  Involves a child growing within her body and can be discovered by the absence of menstruation.  May cause illness.

2. Bloated, held out, prolonged.

I'd also like to say something to all the men out there who think that getting a girl pregnant is a death sentence!
Being pregnant is a wonderful and painful experience that you'll never have, so just shut the hell up about your selfish views.  Women don't trap men by getting pregnant.  It's not their choice!The act of receiving a serious butt whoopin at the hands of a person or group of persons.A severe beating delivered with the hands and feet; a pummeling so bad, the recipient needs to use his health insurance; see [open a can of whup ass]A good, old-fashioned ass kickin',Assault by the police after being arrested1. To beat someone up very badly, to the point of them being on the ground. This can happen with a combination of the following:

* Punching
* Kicking
* Kicking [Balls]
* [Curbstomping]
* [Fist Fight]ing

After the victim is on the ground, various forms of abuse may happen. Beatdown is then concurred, and a broken limb is required before it's real beatdown.

2. Another way of expressing utter defeat of someone. Can be used in celebration or defeat.v. (1) to verbally berate into submission (publicly) (2) to physically rough up or convincingly administer authority over another person or thing (3) the exercise of legitimate authority, rules, or known customs which leaves a person or persons in a poor position and often disappointed.
n. the act of beating down (2) a disappointing and unexpected result to an attempted action1. A fistfight where the odds are stacked highly in one of the two participants favours, commonly resulting in broken bones and softening of the face.

2. The climax of a hardcore song, usually a down-tempo combination of palm muted open strings/extensive pinch harmonics and low end chords, where crowd participant's can quite simply unleash the beast on one another.

3. fucking awesome.To receive a BEAT DOWN would be equivalent to getting your ass seriously beaten by another person or persons; to have one's ass handed to them; to be "pounded into the ground" by someone who doesn't like you.the dance of the hardcore kid.... it is when the guitarist simply stums the D or C string open.....The act of pumbling, destroying, and smashing a disgusting creature, especially ostriches, salamanders, junebugs, armadillos, and orangutang. Beat downs are given if and only if the act of being crusty or ugly is committed. They are given very often and involve fists and feet, or anything wet.Yellow bread made from cornmeal ubiquitous in Southern cuisine; it is slightly sweet, and usually served with butter.A baked foodstuff for which the primary ingredient is maize, which many people call corn, a grain.  Tradition holds that the Pilgrims ate corn bread because it was a plentiful grain - and the only grain - readily available where they settled in Massachusetts.1. A food commonly eaten by big booty black bitches.

2. Ur ass cherry(virginity),A girl with an extremely large ass, this refers to the fact that she must "eat her cornbread" in order to obtain such a fine ass.Money a prostitute makes from performing anal sex acts, as in getting [cornholed].a staple in African-American cuisine, often served with greens, coated with yam juice.The most delicious bread on the planet that was invented by Indians and is made out of corn.A name that no one will take seriouslyReference to the song "No sex in the champagne room" by Chris Rock. In it he says "Cornbread. Ain't nothin' wrong with that." So this word means that someone is perfect and you can't find anything wrong with her, just like cornbread.An affirmative statement.  A word mumbled when in acquiescence with another.  Used in place of the words: agreed or indeed.

It can also be used in random outbursts when feeling elated or quirky.Where you sleep when you get your girlfriend mad; but not mad enough to be kicked out of the house.when a girl sits on your lap and subtly grinds your cock with her ass in public, pretending that shes not (like a couch dance)the second best thing to use next to the bed ;)One's system of morals or beliefsA piece of furniture more diverse than a coffee table.A word used to replace words such as "fuck", or "shit", and has multiple uses as saying "back off". Or it is a piece of furniture that is ussually sat on.referrers  to the "sit-able" [plateau] of an excessively [fat] [booty]couch - an offensive term used to diminish someones social standing. Inferring that the person in question enjoys anus on his/her face.

A amicable term in some social spheres.The place where young children get ston'd in the morning.A lazy person.The reproductive system (gender neutral).Bhe act of saving a life when a person is drowning or choking by repetitively thrusting one's penis in and out of the person's throat. The thrusting creates a plumbing effect that forces the obstruction to move up the throat. This action is in no way sexual; it should only be used during times of grave danger.The act of purposefully stopping up your toilet so that the plumber will come to your house and unclog it.Wearing one's pants so low as to display one's asscrack. Derived from the state of many a fat plumber's pants.(verb) Very deep anal penetration
Deep-sea plumbing: Anal penetration over 10 inchesGeneric term for the bars of a jail cellTo forcefully insert a hollow metal pipe into the rectum of a woman and suck out all of faecal matter. It is similar to a [filthy fiddler].Plumbing is a sexual act involving a man and a female. The aforementioned male pops his penis in the girl's vagina, lubricating her ring, tickling and widening the said orifice. When that there hole is at maximum size, the man pops the scrotum and both balls in that bottomless pit of love.Any brass wind instrument, because of the appearance of the tubing.A Farm-veihicle that can pull farm-implements.  Tractors are usually used to pull items, and often have a [Front-end Loader] attacthed.Something you like, alot, think is attractive.A really, really fat girl that you bang because your stupid/high/desperate.A Techie, and a Actor; this person does both on stage and behind stage work, for theater.  This term was invented by WMHS Techie/Actors who needed a name in MoCoSomething really good. Mostly used in Kansas but also widely used throughout the midwest.An insult describing, someone who is slow and annoying.Big ass black bitch screwing a little white man while intoxicated.One who has ways from the rural Southern U.S., particularly Texas and most particularly, the town of Thorton, TX.word for female genitals.
aka. twat lol.(TRAK-tor) Used with [trash] to create [tractor trash]. Describes [white trash] from predominantly farming communities.Any opposite sex escort taken to an event in an effort to give a homosexaul person the apperance of being out on a date with a person of the opposite sex.a man or woman used as a cover for a gay partnerA female or male(though,mainly female) who is used as a cover-up for a homosexual.The single most manly, and great thing a man can do. To have a beard is to be a true man. If you have a beard, show it off proudly, and enjoy the satisfaction of the envy in the eyes of people around you who don't have beards. If you don't have a beard, grow one. If you cant grow one and your not past puberty yet, hold out my young friend, your time will come. If you don't have a beard and your past puberty, go get that sex change you know you need.The best solution to any problem. A sort of spiritual band-aid that's only effective when used by men.A common word used to address a homosexual's female friend who he takes around town; he normally calls this companion his "girlfriend" to prove to the world that he is a masculine, football watching, titty grabbing heterosexual male. Although, he may think that this so called 'image' is working, he's actually fooling himself. It's completely obvious to on-lookers that he is a flamboyant homo. Gayer than a chihuahua in pink shades. 

Here are some warning signs that you may be a beard...

1. He wears more makeup than you.
2. He looks fucking FIERCE in pictures 'cause he smiles wit' his eyes.
3. Uses bronzer as blush
4. Plucks his own eyebrows and his eyebrows look more groomed than yours.
5. Stands with hands on his hips.A condition that causes hair to grow from the chin and lower face. Symptoms include itching, divinity and gratuitous awesomeness.

Synonyms include: Jesus.The term 'Beard' is used to describe a person who is being used by another person to cover something up. This can range from gay men using a girlfriend as a beard to make people think he is straight, or someone using a friend to make people think they are hanging out with them when really they are with someone else.1. A boy or girl hired as a celebritys boyfriend/girlfriend by that celebritys management, usually for publicity.when a gay man and a gay woman date each other to hide that fact that they're gaya woman's hair arranged at the back of her head, held together with a band and to be used by a man as a handle while receiving oral sex from a willing female.

A straight ponytail is grasped near the base in a male's fist, medium grip. This allows nice control of the female's head, but is limiting due to awkward bending of the male's wrist. It is a carpal tunnel syndrome hazard for men who receive a high volume of blowjobs. The height of the ponytail on the back of the woman's head can be adjusted for better torque.

Another type of ponytail is the balled ponytail. The straight ponytail is simply folded under itself and tucked back into the band, resembling a ball of hair. Grasped with an open palm, the fingers should meet at the band, thus the "ball" is contained in the man's hand. Called the "palm sander" grip, it allows full control of the woman's head with no wrist strain.

A third type of ponytail is the double ponytail. Two tails are formed toward the rear left and right sides of the female's head. A favorite among bikers as each tail can be grasped by a separate hand. The willing lady's head is steered like a motorcycle.

Caution: though clearly sexual stimuli for men, it is important for men to remember women do not always view it in the same context. Women often use ponytails just to keep hair out of their faces. The confused male should never just assume when a woman's hair is in a ponytail her head is ready for mounting. He should always ask first.Ponytail; verb.  To grab a girl by her ponytail and remove her from whatever current situation she is in.1) the thing that's on a ponies butt

2) when a person with long hair puts it in a singular hair elasticA meme that took the Bioware Social Network by storm in anticipation for Dragon Age 2.

The second day of live feed from gamescom in Germany proved to be nothing but slow, dull hours of people standing by the DA2 booth and taking pictures in front of its poster.

Bored, the online viewers took note of one booth workers' Godly hairstyle of a long, blonde ponytail-braid. So enthralled were they that within just a couple hours; a Facebook page, several threads, a Chant of Ponytail (parody of DA:O's Chant of Light) and a social group on the Bioware forums had been created in honor of her.

Bioware remarked on it via Twitter, and Ponytail occasionally waved at the camera and appeared generally entertained by her sudden popularity from her self-titled army.Where a girl puts her hair up in a single rubber band.
why:
So she can smack a bitch
So she can smack someone in the face with her hair
To try and impress someone
To give head

It also the most impossible thing to do when you have messy, snarled hair i do not reccomend it you will look terrible unless you have bobby pins to fix that shitGetting alot of head.Basically it is a term used for people whose skin color is darker than most. Normally referred to as "nigger", "negro", "knee's grow", or "samo-niggaz". They are typically found wandering around in Compton shooting down samo-niggaz, also if you are trying to find them in the dark, say a funny joke it will make them laugh and you will see their teeth. For example: "What do you get when you cross a samoan and a negro?" -pause- and then say "SAMO-NIGGGGAAZZ!!!!!" in a very niggerish accent. When you come across a ponytail you have to holler at them for example...When someone has a cock stuck on the back of their head that resembles a cleft of hair being draped down the back of their neck.(from a hairstyle popular with the people described, usage invented by Kaecyy in 2005)

A generally amiable but hopelessly nerdy person-- not necessarily possessing an actual ponytail or even long hair-- who is usually immersed in a combination of science fiction and fantasy literature (and their derivatives), roleplaying games (often in their live action varieties), the gothic-industrial subculture, and/or the historical reenactment of pre-industrial periods of European history (often at what are called "Renaissance fairs")-- among other influences-- to or nearly to the point of lifestyle.Ponytail is when a gay or bi guy gets mad at his balding lover for not satisfying him sexually. When his lover falls asleep, he jacks off on the guy's bald spot and then  affixes a tube sock to it. The guy wakes up with a "ponytail". A variation of the [superman].A man who is fascinated with large breasted women, who as a child was deprived of his mother's breast milk and was a bottle fed baby.Heroin supplier; a penny balloon that contains narcoticsa heroin dealerslang for [condom]; slang for protection during sex.A woman's breasts, AKA [boobs], [tits], [jugs], [hooters], [knockers].Elegant strip club located at 233 Porno Ave in Providence, RI. Famous for allowing men (and women) of all ages, including those 15-17.  Home of the infamous "referee" (bouncer) who also offers lap dances for a discounted price.A fool; a person who has just made a pretty obvious mistakeBalloons are used to hold heroin (usually low grade H). A dealer will use un-filled balloons (the multi-colored, water balloons, most of the time) to place a small, universal weight, amount of heroin into. The weight of the heroin inside each balloon can vary depending on who packaged or "tied" them. The amount is usually about .1grams per balloon. People buy them in packs of 10 or more, and rarely buy/sell a single "balloon." Rumor has it, the reason heroin was originally put into these balloons, was so you could swallow them if need be, and not need medical attention.Another name for [breasts].A very weird thing that is basically a colored plastic sack of your breath to give your friend on their birthday.1. A source of information.

2. A source of entertainment.

3. A tool barely used by todays societies, because it is not 'cool' to read a book.verb meaning to run or to leave in a hurryan object used as a coaster, increase the hight of small children, or increase the stability of poorly built furniture.What people don't read enough today.cool: the first option given when trying to type 'cool' in a text message using t9Did you know there HAVE been books printed since the fifties and the new ones are cool?  They have them so anyone can understand them.  Books can be about video games, sex, drugs, sports, people, pretty much everything.  They come with cuss words, funny characters and you might understand some more of you those weird things...that's right. Words.Something we stopped caring about after the [internet] came along.Portable sanctuaries.Words assembled on pages. They usually tell stories of things the reader is interested in. That is, unless you're reading in [school]. Then, you have to read books nobody cares about or even likes. Maybe more people would like reading if they weren't forced to read books that they didn't like. I know I would.cool.

In the T9 predictive text on cell phones, the numbers 2665 spell both "book" and "cool," but "book" is the first word to display. To save time, it is left and understood to mean "cool."The best thing in the worldthe reason you need a new hard drive.The traditional way for young female Americans to afford university education (those not from wealthy families).A great American pastime.something that both sexes can enjoy.Arousing materials usually employed for masturbatory purposes.

It's often said that the most senstive part of your body during a porn session is your ears - no one likes getting busted with their undies around their ankles.

But, the use of porn doesn't need to be such an ugly experience.  'The Big Wank' (see below) is an example of how you can add more mystique and romance to your evening at home alone.peas and corn mixed together in a bowln. Reading and viewing material, otherwise known as 'cliterature'.Will never die, as long as there are folks willing to strip for the camera, the people who wish to browse it, and the assholes who wish to destroy it.something that the user loses interest in after masturbation has occurredhairy mofo.Heartless, 
Having no emotions,v. used to describe something awesome or nice ; something worthy of hatinBetter than [cool]
To be cooler than cool
The coolest level of coolwhat a girl says she is when she wants to snuggle :]plain, obviously, flat out, straight upan annoying and contagious illness that causes sniffling, sneezing, coughing, and other symptomsharsh, mean, icyCold was a rock band that started in 1986. They released 4 cd's: Cold, 13 ways to bleed on stage, year of the spider, and a different kind of pain. They also released an ep called Oddity. The band consisted of lead singer Scooter Ward, Matt Louhgran, Zachary Gilbert, both guitarists, Jeremy Marshall on bass, and Sam McCandless on drums. Former members included Mike Booth, Sean Lay, Terry Balsamo, Kelly Hayes and Eddie Rendini.
On February 27, 2006, Ward left a message on their official website saying they had disbanded. However, he said he and Sam will continue writing music.An infectious disease that usually spreads like wildfire around people, because people don't give a shit worth about others. They would yawn cough and not wash their hands properly to prevent others from catching the cold. If you catch a fucking cold, don't cough, cover your fucking mouth, and if you go to either 1-12 grades, go to the back of the class, and don't spread your fucking cold.Pretty, beautiful, hot1- *FRIDGE; - ph-ry-dJG ; verb- the action of destroying or assassinating a persons anus with a penis of considerable magnitude often resembling a 57 bus. The action, ususally performed in a violatory sense, produces the aftermath of either one of the following symptoms; laseration and/or complete tearing of the anal orifice, the dissemination of part or the entirety of the subjects' internal organs where the giant girder cock forced its entry, and/or the complete annihliation of the victims existance to the extent where it would be more appropriate to use the remains to bury the compost that would have been used to otherwise bury the remains.

2- As above but via a huge hit during a Football game.

3- Literally a Football player of such magnitude that he resembles a walking samsung fridge/freezer combo.someone who has never french kissedshort version of refridgeratorAn extremely cool person, the phrase was coined by BriBry (A YouTuber with 21,000+ subscribers) on a blogTV show in April 2011.A girl who is frigid and only hangs out with girls. Perhaps the date, but they are too scared to do anything.

They also are overly sacarstic.someone who hasn't got on (french kissed) anyone yet.place to store cold drinks and food

since when do u keep ice-cream in da fridge-noun, /frɪdʒ/: A common kitchen appliance used to store and preserve dead human bodies and body parts for consumption.Anyone from Shenendehowa HS knows that the fridge is 'a place to go sit and chill'A very appealing being full of human desires. When the fridge is full, it can make anyone very happy. But when not full, it has the potential to kill.A maker of [trouble] is not one who "causes" trouble, but who achieves a level of trouble by being [Mischievous], [Stunning]!, [Sensational]! and [Smart]...1. When knowingly, and consciously getting into trouble with no regard or care for the potential repercussions.

2. When one said person has one or more warrants for their arrest at one time.
3. If your name is Brittany Rivera.(n). 1. A poo that is very stubborn, requires a lot of force to eject., 2. Hardened feces which is lodged at the anus, preventing soft feces behind it to pass.

Example. "Where's a magazine? I've got a trouble-maker to work out."A troublemaker is someone who expresses a view on a forum that differs from those of the Administrator and/or, as is more common, a moderator of a forum. The person deemed to be a troublemaker will usually be 100% correct in their statements, but the moderator will object, making statements that could be classified as being a [bigland].

As a result the troublemaker will then be told to go and form their own forum, even though everything they said was both reasonable and correct.When you pair a shot of tequila with a Guinness.[Spike],the troublemaker. Generally considered out to [lunch]. Known for wildly outlandish behavior. Highly unstable antisocial personality however incredibly sexy.a person who escalates a situation.Someone who brings about or initiates something.A person who starts fights or arguments.A blow up alligator; short for instant gator.A person who instigates.  To instigate is to conspire, plan and prank the local populationtype of person that gets information from people by overhearin wat they say ...and then tell their bestfriend <3Bunty, officially known as the instigator.1. (before 1997) Something really bad; a failure

2. (after 1997) Something considered excellent and/or the best (uses modifier "the")something very cool/ goodA graffitti slang wordrefers to a person male/female who's attractive , on they steez and or carries themselves well .Fast Graffiti Pieces, more than two colors, uses all of your letters. not much details just enough to look good and be on your way.(verb) the act of writing a grafitti tag in a highly visible public place.To fail spectacularly.Something you never say on air airplane.Slang for Ecstasy pillscool, awesome. Also see shita baby cat! sometimes they can't meow properly yet and they are sooo cute!An baby [cat]. Also known as a [kitty]. They have sharp little claws and teeth and can be nasty sometimes, but they are soft, cute, and totally lovable. Their meow is just precious to hear. Be gentle; kittens are delicate.1.  An immature cat.
2.  An adorable ball of fur with big eyes that uses its powers of cuteness to manipulate human beings into submission and slavery.
3.  An adorable, yet insane, tiny monster with teeth and claws.Cute little fluffballskitten (kit'en) n. 

 A small, sometimes domesticated animal; usually a pet; a member of the cat family, wants to grow up to be a lion, tiger, leopard, etc; thinks the world revolves around her; is probably right.little fluffy bastardsa woman who likes to date men older than her, usually by about 10 years, or more depending on the woman. Also the opposite of a cougar.The casualties of masturbation.(n) Term of coolness for a female from the 1950's and still used in [rockabilly] circles.Small balls of fluff that people perceive as being "cute". Everytime you do something naughty, they die.random weather patterns. makeing meteorology nearly imposibleThe 17th state of the United States -- in 1803. Contains 13,000,000 people and its chief cities are Cleveland, Cincinnati, and the capital of Columbus. Ohio is known for being the home of the Wright Brothers, the first man in space, more presidents than any other state, and Generals William T. Sherman and U.S. Grant. Also home of the champion OSU Buckeyes. Unlike what others may tell you, there are larger hellholes in the universe. Ohio has a lot to offer and is a decent place full of decent people.A land of shifting mists, Ohio is the most mysterious state in America.  There are some who claim that it does not exist at all, but is merely a hoax perpetrated by a strong core of dedicated jokesters in the "neighboring" states of Michigan, Pennsylvania, Indiana, and West Virginia (we're pretty sure no one tells Kentucky anything).  

Most people believe, however, that Ohio DOES in fact exists, and that its mystery is due solely to the mysterious mists that seem to enshroud the entirety of the state in...well...mystery, deterring all but the most stalwart of travelers.  Constituents to this belief also hold that Ohio is, in fact, the last home of the dinosaurs, and that Ohioan economy is based almost solely on quarrying and agricultural works using highly-trained dinosaurs as the primary (and literal) beasts of burden.The Buckeye State. One of the best states to live in, and all around best in the Union. We have 3 major cities: our Capital; [Columbus] (aka C-Bus, Bus Town), [Cincinnati] (aka the dirty/nasty Nati) and [Cleveland] (the Mistake by the Lake). Home to smaller cities such as; Dayton, Toledo and Akron. 1 NBA team, 1 NHL team, 1 MLS team, 2 NFL teams, 2 MLB teams. We are also home to THE Ohio State University Buckeyes, one of the largest/best universities in the country. Also home to Ohio University, which is filled with raging alcoholics that refer to themselves as "students". Most of us in Ohio, (especially us in Columbus) were born and raised with the Bucks. We bleed Scarlett & Grey. We say things like "you guys" and a drive-thru liquor store is not strange to us. It's the beach, not the shore, and pop, not soda. We are the Eastern most state in the MidWest, and have some of the friendliest people around. Ohio girls are some of the coolest/nicest you will ever meet. We are a big football state, but Lacrosse is another sport everyone plays. We play a little game called [Cornhole] anywhere we can. We love our corn & we love our beer. We are Ohio. The Heart of it All, and you'd be nothing without us.The only place in the world where you can experience all four seasons in one week.A chant that occurs in Columbus, Ohio between 2 individuals or 2 groups of people who are too stupid to get that not everyone they see gives a rat's ass about sports and can't spell the name of the four letter state they live in without help from other idiots. Proof that OSU students don't learn anything but how to get arrested, drink, fight, watch football and date rape each other. Anyone who yells "O-H" at you in Columbus is a complete waste of flesh and deserves to get their ass kicked.1) One of the states of the United States of America.
Home to a bunch of formerly bad but now improving pro sports teams, a ton of colleges, the OSU Buckeyes, actual buckeyes, part of the Rust Belt, Cedar Point and a lot of soybeans, cows, and corn.
Ohio contains a little bit of all the typical Midwestern environments- college towns, suburbs, cities, urban areas trying to reinvent themseles, farmlands, etc.  It also contains part of Appalachia, and a large number of "swing voters".  It has quite a few ardent liberals and conservatives, and has been the home and/or birthplace of eight presidents.  The weather, it being part of the Midwest region, is often "crazy" and swings between hot, mild, cold, and freezing.  The four seasons are widely known to be "winter, still winter, almost winter, and construction" or something to that effect (believed to be taken from a Jeff Foxworthy chain email).
There's definitely a lot more there than bad drivers, "hicks", and cows, and just driving through the state does not really do it justice.  You've got to experience it to really understand it, and then you can pass judgement.
2) A song written by Neil Young (while he was working with Crosby, Stills, Nash, and Young) in response to the [Kent State Massacre], which occured at Kent State University in Ohio on May 4, 1970 when National Guardsmen opened fire on student protesters on the KSU campus.I used to think that this state was propably the most suckish, boring state EVER.
I think a lot differently now.
Here are a few things about this Awesome state.

HISTORRRYYY
This was one of the first states of the Northeast, Established in 1803. The three main cities are Columbus, the capitol, Cleveland, and Cinncinati.
The Wright Brothers were raised in Ohio.
So were eight of America's presidents.
Aaand the first man to walk on the moon.
Akron was the first town to use police cars.
Cleveland was the first fully electric powered city.
Also the first state to use traffic lights.
And many many other things that I can't remember.

TIPS, HINT, AND INFO FOR ANY TOURIST...

1; STAY. AWAY. FROM. SPRINGFEILD. TOWNSHIP. This is basically the cespoo of Ohio. Unless you are crazy, like everyone else that lives in that weird place :D

2; ..I suggest dont go to Toledo.

3; If you have the courage to yell, 'I LOVE MICHIGAN' in a public area...You. Will. Be. Eaten. Alive. Unless you're in Toledo.

4; When you hear someone yell, 'O-H', you yell 'I-O'. Dont ask questions. Just do it. 

5; Don't. Diss. OSU. You will also be eaten alive for that also. Again, unless you're in Toledo

6; In response to number one, stay away from Ellet too.

7; Our weather is crap and very unpredictable. Deal with it. I suggest bringing snowboots in the middle of summer and shorts in the dead of winter.

8; Only we can diss our state. If you diss it, we'll agree with you for that second, then again, eat you alive.

9; There's a 3/4 chance you will be eaten alive.

So, that's only 1/4 of the stuff in Ohio. Come here to figure out the rest for yourself :D
But...Try not to be eaten alive...America is the melting pot of the world; Ohio is the melting pot of America.  There will never be a pot more melting than Ohio.  Some say this makes Ohio a blurry combination of everything, and that it is not very distinct among the states, but this is cantrary to the truth.  No other state is like Ohio, in that it is a melting pot.  Also, Ohio's flag is one of only three non-rectangular significant world flags, and the only non-rectangular flag of the states.  Ohio's also cool cuz I live there.Ohio is the heart of America and is well known for it's amusement park in Sandusky Ohio called Cedar Point, which has over fourteen rides and loads of tourists come summer.

Ohio also has a huge historical background which can be seen almost everywhere you go.

Ohio is one of the states with the most American accent.

It's pronounced, OH-HIGH-OH, not OH-HAI-UH. If you go to any person who was raised in Ohio they will laugh at you for pronouncing it differently than 99% of America.

Ohio rivals with Michigan about sports, and they don't like each other because Michigan thinks Ohioan's drive slow -- while Ohioans think they drive like bats out of hell. (Which they do.)

Most of Ohio is taken up by farms and fields, but don't judge it by the land, for there is many neat things you can discover in Ohio.The religious belief that every word of the sacred texts is literally true; stereotypically in Christianity and taken to such extremes. See also: [fundamentalist].A group of people comprising 0.002% of the world's population yet drawing unproportional amount of media coverage (especially Israeli Jews).1. Someone who practices Judaism.

2. Derogatory term for someone tight with their money or someone not very generous.The only people in the world that are simultaneously hated by both the extreme Left and the extreme Right.

Synonym: [scapegoat]A person of the jewish faith.Let's Clear up some of the Misconceptions in these postings.

A Jew is a person who's mother is Jewish. (Some streams of Judaism argue that Jewish patrimony can be acquired through the father as well). 
Jews are not a race but an eclectic mix of different races, nationalities, and cultures; they are a truly multi-cultural and multi-ethnic people. However, within this mix, there are distinct ethnic groups such as the Ashkenazic and Sephardic Jews that make up the overwhelming majority of the Jewish People. 
Most American Jews are of Ashkenazic origin -- usually originating from Eastern Europe or the former Soviet Union. Therefore, American Jews could largely be classified as an ethnic group, hence the characteristic stereotypes, although there are exceptions.
 A Jew is not a person who practices Judaism, although most Jews do adhere to some form of Jewish practice or cultural tradition.
 A Jew is not an Israeli and an Israeli is not a Jew. An Israeli is a citizen of the state of Israel. While most Israeli's are Jewish, there are also non-Jewish citizens of Israel. 
A Jew is not automatically a citizen of the state of Israel. A Jew must apply for and be granted citizenship to the state just like everyone else, although most are awarded citizenship rather easily.1) someone who practises judaism

2) is also a culture/ethnicity, that is to say it has a certain sense of humour, certain type of food and music etc.

3) A person who Mel Gibson talks smack about after he has had too much to drink.A southern bastardization and contraction of the two words "did you".Something you blame something.Like Christians, but without all that Jesus stuffone who practices the world's oldest monotheistic religionLacking any class. Dumb and unartful, like most of the words in this dictionary.
[fool]the classy way of saying awkward. use it.Adjective

gauche (comparative more gauche, superlative most gauche)

Positive
gauche
		

Comparative
more gauche
		

Superlative
most gauche

   1. Awkward or lacking in social graces; bumbling.

          Quotations:
              * "Seeking by vulgar pomp and gauche display" — Samuel Griswold (1793-1860)nuveau riche, "cursi", expensive but tackySocially ackward and lacking Social experienceThe hair on a dogs cock after the lipstick has been withdrawn.Male genitalia. Pronounced "gooch".A girl's boyfriend/crusha classy, sophisticated manner, much like audrey hepburn. it is classy, glamorous, without being a pushover, and without being flashy. its an element of class.Glam without being trampy - attention grabbing class! It is sophisticated, intelligent, and gorgeous.Chic is an elegant fashion sense, that is also very glamorous, and does NOT mean a girl, thats CHICK!Hard to define, a certain eliment of style and sophistication in your fashion sense. Almost artisticly stylish (don't ask).An abbreviation for Cherry Coke. Commonly herd in the hood.It's simply just another word for stylish.

FACTVery attractive lady with an air of elegance flowing around her but at the same time she is very friendly and approachable.

She is a very genuine character and there's nothing pretentious about her.

Very sexy but not slutty, not a skank. She dresses herself decently, and appropriately.To be super stylish. One of the cool people. Effortlessly awesome.An abbreviation of the word chica that close girlfriends or besties say to one another. Usually girls who are called this are hot, sassy and feisty!One of the tightest disco-funk band of all time.to groom a man.  Shaving, waxing, cleaning up the superfluous fur.A term used to define male grooming below the belt. A male can use both an electric razor or a regular razor. A Mach 3 is preferable with the ladies on the testicular area. No female likes to deal with hairy balls, so men must education themselves on proper manscaping and maintenance techniquesWhen men shave or trim their cock and ballsA mans grooming of his body hair.  Like landscaping, but for the body."I have no idea what this is."

- Jonathan GoldsmithA fine artform exclusive to men;  the continued upkeep of exceptional hygeine and strategic hair removal as they pertain to the male body.For a guy to trim his pubic hair or to style it fashionably.To trim male pubes back to a reasonable bush."I have no idea what this is"
- Jonathan GoldsmithA word used to discribe the shaving of a Males pubic /chest/ and back hairs.

-Its pronounced like Landscaping but with a (man) instead of (land).Describes the complicated love and affection shared by two straight males.-noun
1. A [non-sexual] [relationship] between two men that are unusually close.

-verb  -mans-ing
1. The act of wooing a fellow male friend for the purpose of becoming closer.
2. Going to unusual lengths in an attempt to become closer with another male friend.

also: "Bromancing the Stone"
1. The act of truly and thoroughly  enjoying the process of getting and/or being high/stoned. 

Provenance/Origin: "Bromance" is a [portmanteau] of the two words "brother" and "romance". Originally coined by author/editor Dave Carnie in "Big Brother Magazine." [Big Brother] was a sort of R rated [skateboarding]/skate culture magazine that was eventually purchased by [Larry Flynt]'s [Hustler] [conglomerate] and consequently taken out of [circulation] due to unsatisfactory sales [performance]. Carnie used the word on several occasions to describe relationships between [skate-buddies] who spent a lot of time together and/or shared hotel rooms on every tour/skate [road trip].A close relationship between two bros to such a point where they start to seem like a couple.The relationship between two straight guys. They enjoy each others company and even though they may constantly joke about being gay they are not.a highly formed friendship between male friends, or "bro's".(N) The intense complicated love shared between two heterosexual males that consists of but not limited to wrestling, numerous man-dates, and tons of other stories that will only remain between the two.

Also a form of male bonding to such a point where they start to seem like a couple.

This bond is normally only shared between two males that have a deeper understanding of each other, in a way no woman could ever realize.Bromance

-noun

A strictly non-sexual relationship between two completely heterosexual men that are close and enjoy eachothers company but still enjoy the company of women.What House and Wilson or George Clooney and Brad Pitt have.

Dating back to Plato and Socrates, a close but non-sexual relationship between two men. The whole is greater than the sum of the individual parts.

To girls this means, George Clooney + Brad Pitt>George Clooney or Brad Pittwhen two guys have a very close bond, to the point where they act like a couple, except that they are both straight. Signs of a bromance include, but are not limited to: knowing what the other is thinking, hanging out 27/7, hugging, extensive high-fiving, and sharing clothes. Some famous examples include Sherlock Holmes and Watson, and Captain Kirk and Spock.Noun- An intense and extreme non-sexual bond between two straight males. Said to be a “deep emotional bond” that no woman could satisfy.As a rule of thumb, it is profoundly unwise to take crack-cocaine. The brain has evolved a truly vicious set of negative feedback mechanisms. Their functional effect is to stop us from being truly happy for long. Nature is cruelly parsimonious with pleasure. The initial short-lived euphoria of a reinforcer as powerful as crack will be followed by a "crash". This involves anxiety, depression, irritability, extreme fatigue and possibly paranoia. Physical health may deteriorate. An intense craving for more cocaine develops. In heavy users, stereotyped compulsive and repetitive patterns of behaviour may occur. So may tactile hallucinations of insects crawling underneath the skin ("formication"). Severe depressive conditions may follow; agitated delirium; and also a syndrome sometimes known as toxic paranoid psychosis. The neural aftereffects of chronic cocaine use include changes in monoamine metabolites and uptake transporters. There is down-regulation of dopamine D2 receptors to compensate for their drug-induced overstimulation. Thus the brain's capacity to experience pleasure is diminished.Crack is something that is sold by both drug dealers and prostitutes. The only difference is that a prostitute can wash her crack and sell it again.Another form of cocaine:  2 parts cocaine to one part baking soda, with a little water, heat gently until a precipitate forms: this is your crack1. Smokeable cocain 
2. A program to unlock trial versions of programs 
3. "[butt cleavage]"Otherwise known as crack-cocaine, this illegal drug is a mixture of two parts cocaine and one part baking soda. This chemical process reverts the powder-cocaine mkaing process by one step, producing a smokable form of the naturally found alkaloid cocaine. Because of its nature as an inhalable substance, the high is quicker and more intense, leading to a larger number of addicts. In present society, it is considered to be much more distasteful to use crack-cocaine then powder-cocaine as crack is mainly viewed as a drug for poor people whereas powder cocaine is used by a richer constituancy. Contrary to popular belief, crack-cocaine is not freebase cocaine. Freebase cocaine is a mixture of cocaine, ether, and other dangerous and combustable materials. Baking soda was replaced as the ingredient in the 1980's to make production easier and less dangerous. Either way, crack and freebase cocaine produce the same smokable form of the drug.A small, illegal program who's sole purpose is to trick another program (by editting, imputting a registration key, or some other method) into thinking it has been registered.The area between the ass cheeks and, in females, including the crevices of the genitalia.Basically, crack is silly, intentionally non-serious, and has a high tendency to be extremely crazy and unfounded, such as purposeful [OOC]-ness or playing on cliches, inside jokes, and/or [fanon].
  
The term crack probably stems from crack as in crack cocaine, as opposed to a crack in a wall. As in, so horrendously unfounded/silly that only one could have come up with it while under the influence of crack.Something that is great, awesome, good.NOUN:
1. The solid form of the illicit, recreational drug, cocaine.
2. A small gap on the surface of an object.
3. An illegally obtained password or file to a copyrighted computer program.

ADJECTIVE:
1. The quality or state of excellence. (often used to describe music)
2. Having a small gap on the surface of an object. [-ed]

VERB:
1. To make a small gap on the surface of an object.
2. To illegally pass through some form of passive security (often used with computer programs, see NOUN-3).
3. To punch someone in an altercation.
4. To start. [-ing]
5. To be occurring. (often used in the greeting, "What's crackin'?!")An abbreviation for methamphetamine, a drug that stimulates the central nervous system by causing it to release more dopamine, a neurotransmitter that gives someone a feeling of satisfaction.a horrible drug that ruins lives, breaks up families, and does considerable damage to one's looks (its true, look at the before and after pictures). All the people who write definitions promoting it have no idea, and will be o-so-happy when all of their teeth fall out :)the stupidest shit EVERAn abbreviation for [methamphetamine], a drug that stimulates the central nervous system by causing it to release more dopamine, a neurotransmitter that gives someone a feeling of satisfaction.A stupid drug made used and made by [white trash] that's made out of cold medicine and other easily obtained chemicals.The lonely situation you find yourself in, after using methamphetamine. Typically, broke, with no job, falling apart, stuttering, wondering why you pulled into this parking lot "What the hell was I doing just now?" when all your "new best friends" have left you for better and you feel like it's the end of the world.A drug for fuckups.. Invented by some japenese guy approx. 80 years ago.. The hippie version is speed...Will fuck up ones life and their love ones; HIGHLY addictive, probably the most addictive drug; not only popular with so called "white trash" but very big in the Filipino community all across USA. (esp. cali, vegas, NY & JERSEY). Most users/dealers/runners and THE SOURCE know or have "heard" of one another.

They say, "don't knock it, until you TRY it" or "Try anything once", etc. etc. CRYSTAL METH does NOT apply to these sayings! DO NOT TRY IT!1. The reason why it is so hard to get decent over the counter meds for your freaking hayfever. 2. [Crack] for [rural] and [suburban] white people.Short for methamphetamines. The most highly addictive illicit narcotic made from all sorts of deadly toxins: metals, cold medicines, rat poison, chlorine, bleach, etc. The drug is so dangerous and deadly, that it can explode when being produced incorrectly. Unfortunately, the drug has a strangle hold on America and destroys cities, families, and eventually the addict themself. It makes the addict lose their looks, teeth, health, personality, etc. On the streets its known as ICE, SPEED and CRYSTAL METH. The drug turns you into a loser and eventually a criminal and convict. It is highly addictive because it stimulates the central nervous system, giving a feeling of euphoria and relaxation. Meth is the fastest-growing illegal drug in the United States, and is actually growing the fastest among caucasians in upper middle-class suburbs and rural areas.Gin is an unaged [liquor] made by [distill]ing [grain]s such as [barley], [corn] or [rye]. Its [bouquet] comes from [juniper] berries, [coriander], [herb]s and [spice]s, usually added to the grain mash during [distillation]. The gin is stored in [glass], [earthenware] or [stainless steel] containers, but does not mature in these. The storage time serves only to harmonize the product.

Someone once said that "A [bar] without gin is like an Italian kitchen without pasta". No other [liquor] provides for the creation of so many classic [cocktail]s. Gin is in fact a liquor that is harmonious with almost anything.

Without gin the king of [cocktail]s, the dry [Martini], would not exist.An often strong liquor, usually clear but with a strong smell, much like rubbing alcohol. Sold under brands like Gordon's 'London Dry Gin' and Bombay 'Sapphire'. Often used to escape life temporarily or make high skool more interesting.An archaeic word for Aboriginal Females
considered offensive but curiosly still allowed to be used to name Australian places. Gin-Gin Falls for example(n) An individual of aboriginal origin. (Offensive)(n) in poker, drawing/flopping/turning the best card or combination of cards (typically it gives one a very strong hand and one's opponent a strong but second-best hand); frequently used with the verb 'to hit' and occasionally followed by 'card(s)'

etymology: probably originating from the card game of the same namePronounced "gĭn" not "jĭn" -Bahamian slang meaning "going to".A grain liquor that smells and tastes like pine needles.Slang for the female genitalia.In hold 'em poker: Describes a hand's relationship to a flop when conditions exist where not only is the hand likely the strongest, but can also easily improve to the [nuts] (aka best hand possible).a girl who is ready to suck any nigga up just for popularity or cause they happen to be real thirsty.The surest way of getting nothing from something.when your not sure if you have to fart or shit and you take the chance any way thats what gambling is all aboutGiving money to native americans.1. An improvident activity in which winning gleefully proceeds losing. 2. The saddled process of chasing one's loses or blowing one's winnings. 3. Chinese finger cuffs. 4. An insatiable itch erroneously believed to be satisfied by scratching. 5. The willingness to ask Chance for Certainty.just a way to get ahead.v., intransitive

A quick way to riches and power.

It's a sure thing.the act of masturbating. the reference is to the hand gesture made to imply masturbation, which greatly resembles the shaking of dice.custom-made; looking like it cost a million bucksOne of the powerful masculin [trends] for 2008 in fashion. Bespoke [tailoring] reffers to a particularity of british fashion, but the term 'bespoke' is now extended to all life's domains, as a powerful mark of [luxury], an anti-brand/ anti-globalisation reaction.The act of shoving a bicycle pump up a woman's rectum while going down on her.(1)A drink that often burns when consumed by itself, but goes good mixed with various sodas (see: [pepsi], [coke], [7-up]) and sometimes even water. Straight shots are smoother if chilled, and some whiskeys such as Seagram's Seven can be consumed straight by even those with the weakest stomachs.

(2)A drink which makes old men's I.Q.s increase exponentially after every shot, eventually leading to a bar full of omniscient men who can't even begin to consider that for once they might just be wrong.

(3)Something good to come out of Canada.The life giving substance that has intoxicated many a man. (better than eve and that god damn apple)Part of the military phonetic alphabet. As one might expect, Whiskey = W.An alcoholic beverage made from ingredients similar to beer, but intended for grown ups. Suitable for use as an aftershave, by men who consider that perfumed stuff too girly.The best fucking drink in the world. Not too mention the manliest. Mixed with [weed], it can cause one to become fucking [crunk]. Puts hair on your chest.1. The oil of conversation, the philosophic wine, the ale that is consumed when good fellows get together, that puts a song in their hearts and laughter on their lips, and the warm glow of contentment in their eyes;

2. Christmas cheer;

3. The stimulating drink that puts the spring in the old gentleman’s step on a frosty, crispy morning;

4. The drink which enables a man to magnify his joy, and his happiness, and to forget, if only for a little while, life’s great tragedies, and heartaches, and sorrows;The reason I get up in the morning and the reason I pass out at night.Proof that God loves us and wants us to be happy.The cause of and solution to all life's problems!Its the fifth element after water, fire, earth and wind... Nothing exists without it!A magic potion used to make people of the opposite look bettera liquid form of carbohydrates that should be drank as a replacement for all other liquids, especially waterwhat men need to function dailyThe piss of angels.- After Bacon. it's the way of life
- The saver of old lonely men
- It even sounds cool..heh..heh.. Beer.a substance imbibed by males which, in time improves the appearance of ugly women and should be purchased more than makeup cuz it does a whole hell of a lot more for ya if yer really ugly than any makeup ever willA drink which makes you strong and clever.What you put in water bottles and bring to school.Vodka is a clear, colorless, unaged [liquor] "made from [ethyl alcohol] from agricultural origin". It was originally made in [Russia] from [potato]es, but today's vodka, which is almost odorless and tasteless, is usually made from [grain], primarily [barley] and [wheat], and occationally from [rye].

Vodka is integral to many [cocktail]s such as the [Screwdriver], [Bloody Mary] and Vodka [Martini]. If served straight, it should always be icy-cold.

Flavored vodkas have become popular in the [United States] and may be flavored with anything from [fruit]s to hot [pepper]s. Some flavored vodkas are even sweetened slightly.As a Russian who is experienced in the art of vodka consumption i feel obligated to provide the following information about vodka drinking.
A) Vodka should never ever under any circumstances be bought in a plastic bottle
B) Vodka should never be served ice-cold or even moderately could when straight. BUT!!!!! the shoot glass should be ice cold.
C) Just because you have a carton of Tropicana and a bottle of Smirnoff doesn't mean you can make a screwdriver. Screwdrivers never have any plump in them
D) When drinking vodka never sip it, or drink it slowly! This way of drinking vodka leads to loss of taste buds and a reeking smell.
E) Before taking a shot of vodka cheers must be said, then let out all the air you have in your lungs, drink and inhale at the same time.
F) NEVER EVER CHASE VODKA WTH BEAR
G) A good tactic for not getting sick while drinking vodka, is to supplement it with soda and some snacks.
H) Drinking vodka together with bear and champagne leads to short term memory loss.

facts
Vodka a 40% alcoholic drink. In theory it can be made out of anything, even wood or marijuana. The solution to this magnificent drink is extremely simple: a 2/5 ratio of alcohol and water. Non-mass produced vodka, which is available in most of Europe and Russia, is an expensive high quality drink, which went through as many as 8 stages of filtration and sold for more that 100$ a bottle.
Rarely it is mixed in to cocktails, such as vodka martini and the screw driver.
In the United States only commercial, mass produced vodka is available and has a number of flaws. A) it is not made in Russia, even if it is called Smirnoff of Stolichnaya, but New Jersey or in the best case scenario Sweden.
Best brand of Vodka are: VEDA and BELUGA BLACK, these two brands made Stoli and Absolute look like absolute shit!
Please drink responsibly and enjoy.Low cost and effective engine fuel, industrial solvent and poison. Some people also like to drink the stuff.quite strong alocolic liquid (40-60%).
not brewed, like wine, so it doesn`t taste like yeast. what most people will use to get [shitfaced]. To avoid death, it is adviced to mix the vodka with a non-alcohol liquid.Unfortunately it has become a pop culture joke. Most popular vodkas (smirnoff, absolut) are absolut shit and made in Sweden or Finland or something. Real and good vodka must be made in a slavic country. There is an ongoing argument with Poland and Russia over who created the drink. There is more evidence that says Poland coined the term vodka(wódka) for it and first started mass consumption of it. However, it was most likely created by persians or arabs. Slavic and also celtic people have the highest alcohol tolerances.A drink that can be either complete shit or damn fine. Has one of the most delicate tastes if properly filtered. Quartz filtered vodka recomended over a charcoal filterBasically, alcohol mixed with water. An alternative to just plain raw alcohol, invented by people who did not die like 4 seconds after drinking it (and apparently wanted more). Go to any spot in Russia you can buy it for like 50 kopeiks (2 cents) a bottle

Comes from the Russian word "water" (meaning that the Russians practically drink it as if it was water)Has 3 meanings:

1. Clear alcoholic beverage made from fermented grain or potatoes

2. Water in Russia, since most water found in russia that is not frozen is hazordous to your health and may be fatal

3. God in Russia, the Russian God, or, the God of the Russian people, or perhaps just the poor bums on the streets of RussiaWhen you have to hold on to the grass to keep from falling off the earth.A word defining a person who has had too much alcohol.  See also:  hammered, sloshed, shit-faced, tanked, blitzed, bombed, wrecked, three sheets to the wind, drunkened, loose, tipsy, defcon 1, well-done, trashed, jagged up, Irish, canned, smashed, fucked-up, intoxicated, inebriated, aniahalated, laced, (etc.)Chemically incovienencedA sublime way of existing in a world full of idiots.One's alter ego who is blamed for all things of a regrettable nature.The state you're in when you won't give two shits about what you say. You will be fucking uninhibited and won't give a shit what anyone thinks. You will be happy and motherfucking confident. You will be sippin dranks and feeling like a baller. Euphoria on a scale of 1 to 10: a motherfuckign 10................
So give it up to alcohol, bitches. this shit is legit, and deserves fucking respect, (that bottle of sailor jerrys was fucking good by the way)
Nigger. if you dont like alcohol, you can just kill yourself cause your iq is in the negatives!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!1. Past tense of "drink".
2. Your girlfriend's dad.
3. Spinning without moving.when you have to close one eye to keep people from splitting in two.Intoxicated with alcoholic liquor to the point of impairment of physical and mental faculties. 
Caused or influenced by intoxication.a state of being that one can only hope to constantly attainThe magic wand that can make a man dissappearaccident indicatorThe alternative to the orange.THE MOST BADASS FUCKING FRUIT ON THE FUCKING PLANET. SERIOUSLY, THIS MOTHERFUCKER KICKS THE SHIT OUT OF THE PUSSY ORANGE OR BANANA. THIS JUICY, RED MOTHERFUCKER IS THE BEST FUCKING THING THAT GOD HAS EVER CREATED. EAT AN A APPLE AND YOUR DICK WILL GROW 3 INCHES. FUCK.A horrendous company that has somehow managed to stay afloat for years and appeal to a mass of misguided people.  They specialize in taking existing technology, making it all shiny and fancy looking, and re-selling it for double the price.  Ironically, their slogan is "Think Different".

Their latest and greatest gadget that's getting all the attention is, of course, the iPhone, which is basically comparable to any high-quality $150 phone, except it has "innovative" touch screen technology, and it sells for $600.

Apple couldn't quite figure out how to make an operating system, so they just stole the freeBSD kernel and repackaged a bastardized version of it as Mac OS X.  It's funny that Apple brags that it's "Unix-based", since no one with experience in Unix would ever use a Mac.

Apple frequently runs "clever" ads.  Although they've made a ton of them, all the ads boil down to how Windows has viruses and crashes all the time.  Apple also have an enormous, cult-like fanbase that like to remind us of these things every five seconds.  Apple fanboys are generally smug, annoying, and arrogant, despite the fact that most of them don't know jack shit about computers.what the fuck are you looking at the definition of apples for you stupid fuck?The truly heinous name of Chris Martin and Gwenyth Paltrow's lovechild.The result of a mindblowing or humiliating situation in which the victim is posed one question:A greedy-ass company that makes a shit tone of money and over-prices their productsA manufacturer of computers, peripherials, and software with around a 3% share of the pc market. 
Most well-known products include:
imac
ipod
itunes
OS X
final cut pro
ibook

While their operating system's market share may be significantly below that of Microsoft's windows, many still prefer to use Apple's computers and software, especially for graphical design and audio work. 

Many people like to debate over the superiority of macs over pcs and visa versa, such people have no lives.A shortened version of [apples and pears], which is cockneyrhyming slang for stairs.Australian Slang for goodThe kind of guy most girls ACTUALLY want when they say they want a [Nice Guy].

Jerks are selfish, manipulative bastards who see women as little more then sexual conquests to brag about to their buddies or mere objects that are there for their personal pleasure. As to ensure the post-sex breakup will be in their favor, Jerks often play the "sensative guy" early on so the girl will make most of the moves on HIM, and after he's done with her and dumps her for some other girl just like her, he can make it look like she's at fault for coming on too strong, and consequently she'll take him back if he chooses to return for seconds.

Typically are/were [Frat Boy]s, [Jock]s, and [Prep]s in school.Noun. An [idiot] or stupid person. An insensitive, selfish, ignorant, cocky person who is inconsiderate and does stupid things.1.  Final stage of evolution of any male who spent at least one year dating in America, no matter his origin
2.  Mandatory mindset for self-survival within corporate America
3.  At this point of no return, group synonym for an elusive + cocky + self-confident + self-centered + loud + crazy male
4.  A guy that doesn’t give a flyin’ fuck about anything else but his handsome allure and annoying success.
5.  THE abusive attitude that will surely attract any girl’s love in America. For life
6.  A guy that enhances any girl’s low self-esteem and insecurity without meaning it. Then gets blamed for it.
7.  A guy that does not return any “I love you” s but keeps smiling at his girl’s face until she melts down and asks for more of that shit :)
8.  Every bitches’ openly discussed concern. Yet every bitches’ secret love.
9.  A challenge  aka any girl’s biggest turn-on.
10.  A bitch with a dick.1. A mean/heartless person.

2. More common: A guy who perfectly fits the gender stereotype, and is insensitive, controlling, and will treat women like sex objects. Though many women constantly complain about guys like that, most end up with one, because they didn't dig deeper and didn't try to see through the jerk's crap. Instead of going for a [nice guy] who will obviously be there for a girl, most girls choose what's right in front of them, a cold-hearted bastard who happens to look "macho", who is a big-time flirt and wears his penis on his sleeve.An alternative to dating.A very powerful word to call someone... Unlike the f-word, "jerk" doesn't lose it's power the more you say it.A person you really love that just doesn't see how much you care for them, and yet, every so often actually treats you good, only to then act completely different from who they were when you first met them.In medival Europe,masturbation was considered to be on the brink of insanity. So as an insult, people would call each other "jerk-offs", and soon, jerk was enough to get the point across.The man all girls are attracted to.A person who does not use their turn signal.(uh-nak-ruh-niz-uhm)

From Middle Greek anachronismo, the word Anachronism refers to an event, person, object or custom that is chronologically out of place. It can also be an error in chronology, in which a person, object, event, etc., is assigned a date or period other than the correct one.out of place or at the wrong timeAn object or event that is seemingly out of place in time.out of the proper time.A hospital you never ever want to be admitted to. We all have that one wacko job for a relative or friend. Multiply that by like 300 and stick them all in a tiny room painted baby blue and make them talk about the issues they have and watch them go. It's like playing a game of stick the yellow shapes in the right spots and wait for the red box to explode and blow pieces everywhere. If you live near one I suggest you move because the crazy ass-holes break out the glass and run free. Then it is like playing a game of "Where's Weirdo". I worked at one and I will say that I could not wait to get to work. There was never a dull moment. If you love caos and mayhem you really should consider a career at the nut house.1. Sci-fi movie/book about a retro-ish gang leader who after beating people up, raping, stealing, etc, is taken to prison where he later is chosen to participate in a "special treatment" program to "cure" him.

2. Also, a term used in the CWO book to describe a person who is perfectly moral, nonviolent, etc; but has no free will.A object (or person in the case of the movie) which appears normal on the outside but is completely artificial on the inside.someone who appears normal to the eye and holds the colors of life (orange), but is really a tool for someone or something else (clockwork)A clockwork orange comes from an old London saying "queer as a clockwork orange". A clockwork orange is actually a wind up doll that is controlled by both god and the devil. Anthony Burgess uses this for his book to symbolize the government almost brainwashing Alex in order to control his bad behavior.A novel which came out BEFORE the movie, commonly fooling idiots. Learn to read.Oddest, most kickass movie. 
Alex is a stud.one of the best damn movies everThe orbital subway around Glasgow. So named due to it's circular route and orange subway trains. Also famous for it's central role in The [Glasgow Subcrawl].Person who has no free will, is a victim of a cruel psyhological therapy (A Clockwork Orange), or a person who is unable to make it's own choices between good and bad1.Original a from slang (from a part of London) that means a homosexual.
2.A novel by Anthony Brugess.  The novel was based somewhat on his life, such as one of the rape scenes.  The novel was about  totalirism and the good and evil of humans.
3.An amazing movie based on Anthony Burgess' Novel.  The director banned the film himself due to it's 'ultra violent' nature.Judgment (American English); judgement (British English)1. Judgement occurs when the judgee is struck with; either "the stick of judgement" (1 - 4) or with "the ball of judgement", both currently in use in Devon, UK.

2.  The act of vigilante violence.The collective term for a group of [hipsters].What is considered justA clan of fags lead by 2 old people who no one like except for the fags who join it.The Pirate is an oft misunderstood individual who can be seen absolutely pwning everyone around him/her. Well versed in the arts of cheekiness, deceit, extortion(sp), theft, blackmail, smarmery, and crazy acrobatic sword and or knife fighting. The  pirate always lands on his feet, and always wins, even when you think not. naturally hates the ninja, as ninjas are overated far too serious for their own good. 
the most 31337 p1r4735 sometimes join the ranks of the mysterious Shadow Pirates.1. One who drinks rum, get angry, and stab things.
2. A sailing criminal who, sails on a ship, steals from other ships, lives without any law:only a set of morals, survives on goods stolen from other ships/ports.When a woman is giving you head pull out before ejaculation and blow your load in her eye. Then kick her in the shin. After completing those 2 tasks you have gave a women the pirate.Pirates are a sea fearing folk, oft to be seen pilaging, raping, murdering, or commiting other acts of piracy. They usually own a monkey, parrot, or sexy wench.The coolest motherfucking people to ever exist.1. n. Arch rival of the [ninja].
2. n. Devotee of the [Flying Spaghetti Monster].1. Always land on their feet
2. have cool eye patches ... even if they have both eyes
3. have dice
4. have guns
5. pirates are not ordinary humans so they can kill ninjas!
6. have cool ships
7. have better swords then ninjas
8. are all around better then ninjas
9. have a lot of movies about them (way more then ninjas)
10. wear red on thursdays
11. have graduated from Pyro Pirate Academy of One-Eyed Peter!
12. polish their peg legs
13. say thinds like scally-wagger and scurvy-chap
14. Arrrrr! need i say more
15. pack a mean punch
16. always have the best snacks
17. will make you walk the plank if your not as cool as them
18. start all the major fashion trends
19. don't go crying to their mommies ... like ninjas
20. know how to handle a lady
21. knows how to DAG people better then ninjas
22. have pretty cool boots
23. get all the tasty rum
24. have pretty good cursive
25. have more extended vocabualary then ninjas
26. are absolutley amazing!!!
ARRRR!The name given to the coolest dudes to ever sail the seven seas. They have cool boats, cool planks and cool wooden legs. Parrots are also optional. Their main duties include searching far and wide for, "pluder," or, "bling," as it would now be known.The holy being in the religion of Pastafarianism. Often prayed to by followers of the Flying Spaghetti Monster. R'amen.Better than ninjasa small sexy piece of underwear that girls wear and it attracts men. When a girl bends over, it tends to show out from under her jeans or hipsters. Men love them.By far one of the best forms of underwear.  It is small, with strings going around the hips, a small piece of cloth in the back, and cloth in the front.  Many girls wear them, useful in preventing "Panty Lines" from coming through when they wear tight pants.  Also, a huge turnon for guys when girls bend over, and they pop up about the pants.What comes out when someone with a lisp tries to say the word "song"1.underwear that makes guys horny when they see the strings pulled up and the cheeks of an ass when a girl wheres a dress on a windy day
2. Panties that girls where so that they leave a less distinct pantyline so they dont look like there wearing grandma panties in booty shorts1). A peice of lingerie that goes up your ass. Comfortable. Most would disagree, but some say it is comfy, like me.

2). A sandle or flip flop worn in Summer.Retro Definition: Rubber, slip-on sandals (a.k.a. 'flip-flops' or 'jap-flaps'), usually worn for water activities. This definition has been provided as a Public Service Announcement.Thongs are a type of footwear, also known as 'Flip-Flops'. Not to be mistaken with the sexy [thong] garment of underwear.Australian for cheap rubber footwear, known as [flip flops]or [jandles] in New zealand, dunno what yanks call them.A perpetual wedgie.the word used in Australia, to define flip flops.an occupation that involves taking (stripping) one's clothes off for the sexual stimulation of others. most strippers are female.A girl that guys are dumb enough pay $20 for a 5 minute dry hump.  She swoons at his ridiculous pickup lines and laughs at his stupid jokes to make him think he's getting somewhere with her, so he continues to fork out the money in hopes of impressing her to the point that he'll get more than just a case of blue balls and an experience to jack off to before going to bed that night.  But after giving her the last of his money, she tells him she'll be right back.  After several minutes he realizes she isn't coming back, so he leaves the club disappointed and flat broke, and as he's leaving, he sees her grindin her ass into some other dumb bastard's lap.A stupid bitch who got pregnant when she was a teenager by a losser and now gets naked for dollars to support her bastard childSomebody (usually a woman) who uses provocative dance whilst dis-robing to extract money from sad, sex-starves letches.A woman who seeks to relive her chaotic childhood experience by disrobing and rubbing her snatch on a brass pole in front of men that care for her like her father did.woman with a hot body that is really dead inside. they give u pleasure without sex and take all ur cash. if u make a move on her, her big black bitches will beat the shit out of you and take all ur moneyThe official occupation of a  [single mother],  or any struggling woman trying to make  [ends]  meet1.  A person who takes off their clothes and dances around to make money.
2.  A peeler or ripperFlashy, showy. An item or person who, superficially, appears better than they actually are.
Deliberately trying to look good but lacking substance(unlike [spongey]) 
In the case of people, usually accompanied by an arrogant or over-confident sense of self-absorbtion.An individual; male or female, with the athletic prowess of a jungle cat and the tits (or balls) enough to take off their clothes and dance around butt naked in front of a crowd of people for tips. These people are adept in the art of flirting, fantasy creation and erotic dance. Not a profession for the weak willed or faint of heart, it is an art not understood by many and thus often disrespected.prostitute. started in the civil war When Gen.Hooker of the Union Army (the first [pimp]) tried to protect his troops from VD by buying the best chicks and pimping them to his corps of 20,000 men. orginally hooker's girls.A not-so-rare breed of female that is overtly loose between the legs.  Much like dinosaurs, these creatures cannot see anything unless it moves.

Sometimes called "street t-rex"1. A source of pleasure, mainly sex, bt only if payed.
2. Target practice.The "new" cool. Sort of like kool, kewl, wet, or badass. This word can be used to replace cool to make your sentences all the better!Term used to describe a type of female that is:

- Easy to [bang]
- Takes money for sex
- Disappointed male does not get anyA woman who is wise above others in the art of sexual satisfaction and [love].  In ancient times, these women were considered to be priestesses and were given their own temples where they could teach their art to others for a large sum of money.   These women were highly respected and cherished for their extensive knowledge of lovemaking/giving, and their spiritual understanding.  

Later, the christian religion would have a great negative effect on these women's lives, mostly because the spiritual beliefs of these cunt-lovin' cultures were pagan (a big no-no to chiristianity).   as christianity spread, people started to see sex as a sin, and the priestesses were slowly blacklisted.  today, this christian idea of sex as a sin still stands, and hookers are now considered criminals.A woman (usu) who receives money for chugging the snotty end of a piss pump until the "john's" fuck stick blows a bileous ball bilge bolis of throat yogurt down the back of her crack smoking gullet.A [prostitute]. Usually, prostitutes are females, but plenty of prositutes are males.

Hookers sell their bodies to a variety of people, from unassuming men to really freaky characters. Just imagine having sex with half a dozen strange men each day for money: it's not a pleasant thought.

And prostitutes don't have sex for money because they like it; it's about the money. They might often hate their line of work, but they have no other way out.

Hookers range from the [chic] [call girl], who is higher class and has control over the situation, to the lowly [streetwalker], who is vulnerable to attack or police entrapment.

And remember: use a [condom] if you're with a prostitute, unless you want [clamydia], [gonorrhea], [herpes], [AIDS], [hepatitis], [syphilis], or other *charming* diseases.A sexy woman who fucks men who need to be fucked. A woman who gives pleasure to desperate males like me when In need of pussy.Slang,What you might call a close friend. used like the word buddy or pal.not the traditional definition. OR, a reference to girls or women that might, or might not be actual women for hire.What i always call my friend Bill X when i see him, and he responds in the same fashion.1.Actual bowling, with 10 pins and 1 ball.
2. Masturbating, with 2 balls and 1 pin.Simply a codeword for smoking Cannabis to be used around non-users1. Noun; The sport in which you throw a bowling ball at pins.
2. Verb; usually means to smoke weed (hints the word "bowl"ing)When engaging in sexual intercourse, in the doggy style position, place your middle finger and ring finger in the females anal sphincter and your thumb in her vagina and grip vigorously like it's a bowling ball while you pump and thrust.Same rules as bowling except instead of knocking down pins each player must cash a bowl.
Strike = One hit to cash the bowl
Spare = Two hits to cash the bowl
Gutter Ball = A person Volcano's or drops the pins (danks)When a female rubs her breast against another females vagina in an up and down motion which can lead to orgasm.Filling all three of a woman's holes during the act of sexual intercourse, as if she was a bowling ball.  This can be done by three men, or by one man using the penis and hands (a modified [shocker]) or by one man taking turns at each hole.throwing an oversized, [extremely] heavy, painted coconut at pinsThe act of sticking you thumb in a womans ass while hitting it from the back, holding her ass such as a bowling ball.The act of transferring a joint roach into a bowl to finish it off.Someone who frequently dates girls that other guys have thrown out like trash.  Usually goes for girls that are getting over a bad breakup.bench player, who has the primary quality of burning minutes and chipping in the occassional goal.

Term mostly used in hockey, but can also be used in basketball or baseball.individual(s) who pick up your trash.  If left out on a certain day each week.1) someone who picks up girls who have recently split from their partners. Regarded as a [twat] by all those around him.
2) Someone who picks up a lot of points from rebounds in American Sports.A guy who constantly picks up, or takes out, horrifically trashy women."Who can take the trash and the twisty things too? 

--- The garbage man can, the garbage man can!"The process of which a man shits inside a girls vagina then fucks her. This could be used instead of lube.When you see someone hitting on a person and it falls through so that person continues to hit on someone else until they succeed. It can also be a person that is a last resort.A garbageman is a man with a massive package, and he flaunts it, by wearing tight shorts, undies, kilts, etc.
He WILL place his 'junk' on you, if he feels aroused and/or threatened.  Typically used in homosexual/incestual type situationsA sex move during which a man penetrates a woman who is in the process of vomiting.  Ideally, pelvic thrusts will coincide with gastric contractions.The black man's 747.A special mode of transportation of asorted goods and persons. Involving large vehicles claimed to be 'busses' which are secretly cheaply created allein space-crafts bringing the opeouts to the masses.Very short skirt, only an inch from the *hare*.Best pets every! there lazy and dont move most of the time... but will get up every one and awhile to greet you1. A large bus, derived from the company greyhound. Commonly used to transport those who cannot afford faster, more efficient or more luxurious transportation.

2. An alcoholic beverage mixing gin, and grapefruit juice.Racing dog.

A bus that goes state to state.The Runaway's method of running awayTo fatally injure by decapitation with a hunting knife.For people unable to afford quicker and more efficient methods of transportation.

A wonderful way to see the worst parts of many cities across the country.1. A hot, older man aged 56 yo and up a dilf. 2. The final step in the dilf/hound dog continuum.Short for [Warped Tour]. A punk rock concert tour that occurs every summer. It usualy has around 6 stages and near or more than 50 bands. The Warped Tour is sponsered by Vans and has been running for just over 10 years.To be convoluted, twisted, rippled or distorted.when a person gets so crazy high that they begin to see things with a distorted appearance, as if they are warped.

usually affective after smoking very chronic weed or getting hella fucked up from anything else.Cool or funny in a weird way.1. something that is so insanely cool
2. unbelieveableAfter you have smoked a lot of marajuana, u feel in the zone, (the place where you want to be)and altered

(another meaning for stoned,baked,blazed)1)getting high.2)severly underrated red hot chili peppers songAnother way of saying WTFOne sexy biatch, Constantly harrased by Flea, Moxin and Subotai for sexual favors but they're below Warped and not in his his league.When a person gets so [seshed] they start to lose touch with reality.  Almost a high sensation.

See [sesh].The act of vomiting, hurling, barfing, losing lunch, tossing cookies, ralfing, throwing up, yacking, retching, technicolour yawning, spewing, blowing chunks, and/or other forms of physical illness.What happened that time in seventh grade when you walked in on your parents.Slang meaning to vomit.  The word 'puke' is sometimes considered offensive.1. the act of vomiting
2. vomit itself

See also [word]mag[/word]to pour acidic vomit from you stomach out your face.to vomitFilipino term for vagina or pussy; the hole between the legs of a woman where the penis goes in and out until ejaculation occurs; (pronounced as "pooh - key")Tagalog for female genitalsExtremely annoyingThe act of or the action of relieving your stomach contents in a matter of bile, food, or other stomach contents is projected from the stomach to the esophagus out of the mouth. Also known as throwing up.Indifference; to be used when one simply does not care."The verbal equivalent of a shrug of the shoulders." -quoth meused in the greatest tv show of all time [The Simpsons]. in the episode Hungry, Hungry Homer, bart and lisa respond to a homer inquiry with "meh". mystery solvedMeh is used to describe any and every word possible, including:
Yes
No
maybe
kind of
never
always
ok
alright
no thankyou
yes please
look bitch i really dont care so just shut the fuck up
if you want
whatever
If you wnat
i dont want to really
well
shut up
i dont really care
no honestly, i dont care...

...and is never explained on which is actually used...An interjection used to imply indifference towards a subject; "a verbal shrug".  This particular interjection has somehow become quite popular among teens, the reason for this popularity is a mystery.  Other popular interjections are "bleh", "dah", and "mih".  Usu. pronounced shortly, without eye contact or body movement.This is a universal, non-commital answer to every question ever posed. Its the answer that deosn't actually give any answer.A random word when people either don't know what to say, don't care, can't answer a question or are too drunk to form a coherent english phrase.Indifference, or I do not care, also whateverAn expression of [apathy].Meh is used to say whatever, I don't care, I don't have an answer, I have nothing else to say, I'm frustrated, not interested or your joke isn't funny.The only thing that's fun to do anymore.An escape from life, like (see [weed]).  When you get back, the problems of life hit you in the face like a brick.The only thing that brings me joy.computerized games involving many gernes of typesa form of entertainment that is composed of any type of game put into a digital image on a screen and is operated by the player through means of a control connected to a form of a console 

commonly a scapegoat for politicians and crappy parents 

my hobbyThe target of every [Soccer mom], [politician], and [feminist] who (1) has never played a videogame in her life, (2) doesn't know how to discipline her kid, thanks to all the time she spent marrying and divorcing 4 or 5 times, and (3) is looking for an easy [scapegoat] for her incompetence.3D or 2D virtual games that can waste your time for good and fun.One of the best forms of entertainment.a true test of skill, unless you have it on fuckin easy you nerd!A program that is more than a form of entertainment. It offers us an escape from the dullness of reality, a place where we can do things we actually can't.passing a homeless person on your way to a [coin star] machine.a word used by prude or unattractive girls in situation in which they feel weirded out by the presence of a confident young guy trying to make conversationhaving your flat mate walk in on you while you are making out with yourself in the mirror, moaning, and saying in a deep, sexy, voice: "oh, baby".1. Ungraceful; ungainly.
2. Clumsily or unskillfully performed.
3. Marked by or causing embarrassment or discomfort.When two pedophiles meet up after chatting as 15 year olds online.A common word overused by kids in junior high, almost in the same group with "LOL" and "random!". Used to try and impress your preteen friends after or during a long pause between conversations. Also used by idiots whenever there is a pause in speech. Sometimes accompanied by a hand motion resembling a turtle or a turkey.Interjection used in a situation that is slightly uncomfortable, often accompanied by a gesture where the lower arm is thrust out parallel to the ground with the hand open and fingers together with thumb on top.Interjection used in a situation that is slightly uncomfortable, often accompanied by a virety of gestures: 1. Pulling the collar with one finger (this represents the sweat collecting under the collar from the AWKWARD situation) 2. Arms form a triangle over the head (such as the A in YMCA) 3. One finger pointing at the back of the other hands wrist 4. Pointing at the back of the neckA comment made by a third party in response to someone saying something inappropriate or embarrasing themselves in some way, thus causing an awkward silence for several seconds.

Saying "awkard" is often a remark deliberately aimed at stating the obvious to make the situation just that little bit more cringe-worthy.

for related topic please see [ground swallow me up], [dig a hole] and [keep digging]A situation which is of a significant amount of discomfort, and a subject of hilarity and confusion for those not involved.Round objects dangling in a scrotum. Only men have testicles. Women love to kick, knee, squeeze, or otherwise abuse them. When struck, testicles cause extreme pain.A word you say when there is awkward silence in a room with three or more people.1. Two walnut-sized coils of tubing inside the [scrotum] containing the reproductive fluid of a male, [semen]. 

2. An ancient greek hero.Testicles or testes are the pair of male glands that produce sperm fluid; the tiny sperm in the fluid each contain half the 'information' required to produce another being of the same species. The other half is provided by the egg that is produced in the female equivalent glands called ovaries. When sperm is spurted into the female via the penis and has travelled through the cervix into the womb, the thousands of sperm surround the 'waiting' egg and when one sperm is successful in piercing the egg, the egg, which is hundreds of times larger than the sperm, then prevents further sperm from doing so. The egg is then "fertilized" and eventually grows into a new being of the same species.

The testicles also produce a hormone called testosterone; this hormone in large doses is what makes a being grow into a male. Thus testicles are what makes a male a male!

Unfortunately for mammals, the testicles have to be on the outside of the body so that they do not get too warm. They are composed of tiny tubes or sperm ducts where the sperm are produced; these tubes are coiled up like very thin coils of spaghetti and are contained within an outer cover attached to the body by a thicker tube (the testicle or sperm chord). This chord has a thin walled swelling at the testicle end called the “Epididymis” and this is protected by being at the back of the testicle. This swelling is very important because it is where the sperm is stored and reaches full maturity after being produced in the sperm ducts or tubes. Both the testicles are contained in a special skin bag called the scrotum that adjusts to keep the testicles at the right temperature; closer to the body in cold external temperatures and further from the body in warm external temperatures.

Because they are delicate, testicles have many nerve endings and these are made to cause pain if struck or put under pressure so that the owner will take care not to damage them. This pain is extreme and is not solely confined to the testicles and even a fairly moderate blow can cause debilitation by causing the owner to go into shock; a very hard blow can not only rupture the testicle, but can cause so much shock that the owner dies.

Human nature being what it is, testicles are very often the subject of torture to force a man to tell all he knows as in almost all cases, no man can withstand the pain caused.

Women also find testicles a welcome vulnerability in an otherwise much stronger assailant in self-defence; the famous kick in the balls is a great equalizer.

Additionally, because testicles, along with the penis, are an observable difference in the sexes and because they are what make a man a man, they are often the target (both mental and real!) of female hate (and revenge!) for making men “the way they are”!The Fountains of Cum. Where all the [cum] cums from. Ladies: love'em, tickle'em, lick'em but just don't squeeze'em!A greek philosopher from 348 BCE, worked along Socrates.
His name is pronounced (pronounced Test-uh-cleez)The symbol of manhood. They are what makes a man a man.you gotta be fucking kidding me... looking up testicles in the urban dictionary??1. What no one would be here without.
2. Source of extra muscle, adrenaline, and power.
3. What makes feminists hypocritical.The two [round[ [balls] in the sack under the mans '[shaft]'.a streatchy strapless top for woman that is one of the hottest, sexyest most gorgious femane articles of clothing ever invented. they look amazing on the right girls but when worn by the rong girl it's just plain creepy!a person who is consistently a bad time; a bummera strapless, cylindrical top.Euphemism for someone who drops a huge, usually long, piece of shit. As a lumberjack lays logs, this person laid their log into the toilet.The lumberjack is an exciting sexual maneuver which should be only attempted by professionals.  

In this case, the woman is on all fours and the man enters her from behind (see "doggie style").  Hole choice is completely up to the lumberjack himself.  When he is ready to cum, he yells "TIMmmBERRRrrrr" and takes out the woman's arms with a svelte swooping motion.  The woman then, like a tree, falls to the bed.  During the fall, the woman experiences excitement as well as fear during her zero gravity experience as she realizes impact is imminent.  This leads to the tightening of her vaginal and anal cavities, yielding an astonishing feeling and hence orgasm for the lumberjack.

Extra points can be scored on this maneuver by the close and careful placement of the woman in relation to the headboard.  When the woman's arms are taken out, her head slams into the headboard.  Very fun!The man who singsA girl that is so disgusting, that she makes you lose a boner. she "cuts down your wood".Lumberjacks are the second most awesome people group, after [Pirates], and before [Ninjas].  

Real Lumberjacks have an ax and existed long ago and wear flannel, suspenders, and pants.  They have hairy faces and kick ass.  They will cut down any forest easy, because they are awesome.  

Fake Lumberjacks are the modern day lumberjacks who wear bright orange and they use chainsaws because they are too weak to use an ax.  They also eat lots of flapjacks.  Sing and breakdance.

The most awesome lumberjack ever was Paul Bunyan, he was kickass.  
A lumberjack's ax is NOT spelled with an e like "axe".  Only norsemen had axes.A gentleman who earns his living by felling trees. We all owe him a debt of gratitude for providing the material for our homes and furniture. This gentleman is soundly hated by the [environmentalist] who lives in a timber house.A red and black flanel jacket, coat, or shirt popular in the 80s and 90s.  Actual lumberjacks wear these often.To fuck over an entire fanbase by writing, producing, and airing a television series finale episode so poor that even a union of hookers think it sucks more than they do. Named after the surprise regarding protagonist Dexter Morgan's fate at the end of the series finale of television show [Dexter].Term used to describe a chick that gives a lot of handjobs...(hand ho). One who "jacks lumber" (Gives hand jobs)A sexual act involving 2 men and 1 woman with large, floppy breasts. The woman lays on her back, while each man slides his penis under a breast from each side. To avoid touching each other in the middle, the men coordinate going back and forth, like 2 lumberjacks sawing down a tree.

May also be referred to as a "See-saw"Someone who will tell you that religion is science and science is a religion.Polite way of saying "dumbass".A person who believes that the biblical account of Genesis is a literal, scientific document, and that all scientific knowledge of evolution and geology are mistaken and/or misrepresented by biased scientists. According to Creationists, the world was created in 6 days some 4 to 6 thousand years ago, God placed fossils into various depths of the Earth for no apparent reason (or that, since fossils are so rare, not all co-existing animals were fossilized together) all species where created individually (with allowance for individual variation and common design themes, but no common anscestry), that all life was harmonious before the fall of man (hence carnivores ate grass), that dinosaurs (which are said to be referred to in the bible as "leviathan" and "behemoth" and are supposedly represented in ancient art) lived at the same time as humans, and that they were whiped out in the biblical flood because they couldn't fit into Noah's Ark (or that he only fit the small ones, in which case some dinosaurs might be alive today). 

To promote these views, creationists often misrepresent the data themselves, in an effort to discredit science and abuse it to validate their own beliefs. Hence, they are extremely critical of any and all (overwhelming) evidence that does not support their views while using bogus or equivocal data to prove theirs. 

This doesn't work. 

Any close, unbiased examination of the evidence reveals that nearly all of the creationist's claims are found wanting. I will not list those reasons here but will instead include a few links below.

Creatonists aim to keep the American public ignorant of evolution and science (which they have done a pretty good job of doing, as recent polls suggest) and desire that creation be taught in public schools along with evolution. 

This would be about as ridiculous as teaching two different versions of the Holocaust in history classes (as some people claim that it never happened, and can back up this claim with phony evidence) or teaching an alternate flat earth theory (which another society can find "evidence" for) in geography. 

That is not to say that there isn't a place for Genesis in the sphere of public education, but that would most likely be in courses involving theology, religion, culture, anthropology, and philosophy. 

The moral here, of course, is that one shouldn't look to science to back up theology and vice versa.

Here are some links to learn the truth and why "creation scientists" are wrong (the links themselves can't be included because this site can't have words with more than 50 characters--wtf??). Go to a search engine and type in:

www.talkorigins.org

And perhaps Karl Thornley's page on Theistic Evolution for a few more good links.Mindless cretin who thinks that "Goddidit!"a person who believes, despite overwhelming evidence to the contrary, that every single word in the good book is 100 percent factual.  They tend to exhibit outward signs of basic intelligence and know a lot of big words, occasionally even well educated, but have the general intelligence of a shoe.  See also : brainwashed.One that thinks that hundreds of different scientist who all came to the same conclusionregarding the creation of the human species must be wrong because the Bible says so.  They tend to try and have scientific truth banned from their childrens' schools.An ignorant person who feels that the bible must be taken litteraly and any science that contradics what their book says (despite the fact there are different translations of the bible pointing to different things) is wrong. That would be all of science by the way. There is no science at all to suport their ignorant and idiotic claims.
 A creationist will not accept the theory of evolution, despite it being fundemental to modern biology & genetics, and do not understand what theory means in scientific literature. They realy dont like this theory at all. 
 They normaly try to discrace 'evolutionists' and often attempt to imply that science can only be science if it is looked at from a religious perspective when quite the opposite is true. They accept a point and then ty and prove it, the opposite of the scientific method.
 Finaly most know nothing about science and simply follow their faith. Many creationist leaders give themselves the title of Dr. Nearly all of these 'doctors' aquired their degrees from uncredited degree mills.

See www.talkorigins.com for a refutal of creationist claims.A person who thinks he/she knows more about science than an actual scientist.Synonymous with [idiot]often used to describe something stupid or unfortunate; can replace the common slang word "gay"Hatred of women. Often rewarded by a slap in the face.In reference to the city, let's just say that you know you're from there if any of the following apply to you:Power that comes form diversity.... Pride that comes from making it to the top....The greatest Fucking city in the world.Where my heart will always be no matter where I go.  

New York = Home1. The 11th state to join the union.
2. Also refers to NYC, or as most ignorant people think- Manhattan. (Oh, yeah, there's also The Bronx, Brooklyn, Queens and Staten Island)The Empire State where the greatest city and the capital of the world dwells. NYC or the five boroughs of south NY. The 1st capital of the country from 1785-1790. Home of Broadway theatre, home of the best pizza(NY style) in the world, home of the best franks(Nathans and Papiaya)in the world, also the place where the term 'Hot Dog' was coined, birth place of the potato chip(Saratoga ,NY),the media capital of the world, business capital of the world, largest department store in the world(Macy's 34th st.),Birth place of Hip Hop culture, one of the fashion capital of the world, home of the largest and greatest subway system in the world along with the 1st in the country. And home of the greatest and most successful team in sports(NY Yankees).best bagels, best pizza, best italian food period, best places to shop, its awesome.. u can go out east on LI or manhattan or upstate NY. new york is a great place to live. 

oh yeah and upstate is part of new york u idiot. if u wanna talk about the city say NYC. i'm sure upstate NY people write NY on their mail. you can't argue that or you're just dumb.I am from New York. I curse a lot. I say mad instead of wicked. I like the YANKEES. I know what REAL pizza tastes like, and I know that a bagel is much more than a roll with a hole in the middle. They're sprinkles...not jimmies. I play BEER PONG not beirut. I judge people by what exit they get off the highway. It's not called the shore, it's the BEACH. Its a wedge or a sub NOT a hoagie! It's not New York City or Manhattan, it's 'THE' CITY. Two words...MOTHER FUCKER. I know that 55 mph really means 85. When someone cuts me off, they get the horn AND the finger."Basically the greatest state in the entire country...better yet, the world.  New Yorkers are also the best people around.  Sure, we can be arrogant and yes, from time to time we're prissy bitches.  But NOTHING is finer than a New York girl...or the taste of REAL pizza and bagels.  We're the only state that you can say "The City" and know you're referring to NYC.  We have the best shopping, the best Christmas Tree, the best Parades...oh right and the best baseball team that ever existed and I'm NOT talking about the Mets.  All in all, New York rapes your state by being better in EVERY way imaginable.  I <3 NY.To the general public:
A large city on the United State's east coast

To the people who live there:
The center of the universeYour current boss.someone being arrogant, rude, obnoxious, or just a total dickhead....Your [butt] hole. Were your [shit] comes out.A person in another car who cuts you off to get to the next lane, almost hits you while talking on the phone.An obnoxious, arrogant, self-centered male who women can't seem to get enough of.Anyone who doesn't do exactly what you think they ought to do, exactly when you think they ought to do it.The worst kind of person.  You cannot fully construct a meaning that fully encompasses what this vicious insult means.  If you're an asshole, you are disgusting, loathesome, vile, distasteful, wrathful, belligerent, agoraphobic, and more.  Assholes are human fecal matter.  They are the lowest of the low.  They transcend all forms of immorality.  It is the very worst of insults; to be called an asshole is to have your very soul ripped apart and shat on.  I say that the word "asshole" is the worst cussword of the english language, worst than fuck, shit, and cunt combined.A grave in which to place a Donkey.An alternate word for aviator-style sunglasses with very dark or mirrored lenses.

While assholes are worn by people from all walks of life, these are the primary wearers: [pigs], pretty much everyone in the movie [Top Gun] (chicks included), obese motorcyclists, [rent-a-cop]s, yacht owners, hipsters, construction workers, and aging retirees who like to fish and drink watery American piss-beer.

Assholes may also worn by non-assholes for the ironic effect.1. A person who you feel needs to have the fuck beaten out of him
2. This dipshit I know named AlbertAn exceedingly large penis belonging to an opinionated man.A natural leader of men. Women want him and men want to be him. He drives a tank with three wind shield wipers. He commands an army of troops and often takes them on field trips for r. and r. He receives many perks from the civilian population such as a third free entree from applebees when he purchases the 2 for $20 meal deal. He is currently training troops in Orlando Florida.A Military rank for an Officer usualy below general and above Lieutenant Colonel, Major, Captain, and Lieutenant.Kentucky Fried Chicken or KFC [fast food] joint; after its deceased [mascot], Col. Harlan SandersAn [idiot] who lives for [slow pitch] [softball]. Plays [catcher]. Thinks he's [Batman]. Likes to give shit, doesn't like to get shit. Has an excuse for anything that doesn't go his way, yet will give you reasons why you can't do the same thing. Picks fights and then resorts to "I'll sue your ass" if you call him on it. Basically a 5 year old [spoiled child].1.Military rank

2.A characters from the video game Mega Man X4.
  Has a sister called Iris. He is working with Repliforce
  and later dies during the rebellion.
  Some people believe Iris and Colonel were the same person    
and got split into 2 : THIS IS NONSENSE AND BS.A shitty baseball teamname of the un popped pieces of corn at the bottom of a pop corn bowl.a short stalky man that is balding with comb over, stutters and says um constantly, very strict and continues to create problems with the cadets.  talks for hours on end and bores the students to sleep, treats the kids like they have not a clue in the world about whats going on and how they could do anything in the world to change a thing...A stocky man of medium height, very solid build, tends to draw himself up to full height when excited, or early in the mornings. Very poor sense of balance, becomes ill and vomits easily, especially when being talked to. Very popular, especially among ladies, talks to anyone. Enjoys the occasional flap in the wind. Cousin to [Princess Sophie].Believing that the group one belongs to, be it of sex, creed, or color, is automatically superior to another's.One who believes that their gender, group, or kind is superior to others.1. A British [chav] - a white urban Brit who enjoys picking fights with strangers and acting tough. Chav is a shortened version of the term and is used much more often.

2. A [jingoist] - a person who is fiercely nationalistic and will side with their country no matter what - right or wrong - and call anyone who disagrees with them a traitor. Common in parts of the UK and in the Southern and Midwestern US.

3. A [male chauvinist] - a man who treats women as inferior or considers men better than women. A [sexist]. Common in fundamentalist [Christian] and [Islamic] cultures.A usually male jerk who feel he is superior because he has a penis. Although many of us know that it is just them compensating because they have no penis, they may also compensate with a car their parents bought them. Typically, they have no standards, will have sex with just about anyone, and they are also CHEATERS.someone who tends to stay up late into the nightSomeone who stays up late and sleeps in the day.A girl you sleep with that you don't want your friends to know about. Typically some easy girl you meet at a bar or party that is willing to sleep with you A.S.A.P.A meth user that stays on the pourch all night at a the meth house, watching everything, usually a paranoid tweaker.Suffix added to any noun to describe the biggest/baddest/meanest/nastiest of its type. Dervied from Godzilla, Japan's national hero, 60's movie star, and general all around badass.A person (or gaming nerd) who has a complex about his/her status and image when playing Computer Games.

He / She doesn't like losing and will come up with all sorts of excuses.

It's what defines the person's life as he/she doesn't really have one and therefore they will vigorously defend their status so they are not seen as a 'noob' online.adj.; when used as a suffix for a proper name or specific entity, becomes part of that noun.

Derived from [Godzilla], the gargantuan reptilian star of Japanese "B" horror [movie] genre. Introduced in 1954 as "Gojira", Godzilla is the embodiment of all that is massive, destructive, and extremely difficult to defeat. Ergo, "'zilla" in both the stand-alone adjective and suffix forms represents those same charecteristics. Linguistically, the "z-l" [combo] has stronger audiological [punch] than "j-r", thus giving "'zilla" more connotative [power] than "'jira".Derived from Godzilla, it could be another word for "monster", or just the meanest, baddest thing of any type of person or animalreal biganother term of monster, basically, it come from godzilla, but now, zilla it self trend to means any type of monster, like kingkong, godzilla,dinosaur,Jaws..etca suffix which can be used on pretty much any word.  

(1) a suffix personifying the root word

(2) just a suffix used to make a word more intense (read: retarded)The ultimate compliment known to man and the highest achievement the common man can achieve. Closely followed by a Nobel Prize.1. a type of vann
2. a sooners fan
3. a chokeran individual who displays many animilastic qualities; stems from the species velocirapter, which was known for its rather savage dispositionA girl who gets around the block mostly from drunk hook ups and one night stands and has a ton miles. Pretty much the last resort for a dude just lookin for a nut. Also known as a one hitter quitter.something that is radical, cool, or otherwise awesome. something that is snow is generally the shit, being top score, bitchin, etc. the word is derived from the fact that snow is generally off the hook in its beauty, power, and pimperyCoke, cocaine. Used primarily by huffing through the nostrils snow can also be freebased and inhaled.1.  Frozen [precipitation] that is white, powdered and falls to the ground in winter.

2.  [Static] on the TV.

3.  [Coke] or [cocaine].

4.  A white Canadian rapper who had a hit in 1992 with the reggae influenced [Informer].  

5.  White girls.A frozen white fluffy form of rain that will keep you out of school for a day. Usually seen in the winter season.stuff that falls from the sky at christmas and it tastes nicefinely powdered cocainea white precipitate that turns every driver within a 75 mile radius of Chicago completely retarded.1 - White, cold, soft, slightly frozen water that falls from the sky in winter. Also tastes nice. Beware of yellow snow.
2 - Cocaine or crack. A white powder powder narcotic. Also called blow, charlie, snowflake.1. mislead, especially by overwhelming with (mis)information
2. deceive
3. hoodwink
4. bamboozleIt is the process of adding lots of small hole-punched papers into a [nugget]ed back pack.1. To whine
2. To Bitch
3. Also see "protesting" -A debate strategy commonly used by Ridgeview and Bakersfield High schools
4. The only lesson jv members at the aforementioned schools learn about
5. Protesting Manuals are equivalent to evidence at these schools.A temporary gathering of people designed to speak out against a cause or political event.  Rarely works because the politicians who are being protested against usually send the [riot police] to "calm down" the protesters.A [mosh pit] for [people] who [care] about [important issues].The act of a diabetic urinating in their partners mouth. Basically a stronger, more pungent lemonade mouth.Made from Orange Pekoe Tea leaves this non-alcoholic beverage, served cold and moslty below the [Mason Dixon line] is a Southerners favorite treat on a hot day (or with pork [BBQ]).  Sugar is added at the time just after brewing "while the tea is still hot".  This allows the sugar to disolve more evenly and produces a fine treat.  Can be garnished with a Lemon.   (See also [Ice Tea])Liquid amazing.A sweet drink said to extend the average human's life by 10-15 years.A reference to males that are sexually interested in minors (both male and female). Said males cannot refuse sweet tea and it is often used to lure them into police traps.

It is believed that pedophiles are fueled on the stuff. McDonalds has recently attempted to capitalize on this fact.

See: [To Catch a Predator]The act of dipping ones testicles in sugar, and smearing them across your opponents face.Semen, jizz, baby gravy. Usually spilled by the half gallon, sprayed all around a room, sometimes on electronic equipment for maximum effect.A female person who believes themself to be  amazing, astonishing , aweinspiring , impressive , intimidating, magnificent, majestic, mind-blowing,The One and Only.

Can also mean crazy woman.southern drink....specially in the area of Tennesse...where the hot bitches are...it is known that by drinking this beverage it will give an avarage girl the power of being hot...also gives you an awesome souther accent...but the word can be used as "cool" or "sweet" on any ocation..The drink of choice for the low class. Extremely low quality tea with a pound of sugar per cup. Also known as, rot your teeth out tea, and we wonder why southerners have such nasty teeth.Generally the acronym used for barbecue, it has evolved into a piece of the internet vernacular. 

Used to poke fun by attaching it to common acronyms such as [wtf], [omg] and [hax].an acronym used for barbecue but sometimes used to point out the absurdity of using acronyms online.Often used to parody online acronyms, this originally stood for "better be quick," usually used in online games.Short for "bitches be queefing". Queefing is the discharge of air from the vaginal tract, known as vaginal flatulence.Originally started on irc channels and then used in instant messengers meaning "be back quick". More recently used as a leet speak variant meaning "barbecue" in conjunction with phrases and other acronyms mainly meant to tease the lesser experienced.Melbourne Australian slang for sexual encounterCommonly used abbreviation meaning "Bitch Be Quiet". Other meanings have also been assigned to the same letter combination, however, these are of course wrong, as this usage is clearly the best and only possibly meaning for BBQ. (Not...)Big Bad Queer

A person who is trying to act all cool and badass ended up looking and sounding all gay,stupid,and hated by others.1. A shortened version of the word "barbecue"

2. An Internet slang term for things such as Be Back, Queers, Better be Quick, and Bitch Be Quiet, among other terms.bitch be quiet. linked with wtf bbqa delicious frozen treat that comes from cows. Ice cream comes in many different flavours and can often be found at your local grociery store.A relitively new shoe on the market. Created by Pharell Williams from the Neptunes (N.E.R.D) and Nigo, the creator of the Bathing Apes clothing and shoe line. They are marketed by Reebok. Only 3000 are currently in the market, ranging from around $300-$500 dollars.crack. hell even Master P calls it ice cream, and no one is more right them him.• The flavored cream of ice
• A common cure for broken hearted females
• A cold and delicious treat, perfect on hot summer daysflavored frozen cream that comes in different flavors.Release 4.0 of Google's [Android].

Although [Gingerbread] and [Honeycomb] are not yet available, Google is said to be already working on Android 4.0.

No idea what it will look like, but it will be greater than great!!

[Froyo] and [Gingerbread] are said to perform great with a 1 Ghz processor, [Honeycomb] and Ice Cream for sure will have a big impact on hardware.

Apple and Microsoft: be afraid, very afraid.code word for sexual pleasures when you are not behind closed doors and need to talk about the type of ice cream you had whether it be chocolate vanilla or better yet mocha.crack dope powder candyThe plural of [Ice Cream]The stuff that makes my head hurt when i eat too much of it... stupid fuckerA person that simply cannot be happy for another person's success.  So rather than be happy they make a point of exposing a flaw in that person.

Hating, the result of being a hater, is not exactly jealousy.  The hater doesnt really want to be the person he or she hates, rather the hater wants to knock somelse down a notch.Overused word that people like to use just because someone else expresses a dislike for a certain individual.most of the people in this siteA term used by others, usually being suburban "gangsters", whose lives are absolutely and undeniably defined by what others think.  These people "rumble" often and think  of themselves as original and/or indestructable.  People that use the term "haters" are the lowest stage of the evolutionary scale.  They bleed the fastest and have thought processes similar to that of a mentally underdeveloped cat.to be a hater is to descriminate or hate something, someone, or a certain type of something. 

If the world didn't have haters then it would be a better place. a much better place.

I mean not that there aren't assholes in the world. to hate somethings is good. i hate poverty, war, and bad shit like that. just try to have some morals, people.A person that develops a strong dislike for another, solely basing their own opinion on personal judgment rather than objective merit. The formation of a hater's contempt commonly arises from jealously and/or resentment. Individuals that make fun of, or "hate," others for justified reasons cannot be legitimately classified as "haters;" although many faggots attempt to rationalize their own situations by doing so. Additionally, the word "hater" is frequently overused, mainly by members of the rap and hip-hop communities.A person who feels anger and/or jealousy for someone who has succeeded in something they have worked hard for.
  A being who speaks badly,and/or takes negative actions in attempt to create problems for a successful person.Anyone with a opinion.The most non-insulting "insult" in existence. It's a waste of breath to say it and a waste of energy to type it. This term is often used by pre-teen girls whenever someone insults their favorite teeny bopper singers. If you ever call somene a hater, find the nearest knife and use it pierce your lungs for polluting our air with that fucking stupid word.People that make up reasons to hate certain people just because they aren't as wealthy or successfull as them. People are often hating:

1. [Bill Gates]
2. [Blink 182]
3. [George W. Bush]
4. [Halle Barry]
5. [Ben Affleck]P-Person
I-Into
M-Marketing
P-ProstitutesA man who beats up women and owns over a thousand sex slaves.one who brokers the sexual favors of women for profits1. Protection, Instruction, & Management of Prostitutes
2. Protectional Instructor Managing Professional
3. Prostitute's Instructional Management Professional
4. Professional In Management of Prostitutes 
5. Prostitute's Infamous Management Professional
6. Professionally Instructing Many Prostitutes
7. Professional Illegally Managing Prostitutes

Optional, but not recommended:
*Professional- replaced by Pro, Player, or Playa
*Into        - replaced by Intwined or Into
*Managing    - replaced by Marketing

Slang: noun or verb
1. Player(s/z)/Playa(s/z) Interested in(to) Making Progress/Prostitutes
2. (Put/Place It) or (Paper) in My/Men's Pants/Pocket(s)/Places
3. Party In My/Men's Pants/Panties
4. Pissin(g)/Peein(g) In(to) My Pants/Place/Partner/Potty 
5. Pissin(g)/Peein(g) In(to) Mouths of People/Prostitutes/Potty
6. People/Prostituts In Many/Money-filled Places/People
7. Perfect Independent Marvelous Playa(s/z) or Player(s/z)
8. Pooping In(to) My Place/Pants/Partner/Potty
9. Pennys In My Pocket/Place/Palace/Prostitutes
10. Put/Place It in My Pussy/Prostitute
11. Pussy Is My/Mens Prerogative/Purpose/PlaymateThe people wearing the purple suits on street corners who use dirt poor women to get money.  And later blowing it all on spinner's and gold lining for their three wheeled cycles.To make better, to fix up,some dumass middle school teenager who is as rich as hell and wear clothes like he's from the ghetto.Thinks he has he has hoes but the only one who he would lose his virginity to is his mom. Thinks rock is "for losers". Listens to too much 50 cent and tells everyone he used to live in "the projects". friends consist of a bunch of airheads who say LOL!! the whole time and his own dim-witted speciesPride Intelligence Money Power1. someone who profits off the money prostitutes make from selling their bodies
2. to seek out hookers to make a profit off of them selling their bodies.
3. to hit on several different girls
4. a guy who has alot of girlfriends or has been with alot women.
5. something that is really cool.v. Live off the earnings of a prostitutea machine for downloading pornWhat you are on nowThe most useful and most frustrating thing any human being will ever work with.If you're looking up this word, kill yourself.a very, very expensive punching bagA tool that is supposed to save time but intead wastes time.The most boring and frustrating thing in the world-however, I keep coming back.the thing people use to:
1. Go on MySpace or any other blog-related sites
2. download porn
3. illegally download music
4. play games
5. and use to look up the word "computer" on Urbandictionary.comThe answer to every single question.A $1000 facebook machineOne whose IQ exceeds his weight.An individual persecuted for his superior skills or intellect, most often by people who fear and envy him.An 'individual', i.e. a person who does not conform to society's beliefs that all people should follow trends and do what their peers do. Often highly intelligent but socially rejected because of their obesssion with a given subject, usually computers. Unfortunately, nerds seem to have problems breeding, to the detriment of mankind as a whole.Never
Ending
Radical
Dude.A stereotypical label used to describe a person that is socially inadequate.  A four letter word, but a six figure income.A person who gains pleasure from amassing large quantities of knowledge about subjects often too detailed or complicated for most other people to be bothered with.

Often mistaken for Geeks, who aspire to become nerds, yet lack the intelligence, and end up giving nerds a bad name due to their poor social skills.

Non-nerds are often scared of nerds, due to their detailed knowledge, and therefore seemingly high levels of intelligence - and subsequently denegrate them as much as possible as often as possible.

Nerds exist covertly within the fabric of society, often choosing to 'nerd it up' in private or in the company of fellow nerds.  It is for this reason they are feared the most - unlike geeks, who are easily identified, nerds can only be found out when casual conversation reaches a subject that they like nerding.the group of people who will most likely make a life changing invention that will radically change the world. the computer was invented by a nerd. the macintosh/apple and windows were invetned by nerds. jocks and normal people have no claim to civilization except for being the hard labor. nerds actually do the thinking. so jocks, fuck you, and go eat your steroidsThe person you will one day call "Boss"Guys with IQ higher than your weight. You made fun of them when you were at school but you would be lucky if you get employed as janitors in their businesses.A delicious candy made by Wonka.  They are pretty much crystalized sugar in a color coating that people love to give out on halloween.An individual who deals with the complex systems of todays military/civilian aircraft. Their entire mission is to make bricks "fly", and fix leaking electrons from parts, and they do it damn well. Usually pissed off individuals who are the be all end all of the sortie cock, they take and stride. Because one day, their enlistment will come to an end.Stands for AVIation electrONICSNot the best state in the country, but very far from the worst.  Home to three million people, some really sweet cities, three great univerties, a whole bunch of stellar small private colleges and a ton of true natural beauty in its lush northeast bluff country and statewide river valleys, lakes, and yes, rolling fields.  Iowa is a national leader in education (students in many other states including Texas take the Iowa Test of Basic Skills, and everyone's heard of the ACT, based in Iowa City) and is leading the way in biofuels to reduce the nation's dependence on oil.  To dispel the ignorance displayed elsewhere on this post, here's a state breakdown of cities and topography.  If seventy synonyms for boobs is alright to post, so is this.

Central Iowa:  [Des Moines], located at the intersection of I-80 and I-35, is the largest city with a metro of a half million and is the state capital, second only to London for the title of insurance capital of the world.  [Ames] (80,000 metro) is about a half hour north of Des Moines and is home to [Iowa State University], a land grant school of 30,000 respected around the world for its engineering and agricultural programs.  Central Iowa is, outside of river vallies, very flat, and outside of the Des Moines area and Ames is very sparsely populated.

Eastern Iowa:  The most densely populated area of the state.  Ethnically diverse [Iowa City] (115,000 metro) was Iowa's first state capital, was the first city in the world to elect a female mayor, has been named the most cultured city per capita in the nation, is always in the top five cities in the country for education, and is home to the [University of Iowa], 30,000, nationally renowned for its Carver College of Medicine and Iowa Hawkeye athletics.  The music departments of Iowa City's two large public high schools have won a total of five Grammy awards.  [Cedar Rapids], (200,000 metro) just twenty minutes north of Iowa City in the beautiful Cedar River valley, is the second largest single city, is the economic hub of eastern Iowa, has two private colleges, and is best known for being the place you get any of your Quaker Oats brand ceral from.  [Waterloo/Cedar Falls], two conjoined cities (130,000 metro) is where the [Unviersity of Northern Iowa], 18,000, is located.  The [Quad Cities], (375,000 metro) two in Iowa and two in Illinois, straddle the Mississippi and form the largest metro between Des Moines and Chicago.  The largest of the four cities is [Davenport], IA, home to the Bix 7 foot race whose hilly course and large prize attract runners from every part of the globe.  [Dubuque], (90,000 metro) on the Mississippi where Iowa meets Illinois and Wisconsin, is Iowa's oldest city. It is home to a ton of beautiful architecture, four private colleges, a far-reaching ELCA Lutheran seminary, and the Smithsonion affiliated National Mississippi River Musem and Aquarium.  Eastern Iowa's topography is for the most part very rolling farmland, with the exception of the hillier Iowa river valley, Cedar river valley, and the bluffs and hills skirting the whole eastern border along the Mississippi.  The northeast corner of the state is all bluffland, home to small town Decorah and reputed Luther College.

Western Iowa:  The vast majority of Iowa west of I-35 is flat farmland with the exception of the very westernmost strip.  [Sioux City] on the Missouri river (the western border) is a good sized city with nice amenities and lots of historyt.  [Council Bluffs] is the largest suburb of Omaha, just across the river in Nebraska.  The Iowa Great Lakes region contains many large lakes, most notably lake Okoboji, one of only three blue water lakes in the world.  The Loess Hills state park runs along the whole westernmost strip of the state, and offers lots of hilly hiking and some of the state's largest forests.

Iowa's motto should be "Iowa: Not as bad as you picture it."Pretty much the shit.  Make sure you're clear on the fact that the word "the" is in there, or else you'll get the meaning all wrong.  Iowa is home to the three million nicest people in the United States, probably in the world.  A leader in education, and home to some of the most beautiful scenery into the world.  It's a traquil beauty, and if you're into that, you'll love Iowa.  And if you're not into that, you can go take California or wherever you're from and fuck it.a farming state that isnt a bunch of dumb farmers thats [montana]A state that quietly grows corn and takes care of its own affairs. Residents think Des Moines compares to New York.People who dont live in Iowa refer to Iowa is full of corn and farmers. Its full of things pretty much from other states. 3 million awesome people live there. And its probably 3 million people you would never forget because they are so nice. Iowa is also one of the most beautiful places to live and only cool people can live in Iowa. Because Iowa is THE SHITT. Also home to the best college football team the IOWA HAWKEYES!The greatest state in the Union with education, and the ability to function with agriculture and good morals,When western civilization comes crashing down around you other 49 inferior states (Illinois is ok).BEST State in the entire united states of america!

Most, cocky dumbasses hate on iowa, and say that all there is is corn.. Thats completley wrong! EVERY state has agriculture and just about every state grows corn and has corn fields.
So what if iowa has corn, that dosnt mean thats the only thing to do!

Iowa is the best! Our hot chicks and all of our sports teams..

Iowa will fuck up anyone who tries to talk shit on us! were no pussys, we will fight any mother fucker who tries to hate on us!

Iowa has the best state fair too! The IOWA State Fair is possibly the best state fair in all of the US.

We have everything, Demo Derbys, Mudding, So much shit, youd just have to come here and check it out!State in the midwest, mostly farmland, but has a fantastic balance of rural, suberban, and highly populated areas. It is named after the Soux indian name meaning land between 2 rivers(missouri, Mississippi). Produces more corn and pork than any other state, and is not home to a bunch of hicks. in fact Iowa has the highest % of leteracy in the United states. statisticly its largest city, Des Moines, is in a perfect location for trade because it lies on interstate 35 and interstate 80, 2 of the buisiest highways in the US. however, because of Chicago's close proximity there isnt quite as many large factorys as there should be. Iowa is a beautiful state with hilly reigons in the east and hundreds of rivers and streams. The people are known for being friendly, usually hard working, and down to earth.

***to readers in the Northeast and california specificly***
No, just because someone lives in Iowa does not mean that they live on a farm. enough said. and another thing, stop mistaking Iowa for Idaho and Ohio. yes, they do sound the same but seriously, get it right its not that hardWhat the hell is this
I - Idiots

O - Out

W - Wondering

A - Around
shit?
We're the smartest state in the U.S!
For Christ's sake, stop your bitching about our "terrible driving" and go to New York, give me a review about their shitty driving.

God damn, Iowa has some of the nicest people, and there isn't corn EVERY WHERE.
To be honest, there isn't even as much corn as you think there would be, there are more cities than corn.

Plus, if you hate Iowa then promise me you'll never eat corn and or barilla noodles again.
So, all you more suberban suburban states can suck it because Iowa is the shit!A state full of beauty and 3 million of the nicest people in the universe. Also a pioneer in education, with the Iowa Test of Basic Skills and ACT being based in Iowa City. Is home to a ton of natural beauty: Ledgers State Park near Boone, the Des Moines, Missouri, and Mississippi Rivers, as well as numerous forests and woods. Tends to be judged by people who have never visited it.Place of extreme weather.A state of the south-central United States. It was admitted as the 28th state in 1845. Explored by the Spanish in the 16th and 17th centuries, the region became a province of Mexico in the early 19th century. Texans won their independence in 1836 after a gallant but losing stand at the Alamo in February and a defeat of Santa Anna's forces at the Battle of San Jacinto (April 21). Denied admission as a state by antislavery forces in the U.S. Congress, the leaders of Texas formed an independent republic that lasted until 1845. Austin is the capital and Houston the largest city. Population: 17,059,805. 

The Lonestar State, The State that still believes that criminals should be punished, Home of the Wataburger, home of Southern Hospitality, HTown, And Everythang thats bigger and better.

AND NO!! We Dont all walk around with cowboy hats and boots, and we're all not rednecks....for that...see oklahoma.The best Mexican food. Dr. Pepper on tap. Beautiful ladies. Awesomeness everywhere you turn. The best fucking place on earth. Move there now!the only state in the union that can fly its flag at the same height as the american flag.....
and the only reason texas doesnt fall into the gulf of mexico... is because oklahoma sucksHome to Dr. Pepper, several modern and well respected singers, activists, and the like, Sam Houston, and other great men and women before him, numerous plantlife and animals, and a few horrid idiots who give the rest of us a bad name-ie: George Bush.The biggest and baddest state of them all(15 states can be put into Texas and we'd still have 1000 miles left) where everything is bigger and much better than places such as California. Home of a Ranch bigger than Rhode Island,the home of trunk poppin, Dr.Pepper,home of the first word spoken from the moon which was Houston,home of swangin on 84's and vogues, chopped and screwed music, SA Town, D Town, and H Town which are all 3 in the top 10 most populated cities in the U.S.
The Lone Star State was the only state that was its own country, and the only state worthy of even making a definition of. 


If you aint a Texan, you wish you were.The greatest state everOkay.
I was born and raised in Houston.
So lets tell the truth.
-The weather in Texas changes very rapidly, and we get a bit of everything, except snow. That doesn't come around very often.
-We don't get married to our sisters or even distant cousins. A shock. I know. If you want to see some of that go to Oklahoma.
-Not everyone here talks with a distinct country accent.
You have to go to the smaller towns for that. Lufkin, Etoile, Waco, etc. It all depends on what area of Texas you were born in. People move here from New York and California all the time, and we don't sound any diffrent.
Our slang is the only true thing that seperates us.
-Yes, we have racism here. Just like any other state, but it's not as bad as people make it sound. The Africans, Mexicans, and Orientals, etc. out number us by more the 50%.
-Taking hits to our pride by informing us we cuss to much (yes, 'cuss') is low. We cuss just as much as anyone in California, or Florida would.
-No one walks around here in in full cowboy uniform. So if you think we do, maybe you should visit before opening your mouth.A state in the southern USA. Its in the south. There are billboards about Jesus. One can buy [waffles] there.The best damn state in the country!  That's all you need to know.The greatest and most popular sport in history with more than 5 times the TV audience of the next most popular (cricket - every radio and TV in the sub-continent is permanently tuned to Pakistan/India cricket matches - that's a big audience).

Only Americans call it 'soccer' owing to their vast ignorance of what goes on outside their national boundaries and the misnomer which has them thinking than a corruption of rugby, with all the danger and most of the skill removed can also be called 'football'. 

'The Beautiful Game' can be played anywhere, on almost any surface, by any number of players, for almost any length of time. And is. There is no country on earth that doesn't play. It has inspired more passion, more courage and more excitement than any other sport in history and dwarfs everything else.When a girl is playing footsie with you, and her foot travels up to your crotch.A name given to two different sports in which America and the rest of the world use to waste their lives away constantly arguing over which is better. Honestly, I'm an American. And I love the game of American football. But notice how I haven't said that I hate football (aka soccer). In fact, I love that sport, too. I just totally suck at it. Haha. C'mon, be real ya'll. Both games are cool. Even rugby too. It's cool. I have no idea how to play it, but I enjoy trying. It's all preference. For all ya'll that say football is whack cause we wear padding, go ahead and say whatever the fuck you want to say. That padding protects us so we can stay a little safer to enjoy the game a little longer. I don't care if I don't use it, I've tackled mofos twice my size without any padding on. The point I'm trying to make; All three games are great. They all require stratedgy, strength, speed, and endurance. So just shut the fuck up, grab the ball that suits you, and play your damn game already. You got that? Kay, just helping out. I'm just a 15yr old from a small town. Yeah, yeah... What do I know? Honestly? I know it's fucking pointless for ya'll to fight over sports. So just save your shit for someone who's still too much of a punk to simply enjoy a game of American football, football, or rugby. Peace people! Damn. Haha.Football - Only the best damn sport ever. Played with a round ball and feet. However, Americans tend to mistake it for American Football (which should truthfully be called tackleball for all that matters).Also Known As the BEAUTIFUL GAME. A real sport played with your FEET and an actual round BALL, hence the name FOOTBALL. This term should never be used to refer to our silly american game of putting on 30 pounds of armor and carrying a cone shaped piece of rubber while trying not to be touched by other guys. You'll note the lack of definitions calling this silly game football. And there is a reason for that. Some silly americans give us a bad name by not noticing what is going on in the rest of the world and don't realize that there was already a real sport called football when we made up our game, but everyone else in the world knows whats up.
P.S. Please, if you are American please stop saying the S word (s****r)and saying that our american game is better than real football. If you are not american just know that not all of us are confused faggots.A lovely game that alot of people play.
Also the most importmant sport in the world.
Very famous, but also fun for people who like football.
If you dont play football yet, i would say:
Give it a try!

Ofcourse if you start at older age, you wont get as good as Ronaldo, Messi, ...
But doesnt matter, its just for fun! ( Mostly )A variety of games that which Europeans and Americans tend to argue over pointlessly till the end of time as to which version is "right" never minding the fact that due to Cultural Mutation different words can mean different things in other places
Typically Americans profess love for the version that involves padding and an ovoid ball in which the point of the game is to move the ball ten yards down the field at a time through either rushing or passing before passing into the plain of the "End Zone" placed at either ends of a 100 Yard Field to score points
Europeans tend to extol the virtues of a much simpler sport that only requires a pair of goals placed at either end of a field and is played with a checkered Spherical BallOK, here goes... slowly:
The word describes a very populare game, which is played all over the world.
The word consists of two parts, which quite accurately descibes the game:
1) Foot
2) Ball

Part 1) Foot. This means that the foot is the main body part involved when playing this game.
Part 2) Ball. This means that the game is played with a spheric (globe-shaped) object.

This definition seems to be understood all over the world, except in the US, where they have misunderstood both parts of the word. Instead of using their feet, they mainly use their hands. And, instead of using a ball, they use an egg-shaped object.The round form of the drug Zanax that also comes in another form called [sticks] this form is in the shape of a football.A place on urbandictionary.com where obnoxious [eurofags] bitch about how Americans call football soccer and vice versa.A tongue of which the user speaks of something the complete opposite of what the user means. It often has the best comedic value.the bastard stepchild of ironyYour body's natural defense against stupid.A word that gives you the possibility to play with your imagination when asked stupid questions.Something that nobody on the internet can ever recognize.God's gift to man.
Incredibly humourous if used correctly.Noun.  A very British form of humour which derives laughs from saying something while really meaning something else.  Often (though not always, contrary to popular belief) used in scathing remarks.

The word 'Sarcasm' is derived from a Greek word meaning 'tearing flesh', which is why sarcastic vegetarians are so ironic.

See also [irony].The ability to insult idiots without them realizing it.A verbal reflex against stupidity. In my opinion one of the best types of humour.When one says something, but usually means the opposite.
Used sometimes in order to belittle someone and make them seem retarded... or equally to amuse and impress them with your mind. Indeed.Humorous name for oral sex.To drink an entire beverage in one goplace where brain livesOral sex, head.The nickname for members of the Phi Kappa Sigma fraternity.Another word for a female sucking cock. " Oh baby, give me some skull!!" It's the same thing as saying give me some head, or give me some brain. Cock-sucking words are great!!what the hardcore kids give instead of head.

see [skull fuck].to give or recieve oral sexTo bash another in the head,Created in an attempt to imagine what in the world someone could have going on in their head when they say or do something absolutely ridiculous/ illogical/ or straight up retarded. This person must be lacking a brain in their head i.e having nothing more than a flesh covered skull resting on their neck. Skull.A coat that makes you invisibleOne who lacks the skill to contribute balanced team work in an MMO. Also known as train mobber, skill-less peon and fearless noob.Cloak is another way of leaving without anyone else knowing.to smoke marijuana.To have sex, or to [fuck]. In the context of the vagina's ability to envelope, engulf or cover the penis like a piece of clothing. Perhaps a term originating from Canada.an extremely beautiful women/girl who everyone loves and will never forget. she has many friends and people feel they can always go to her for help, no matter what the situation is. cloaks is a great listener and speaker, she is also very creative and imaginative. She tends to be very artistic and athletic. Cloaks enjoys acting, dancing and singing, she is also very good at them. Cloaks is also a great lover in the bedroom, Every man thinks she is irresistible and falls in lover with her at first sight.a super gay homofag queer fairy buttpiratea friend or aqauntancethe result unprotected [sex] of a male and a female of the same species; also can be known as [offspring] and [brats]things that interupt you while your banging you wife.Anyone below the age of 18 (or 21, in some circles.) Don't listen to the idiotic fools who hate on little kids because they think it's "hip and cool".The stuff that gets shot all over the place during sex.the worst STD you can get.1.Something REALLY old people desire to be when their backs start breaking and their hearing and eyesight get poor.Krazy Individuals Destroying Societywhat teenagers claim they are notA baby goatThe word people use when you've done something that isn't technically "bad" or "wrong" but they still don't like it anyway and expect you to conform to their personal tastes.What your mom says when she catches you masturbating.The current euphemism for "wrong" or "bad." It is supposed to sound more objective than "wrong" and "bad," but it is not.putting it simply, not [appropriate]the [definition] of [urban dictionary]not suitable or proper in the circumstances. Action could be used in a talking, visual, or sexual manner.In high school settings, short skirts, low cut tops, see through clothing and skin tight jeans.  The student handbook says not to wear this, but many girls still wear it anyway to look skanky.The act of saying something irrelevant to the topic or becoming mad feisty with another person without an apparent reason. Usually accompanied with the action of standing up and pointing your hand down to the person it pertains to.The word that used to actually mean something, but doesn't mean anything anymore.To [curse] or '[cuss]'. Swears are considered inappropriate to use in public places, but are less offensive than other profanities. These '[bad word]s' are often referenced by pre-adolescents by their first letter (the 'f' word, the 's' word, even 'h-e-double-hockey-sticks').Any word that a person says when they can't think of anything intelligent to sayTo verbally abuse, or to rape an object with hatred wordsWords that people get offended by for some unexplained reason.when something is weird or funny and you sont have anything to say, you just point and say swear! swear this, omg swear that.

or it can be used like the world "seriously"Swear is used often for cursing someone, often with any consequences.

Perfect swearing language: Russian language is also the 5th officially used language over the world, aside English or Spanish. Russian language has more swear words in them, than any other language.

According to the infamous Taboo vocabulary, you can literally talk and swear in Russian and make lines, that make sense.Word that makes your sentence mean something, and actually prove a point.cannot really be defined but in terms to understand it can be understood as being dumb, stupid, retarded, saying something that is absurd.(verb) when someone thinks they're SO much better than others; someone who is conceited and vain, and definately wants others to notice.[fuck]
[ass]
[damn]
[hell]
[shit]
[bastard]
[bitch]
[crap]
All [racist] words.When someone else gets hurt.1. Something that causes you to laugh
2. A person who isn't quite rightA way of describing the girl you really like, either to said girl or your friends, without hinting too much. Either used by shy men who have a hard time admitting they really like someone or describing the girl you like to your friend that proclaims himself the matchmaker or love finder (yes, this is a stereotyped friend that every bro has, you may even be this person - if so, you have learned the secret code of bro hinting (ha, and you only thought girls spoke in hint))When someone else gets hurt.The only part of a newspaper worth looking at.  Located beside or near the crossword puzzles and cryptoquote.  Famous funnies include Garfield, Family Circus, Andy Capp, and Peanuts.Makes you laugh, oddA plural exclamation of extreme humourosity.  

OR

When followed by a question mark, a needy request to find out whether a joke has been accepted or not.The fact that you're wasting time looking up "funny".Definitions on urbandictionary tagged with 'funny', usually aren't.If you have to look up funny your probably a fag.Big
Gigantic
HugeA compliment- referring to either muscles or more commonly, the mail genitalia. Also associated with terms such as "biggie" or "bigs". Add "particularly", "fairly", or "rather" for added enjoyment.Something of excessive size.  Normally associated with [heavy] as well.the state of the penis when arousedone thousand United States dollarsa thousand dollars - they say it all the time in the Sopranosaka, huge, masssiv, ownageIn sarcasm, to refer to something as unworthwhile, lacking merit or otherwise derogatory.

Can be used with prefixes "fairly" and "particulary" for added effect.

See also: [small]Really good, excellent. Used by DJs and dance music fans to describe a track.When you are 'avin' it in a collosal fashion. One size fits all. It is possible to say "how are you avin' it?" as this means the same thing due to the fact that there is only one size to 'ave' itA good fun alternative to life.crack, in CD-ROM form.The most highly addictive game ever played. It will consume your soul and poison your water supply.A highly entertaining mmorpg that is played by a wide variety of people. some get addicted to it like its crack cocaine, and some only play it a few times a month. The level of addiction all depends on the person playing it.The world's most effective form of birth control.A computer game whose participants apparently don't know how to correctly make words plural.

Hint for WoW players: it doesn't involve an apostrophe.Taken mistakenly as a peer to EverQuest or EverQuest II, it is an entertaining game in which a player learns how to cooperate as a team, and harnesses competition, unlike EverQuest II. The irony behind half of the definitions under this category is this: If you'd read the back of the box, you would realize that it states "even if you only have a couple of minutes, World of Warcraft's superior quest system offers quick gameplay." The sad truth is that people don't want to accept the fact that many of the players on this game have lives, jobs, spouses, ect. They see that it is an MMORPG, and automatically assume that it's a parallel to EQ and EQ2.A game were nobody but the company taking your money wins. Often replaces one's social life.A game that manages by some divine power to completely waste your life and lets you have fun while doing so.World of Warcraft- WoW is kind of like smoking. You don't see what all the fuss is about in the beginning, until one of your friends gives you a free taste. Still, you can't see how addicting it is until you have tried it a few times. Then you start buying it, and using it by the bundle, and you can't seem to stop. You'll do anything just to get a few good hours in with your favorite pasttime. You slowly start to lose touch with former friends and family, and meet lots of strange new people with a similar addiction. Prolonged use can lead to death. It's very difficult to get out of your system, you must rely on the strangth of others, for your willpower has ben sapped.
General Surgeons Warning- Not intended for oral or anal use. WoW shouldn't be used if you suffer from seizures or are an expectant mother. Side effects include obsession, nausea, vomiting, and pink eye. Ask you doctor before using.Somebody who finds great pleasure in the art of Computer Programming.

Synonymous with: Hacker, ProgrammerThe low end of the scale as far as [software engineers] go.Slang word, used by idiots, for the term 'programmer'. Often used by communities for Private Servers. There are related words such as 'Code' or 'Coding'.a bitchy old, pregnant man with a beer belly. not just old but he ancient, he was in the same class as jesus when they were kids.short for code infraction, used at [Delbarton], get three and you're strongly encouraged to leave the school.Fake Fag Slang for ProgrammerJail guard, cop, security guard, etc.
Someone with power over you in a controlled surroundingswhen you lose your virginity or just has sex and you can't say it out loud you say you wore a "blue shirt"an extremely hot guy with a nice bodyA huge spokkerjones that will never know the embrace of a womanThe opposite of a Red Shirt. A character in a fictional series that will simply not die, regardless of fans hating them or the amount of injuries they sustain. Some true Blue Shirts even die and are resurrected through some means, just to spite the viewers.The opposite of a Red Shirt. A character in a fictional series that will simply not die, regardless of fans hating them or the amount of injuries they sustain. Some true Blue Shirts even die and are resurrected through some means, just to spite the viewers.The opposite of a Red Shirt. A character in a fictional series that will simply not die, regardless of fans hating them or the amount of injuries they sustain. Some true Blue Shirts even die and are resurrected through some means, just to spite the viewers.Someone under the 25th percentile for stature for their age, sex, and country.
(5'7" and under for men and 5'2" and under for women in the US)what i am.1.) noun, A cigarrette, having been previously smoked, but not completely, suggesting the later use and finish of said cigarette.The small coffee size at Starbuck's; the only size on the menu there that makes any sense (et al [Tall], [Grande], [Vente]).Comfy and easy to wear.Military and prison adjective for describing someone nearing the end of their tour of duty, enlistment or incarceration.  A [short-timer] is someone who has less then 90 days to serve.  A Korean War veteran told me these terms were in wide use in the late 1940s; they have been in continuous wide use in the military since then.outta luckto be not tall. under 5" tallsnoun; used by a third party person to express when somebody has insulted or humiliated another personShort was used long before there were compact cars.  It goes back to at least the Forties on the Southside of Chicago.  It means ANY car.  It was from the vernacular of hotrodders and black gangsters. It probably derives from "hot short", which evolved to "hotwire" ... a car.1. The Good Part - The woman you marry and live with for the rest of your life.

2. The Bad Part - The woman you marry and live with for the rest of your life.extreme hardcore version of a girlfriendThe beautiful, inteligent, classy and fulfilling companion of a man that is wise enough to notice such qualities. Usually despised and hated on by the [baby momma].A prostitute with a life-long contract to a single client.A woman that a man is married to.The person that is there for you whenever you need them, the person that makes you want to be better, the person that you love and cherish forever.

(Hint: getting married to a woman you don't love isn't a good idea, don't do it.)w.i.f.e.
wash, iron, fuck, ect.The reason I drink so much.The name of someone that is on a vendetta to make you regret ever choosing her as a partner.term used in reference to the woman in which a man is the most emotionally involved with & who he feels the most obligation toward. she typically has characteristics which would make her a desirable long-term partner.The cause of, and solution to all life's problems.Any of a class of chemical compounds having the general formula ROH, where R represents an alkyl group and -OH a hydroxyl group. Most commonly refers to ethanol, which you can drink to forget how much your life sucks, and methanol, which you can drink when you remember.Liquid Panty RemoverA substance found in beer (except American beer) and several other beverages that makes you excessively happy, sad, belligerent or horny.  It allows white men to dance and ugly men to get laid (when given to their victim).Alcohol. What most of your university/college life will revolve around.The buffer between reality and a good night. Has been known to make people seem more attractive and make obviously stupid idea's seem like good sense.The antidote to reality.The answer to the question "What made you move to North Dakota?"1) The active ingredient in alcohol is ethyl alcohol, which is produced by yeast. Working much like [ether], alcohol puts the brain to sleep. Alcohol functions as a depressant to the central nervous system and slows down body functions. In large amounts, alcohol causes sedation, intoxication, unconsciousness, and possible death. Aside from significant negative physical consequences, chronic use of alcohol can lead to physical and psychological addiction. 

2) Colorless, volatile liquid obtained by distillation and fermentation of carbohydrates (grain, molasses, potatoes [irish]). Alcohol is antiseptic and cooling but is also very drying to the hair and skin; care should thus be taken not to use too much. 

3) This constituent of wine is a natural by-product of fermentation. It is one of the main pillars of perceived flavor, the others being "Acid", "residual Sugar" (and/or "Glycerin") and "Tannin". The presence of these components define a wine that has "good balance". For tablewines the wine label must, by law, state the alcohol content of the wine within the bottle, usually expressed as a percentage of the volume. Table wines do not usually exceed 14% alcohol content - (11% to 12.5% is generally considered the optimum amount) - although a few, such as Zinfandel, can go up to a 17% level. Sweet dessert wines fall in the same range. Fortified wines - (eg: Sherry, Port etc) - range from 17% to 21% alcohol content. 

4) Ethanol or ethyl alcohol (C2H5OH), the liquid produced from sugar by fermentation that can make you drunk 

5) A chemical compound formed by the action of yeast on the sugar content of grapes during fermentation. Most wines have between 7 and 25 percent alcohol, which gives wine is vinosity. If wine has too much alcohol for its body weight, it is unbalanced, and will taste uncharacteristically heavy or hot. The quality will be noticeable in aroma and aftertaste. 

6) A general class of hydrocarbons that contain a hydroxyl group (OH). The term "alcohol" is often used interchangeably with the term "ethanol," even though there are many types of alcohol. (See Butanol, Ethanol, Methanol.)liquid stamina in a bottleA holiday that no Black people I know celebrate.
Well , one year my Uncle tried to , but we all laughed at him.A holiday developed by a Dr. Maulana "Ron" Karenga, a black militant, Marxist, and convicted felon.
Just five years after this, he was convicted of torturing two black women to death. 

Observed from December 26 to January 1, Kwanzaa is based on a mixture of East African harvest rituals, called "first fruits" by Karenga and 1960's radicalism. This is in spite of the fact most slaves came from West Africa.

Viewed as an "alternative" to Christmas, it, nonetheless, is based on race, and not in faith.1)A made up piece of shit holiday steeped in all the deepest traditions of Sweetest Day  or Secretary's Day. 

2)A holiday for African Americans that no African American observes or understands.It's the right-on power handshake of the 1990s.  Yet another politically correct tactic to get whites to pay attention to non-whites, primarily blacks.  It's a fabricated holiday based on race, invented by a convicted felon, which is too third world for most black Americans, too jewish for black muslims, and too stupid for everyone else.  Now that's a fine example for the ghetto children of the world!Kwanzaa is a Counterfeit made up, holiday started by a black convicted kidnaper, rapist, Karenga, whose criminal record includes having been convicted and jailed on charges of assault and false imprisonment for the torture of two black women.

There is no nothing ethnically African about it, it is all fake andObviously a manufactured holiday created by African Americans in the late 1980s/early 1990s, when the fad of that time was to be "African", which is why Eddie Murphy's "Coming to America" was a blockbuster hit in 1988, when in reality it was a [racist] shit movie that made fun of people from Africa.A fake and gay holiday made up by some random black guy in the 60's.A popular file sharing program for African-Americans.An African-American holiday that celebrates the deeds of a brave little boy who saved his village from man-eating tigers by having them follow each others tails until they turned into butter.
Flapjacks with loads of butter are served at the holiday meal.The black [Hanukkah]God's gift to the world.  Brings peace when used wisely.An ancient plant, refrenced biblically {the Holy Herb}.

Gets you rocked, and has been proven to be less harmful then alcohol or cigarettes. It has never been conclusively proven to have caused a single death in the entire world, ever.

Easily avalible in most forign countries, and Alaska, where everybody grows it anyway.

Can be purchased by the (if you're lucky) gram, or (not so lucky) by standard measurements. (1/8th of an ounce, 1/4er, 1/2, ect. An eigth usually weighs 3.75, depending on the weight of the baggie and weather or not you're buying from an asshole. There are dealers, and then there are professionals.) usual prices for the sticky-icky-icky (Not that cheap mexican shite, but tanqueray-and-chronic-chronic) can run from $30 to $50 and even $60 an eigth. I even heard it ran eighty an eigth out on Kodiack Island, but you gotta look at the market from a local poiont of view.

It's easier to get then liquor if you're under 21. 

It will not cause you to shoot your friend with the gun you found in your parent's bedroom while they weren't home. (That's shitty parenting, folks, not the pot!)

It's healthier then Xanax if you're just looking to ignore your troules for a few hours.

A biennial Youth Risk Behavior Survey, released May 21 by the U.S. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention stated that more of america's youth smoke pot then cigarettes.

It's a step in the right direction, folks!the answer to all in this horrible world of oursmarijuanaweed not a drug!the dried leaves and flowering tops of pistillate hemp plant that yeild cannabin and are sometimes smoked in cigarette form for its intoxicating effect   

aka

fucking awesomeweed is marijuana, stupid. here's some names i've collected
weed
chron or chronic
dro (hydroponics)
sticks and stems (shitty weed)
sticky-icky (dripping with THC)
mauie wowie
jamaican red hair
blueberry
strawberry
AK-47
kind bud
snowflake
skunk and super skunk
mary jane
MJ
grass (no one calls it that anymore)
ganga (pronounced GAHN-JAH)
herb or herbal
dank
trees
mids or middies (average weed)
damn, there's a ton more, i just can't remember from smoking all of the above.a beautiful thing if used properly. all it does is make you happy.an essential substance in most people's lives.A green plant god put on the earth for me and you.Type of [Christianity] that places authority in the Bible as the infallible word of God. This does not necessarily mean a literal interpretation of everything in the Bible (cf. [creationism]). Not to be confused with [evangelism], which means something entirely different.A generalization of multiple groups of Protestant Christianity. It's not actually a denomination, but a category that churches of many denominations fall under, ranging from some baptist churches in the south to non-denominational churches in the north and along the coastline. Using that criteria, the majority of protestant Christians in the US probably fall under the "Evangelical" category. Despite popular belief, they are real, tangible people, who are just as capable of being discriminated against as the people who they are frequently (and usually, falsely) accused of being discriminated against. An Evangelical Christian is best characterized as someone who wants to spread the Gospel of Christ by being living examples to the people around them. Real Evangelicals do not believe in forcing people who are not Christians to act like Christians, because they believe that Christ his followers to only come of their own free will.

Evangelical Christians should NOT be confused with "fundamentalists," a term that has come to mean someone who is far more mental than fun. Evangelicals tend to believe in more literal interpretations of the bible, but that does not mean that they are against scientific study or using critical thinking (after all, how can you understand how the Bible applies to your life without critical thinking?). Also, they do not want religion to control the government, because as [Martin Luther] figured out during the dark ages, religion controlling government is actually a cheap disguise for the government controlling religion. True Evangelicals want freedom of religion, and that includes the freedom to share the gospel with others.

Evangelical Christians are a large, and unfortunately, misunderstood part of the global population. They are constantly stereotyped as being hateful, bigoted people, even though many of them have done many great works for bringing rights to people and sending help to places. Evangelicals want to change their communities for the better by changing the people, one person at a time. Maybe if people came to realize that the large majority of Evangelical Christians are actually legitimately nice people who enjoy life and are happy to share their happiness with others, they'd realize that the mainstream perception of "evangelical" is merely an aggressively propagated stereotype that aims to strip Christians of their legitimacy as human beings.Comes from the word 'evangelism', which means spreading the good news about jesus christ.

So inturn evangelical is living your life in the way that god wants you to, so that others may see you and see how god has worked in your life. It is not a way of forcing a religion on someone.

It can also mean to speak to people about jesus.A sect of christianity that is full of mindless, brainwashed followers who spend their entire life in misery when they aren't spreading the gospel. The whole sect is full of middle class/rich white folks who want to go to church to be entertained by crying, hysterical preachers and find new prejudices to be in support of. They believe that their religion is the only way of life and refuse to accept any other ways.  There is no 'conversation' with evangelicals...they only convert. BEWARE.According to society, the only demographic that should feel ashamed of themselves when campaigning or when casting a vote.The Andromeda Strain of Christianity. Often called "conservative Christianity", when in reality it is a very modern radical version. Evangelicalism has no true theology, substituting apologetics for theology, and far more concerned with what will draw in people than in actual beliefs.

Evangelicals are often mistaken for Protestants, however the two groups a quite different. Protestantism is based on the idea that people can read and understand the Bible for themselves, without need of a mediator. In Evangelicalism, your minister is the final authority of what the Bible means.

Evangelicals gather to worship in thousands or tens of thousands in the belief that their minister is an intermediary to God, and that it is very important to get their religion directly from him.Describes Christians who try to uphold the tenants of the Protestant Reformation, but without all that courage, conviction, and critical-thinking baggage that got their 16th and 17th century forefathers burned at the stake.  Also known as "Evan-jelly-fish" due to apparent lack of brain and spine.christians who like to argue and force their ideas of religion on others. sometimes resulting in violence and always voice raising.Modern day nazi's. They brainwash there followers using group hysteria, which Hitler used. They try to convert everything that moves by forcing people to beleive what they think. They consider themselves an army of god, ready to fight for his bidding.

They are also hypocrite's. E.G. Ted haggard , who is one of the pastor's at a mega church i colorado, paid a male prostitute to butt fuck him after condeming gays and homosexual activity. He asked forgiveness and was forgiven and "cured", but if any one else who wasnt evangelical did that they would not be forgiven ( like Bill Clinton).1. an adjective synonymous with "mindless."

2. a noun synonymous with "fucking idiot."a broke ass mutha fucka who relies on crack to sustain daily life.  Often seen running at full speed for a multitude of reasons.People of any race that live to hit that nasty-ass rock. Usually real thin, dirty and smell like warm trash and/or spoiled milk, fecal matter, rotting corpses etc. Frequently bobbing, weaving, twitching and glitching. Large periodic spurts of energy. Always got something for sale or knows somebody that has just what you need. The most severe crackheads can be viewed in the wild missing standard items such as shoes, socks and teeth. If you come into contact with a crackhead it is suggested to secure all valuables and avoid any physical contact or direct contact with their breath (could cause dizzyness and/or vomitting).  If you lose property to a crackhead, accept the loss. If you find yourself chasing a crackhead, accept the loss .. crackheads are fast, they be gittin somewheres.. You ain't catching no crackhead...1.a person on crack
2.a moron1. one who does excessive amounts of crack.

2. one who acts as though they do excessive amounts of crack.Someone who smokes crack and will lie cheat and steal from anyone to get a hit1.one who is highly addicted to the euphoria brought on by crack cocaine.
2. one who does stupid things.1. one who partakes in smoking crack cocaine.
2. One who can run like the wind when s/he believes that quazimotto is chasing him/her.
3. one who will try to sell thier dog on e-bay.
4. If you live in a hotel, have no food, are pregnant, and your only worry is when/how to score...you are a crackhead.
5. one who acts "crackish"
6. A Jarrod or an Izatt.
7. A "parent" of a Crack baby.
8. The person who robbed you.A crackhead is the lowest form of a drug user. They abuse the drug crack cocaine. They are often liars, traitors, and thiefs. 

Crackheads are often paranoid and fidgety. 

Crackheads can be anyone, any race, any gender.

Crackheads will sell everything and anything to fuel their addiction. 

Crackheads cannot be trusted. If you ever find yourself to a person who is a known crackhead, try to get away as fast as possible, otherwise you may lose valauble jewerly, wallet, etc. 

Unless you don't mind having any of your prized possessions disappear, it is not wise to let a crackhead into your home. Never leave a crackhead unnattended to, or you will find things mysteriously go missing. 

It is important to never let a crackhead get to you, don't ever let them get under your skin. You are the stronger person in the situation, unless you too are a crackhead.

Crackheads are pathetic.Somebody who does [crack] regulary and gets addicted. Thus becoming a crackhead.The lowest form of a drug-user.The infamous act of a girl getting fucked by a donkey cock, whilst paying gentlemen gather around and watch.as stated above, refers to a woman getting fucked by a donkey, often performed for the pleasure of refined gentleman.  

one variation (specifically found in tijuana) is a competition in which different whores fuck the donkey.  the depth to which they are penetrated is marked by tying a red ribbon (a la tony orlando and dawn) 'round the donkey's cock.  the girl who takes it the deepest wins (i guess?).A sex act involving a woman and a donkey in which the woman fornicates with said donkey, typically performed in rural Mexican cities.An act where a horny woman gets corn-holed by a raging horny assa show where a woman has sex with a jackass1. A form of entertainment most commonly associated with being presented in Tijuana, in which (usually) men pay to observe a male donkey have sex with a female human.

2. A popular Oregon radio show, broadcast from Eugene with a transmitter powerful enough to be heard even outside the state depending on how good the receiving radio is (Vancouver, WA is an example). Syndicated in Medford (south of Eugene) at night time, though the hours the show is actually done is 2-6 PM. Broadcast on 101.5 KFLY FM, the show plays little music compared to most FM radio, and is mainly composed of the two co-hosts Tanner and Drew sharing their often humorous opinions and satires of current events and people currently in the news; as well as other commonly done humor-based radio bits. They refer to their listeners as throbbits (from a pornographic parody of Lord of the Rings).a live show in which a woman has sex (oral, anal, vaginal) with a mule or donkey. they are usually found in seedy areas of border towns in Mexico.  yes they really do exist and aren't terribly hard to findSomething you really don't want to be a part of or see.Donkey shows usually take place in TJ.  It is when a donkey's penis penetrates a (sometimes kidnapped) women.an obscene performance in which a woman copulates with a [literal] jackassthe police (see also [fuzz station])Comes from the fact that a lot of police back in the 60's joined straight of the military and they brought with them the very short military haircut that gave them the appearance of fuzz on their heads. When they took their hats off, your first comment might be, hey look, it's the fuzz. It's a style of haircut that made wearing a police hat more comfortable and cooler to wear......still in vogue today and used by many police officers around the world.A slang word for the police used by poor greasers.the fuzz refers to the polices like [the heat] i think the word is derived from the police always being on your ass or in you face like [peach fuzz]The fuzz is a word used when your so frikkin high that when the cops come to bust your ass that u call them the fuzz because the crack and chron are blurring your vision.Means "son of" (hence all the English surnames like Fitzpatrick, Fitzhenry) but can also refer to an illegitimate child, a bastard, someone born out of wedlock etc.A nick name for someone with the last name Fitzpatrick or Fitzgerald.1. noun- full retard

2. verb- to instantaneously lose control of your bowels in an unannounced fashion. Usually resulting in going commando for the remainder of the day.

3. adj.- awesomer than everybody and everything around you.

4. adj- The inability to come up with a response to an insult, usually resulting in threats of sodomy.1.  A suitable name to dipsnap to.
2.  A kid who is popular because his name sounds cool if you say it loud enough.A boy who used to be hot, but glowed down a lot!When someone agrees to do something and changes their mind five seconds laterthe art of coordinating clothing and accessories with name brand shoesTo take your workload and pass it on to an unsuspecting co-worker.a cut on your thumb or a cut on any finger(V) Otherwise known as pulling a Terry Tate, to tackle a coworker in a surprising manner across a row of cubicles. The tackle might be as aggressive as a flying pile-driver or as subtle as kicking another's leg out from underneath him.Analagous to their malevolent movie counterparts, the modern-day Gremlin is most often found on weekends in between the hours of 1800 and 0400. When in its passive form, the Gremlin is most often a well-intentioned and meaningful contributor to society. However, when provoked (usually by means of an ex-girlfriend or obnoxious fool at the bar), the Gremlin first becomes forlorn and introspective, then mischevious, and in some cases violent.

If you encounter a fully manifested Gremlin, you are advised to stay clear (especially when the Gremlin is in a doorway). If you feel the need to intervene, it has been said a trip to Burger King can passify the creature.

The Gremlin will return to its natural state by morning, usually feeling embarassed and apologetic.1.) Little meshevious devils that cause problems with everything around you.
2.) Little red men with horns you see when you are stoned.
3.) Imaginary little devils you can blame shit on.A Gremlin is a woman who a man likes to fuck but doesn't want to go out past dark to eat with......because shes a beast to look at or emotionally unstable.The gremlin is a furry critter that will use her petit stature and nubile appearance to gain the trust of others. Upon making the mistake of trusting a gremlin, she will then lurk in dark corners and attack at any given moment. This evil hobbit will engage in acts of deceit and general tomfoolery as a means of social interaction. Characteristics of the gremlin will include:
-Rage blackouts
-Violent attacks from behind, especially on the knees
-Full speed bodychecks
-Stealing food from gardens
-The belief that she is average height, when she is in fact, gremlin height
-The use of such phrases as "frig-a-mug" and "go S a D"A drunk friend after midnight. You don't feed them.Girl doesn't get wet for you.Making weird or distractive noices revolving around food.
Being generally weird and always hungry and wanting foods such as chocolate or spaghetti bolognese!A small ginger creature, usually found in a darkened room eating ham sandwiches. She sleeps for most of her life and only wakes to scuttle to the kitchen to make a sandwich. Gremlins can be located in the London area and on a quiet night you can here the high pitch cackle when she is amused. By all means stay out of Gremlins way in the mornings.Your girls fucking clingy ass best friend. Have you ever wanted to do something with your girl but her clingy ass best friend is just jealous of you, and doesn't want your girl whom is her best friend doing something because she can't so she tells her not to and your girl listens to her? That right there is being a fucking GREMLIN! GREMLINS are needy as hell and their jealousy of you grows exponentially. You're basically fucked when it comes to gremlins...there's no cure to this shit.The small pieces of [weed] that sometimes don't get smoked because they got stuck to the top inside edges of your [bowl].What this fucking definition is, asshole.1. [n]  the action of attacking the enemy

2. [adj]  of an offensive substitute for inoffensive terminology; "`nigger' is a dysphemistic term for `African-American'"

3. [adj]  unpleasant or disgusting especially to the senses; "offensive odors"

4. [adj]  morally offensive; "an unsavory reputation"; "an unsavory scandal"

5. [adj]  causing anger or annoyance; "offensive remarks"

6. [adj]  for the purpose of attack rather than defense; "offensive weapons"
   
7. [adj]  violating or tending to violate or offend against; "violative of the principles of liberty"; "considered such depravity offensive against all laws of humanity"
   
8. [adj]  causing or able to cause nausea; "a nauseating smell"; "nauseous offal"; "a sickening stench"

 
 	Synonyms:	 	abhorrent, abusive, antipersonnel, assault(a), assaultive, attack(a), attacking(a), charnel, creepy, detestable, disgustful, disgusting, distasteful, dysphemistic, foul, ghastly, ghoulish, hideous, hit-and-run, horrid, horrific, incursive, insulting, invading, invasive, loathly, loathsome, marauding, morbid, nauseating, nauseous, noisome, objectionable, obnoxious, obscene, odoriferous, offence, offending, offense, on the offensive(p), opprobrious, outrageous, predatory, raiding, rank, repellant, repellent, repelling, repugnant, repulsive, revolting, scornful, scrimy, scurrilous, sepulchral, sickening, skanky, tip-and-run, unpleasant, unsavory, unsavoury, unwholesome, verminous, vile, violative, wicked, yucky
 
 	Antonyms:	 	defensive, euphemistic, inoffensive, savory, savoury, unoffending, ylbissopA highly subjective interpretation of something real, imagined, or interpreted as being demeaning; very often the use of complaint to attack someone while paradoxically assuming both authority and victimhood; the use of complaint as a sociopolitical weapon or vehicle to often unmerited benefit, privilege, or compensation.Describes a statement politically or ideologically inconvenient, esp. in the judgment of one having no knowledge of the matter at hand.  Often used to stifle further discussion or pander to the lowest common denominator.  Cf: [fair and balanced].What you see that you don't like when you look in the mirror.The act of attacking & destroying an enemy's self esteem; utilizing unconventional remarks, stirring the enemy's emotions making them unable to network an insult measuring to your ego. If done correctly, the enemy will leave in anger to cry or to write about it in their diary, resulting in a successful response: rage quitting.1. merely mentioning anything about your "lifestyle and/or preference to women"
2. reading a book for class that has the word gay on the cover(that in no way to sexuality)
3. watching a movie where a girl says she loves another girl in a friend way
4.anything having to do with gay rights1. To take a stance or position against a percieved [assault].

2. The quality of an [attack] used against an [opponent] or [enemy] during [battle].

3. To find an [opinion], [act], [object] or [situation] to be [detestable].ANYTHING. LITERALLY ANYTHING THESE DAYS. ANGSTY TEENS GET OFFENDED BY EVERYTHING. IT'S ANNOYING. TAKE A JOKE.a person on social media-especially ifunny-who hates on and/or reports fandoms, furries, bronies, emos, porn, lgbtq, and anything else they don't like. also known as a hater.having no shame.A person who has no shame in getting what they want...often on there knees for best resultswhen someone makes a really stupid mistake, normaly blondes (like me n terri)1) Short for the drug, Cocaine.
2) Short for the beverage, Coca Cola.An addictive soda.

An addictive drug.1. A popular short term for the popular soft drink Coca Cola.

2. A popular short term for the popular, a illegal, drug Cocaine.Any drink served in the SouthWhat I would live the rest of my life on if I had enough money1* soda
2* short for coca cola
3* cocaineA highly addicted substance that ravages both mind and body!

....also the name of a powdered narcotic.1. Hard arse stimulant.  White powder derived from the Coca plant, native of Sth. America.  Very expensive but in small quantities is a fine buzz...

2. Short for Coca Cola - essence of American capitalist pigdog.  Made from [bumsweat] and sugar.1.What kept Tony Montana standing in the last 10 minutes of "Scarface."

2.Warm, its the best rust remover on the planet. (Put a little Coke in a cup and put a nail or small piece of sandwich meat on top. In the morning, meat is gone, wipe off rust.)

3. More popular than you think. I mean cocaine.Always available at bars, both over the counter as a soft drink or mixer and everywhere from the guest lounge to the toilets.

Often the word media or media bar means coke freindly, due to the common opinion that any person working in the media profession is a coke user.One of the smartest medical dramas to ever have aired, House, M.D. features the maverick, anti-social doctor Gregory House (Hugh Laurie) who specializes in infectious diseases and does whatever it takes to solve the puzzling cases that come his way.  

A show that should rob this year's Emmys if not for its sheer quality then for Laurie's brilliant acting.n. a style of electronic music originating in the late 80's in the USA characterized by four-on-the-floor bpms between 110-140, synthesized melodies and bass lines.A slang word with a hundred different definitions, 90% that were made up on the fly here at urbandictionary.com, to the point where it could be substituted for so many words you have no idea what the f**k someone would be talking about if he/she used each and every one.probably one of the best medical dramas ever to hit television, features Hugh Laurie, who plays the anti-social, sarcastic, pain in the ass doctor, who specializes in recognizing infectious diseases. He and his team of doctors take on extremely hard cases, House usually ends being right about the disease at the end of the day.

This show is truly great and it murders Scrubs.Nothing more or less than the best TV show that ever was or ever will be. HOUSE FTW!!the MOST awesome show on television! (well, next to Scrubs) which stars the wonderful British actor, Hugh Lauire, as the genius, pain in the ass, Gregory House.1. (v) to consume a substantial quantity quickly, completely, and with purpose.
2. (v) to beat in competition.
3. (v) to dominate.Pronunciation  (hous)

House Music: The original electronic incarnation from disco. House typically runs around 120 beats per minute (BPM) and uses a 4/4 time sequence and an eight bar repeating cycle. The beat is maintained by a heavy kick drum that alternates in a 1-3 pattern with a high hat accent. Like its disco roots, house often features vocal choruses, real instrumentation, and a more traditional song structure.A fucking wooden or brick fucking place where you live eat and sleep in.A bigger older woman with sexual desires towards younger men. (Usually a housewife.)To run over on a football fieldA vehicle of a redneck, which he drives to a date with his girlfriend instead of carring grass for cows.another four-wheeled vehicle with a flat bed in the back used for storage of equipment, groceries, small recreational vehicles, tools, or extra people. The pickup truck (as previously described) is the most popular automobile among men.A large vechile presumably with a bed for hauling, moving, towing, or even storing what needs be.

The absolute worst thing a person could do to a truck would include the following (these are all sins of god, and you will be punished accordingly):
-lowering it 'til it's an inch or less from the ground
-adding neon lights
-adding a fuckin ricer exhaust system... which most of time would just include tips or some other retarded peice of chrome
-PUTTIN A FUCKIN SPOILER ON IT
-adding giant ass rims to it, then stretching these tiny ass treads over'em that look like they'll pop any second


A real fuckin truck would include the following:
-A "body-on-frame"
-A real fuckin engine, varies from size of the truck (ex. an S10 with a small block, a brand new giant Ram 2500 with a Cummins Diesel)
-Four wheel drive... because some of us have the balls to get off the blacktop, just for fun or required for certain jobs, which most of you BMW pricks would be afraid of, don't wanna raw up them soft hands
-bedliner

optional:
-a nice leveling kit and/or lift kit
-some differential lockers with some beefy axles
-winch
-good ol' 15"/16"/17" wrapped with some treads depending on what terrian you work/play in (crawlers, boggers, LT's, swampers, AT's, 32"-40", etc.)
-sway bars, roll bars
-engine upgrades

Trucks are great vehicles. They are designed to do things cars can't, and most of them are built solid like a rock. Last long. Work hard and play hard. Besides the MPG... why wouldn't you want a truck?The metal part underneath a skateboard that holds the wheels in place (kind of like an axle on a car).  Used for grinding (riding on rails or waxed services).They are the device that attaches the wheels to the [skateboard].When a person does something that you didn't expect or you are so amazed at what happend your speechless.Someone who draws negative attention by not having their shit together. Most commonly used in jail.a word to describe someone/things extreme greatness. it is also a multi use term and can mean anything. it also can be used as an action word.Connection, association, or interaction with a person/place/thing; usually used in a negative sense.The hair on the back of you neck that is nappy, un-tameableA woman's natural habitat.The room where grandma hides her shotgun shells.A mysterious place full of sharp, pointed objects, deadly gas-operated incinerators, things that go 'ping' and a big, cold wardrobe full of beer which is the only true incentive for entering the room in the first placeA nickname for the holdem hand ten three (T-3) offsuit, a term used by many prominent online poker players, and coined by the professional online poker player Jamie Armstrong, aka pokerjamersa word used to describe nappy-naps in the back of a females head...On the sitcom "Martin" he often uses this word to insult the character "Pam"...because her back edges are apparently nappy and rough...Where the goods are cooked, things are shipped/delivered, people get swerved, and basically all the dope shit happens. Sometimes referred to as the bakery.a sammich factorythe back of the nape. (usually used in the phrase nape of the neck).Afro-amerain women or southen women call it"The Kitchen"(Traditional) The place in a home where a woman belongssomething that happens when the condom breaks on prom nightThe worst STD ever.  Causes pain, poverty, and eighteen year of torture.Carrying developing offspring within the body.your end of life...

you are totally fucked.

OWNEDSupposed to be the happiest moment in a couples lives but the dumb asses who conceived by accident just ruin the definition.

Don't have sex until your ready for the consequences.The condition of being able to make twice as much money in the porn industry due to supply and demand.The blossoming of a new life...in your life.When are girl has a baby growing inside her! After she has had unprotected sex!This is what happens when a male and a female have sexual intercourse and the sperm fertilises one of the woman's eggs after ovulation.

Contrary to popular (male) belief, pregnancy is not the woman's fault, it takes 2 to tango if you know what I mean...

Women also do not get pregnant to 'trap' a man. Because if he was indeed worth holding onto, she would not need to get pregnant to keep him, nor would a rubbish guy stick around if he got a woman pregnant either. (See scum or coward)

Pregnancy is the aprox 40 weeks of gestation in which it takes a human being to develop and grow inside his or her mothers body before birth.

It is in 3 stages (known as trimesters)
Pregnancy is divided into three stages called trimesters, each of which lasts three months. The first trimester covers the first 12 weeks of your pregnancy. This stage is often the worst with morning sickness and fatigue as common symptoms.

The baby grows inside the uterus, gaining it's nutrition from the placenta and kept safe and protected by the amniotic sack.

The woman's body goes through serious changes both physical and mental.

The mental changes include, hormonal, she may feel depressed,anxious,happy and angry, her mood changes often, she is not going mad, she is just pregnant!

the physical changes include: her tummy growing (obviously)
her breasts growing and producing milk ready for the babies arrival, usually in later stages of pregnancy she may leak milk.
Her nipples will also swell and darken, her breasts will grow larger, she may also get other skin conditions depending on hormone levels.
Aside from good changes to her body she may also find her immune system is weak, leaving her susceptible to colds,flu and other virus' and infections. When a woman is pregnant, her immune system is in over drive to stop her body from rejecting the unborn baby.

Pregnancy can be both a wonderful and horrible experience for someone. (including the babies daddy who has to put up with a very hormonal pregnant lady)

And before any man can insult a pregnant woman let me just say, if you get a girl pregnant and blame her for it, she is not going to want or need you anyway, so don't think your so great :)
A baby growing up with one parent is better than a baby growing up with an asshole for a father.

Not all pregnancies end with a baby though.
Some women for what ever reason choose to terminate the pregnancy, this does not make a woman a bad person, If she is not ready or in a good position to have a child, or say she became pregnant after rape, then she may choose to abort. No one has the right to judge someone for terminating pregnancy. Abortion is neither right or wrong.
Some pregnancies also end in miscarriage, and some pregnancies are ectopic.

Pregnancy is a natural thing and without it the life of all species would cease to exist.1. A state a woman may find herself in after having unprotected sex with a man.  Involves a child growing within her body and can be discovered by the absence of menstruation.  May cause illness.

2. Bloated, held out, prolonged.

I'd also like to say something to all the men out there who think that getting a girl pregnant is a death sentence!
Being pregnant is a wonderful and painful experience that you'll never have, so just shut the hell up about your selfish views.  Women don't trap men by getting pregnant.  It's not their choice!The act of receiving a serious butt whoopin at the hands of a person or group of persons.A severe beating delivered with the hands and feet; a pummeling so bad, the recipient needs to use his health insurance; see [open a can of whup ass]A good, old-fashioned ass kickin',Assault by the police after being arrested1. To beat someone up very badly, to the point of them being on the ground. This can happen with a combination of the following:

* Punching
* Kicking
* Kicking [Balls]
* [Curbstomping]
* [Fist Fight]ing

After the victim is on the ground, various forms of abuse may happen. Beatdown is then concurred, and a broken limb is required before it's real beatdown.

2. Another way of expressing utter defeat of someone. Can be used in celebration or defeat.v. (1) to verbally berate into submission (publicly) (2) to physically rough up or convincingly administer authority over another person or thing (3) the exercise of legitimate authority, rules, or known customs which leaves a person or persons in a poor position and often disappointed.
n. the act of beating down (2) a disappointing and unexpected result to an attempted action1. A fistfight where the odds are stacked highly in one of the two participants favours, commonly resulting in broken bones and softening of the face.

2. The climax of a hardcore song, usually a down-tempo combination of palm muted open strings/extensive pinch harmonics and low end chords, where crowd participant's can quite simply unleash the beast on one another.

3. fucking awesome.To receive a BEAT DOWN would be equivalent to getting your ass seriously beaten by another person or persons; to have one's ass handed to them; to be "pounded into the ground" by someone who doesn't like you.the dance of the hardcore kid.... it is when the guitarist simply stums the D or C string open.....The act of pumbling, destroying, and smashing a disgusting creature, especially ostriches, salamanders, junebugs, armadillos, and orangutang. Beat downs are given if and only if the act of being crusty or ugly is committed. They are given very often and involve fists and feet, or anything wet.Yellow bread made from cornmeal ubiquitous in Southern cuisine; it is slightly sweet, and usually served with butter.A baked foodstuff for which the primary ingredient is maize, which many people call corn, a grain.  Tradition holds that the Pilgrims ate corn bread because it was a plentiful grain - and the only grain - readily available where they settled in Massachusetts.1. A food commonly eaten by big booty black bitches.

2. Ur ass cherry(virginity),A girl with an extremely large ass, this refers to the fact that she must "eat her cornbread" in order to obtain such a fine ass.Money a prostitute makes from performing anal sex acts, as in getting [cornholed].a staple in African-American cuisine, often served with greens, coated with yam juice.The most delicious bread on the planet that was invented by Indians and is made out of corn.A name that no one will take seriouslyReference to the song "No sex in the champagne room" by Chris Rock. In it he says "Cornbread. Ain't nothin' wrong with that." So this word means that someone is perfect and you can't find anything wrong with her, just like cornbread.An affirmative statement.  A word mumbled when in acquiescence with another.  Used in place of the words: agreed or indeed.

It can also be used in random outbursts when feeling elated or quirky.Where you sleep when you get your girlfriend mad; but not mad enough to be kicked out of the house.when a girl sits on your lap and subtly grinds your cock with her ass in public, pretending that shes not (like a couch dance)the second best thing to use next to the bed ;)One's system of morals or beliefsA piece of furniture more diverse than a coffee table.A word used to replace words such as "fuck", or "shit", and has multiple uses as saying "back off". Or it is a piece of furniture that is ussually sat on.referrers  to the "sit-able" [plateau] of an excessively [fat] [booty]couch - an offensive term used to diminish someones social standing. Inferring that the person in question enjoys anus on his/her face.

A amicable term in some social spheres.The place where young children get ston'd in the morning.A lazy person.The reproductive system (gender neutral).Bhe act of saving a life when a person is drowning or choking by repetitively thrusting one's penis in and out of the person's throat. The thrusting creates a plumbing effect that forces the obstruction to move up the throat. This action is in no way sexual; it should only be used during times of grave danger.The act of purposefully stopping up your toilet so that the plumber will come to your house and unclog it.Wearing one's pants so low as to display one's asscrack. Derived from the state of many a fat plumber's pants.(verb) Very deep anal penetration
Deep-sea plumbing: Anal penetration over 10 inchesGeneric term for the bars of a jail cellTo forcefully insert a hollow metal pipe into the rectum of a woman and suck out all of faecal matter. It is similar to a [filthy fiddler].Plumbing is a sexual act involving a man and a female. The aforementioned male pops his penis in the girl's vagina, lubricating her ring, tickling and widening the said orifice. When that there hole is at maximum size, the man pops the scrotum and both balls in that bottomless pit of love.Any brass wind instrument, because of the appearance of the tubing.A Farm-veihicle that can pull farm-implements.  Tractors are usually used to pull items, and often have a [Front-end Loader] attacthed.Something you like, alot, think is attractive.A really, really fat girl that you bang because your stupid/high/desperate.A Techie, and a Actor; this person does both on stage and behind stage work, for theater.  This term was invented by WMHS Techie/Actors who needed a name in MoCoSomething really good. Mostly used in Kansas but also widely used throughout the midwest.An insult describing, someone who is slow and annoying.Big ass black bitch screwing a little white man while intoxicated.One who has ways from the rural Southern U.S., particularly Texas and most particularly, the town of Thorton, TX.word for female genitals.
aka. twat lol.(TRAK-tor) Used with [trash] to create [tractor trash]. Describes [white trash] from predominantly farming communities.Any opposite sex escort taken to an event in an effort to give a homosexaul person the apperance of being out on a date with a person of the opposite sex.a man or woman used as a cover for a gay partnerA female or male(though,mainly female) who is used as a cover-up for a homosexual.The single most manly, and great thing a man can do. To have a beard is to be a true man. If you have a beard, show it off proudly, and enjoy the satisfaction of the envy in the eyes of people around you who don't have beards. If you don't have a beard, grow one. If you cant grow one and your not past puberty yet, hold out my young friend, your time will come. If you don't have a beard and your past puberty, go get that sex change you know you need.The best solution to any problem. A sort of spiritual band-aid that's only effective when used by men.A common word used to address a homosexual's female friend who he takes around town; he normally calls this companion his "girlfriend" to prove to the world that he is a masculine, football watching, titty grabbing heterosexual male. Although, he may think that this so called 'image' is working, he's actually fooling himself. It's completely obvious to on-lookers that he is a flamboyant homo. Gayer than a chihuahua in pink shades. 

Here are some warning signs that you may be a beard...

1. He wears more makeup than you.
2. He looks fucking FIERCE in pictures 'cause he smiles wit' his eyes.
3. Uses bronzer as blush
4. Plucks his own eyebrows and his eyebrows look more groomed than yours.
5. Stands with hands on his hips.A condition that causes hair to grow from the chin and lower face. Symptoms include itching, divinity and gratuitous awesomeness.

Synonyms include: Jesus.The term 'Beard' is used to describe a person who is being used by another person to cover something up. This can range from gay men using a girlfriend as a beard to make people think he is straight, or someone using a friend to make people think they are hanging out with them when really they are with someone else.1. A boy or girl hired as a celebritys boyfriend/girlfriend by that celebritys management, usually for publicity.when a gay man and a gay woman date each other to hide that fact that they're gaya woman's hair arranged at the back of her head, held together with a band and to be used by a man as a handle while receiving oral sex from a willing female.

A straight ponytail is grasped near the base in a male's fist, medium grip. This allows nice control of the female's head, but is limiting due to awkward bending of the male's wrist. It is a carpal tunnel syndrome hazard for men who receive a high volume of blowjobs. The height of the ponytail on the back of the woman's head can be adjusted for better torque.

Another type of ponytail is the balled ponytail. The straight ponytail is simply folded under itself and tucked back into the band, resembling a ball of hair. Grasped with an open palm, the fingers should meet at the band, thus the "ball" is contained in the man's hand. Called the "palm sander" grip, it allows full control of the woman's head with no wrist strain.

A third type of ponytail is the double ponytail. Two tails are formed toward the rear left and right sides of the female's head. A favorite among bikers as each tail can be grasped by a separate hand. The willing lady's head is steered like a motorcycle.

Caution: though clearly sexual stimuli for men, it is important for men to remember women do not always view it in the same context. Women often use ponytails just to keep hair out of their faces. The confused male should never just assume when a woman's hair is in a ponytail her head is ready for mounting. He should always ask first.Ponytail; verb.  To grab a girl by her ponytail and remove her from whatever current situation she is in.1) the thing that's on a ponies butt

2) when a person with long hair puts it in a singular hair elasticA meme that took the Bioware Social Network by storm in anticipation for Dragon Age 2.

The second day of live feed from gamescom in Germany proved to be nothing but slow, dull hours of people standing by the DA2 booth and taking pictures in front of its poster.

Bored, the online viewers took note of one booth workers' Godly hairstyle of a long, blonde ponytail-braid. So enthralled were they that within just a couple hours; a Facebook page, several threads, a Chant of Ponytail (parody of DA:O's Chant of Light) and a social group on the Bioware forums had been created in honor of her.

Bioware remarked on it via Twitter, and Ponytail occasionally waved at the camera and appeared generally entertained by her sudden popularity from her self-titled army.Where a girl puts her hair up in a single rubber band.
why:
So she can smack a bitch
So she can smack someone in the face with her hair
To try and impress someone
To give head

It also the most impossible thing to do when you have messy, snarled hair i do not reccomend it you will look terrible unless you have bobby pins to fix that shitGetting alot of head.Basically it is a term used for people whose skin color is darker than most. Normally referred to as "nigger", "negro", "knee's grow", or "samo-niggaz". They are typically found wandering around in Compton shooting down samo-niggaz, also if you are trying to find them in the dark, say a funny joke it will make them laugh and you will see their teeth. For example: "What do you get when you cross a samoan and a negro?" -pause- and then say "SAMO-NIGGGGAAZZ!!!!!" in a very niggerish accent. When you come across a ponytail you have to holler at them for example...When someone has a cock stuck on the back of their head that resembles a cleft of hair being draped down the back of their neck.(from a hairstyle popular with the people described, usage invented by Kaecyy in 2005)

A generally amiable but hopelessly nerdy person-- not necessarily possessing an actual ponytail or even long hair-- who is usually immersed in a combination of science fiction and fantasy literature (and their derivatives), roleplaying games (often in their live action varieties), the gothic-industrial subculture, and/or the historical reenactment of pre-industrial periods of European history (often at what are called "Renaissance fairs")-- among other influences-- to or nearly to the point of lifestyle.Ponytail is when a gay or bi guy gets mad at his balding lover for not satisfying him sexually. When his lover falls asleep, he jacks off on the guy's bald spot and then  affixes a tube sock to it. The guy wakes up with a "ponytail". A variation of the [superman].A man who is fascinated with large breasted women, who as a child was deprived of his mother's breast milk and was a bottle fed baby.Heroin supplier; a penny balloon that contains narcoticsa heroin dealerslang for [condom]; slang for protection during sex.A woman's breasts, AKA [boobs], [tits], [jugs], [hooters], [knockers].Elegant strip club located at 233 Porno Ave in Providence, RI. Famous for allowing men (and women) of all ages, including those 15-17.  Home of the infamous "referee" (bouncer) who also offers lap dances for a discounted price.A fool; a person who has just made a pretty obvious mistakeBalloons are used to hold heroin (usually low grade H). A dealer will use un-filled balloons (the multi-colored, water balloons, most of the time) to place a small, universal weight, amount of heroin into. The weight of the heroin inside each balloon can vary depending on who packaged or "tied" them. The amount is usually about .1grams per balloon. People buy them in packs of 10 or more, and rarely buy/sell a single "balloon." Rumor has it, the reason heroin was originally put into these balloons, was so you could swallow them if need be, and not need medical attention.Another name for [breasts].A very weird thing that is basically a colored plastic sack of your breath to give your friend on their birthday.1. A source of information.

2. A source of entertainment.

3. A tool barely used by todays societies, because it is not 'cool' to read a book.verb meaning to run or to leave in a hurryan object used as a coaster, increase the hight of small children, or increase the stability of poorly built furniture.What people don't read enough today.cool: the first option given when trying to type 'cool' in a text message using t9Did you know there HAVE been books printed since the fifties and the new ones are cool?  They have them so anyone can understand them.  Books can be about video games, sex, drugs, sports, people, pretty much everything.  They come with cuss words, funny characters and you might understand some more of you those weird things...that's right. Words.Something we stopped caring about after the [internet] came along.Portable sanctuaries.Words assembled on pages. They usually tell stories of things the reader is interested in. That is, unless you're reading in [school]. Then, you have to read books nobody cares about or even likes. Maybe more people would like reading if they weren't forced to read books that they didn't like. I know I would.cool.

In the T9 predictive text on cell phones, the numbers 2665 spell both "book" and "cool," but "book" is the first word to display. To save time, it is left and understood to mean "cool."The best thing in the worldthe reason you need a new hard drive.The traditional way for young female Americans to afford university education (those not from wealthy families).A great American pastime.something that both sexes can enjoy.Arousing materials usually employed for masturbatory purposes.

It's often said that the most senstive part of your body during a porn session is your ears - no one likes getting busted with their undies around their ankles.

But, the use of porn doesn't need to be such an ugly experience.  'The Big Wank' (see below) is an example of how you can add more mystique and romance to your evening at home alone.peas and corn mixed together in a bowln. Reading and viewing material, otherwise known as 'cliterature'.Will never die, as long as there are folks willing to strip for the camera, the people who wish to browse it, and the assholes who wish to destroy it.something that the user loses interest in after masturbation has occurredhairy mofo.Heartless, 
Having no emotions,v. used to describe something awesome or nice ; something worthy of hatinBetter than [cool]
To be cooler than cool
The coolest level of coolwhat a girl says she is when she wants to snuggle :]plain, obviously, flat out, straight upan annoying and contagious illness that causes sniffling, sneezing, coughing, and other symptomsharsh, mean, icyCold was a rock band that started in 1986. They released 4 cd's: Cold, 13 ways to bleed on stage, year of the spider, and a different kind of pain. They also released an ep called Oddity. The band consisted of lead singer Scooter Ward, Matt Louhgran, Zachary Gilbert, both guitarists, Jeremy Marshall on bass, and Sam McCandless on drums. Former members included Mike Booth, Sean Lay, Terry Balsamo, Kelly Hayes and Eddie Rendini.
On February 27, 2006, Ward left a message on their official website saying they had disbanded. However, he said he and Sam will continue writing music.An infectious disease that usually spreads like wildfire around people, because people don't give a shit worth about others. They would yawn cough and not wash their hands properly to prevent others from catching the cold. If you catch a fucking cold, don't cough, cover your fucking mouth, and if you go to either 1-12 grades, go to the back of the class, and don't spread your fucking cold.Pretty, beautiful, hot1- *FRIDGE; - ph-ry-dJG ; verb- the action of destroying or assassinating a persons anus with a penis of considerable magnitude often resembling a 57 bus. The action, ususally performed in a violatory sense, produces the aftermath of either one of the following symptoms; laseration and/or complete tearing of the anal orifice, the dissemination of part or the entirety of the subjects' internal organs where the giant girder cock forced its entry, and/or the complete annihliation of the victims existance to the extent where it would be more appropriate to use the remains to bury the compost that would have been used to otherwise bury the remains.

2- As above but via a huge hit during a Football game.

3- Literally a Football player of such magnitude that he resembles a walking samsung fridge/freezer combo.someone who has never french kissedshort version of refridgeratorAn extremely cool person, the phrase was coined by BriBry (A YouTuber with 21,000+ subscribers) on a blogTV show in April 2011.A girl who is frigid and only hangs out with girls. Perhaps the date, but they are too scared to do anything.

They also are overly sacarstic.someone who hasn't got on (french kissed) anyone yet.place to store cold drinks and food

since when do u keep ice-cream in da fridge-noun, /frɪdʒ/: A common kitchen appliance used to store and preserve dead human bodies and body parts for consumption.Anyone from Shenendehowa HS knows that the fridge is 'a place to go sit and chill'A very appealing being full of human desires. When the fridge is full, it can make anyone very happy. But when not full, it has the potential to kill.A maker of [trouble] is not one who "causes" trouble, but who achieves a level of trouble by being [Mischievous], [Stunning]!, [Sensational]! and [Smart]...1. When knowingly, and consciously getting into trouble with no regard or care for the potential repercussions.

2. When one said person has one or more warrants for their arrest at one time.
3. If your name is Brittany Rivera.(n). 1. A poo that is very stubborn, requires a lot of force to eject., 2. Hardened feces which is lodged at the anus, preventing soft feces behind it to pass.

Example. "Where's a magazine? I've got a trouble-maker to work out."A troublemaker is someone who expresses a view on a forum that differs from those of the Administrator and/or, as is more common, a moderator of a forum. The person deemed to be a troublemaker will usually be 100% correct in their statements, but the moderator will object, making statements that could be classified as being a [bigland].

As a result the troublemaker will then be told to go and form their own forum, even though everything they said was both reasonable and correct.When you pair a shot of tequila with a Guinness.[Spike],the troublemaker. Generally considered out to [lunch]. Known for wildly outlandish behavior. Highly unstable antisocial personality however incredibly sexy.a person who escalates a situation.Someone who brings about or initiates something.A person who starts fights or arguments.A blow up alligator; short for instant gator.A person who instigates.  To instigate is to conspire, plan and prank the local populationtype of person that gets information from people by overhearin wat they say ...and then tell their bestfriend <3Bunty, officially known as the instigator.1. (before 1997) Something really bad; a failure

2. (after 1997) Something considered excellent and/or the best (uses modifier "the")something very cool/ goodA graffitti slang wordrefers to a person male/female who's attractive , on they steez and or carries themselves well .Fast Graffiti Pieces, more than two colors, uses all of your letters. not much details just enough to look good and be on your way.(verb) the act of writing a grafitti tag in a highly visible public place.To fail spectacularly.Something you never say on air airplane.Slang for Ecstasy pillscool, awesome. Also see shita baby cat! sometimes they can't meow properly yet and they are sooo cute!An baby [cat]. Also known as a [kitty]. They have sharp little claws and teeth and can be nasty sometimes, but they are soft, cute, and totally lovable. Their meow is just precious to hear. Be gentle; kittens are delicate.1.  An immature cat.
2.  An adorable ball of fur with big eyes that uses its powers of cuteness to manipulate human beings into submission and slavery.
3.  An adorable, yet insane, tiny monster with teeth and claws.Cute little fluffballskitten (kit'en) n. 

 A small, sometimes domesticated animal; usually a pet; a member of the cat family, wants to grow up to be a lion, tiger, leopard, etc; thinks the world revolves around her; is probably right.little fluffy bastardsa woman who likes to date men older than her, usually by about 10 years, or more depending on the woman. Also the opposite of a cougar.The casualties of masturbation.(n) Term of coolness for a female from the 1950's and still used in [rockabilly] circles.Small balls of fluff that people perceive as being "cute". Everytime you do something naughty, they die.random weather patterns. makeing meteorology nearly imposibleThe 17th state of the United States -- in 1803. Contains 13,000,000 people and its chief cities are Cleveland, Cincinnati, and the capital of Columbus. Ohio is known for being the home of the Wright Brothers, the first man in space, more presidents than any other state, and Generals William T. Sherman and U.S. Grant. Also home of the champion OSU Buckeyes. Unlike what others may tell you, there are larger hellholes in the universe. Ohio has a lot to offer and is a decent place full of decent people.A land of shifting mists, Ohio is the most mysterious state in America.  There are some who claim that it does not exist at all, but is merely a hoax perpetrated by a strong core of dedicated jokesters in the "neighboring" states of Michigan, Pennsylvania, Indiana, and West Virginia (we're pretty sure no one tells Kentucky anything).  

Most people believe, however, that Ohio DOES in fact exists, and that its mystery is due solely to the mysterious mists that seem to enshroud the entirety of the state in...well...mystery, deterring all but the most stalwart of travelers.  Constituents to this belief also hold that Ohio is, in fact, the last home of the dinosaurs, and that Ohioan economy is based almost solely on quarrying and agricultural works using highly-trained dinosaurs as the primary (and literal) beasts of burden.The Buckeye State. One of the best states to live in, and all around best in the Union. We have 3 major cities: our Capital; [Columbus] (aka C-Bus, Bus Town), [Cincinnati] (aka the dirty/nasty Nati) and [Cleveland] (the Mistake by the Lake). Home to smaller cities such as; Dayton, Toledo and Akron. 1 NBA team, 1 NHL team, 1 MLS team, 2 NFL teams, 2 MLB teams. We are also home to THE Ohio State University Buckeyes, one of the largest/best universities in the country. Also home to Ohio University, which is filled with raging alcoholics that refer to themselves as "students". Most of us in Ohio, (especially us in Columbus) were born and raised with the Bucks. We bleed Scarlett & Grey. We say things like "you guys" and a drive-thru liquor store is not strange to us. It's the beach, not the shore, and pop, not soda. We are the Eastern most state in the MidWest, and have some of the friendliest people around. Ohio girls are some of the coolest/nicest you will ever meet. We are a big football state, but Lacrosse is another sport everyone plays. We play a little game called [Cornhole] anywhere we can. We love our corn & we love our beer. We are Ohio. The Heart of it All, and you'd be nothing without us.The only place in the world where you can experience all four seasons in one week.A chant that occurs in Columbus, Ohio between 2 individuals or 2 groups of people who are too stupid to get that not everyone they see gives a rat's ass about sports and can't spell the name of the four letter state they live in without help from other idiots. Proof that OSU students don't learn anything but how to get arrested, drink, fight, watch football and date rape each other. Anyone who yells "O-H" at you in Columbus is a complete waste of flesh and deserves to get their ass kicked.1) One of the states of the United States of America.
Home to a bunch of formerly bad but now improving pro sports teams, a ton of colleges, the OSU Buckeyes, actual buckeyes, part of the Rust Belt, Cedar Point and a lot of soybeans, cows, and corn.
Ohio contains a little bit of all the typical Midwestern environments- college towns, suburbs, cities, urban areas trying to reinvent themseles, farmlands, etc.  It also contains part of Appalachia, and a large number of "swing voters".  It has quite a few ardent liberals and conservatives, and has been the home and/or birthplace of eight presidents.  The weather, it being part of the Midwest region, is often "crazy" and swings between hot, mild, cold, and freezing.  The four seasons are widely known to be "winter, still winter, almost winter, and construction" or something to that effect (believed to be taken from a Jeff Foxworthy chain email).
There's definitely a lot more there than bad drivers, "hicks", and cows, and just driving through the state does not really do it justice.  You've got to experience it to really understand it, and then you can pass judgement.
2) A song written by Neil Young (while he was working with Crosby, Stills, Nash, and Young) in response to the [Kent State Massacre], which occured at Kent State University in Ohio on May 4, 1970 when National Guardsmen opened fire on student protesters on the KSU campus.I used to think that this state was propably the most suckish, boring state EVER.
I think a lot differently now.
Here are a few things about this Awesome state.

HISTORRRYYY
This was one of the first states of the Northeast, Established in 1803. The three main cities are Columbus, the capitol, Cleveland, and Cinncinati.
The Wright Brothers were raised in Ohio.
So were eight of America's presidents.
Aaand the first man to walk on the moon.
Akron was the first town to use police cars.
Cleveland was the first fully electric powered city.
Also the first state to use traffic lights.
And many many other things that I can't remember.

TIPS, HINT, AND INFO FOR ANY TOURIST...

1; STAY. AWAY. FROM. SPRINGFEILD. TOWNSHIP. This is basically the cespoo of Ohio. Unless you are crazy, like everyone else that lives in that weird place :D

2; ..I suggest dont go to Toledo.

3; If you have the courage to yell, 'I LOVE MICHIGAN' in a public area...You. Will. Be. Eaten. Alive. Unless you're in Toledo.

4; When you hear someone yell, 'O-H', you yell 'I-O'. Dont ask questions. Just do it. 

5; Don't. Diss. OSU. You will also be eaten alive for that also. Again, unless you're in Toledo

6; In response to number one, stay away from Ellet too.

7; Our weather is crap and very unpredictable. Deal with it. I suggest bringing snowboots in the middle of summer and shorts in the dead of winter.

8; Only we can diss our state. If you diss it, we'll agree with you for that second, then again, eat you alive.

9; There's a 3/4 chance you will be eaten alive.

So, that's only 1/4 of the stuff in Ohio. Come here to figure out the rest for yourself :D
But...Try not to be eaten alive...America is the melting pot of the world; Ohio is the melting pot of America.  There will never be a pot more melting than Ohio.  Some say this makes Ohio a blurry combination of everything, and that it is not very distinct among the states, but this is cantrary to the truth.  No other state is like Ohio, in that it is a melting pot.  Also, Ohio's flag is one of only three non-rectangular significant world flags, and the only non-rectangular flag of the states.  Ohio's also cool cuz I live there.Ohio is the heart of America and is well known for it's amusement park in Sandusky Ohio called Cedar Point, which has over fourteen rides and loads of tourists come summer.

Ohio also has a huge historical background which can be seen almost everywhere you go.

Ohio is one of the states with the most American accent.

It's pronounced, OH-HIGH-OH, not OH-HAI-UH. If you go to any person who was raised in Ohio they will laugh at you for pronouncing it differently than 99% of America.

Ohio rivals with Michigan about sports, and they don't like each other because Michigan thinks Ohioan's drive slow -- while Ohioans think they drive like bats out of hell. (Which they do.)

Most of Ohio is taken up by farms and fields, but don't judge it by the land, for there is many neat things you can discover in Ohio.The religious belief that every word of the sacred texts is literally true; stereotypically in Christianity and taken to such extremes. See also: [fundamentalist].A group of people comprising 0.002% of the world's population yet drawing unproportional amount of media coverage (especially Israeli Jews).1. Someone who practices Judaism.

2. Derogatory term for someone tight with their money or someone not very generous.The only people in the world that are simultaneously hated by both the extreme Left and the extreme Right.

Synonym: [scapegoat]A person of the jewish faith.Let's Clear up some of the Misconceptions in these postings.

A Jew is a person who's mother is Jewish. (Some streams of Judaism argue that Jewish patrimony can be acquired through the father as well). 
Jews are not a race but an eclectic mix of different races, nationalities, and cultures; they are a truly multi-cultural and multi-ethnic people. However, within this mix, there are distinct ethnic groups such as the Ashkenazic and Sephardic Jews that make up the overwhelming majority of the Jewish People. 
Most American Jews are of Ashkenazic origin -- usually originating from Eastern Europe or the former Soviet Union. Therefore, American Jews could largely be classified as an ethnic group, hence the characteristic stereotypes, although there are exceptions.
 A Jew is not a person who practices Judaism, although most Jews do adhere to some form of Jewish practice or cultural tradition.
 A Jew is not an Israeli and an Israeli is not a Jew. An Israeli is a citizen of the state of Israel. While most Israeli's are Jewish, there are also non-Jewish citizens of Israel. 
A Jew is not automatically a citizen of the state of Israel. A Jew must apply for and be granted citizenship to the state just like everyone else, although most are awarded citizenship rather easily.1) someone who practises judaism

2) is also a culture/ethnicity, that is to say it has a certain sense of humour, certain type of food and music etc.

3) A person who Mel Gibson talks smack about after he has had too much to drink.A southern bastardization and contraction of the two words "did you".Something you blame something.Like Christians, but without all that Jesus stuffone who practices the world's oldest monotheistic religionLacking any class. Dumb and unartful, like most of the words in this dictionary.
[fool]the classy way of saying awkward. use it.Adjective

gauche (comparative more gauche, superlative most gauche)

Positive
gauche
		

Comparative
more gauche
		

Superlative
most gauche

   1. Awkward or lacking in social graces; bumbling.

          Quotations:
              * "Seeking by vulgar pomp and gauche display" — Samuel Griswold (1793-1860)nuveau riche, "cursi", expensive but tackySocially ackward and lacking Social experienceThe hair on a dogs cock after the lipstick has been withdrawn.Male genitalia. Pronounced "gooch".A girl's boyfriend/crusha classy, sophisticated manner, much like audrey hepburn. it is classy, glamorous, without being a pushover, and without being flashy. its an element of class.Glam without being trampy - attention grabbing class! It is sophisticated, intelligent, and gorgeous.Chic is an elegant fashion sense, that is also very glamorous, and does NOT mean a girl, thats CHICK!Hard to define, a certain eliment of style and sophistication in your fashion sense. Almost artisticly stylish (don't ask).An abbreviation for Cherry Coke. Commonly herd in the hood.It's simply just another word for stylish.

FACTVery attractive lady with an air of elegance flowing around her but at the same time she is very friendly and approachable.

She is a very genuine character and there's nothing pretentious about her.

Very sexy but not slutty, not a skank. She dresses herself decently, and appropriately.To be super stylish. One of the cool people. Effortlessly awesome.An abbreviation of the word chica that close girlfriends or besties say to one another. Usually girls who are called this are hot, sassy and feisty!One of the tightest disco-funk band of all time.to groom a man.  Shaving, waxing, cleaning up the superfluous fur.A term used to define male grooming below the belt. A male can use both an electric razor or a regular razor. A Mach 3 is preferable with the ladies on the testicular area. No female likes to deal with hairy balls, so men must education themselves on proper manscaping and maintenance techniquesWhen men shave or trim their cock and ballsA mans grooming of his body hair.  Like landscaping, but for the body."I have no idea what this is."

- Jonathan GoldsmithA fine artform exclusive to men;  the continued upkeep of exceptional hygeine and strategic hair removal as they pertain to the male body.For a guy to trim his pubic hair or to style it fashionably.To trim male pubes back to a reasonable bush."I have no idea what this is"
- Jonathan GoldsmithA word used to discribe the shaving of a Males pubic /chest/ and back hairs.

-Its pronounced like Landscaping but with a (man) instead of (land).Describes the complicated love and affection shared by two straight males.-noun
1. A [non-sexual] [relationship] between two men that are unusually close.

-verb  -mans-ing
1. The act of wooing a fellow male friend for the purpose of becoming closer.
2. Going to unusual lengths in an attempt to become closer with another male friend.

also: "Bromancing the Stone"
1. The act of truly and thoroughly  enjoying the process of getting and/or being high/stoned. 

Provenance/Origin: "Bromance" is a [portmanteau] of the two words "brother" and "romance". Originally coined by author/editor Dave Carnie in "Big Brother Magazine." [Big Brother] was a sort of R rated [skateboarding]/skate culture magazine that was eventually purchased by [Larry Flynt]'s [Hustler] [conglomerate] and consequently taken out of [circulation] due to unsatisfactory sales [performance]. Carnie used the word on several occasions to describe relationships between [skate-buddies] who spent a lot of time together and/or shared hotel rooms on every tour/skate [road trip].A close relationship between two bros to such a point where they start to seem like a couple.The relationship between two straight guys. They enjoy each others company and even though they may constantly joke about being gay they are not.a highly formed friendship between male friends, or "bro's".(N) The intense complicated love shared between two heterosexual males that consists of but not limited to wrestling, numerous man-dates, and tons of other stories that will only remain between the two.

Also a form of male bonding to such a point where they start to seem like a couple.

This bond is normally only shared between two males that have a deeper understanding of each other, in a way no woman could ever realize.Bromance

-noun

A strictly non-sexual relationship between two completely heterosexual men that are close and enjoy eachothers company but still enjoy the company of women.What House and Wilson or George Clooney and Brad Pitt have.

Dating back to Plato and Socrates, a close but non-sexual relationship between two men. The whole is greater than the sum of the individual parts.

To girls this means, George Clooney + Brad Pitt>George Clooney or Brad Pittwhen two guys have a very close bond, to the point where they act like a couple, except that they are both straight. Signs of a bromance include, but are not limited to: knowing what the other is thinking, hanging out 27/7, hugging, extensive high-fiving, and sharing clothes. Some famous examples include Sherlock Holmes and Watson, and Captain Kirk and Spock.Noun- An intense and extreme non-sexual bond between two straight males. Said to be a “deep emotional bond” that no woman could satisfy.As a rule of thumb, it is profoundly unwise to take crack-cocaine. The brain has evolved a truly vicious set of negative feedback mechanisms. Their functional effect is to stop us from being truly happy for long. Nature is cruelly parsimonious with pleasure. The initial short-lived euphoria of a reinforcer as powerful as crack will be followed by a "crash". This involves anxiety, depression, irritability, extreme fatigue and possibly paranoia. Physical health may deteriorate. An intense craving for more cocaine develops. In heavy users, stereotyped compulsive and repetitive patterns of behaviour may occur. So may tactile hallucinations of insects crawling underneath the skin ("formication"). Severe depressive conditions may follow; agitated delirium; and also a syndrome sometimes known as toxic paranoid psychosis. The neural aftereffects of chronic cocaine use include changes in monoamine metabolites and uptake transporters. There is down-regulation of dopamine D2 receptors to compensate for their drug-induced overstimulation. Thus the brain's capacity to experience pleasure is diminished.Crack is something that is sold by both drug dealers and prostitutes. The only difference is that a prostitute can wash her crack and sell it again.Another form of cocaine:  2 parts cocaine to one part baking soda, with a little water, heat gently until a precipitate forms: this is your crack1. Smokeable cocain 
2. A program to unlock trial versions of programs 
3. "[butt cleavage]"Otherwise known as crack-cocaine, this illegal drug is a mixture of two parts cocaine and one part baking soda. This chemical process reverts the powder-cocaine mkaing process by one step, producing a smokable form of the naturally found alkaloid cocaine. Because of its nature as an inhalable substance, the high is quicker and more intense, leading to a larger number of addicts. In present society, it is considered to be much more distasteful to use crack-cocaine then powder-cocaine as crack is mainly viewed as a drug for poor people whereas powder cocaine is used by a richer constituancy. Contrary to popular belief, crack-cocaine is not freebase cocaine. Freebase cocaine is a mixture of cocaine, ether, and other dangerous and combustable materials. Baking soda was replaced as the ingredient in the 1980's to make production easier and less dangerous. Either way, crack and freebase cocaine produce the same smokable form of the drug.A small, illegal program who's sole purpose is to trick another program (by editting, imputting a registration key, or some other method) into thinking it has been registered.The area between the ass cheeks and, in females, including the crevices of the genitalia.Basically, crack is silly, intentionally non-serious, and has a high tendency to be extremely crazy and unfounded, such as purposeful [OOC]-ness or playing on cliches, inside jokes, and/or [fanon].
  
The term crack probably stems from crack as in crack cocaine, as opposed to a crack in a wall. As in, so horrendously unfounded/silly that only one could have come up with it while under the influence of crack.Something that is great, awesome, good.NOUN:
1. The solid form of the illicit, recreational drug, cocaine.
2. A small gap on the surface of an object.
3. An illegally obtained password or file to a copyrighted computer program.

ADJECTIVE:
1. The quality or state of excellence. (often used to describe music)
2. Having a small gap on the surface of an object. [-ed]

VERB:
1. To make a small gap on the surface of an object.
2. To illegally pass through some form of passive security (often used with computer programs, see NOUN-3).
3. To punch someone in an altercation.
4. To start. [-ing]
5. To be occurring. (often used in the greeting, "What's crackin'?!")An abbreviation for methamphetamine, a drug that stimulates the central nervous system by causing it to release more dopamine, a neurotransmitter that gives someone a feeling of satisfaction.a horrible drug that ruins lives, breaks up families, and does considerable damage to one's looks (its true, look at the before and after pictures). All the people who write definitions promoting it have no idea, and will be o-so-happy when all of their teeth fall out :)the stupidest shit EVERAn abbreviation for [methamphetamine], a drug that stimulates the central nervous system by causing it to release more dopamine, a neurotransmitter that gives someone a feeling of satisfaction.A stupid drug made used and made by [white trash] that's made out of cold medicine and other easily obtained chemicals.The lonely situation you find yourself in, after using methamphetamine. Typically, broke, with no job, falling apart, stuttering, wondering why you pulled into this parking lot "What the hell was I doing just now?" when all your "new best friends" have left you for better and you feel like it's the end of the world.A drug for fuckups.. Invented by some japenese guy approx. 80 years ago.. The hippie version is speed...Will fuck up ones life and their love ones; HIGHLY addictive, probably the most addictive drug; not only popular with so called "white trash" but very big in the Filipino community all across USA. (esp. cali, vegas, NY & JERSEY). Most users/dealers/runners and THE SOURCE know or have "heard" of one another.

They say, "don't knock it, until you TRY it" or "Try anything once", etc. etc. CRYSTAL METH does NOT apply to these sayings! DO NOT TRY IT!1. The reason why it is so hard to get decent over the counter meds for your freaking hayfever. 2. [Crack] for [rural] and [suburban] white people.Short for methamphetamines. The most highly addictive illicit narcotic made from all sorts of deadly toxins: metals, cold medicines, rat poison, chlorine, bleach, etc. The drug is so dangerous and deadly, that it can explode when being produced incorrectly. Unfortunately, the drug has a strangle hold on America and destroys cities, families, and eventually the addict themself. It makes the addict lose their looks, teeth, health, personality, etc. On the streets its known as ICE, SPEED and CRYSTAL METH. The drug turns you into a loser and eventually a criminal and convict. It is highly addictive because it stimulates the central nervous system, giving a feeling of euphoria and relaxation. Meth is the fastest-growing illegal drug in the United States, and is actually growing the fastest among caucasians in upper middle-class suburbs and rural areas.Gin is an unaged [liquor] made by [distill]ing [grain]s such as [barley], [corn] or [rye]. Its [bouquet] comes from [juniper] berries, [coriander], [herb]s and [spice]s, usually added to the grain mash during [distillation]. The gin is stored in [glass], [earthenware] or [stainless steel] containers, but does not mature in these. The storage time serves only to harmonize the product.

Someone once said that "A [bar] without gin is like an Italian kitchen without pasta". No other [liquor] provides for the creation of so many classic [cocktail]s. Gin is in fact a liquor that is harmonious with almost anything.

Without gin the king of [cocktail]s, the dry [Martini], would not exist.An often strong liquor, usually clear but with a strong smell, much like rubbing alcohol. Sold under brands like Gordon's 'London Dry Gin' and Bombay 'Sapphire'. Often used to escape life temporarily or make high skool more interesting.An archaeic word for Aboriginal Females
considered offensive but curiosly still allowed to be used to name Australian places. Gin-Gin Falls for example(n) An individual of aboriginal origin. (Offensive)(n) in poker, drawing/flopping/turning the best card or combination of cards (typically it gives one a very strong hand and one's opponent a strong but second-best hand); frequently used with the verb 'to hit' and occasionally followed by 'card(s)'

etymology: probably originating from the card game of the same namePronounced "gĭn" not "jĭn" -Bahamian slang meaning "going to".A grain liquor that smells and tastes like pine needles.Slang for the female genitalia.In hold 'em poker: Describes a hand's relationship to a flop when conditions exist where not only is the hand likely the strongest, but can also easily improve to the [nuts] (aka best hand possible).a girl who is ready to suck any nigga up just for popularity or cause they happen to be real thirsty.The surest way of getting nothing from something.when your not sure if you have to fart or shit and you take the chance any way thats what gambling is all aboutGiving money to native americans.1. An improvident activity in which winning gleefully proceeds losing. 2. The saddled process of chasing one's loses or blowing one's winnings. 3. Chinese finger cuffs. 4. An insatiable itch erroneously believed to be satisfied by scratching. 5. The willingness to ask Chance for Certainty.just a way to get ahead.v., intransitive

A quick way to riches and power.

It's a sure thing.the act of masturbating. the reference is to the hand gesture made to imply masturbation, which greatly resembles the shaking of dice.custom-made; looking like it cost a million bucksOne of the powerful masculin [trends] for 2008 in fashion. Bespoke [tailoring] reffers to a particularity of british fashion, but the term 'bespoke' is now extended to all life's domains, as a powerful mark of [luxury], an anti-brand/ anti-globalisation reaction.The act of shoving a bicycle pump up a woman's rectum while going down on her.(1)A drink that often burns when consumed by itself, but goes good mixed with various sodas (see: [pepsi], [coke], [7-up]) and sometimes even water. Straight shots are smoother if chilled, and some whiskeys such as Seagram's Seven can be consumed straight by even those with the weakest stomachs.

(2)A drink which makes old men's I.Q.s increase exponentially after every shot, eventually leading to a bar full of omniscient men who can't even begin to consider that for once they might just be wrong.

(3)Something good to come out of Canada.The life giving substance that has intoxicated many a man. (better than eve and that god damn apple)Part of the military phonetic alphabet. As one might expect, Whiskey = W.An alcoholic beverage made from ingredients similar to beer, but intended for grown ups. Suitable for use as an aftershave, by men who consider that perfumed stuff too girly.The best fucking drink in the world. Not too mention the manliest. Mixed with [weed], it can cause one to become fucking [crunk]. Puts hair on your chest.1. The oil of conversation, the philosophic wine, the ale that is consumed when good fellows get together, that puts a song in their hearts and laughter on their lips, and the warm glow of contentment in their eyes;

2. Christmas cheer;

3. The stimulating drink that puts the spring in the old gentleman’s step on a frosty, crispy morning;

4. The drink which enables a man to magnify his joy, and his happiness, and to forget, if only for a little while, life’s great tragedies, and heartaches, and sorrows;The reason I get up in the morning and the reason I pass out at night.Proof that God loves us and wants us to be happy.The cause of and solution to all life's problems!Its the fifth element after water, fire, earth and wind... Nothing exists without it!A magic potion used to make people of the opposite look bettera liquid form of carbohydrates that should be drank as a replacement for all other liquids, especially waterwhat men need to function dailyThe piss of angels.- After Bacon. it's the way of life
- The saver of old lonely men
- It even sounds cool..heh..heh.. Beer.a substance imbibed by males which, in time improves the appearance of ugly women and should be purchased more than makeup cuz it does a whole hell of a lot more for ya if yer really ugly than any makeup ever willA drink which makes you strong and clever.What you put in water bottles and bring to school.Vodka is a clear, colorless, unaged [liquor] "made from [ethyl alcohol] from agricultural origin". It was originally made in [Russia] from [potato]es, but today's vodka, which is almost odorless and tasteless, is usually made from [grain], primarily [barley] and [wheat], and occationally from [rye].

Vodka is integral to many [cocktail]s such as the [Screwdriver], [Bloody Mary] and Vodka [Martini]. If served straight, it should always be icy-cold.

Flavored vodkas have become popular in the [United States] and may be flavored with anything from [fruit]s to hot [pepper]s. Some flavored vodkas are even sweetened slightly.As a Russian who is experienced in the art of vodka consumption i feel obligated to provide the following information about vodka drinking.
A) Vodka should never ever under any circumstances be bought in a plastic bottle
B) Vodka should never be served ice-cold or even moderately could when straight. BUT!!!!! the shoot glass should be ice cold.
C) Just because you have a carton of Tropicana and a bottle of Smirnoff doesn't mean you can make a screwdriver. Screwdrivers never have any plump in them
D) When drinking vodka never sip it, or drink it slowly! This way of drinking vodka leads to loss of taste buds and a reeking smell.
E) Before taking a shot of vodka cheers must be said, then let out all the air you have in your lungs, drink and inhale at the same time.
F) NEVER EVER CHASE VODKA WTH BEAR
G) A good tactic for not getting sick while drinking vodka, is to supplement it with soda and some snacks.
H) Drinking vodka together with bear and champagne leads to short term memory loss.

facts
Vodka a 40% alcoholic drink. In theory it can be made out of anything, even wood or marijuana. The solution to this magnificent drink is extremely simple: a 2/5 ratio of alcohol and water. Non-mass produced vodka, which is available in most of Europe and Russia, is an expensive high quality drink, which went through as many as 8 stages of filtration and sold for more that 100$ a bottle.
Rarely it is mixed in to cocktails, such as vodka martini and the screw driver.
In the United States only commercial, mass produced vodka is available and has a number of flaws. A) it is not made in Russia, even if it is called Smirnoff of Stolichnaya, but New Jersey or in the best case scenario Sweden.
Best brand of Vodka are: VEDA and BELUGA BLACK, these two brands made Stoli and Absolute look like absolute shit!
Please drink responsibly and enjoy.Low cost and effective engine fuel, industrial solvent and poison. Some people also like to drink the stuff.quite strong alocolic liquid (40-60%).
not brewed, like wine, so it doesn`t taste like yeast. what most people will use to get [shitfaced]. To avoid death, it is adviced to mix the vodka with a non-alcohol liquid.Unfortunately it has become a pop culture joke. Most popular vodkas (smirnoff, absolut) are absolut shit and made in Sweden or Finland or something. Real and good vodka must be made in a slavic country. There is an ongoing argument with Poland and Russia over who created the drink. There is more evidence that says Poland coined the term vodka(wódka) for it and first started mass consumption of it. However, it was most likely created by persians or arabs. Slavic and also celtic people have the highest alcohol tolerances.A drink that can be either complete shit or damn fine. Has one of the most delicate tastes if properly filtered. Quartz filtered vodka recomended over a charcoal filterBasically, alcohol mixed with water. An alternative to just plain raw alcohol, invented by people who did not die like 4 seconds after drinking it (and apparently wanted more). Go to any spot in Russia you can buy it for like 50 kopeiks (2 cents) a bottle

Comes from the Russian word "water" (meaning that the Russians practically drink it as if it was water)Has 3 meanings:

1. Clear alcoholic beverage made from fermented grain or potatoes

2. Water in Russia, since most water found in russia that is not frozen is hazordous to your health and may be fatal

3. God in Russia, the Russian God, or, the God of the Russian people, or perhaps just the poor bums on the streets of RussiaWhen you have to hold on to the grass to keep from falling off the earth.A word defining a person who has had too much alcohol.  See also:  hammered, sloshed, shit-faced, tanked, blitzed, bombed, wrecked, three sheets to the wind, drunkened, loose, tipsy, defcon 1, well-done, trashed, jagged up, Irish, canned, smashed, fucked-up, intoxicated, inebriated, aniahalated, laced, (etc.)Chemically incovienencedA sublime way of existing in a world full of idiots.One's alter ego who is blamed for all things of a regrettable nature.The state you're in when you won't give two shits about what you say. You will be fucking uninhibited and won't give a shit what anyone thinks. You will be happy and motherfucking confident. You will be sippin dranks and feeling like a baller. Euphoria on a scale of 1 to 10: a motherfuckign 10................
So give it up to alcohol, bitches. this shit is legit, and deserves fucking respect, (that bottle of sailor jerrys was fucking good by the way)
Nigger. if you dont like alcohol, you can just kill yourself cause your iq is in the negatives!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!1. Past tense of "drink".
2. Your girlfriend's dad.
3. Spinning without moving.when you have to close one eye to keep people from splitting in two.Intoxicated with alcoholic liquor to the point of impairment of physical and mental faculties. 
Caused or influenced by intoxication.a state of being that one can only hope to constantly attainThe magic wand that can make a man dissappearaccident indicatorThe alternative to the orange.THE MOST BADASS FUCKING FRUIT ON THE FUCKING PLANET. SERIOUSLY, THIS MOTHERFUCKER KICKS THE SHIT OUT OF THE PUSSY ORANGE OR BANANA. THIS JUICY, RED MOTHERFUCKER IS THE BEST FUCKING THING THAT GOD HAS EVER CREATED. EAT AN A APPLE AND YOUR DICK WILL GROW 3 INCHES. FUCK.A horrendous company that has somehow managed to stay afloat for years and appeal to a mass of misguided people.  They specialize in taking existing technology, making it all shiny and fancy looking, and re-selling it for double the price.  Ironically, their slogan is "Think Different".

Their latest and greatest gadget that's getting all the attention is, of course, the iPhone, which is basically comparable to any high-quality $150 phone, except it has "innovative" touch screen technology, and it sells for $600.

Apple couldn't quite figure out how to make an operating system, so they just stole the freeBSD kernel and repackaged a bastardized version of it as Mac OS X.  It's funny that Apple brags that it's "Unix-based", since no one with experience in Unix would ever use a Mac.

Apple frequently runs "clever" ads.  Although they've made a ton of them, all the ads boil down to how Windows has viruses and crashes all the time.  Apple also have an enormous, cult-like fanbase that like to remind us of these things every five seconds.  Apple fanboys are generally smug, annoying, and arrogant, despite the fact that most of them don't know jack shit about computers.what the fuck are you looking at the definition of apples for you stupid fuck?The truly heinous name of Chris Martin and Gwenyth Paltrow's lovechild.The result of a mindblowing or humiliating situation in which the victim is posed one question:A greedy-ass company that makes a shit tone of money and over-prices their productsA manufacturer of computers, peripherials, and software with around a 3% share of the pc market. 
Most well-known products include:
imac
ipod
itunes
OS X
final cut pro
ibook

While their operating system's market share may be significantly below that of Microsoft's windows, many still prefer to use Apple's computers and software, especially for graphical design and audio work. 

Many people like to debate over the superiority of macs over pcs and visa versa, such people have no lives.A shortened version of [apples and pears], which is cockneyrhyming slang for stairs.Australian Slang for goodThe kind of guy most girls ACTUALLY want when they say they want a [Nice Guy].

Jerks are selfish, manipulative bastards who see women as little more then sexual conquests to brag about to their buddies or mere objects that are there for their personal pleasure. As to ensure the post-sex breakup will be in their favor, Jerks often play the "sensative guy" early on so the girl will make most of the moves on HIM, and after he's done with her and dumps her for some other girl just like her, he can make it look like she's at fault for coming on too strong, and consequently she'll take him back if he chooses to return for seconds.

Typically are/were [Frat Boy]s, [Jock]s, and [Prep]s in school.Noun. An [idiot] or stupid person. An insensitive, selfish, ignorant, cocky person who is inconsiderate and does stupid things.1.  Final stage of evolution of any male who spent at least one year dating in America, no matter his origin
2.  Mandatory mindset for self-survival within corporate America
3.  At this point of no return, group synonym for an elusive + cocky + self-confident + self-centered + loud + crazy male
4.  A guy that doesn’t give a flyin’ fuck about anything else but his handsome allure and annoying success.
5.  THE abusive attitude that will surely attract any girl’s love in America. For life
6.  A guy that enhances any girl’s low self-esteem and insecurity without meaning it. Then gets blamed for it.
7.  A guy that does not return any “I love you” s but keeps smiling at his girl’s face until she melts down and asks for more of that shit :)
8.  Every bitches’ openly discussed concern. Yet every bitches’ secret love.
9.  A challenge  aka any girl’s biggest turn-on.
10.  A bitch with a dick.1. A mean/heartless person.

2. More common: A guy who perfectly fits the gender stereotype, and is insensitive, controlling, and will treat women like sex objects. Though many women constantly complain about guys like that, most end up with one, because they didn't dig deeper and didn't try to see through the jerk's crap. Instead of going for a [nice guy] who will obviously be there for a girl, most girls choose what's right in front of them, a cold-hearted bastard who happens to look "macho", who is a big-time flirt and wears his penis on his sleeve.An alternative to dating.A very powerful word to call someone... Unlike the f-word, "jerk" doesn't lose it's power the more you say it.A person you really love that just doesn't see how much you care for them, and yet, every so often actually treats you good, only to then act completely different from who they were when you first met them.In medival Europe,masturbation was considered to be on the brink of insanity. So as an insult, people would call each other "jerk-offs", and soon, jerk was enough to get the point across.The man all girls are attracted to.A person who does not use their turn signal.(uh-nak-ruh-niz-uhm)

From Middle Greek anachronismo, the word Anachronism refers to an event, person, object or custom that is chronologically out of place. It can also be an error in chronology, in which a person, object, event, etc., is assigned a date or period other than the correct one.out of place or at the wrong timeAn object or event that is seemingly out of place in time.out of the proper time.A hospital you never ever want to be admitted to. We all have that one wacko job for a relative or friend. Multiply that by like 300 and stick them all in a tiny room painted baby blue and make them talk about the issues they have and watch them go. It's like playing a game of stick the yellow shapes in the right spots and wait for the red box to explode and blow pieces everywhere. If you live near one I suggest you move because the crazy ass-holes break out the glass and run free. Then it is like playing a game of "Where's Weirdo". I worked at one and I will say that I could not wait to get to work. There was never a dull moment. If you love caos and mayhem you really should consider a career at the nut house.1. Sci-fi movie/book about a retro-ish gang leader who after beating people up, raping, stealing, etc, is taken to prison where he later is chosen to participate in a "special treatment" program to "cure" him.

2. Also, a term used in the CWO book to describe a person who is perfectly moral, nonviolent, etc; but has no free will.A object (or person in the case of the movie) which appears normal on the outside but is completely artificial on the inside.someone who appears normal to the eye and holds the colors of life (orange), but is really a tool for someone or something else (clockwork)A clockwork orange comes from an old London saying "queer as a clockwork orange". A clockwork orange is actually a wind up doll that is controlled by both god and the devil. Anthony Burgess uses this for his book to symbolize the government almost brainwashing Alex in order to control his bad behavior.A novel which came out BEFORE the movie, commonly fooling idiots. Learn to read.Oddest, most kickass movie. 
Alex is a stud.one of the best damn movies everThe orbital subway around Glasgow. So named due to it's circular route and orange subway trains. Also famous for it's central role in The [Glasgow Subcrawl].Person who has no free will, is a victim of a cruel psyhological therapy (A Clockwork Orange), or a person who is unable to make it's own choices between good and bad1.Original a from slang (from a part of London) that means a homosexual.
2.A novel by Anthony Brugess.  The novel was based somewhat on his life, such as one of the rape scenes.  The novel was about  totalirism and the good and evil of humans.
3.An amazing movie based on Anthony Burgess' Novel.  The director banned the film himself due to it's 'ultra violent' nature.Judgment (American English); judgement (British English)1. Judgement occurs when the judgee is struck with; either "the stick of judgement" (1 - 4) or with "the ball of judgement", both currently in use in Devon, UK.

2.  The act of vigilante violence.The collective term for a group of [hipsters].What is considered justA clan of fags lead by 2 old people who no one like except for the fags who join it.The Pirate is an oft misunderstood individual who can be seen absolutely pwning everyone around him/her. Well versed in the arts of cheekiness, deceit, extortion(sp), theft, blackmail, smarmery, and crazy acrobatic sword and or knife fighting. The  pirate always lands on his feet, and always wins, even when you think not. naturally hates the ninja, as ninjas are overated far too serious for their own good. 
the most 31337 p1r4735 sometimes join the ranks of the mysterious Shadow Pirates.1. One who drinks rum, get angry, and stab things.
2. A sailing criminal who, sails on a ship, steals from other ships, lives without any law:only a set of morals, survives on goods stolen from other ships/ports.When a woman is giving you head pull out before ejaculation and blow your load in her eye. Then kick her in the shin. After completing those 2 tasks you have gave a women the pirate.Pirates are a sea fearing folk, oft to be seen pilaging, raping, murdering, or commiting other acts of piracy. They usually own a monkey, parrot, or sexy wench.The coolest motherfucking people to ever exist.1. n. Arch rival of the [ninja].
2. n. Devotee of the [Flying Spaghetti Monster].1. Always land on their feet
2. have cool eye patches ... even if they have both eyes
3. have dice
4. have guns
5. pirates are not ordinary humans so they can kill ninjas!
6. have cool ships
7. have better swords then ninjas
8. are all around better then ninjas
9. have a lot of movies about them (way more then ninjas)
10. wear red on thursdays
11. have graduated from Pyro Pirate Academy of One-Eyed Peter!
12. polish their peg legs
13. say thinds like scally-wagger and scurvy-chap
14. Arrrrr! need i say more
15. pack a mean punch
16. always have the best snacks
17. will make you walk the plank if your not as cool as them
18. start all the major fashion trends
19. don't go crying to their mommies ... like ninjas
20. know how to handle a lady
21. knows how to DAG people better then ninjas
22. have pretty cool boots
23. get all the tasty rum
24. have pretty good cursive
25. have more extended vocabualary then ninjas
26. are absolutley amazing!!!
ARRRR!The name given to the coolest dudes to ever sail the seven seas. They have cool boats, cool planks and cool wooden legs. Parrots are also optional. Their main duties include searching far and wide for, "pluder," or, "bling," as it would now be known.The holy being in the religion of Pastafarianism. Often prayed to by followers of the Flying Spaghetti Monster. R'amen.Better than ninjasa small sexy piece of underwear that girls wear and it attracts men. When a girl bends over, it tends to show out from under her jeans or hipsters. Men love them.By far one of the best forms of underwear.  It is small, with strings going around the hips, a small piece of cloth in the back, and cloth in the front.  Many girls wear them, useful in preventing "Panty Lines" from coming through when they wear tight pants.  Also, a huge turnon for guys when girls bend over, and they pop up about the pants.What comes out when someone with a lisp tries to say the word "song"1.underwear that makes guys horny when they see the strings pulled up and the cheeks of an ass when a girl wheres a dress on a windy day
2. Panties that girls where so that they leave a less distinct pantyline so they dont look like there wearing grandma panties in booty shorts1). A peice of lingerie that goes up your ass. Comfortable. Most would disagree, but some say it is comfy, like me.

2). A sandle or flip flop worn in Summer.Retro Definition: Rubber, slip-on sandals (a.k.a. 'flip-flops' or 'jap-flaps'), usually worn for water activities. This definition has been provided as a Public Service Announcement.Thongs are a type of footwear, also known as 'Flip-Flops'. Not to be mistaken with the sexy [thong] garment of underwear.Australian for cheap rubber footwear, known as [flip flops]or [jandles] in New zealand, dunno what yanks call them.A perpetual wedgie.the word used in Australia, to define flip flops.an occupation that involves taking (stripping) one's clothes off for the sexual stimulation of others. most strippers are female.A girl that guys are dumb enough pay $20 for a 5 minute dry hump.  She swoons at his ridiculous pickup lines and laughs at his stupid jokes to make him think he's getting somewhere with her, so he continues to fork out the money in hopes of impressing her to the point that he'll get more than just a case of blue balls and an experience to jack off to before going to bed that night.  But after giving her the last of his money, she tells him she'll be right back.  After several minutes he realizes she isn't coming back, so he leaves the club disappointed and flat broke, and as he's leaving, he sees her grindin her ass into some other dumb bastard's lap.A stupid bitch who got pregnant when she was a teenager by a losser and now gets naked for dollars to support her bastard childSomebody (usually a woman) who uses provocative dance whilst dis-robing to extract money from sad, sex-starves letches.A woman who seeks to relive her chaotic childhood experience by disrobing and rubbing her snatch on a brass pole in front of men that care for her like her father did.woman with a hot body that is really dead inside. they give u pleasure without sex and take all ur cash. if u make a move on her, her big black bitches will beat the shit out of you and take all ur moneyThe official occupation of a  [single mother],  or any struggling woman trying to make  [ends]  meet1.  A person who takes off their clothes and dances around to make money.
2.  A peeler or ripperFlashy, showy. An item or person who, superficially, appears better than they actually are.
Deliberately trying to look good but lacking substance(unlike [spongey]) 
In the case of people, usually accompanied by an arrogant or over-confident sense of self-absorbtion.An individual; male or female, with the athletic prowess of a jungle cat and the tits (or balls) enough to take off their clothes and dance around butt naked in front of a crowd of people for tips. These people are adept in the art of flirting, fantasy creation and erotic dance. Not a profession for the weak willed or faint of heart, it is an art not understood by many and thus often disrespected.prostitute. started in the civil war When Gen.Hooker of the Union Army (the first [pimp]) tried to protect his troops from VD by buying the best chicks and pimping them to his corps of 20,000 men. orginally hooker's girls.A not-so-rare breed of female that is overtly loose between the legs.  Much like dinosaurs, these creatures cannot see anything unless it moves.

Sometimes called "street t-rex"1. A source of pleasure, mainly sex, bt only if payed.
2. Target practice.The "new" cool. Sort of like kool, kewl, wet, or badass. This word can be used to replace cool to make your sentences all the better!Term used to describe a type of female that is:

- Easy to [bang]
- Takes money for sex
- Disappointed male does not get anyA woman who is wise above others in the art of sexual satisfaction and [love].  In ancient times, these women were considered to be priestesses and were given their own temples where they could teach their art to others for a large sum of money.   These women were highly respected and cherished for their extensive knowledge of lovemaking/giving, and their spiritual understanding.  

Later, the christian religion would have a great negative effect on these women's lives, mostly because the spiritual beliefs of these cunt-lovin' cultures were pagan (a big no-no to chiristianity).   as christianity spread, people started to see sex as a sin, and the priestesses were slowly blacklisted.  today, this christian idea of sex as a sin still stands, and hookers are now considered criminals.A woman (usu) who receives money for chugging the snotty end of a piss pump until the "john's" fuck stick blows a bileous ball bilge bolis of throat yogurt down the back of her crack smoking gullet.A [prostitute]. Usually, prostitutes are females, but plenty of prositutes are males.

Hookers sell their bodies to a variety of people, from unassuming men to really freaky characters. Just imagine having sex with half a dozen strange men each day for money: it's not a pleasant thought.

And prostitutes don't have sex for money because they like it; it's about the money. They might often hate their line of work, but they have no other way out.

Hookers range from the [chic] [call girl], who is higher class and has control over the situation, to the lowly [streetwalker], who is vulnerable to attack or police entrapment.

And remember: use a [condom] if you're with a prostitute, unless you want [clamydia], [gonorrhea], [herpes], [AIDS], [hepatitis], [syphilis], or other *charming* diseases.A sexy woman who fucks men who need to be fucked. A woman who gives pleasure to desperate males like me when In need of pussy.Slang,What you might call a close friend. used like the word buddy or pal.not the traditional definition. OR, a reference to girls or women that might, or might not be actual women for hire.What i always call my friend Bill X when i see him, and he responds in the same fashion.1.Actual bowling, with 10 pins and 1 ball.
2. Masturbating, with 2 balls and 1 pin.Simply a codeword for smoking Cannabis to be used around non-users1. Noun; The sport in which you throw a bowling ball at pins.
2. Verb; usually means to smoke weed (hints the word "bowl"ing)When engaging in sexual intercourse, in the doggy style position, place your middle finger and ring finger in the females anal sphincter and your thumb in her vagina and grip vigorously like it's a bowling ball while you pump and thrust.Same rules as bowling except instead of knocking down pins each player must cash a bowl.
Strike = One hit to cash the bowl
Spare = Two hits to cash the bowl
Gutter Ball = A person Volcano's or drops the pins (danks)When a female rubs her breast against another females vagina in an up and down motion which can lead to orgasm.Filling all three of a woman's holes during the act of sexual intercourse, as if she was a bowling ball.  This can be done by three men, or by one man using the penis and hands (a modified [shocker]) or by one man taking turns at each hole.throwing an oversized, [extremely] heavy, painted coconut at pinsThe act of sticking you thumb in a womans ass while hitting it from the back, holding her ass such as a bowling ball.The act of transferring a joint roach into a bowl to finish it off.Someone who frequently dates girls that other guys have thrown out like trash.  Usually goes for girls that are getting over a bad breakup.bench player, who has the primary quality of burning minutes and chipping in the occassional goal.

Term mostly used in hockey, but can also be used in basketball or baseball.individual(s) who pick up your trash.  If left out on a certain day each week.1) someone who picks up girls who have recently split from their partners. Regarded as a [twat] by all those around him.
2) Someone who picks up a lot of points from rebounds in American Sports.A guy who constantly picks up, or takes out, horrifically trashy women."Who can take the trash and the twisty things too? 

--- The garbage man can, the garbage man can!"The process of which a man shits inside a girls vagina then fucks her. This could be used instead of lube.When you see someone hitting on a person and it falls through so that person continues to hit on someone else until they succeed. It can also be a person that is a last resort.A garbageman is a man with a massive package, and he flaunts it, by wearing tight shorts, undies, kilts, etc.
He WILL place his 'junk' on you, if he feels aroused and/or threatened.  Typically used in homosexual/incestual type situationsA sex move during which a man penetrates a woman who is in the process of vomiting.  Ideally, pelvic thrusts will coincide with gastric contractions.The black man's 747.A special mode of transportation of asorted goods and persons. Involving large vehicles claimed to be 'busses' which are secretly cheaply created allein space-crafts bringing the opeouts to the masses.Very short skirt, only an inch from the *hare*.Best pets every! there lazy and dont move most of the time... but will get up every one and awhile to greet you1. A large bus, derived from the company greyhound. Commonly used to transport those who cannot afford faster, more efficient or more luxurious transportation.

2. An alcoholic beverage mixing gin, and grapefruit juice.Racing dog.

A bus that goes state to state.The Runaway's method of running awayTo fatally injure by decapitation with a hunting knife.For people unable to afford quicker and more efficient methods of transportation.

A wonderful way to see the worst parts of many cities across the country.1. A hot, older man aged 56 yo and up a dilf. 2. The final step in the dilf/hound dog continuum.Short for [Warped Tour]. A punk rock concert tour that occurs every summer. It usualy has around 6 stages and near or more than 50 bands. The Warped Tour is sponsered by Vans and has been running for just over 10 years.To be convoluted, twisted, rippled or distorted.when a person gets so crazy high that they begin to see things with a distorted appearance, as if they are warped.

usually affective after smoking very chronic weed or getting hella fucked up from anything else.Cool or funny in a weird way.1. something that is so insanely cool
2. unbelieveableAfter you have smoked a lot of marajuana, u feel in the zone, (the place where you want to be)and altered

(another meaning for stoned,baked,blazed)1)getting high.2)severly underrated red hot chili peppers songAnother way of saying WTFOne sexy biatch, Constantly harrased by Flea, Moxin and Subotai for sexual favors but they're below Warped and not in his his league.When a person gets so [seshed] they start to lose touch with reality.  Almost a high sensation.

See [sesh].The act of vomiting, hurling, barfing, losing lunch, tossing cookies, ralfing, throwing up, yacking, retching, technicolour yawning, spewing, blowing chunks, and/or other forms of physical illness.What happened that time in seventh grade when you walked in on your parents.Slang meaning to vomit.  The word 'puke' is sometimes considered offensive.1. the act of vomiting
2. vomit itself

See also [word]mag[/word]to pour acidic vomit from you stomach out your face.to vomitFilipino term for vagina or pussy; the hole between the legs of a woman where the penis goes in and out until ejaculation occurs; (pronounced as "pooh - key")Tagalog for female genitalsExtremely annoyingThe act of or the action of relieving your stomach contents in a matter of bile, food, or other stomach contents is projected from the stomach to the esophagus out of the mouth. Also known as throwing up.Indifference; to be used when one simply does not care."The verbal equivalent of a shrug of the shoulders." -quoth meused in the greatest tv show of all time [The Simpsons]. in the episode Hungry, Hungry Homer, bart and lisa respond to a homer inquiry with "meh". mystery solvedMeh is used to describe any and every word possible, including:
Yes
No
maybe
kind of
never
always
ok
alright
no thankyou
yes please
look bitch i really dont care so just shut the fuck up
if you want
whatever
If you wnat
i dont want to really
well
shut up
i dont really care
no honestly, i dont care...

...and is never explained on which is actually used...An interjection used to imply indifference towards a subject; "a verbal shrug".  This particular interjection has somehow become quite popular among teens, the reason for this popularity is a mystery.  Other popular interjections are "bleh", "dah", and "mih".  Usu. pronounced shortly, without eye contact or body movement.This is a universal, non-commital answer to every question ever posed. Its the answer that deosn't actually give any answer.A random word when people either don't know what to say, don't care, can't answer a question or are too drunk to form a coherent english phrase.Indifference, or I do not care, also whateverAn expression of [apathy].Meh is used to say whatever, I don't care, I don't have an answer, I have nothing else to say, I'm frustrated, not interested or your joke isn't funny.The only thing that's fun to do anymore.An escape from life, like (see [weed]).  When you get back, the problems of life hit you in the face like a brick.The only thing that brings me joy.computerized games involving many gernes of typesa form of entertainment that is composed of any type of game put into a digital image on a screen and is operated by the player through means of a control connected to a form of a console 

commonly a scapegoat for politicians and crappy parents 

my hobbyThe target of every [Soccer mom], [politician], and [feminist] who (1) has never played a videogame in her life, (2) doesn't know how to discipline her kid, thanks to all the time she spent marrying and divorcing 4 or 5 times, and (3) is looking for an easy [scapegoat] for her incompetence.3D or 2D virtual games that can waste your time for good and fun.One of the best forms of entertainment.a true test of skill, unless you have it on fuckin easy you nerd!A program that is more than a form of entertainment. It offers us an escape from the dullness of reality, a place where we can do things we actually can't.passing a homeless person on your way to a [coin star] machine.a word used by prude or unattractive girls in situation in which they feel weirded out by the presence of a confident young guy trying to make conversationhaving your flat mate walk in on you while you are making out with yourself in the mirror, moaning, and saying in a deep, sexy, voice: "oh, baby".1. Ungraceful; ungainly.
2. Clumsily or unskillfully performed.
3. Marked by or causing embarrassment or discomfort.When two pedophiles meet up after chatting as 15 year olds online.A common word overused by kids in junior high, almost in the same group with "LOL" and "random!". Used to try and impress your preteen friends after or during a long pause between conversations. Also used by idiots whenever there is a pause in speech. Sometimes accompanied by a hand motion resembling a turtle or a turkey.Interjection used in a situation that is slightly uncomfortable, often accompanied by a gesture where the lower arm is thrust out parallel to the ground with the hand open and fingers together with thumb on top.Interjection used in a situation that is slightly uncomfortable, often accompanied by a virety of gestures: 1. Pulling the collar with one finger (this represents the sweat collecting under the collar from the AWKWARD situation) 2. Arms form a triangle over the head (such as the A in YMCA) 3. One finger pointing at the back of the other hands wrist 4. Pointing at the back of the neckA comment made by a third party in response to someone saying something inappropriate or embarrasing themselves in some way, thus causing an awkward silence for several seconds.

Saying "awkard" is often a remark deliberately aimed at stating the obvious to make the situation just that little bit more cringe-worthy.

for related topic please see [ground swallow me up], [dig a hole] and [keep digging]A situation which is of a significant amount of discomfort, and a subject of hilarity and confusion for those not involved.Round objects dangling in a scrotum. Only men have testicles. Women love to kick, knee, squeeze, or otherwise abuse them. When struck, testicles cause extreme pain.A word you say when there is awkward silence in a room with three or more people.1. Two walnut-sized coils of tubing inside the [scrotum] containing the reproductive fluid of a male, [semen]. 

2. An ancient greek hero.Testicles or testes are the pair of male glands that produce sperm fluid; the tiny sperm in the fluid each contain half the 'information' required to produce another being of the same species. The other half is provided by the egg that is produced in the female equivalent glands called ovaries. When sperm is spurted into the female via the penis and has travelled through the cervix into the womb, the thousands of sperm surround the 'waiting' egg and when one sperm is successful in piercing the egg, the egg, which is hundreds of times larger than the sperm, then prevents further sperm from doing so. The egg is then "fertilized" and eventually grows into a new being of the same species.

The testicles also produce a hormone called testosterone; this hormone in large doses is what makes a being grow into a male. Thus testicles are what makes a male a male!

Unfortunately for mammals, the testicles have to be on the outside of the body so that they do not get too warm. They are composed of tiny tubes or sperm ducts where the sperm are produced; these tubes are coiled up like very thin coils of spaghetti and are contained within an outer cover attached to the body by a thicker tube (the testicle or sperm chord). This chord has a thin walled swelling at the testicle end called the “Epididymis” and this is protected by being at the back of the testicle. This swelling is very important because it is where the sperm is stored and reaches full maturity after being produced in the sperm ducts or tubes. Both the testicles are contained in a special skin bag called the scrotum that adjusts to keep the testicles at the right temperature; closer to the body in cold external temperatures and further from the body in warm external temperatures.

Because they are delicate, testicles have many nerve endings and these are made to cause pain if struck or put under pressure so that the owner will take care not to damage them. This pain is extreme and is not solely confined to the testicles and even a fairly moderate blow can cause debilitation by causing the owner to go into shock; a very hard blow can not only rupture the testicle, but can cause so much shock that the owner dies.

Human nature being what it is, testicles are very often the subject of torture to force a man to tell all he knows as in almost all cases, no man can withstand the pain caused.

Women also find testicles a welcome vulnerability in an otherwise much stronger assailant in self-defence; the famous kick in the balls is a great equalizer.

Additionally, because testicles, along with the penis, are an observable difference in the sexes and because they are what make a man a man, they are often the target (both mental and real!) of female hate (and revenge!) for making men “the way they are”!The Fountains of Cum. Where all the [cum] cums from. Ladies: love'em, tickle'em, lick'em but just don't squeeze'em!A greek philosopher from 348 BCE, worked along Socrates.
His name is pronounced (pronounced Test-uh-cleez)The symbol of manhood. They are what makes a man a man.you gotta be fucking kidding me... looking up testicles in the urban dictionary??1. What no one would be here without.
2. Source of extra muscle, adrenaline, and power.
3. What makes feminists hypocritical.The two [round[ [balls] in the sack under the mans '[shaft]'.a streatchy strapless top for woman that is one of the hottest, sexyest most gorgious femane articles of clothing ever invented. they look amazing on the right girls but when worn by the rong girl it's just plain creepy!a person who is consistently a bad time; a bummera strapless, cylindrical top.Euphemism for someone who drops a huge, usually long, piece of shit. As a lumberjack lays logs, this person laid their log into the toilet.The lumberjack is an exciting sexual maneuver which should be only attempted by professionals.  

In this case, the woman is on all fours and the man enters her from behind (see "doggie style").  Hole choice is completely up to the lumberjack himself.  When he is ready to cum, he yells "TIMmmBERRRrrrr" and takes out the woman's arms with a svelte swooping motion.  The woman then, like a tree, falls to the bed.  During the fall, the woman experiences excitement as well as fear during her zero gravity experience as she realizes impact is imminent.  This leads to the tightening of her vaginal and anal cavities, yielding an astonishing feeling and hence orgasm for the lumberjack.

Extra points can be scored on this maneuver by the close and careful placement of the woman in relation to the headboard.  When the woman's arms are taken out, her head slams into the headboard.  Very fun!The man who singsA girl that is so disgusting, that she makes you lose a boner. she "cuts down your wood".Lumberjacks are the second most awesome people group, after [Pirates], and before [Ninjas].  

Real Lumberjacks have an ax and existed long ago and wear flannel, suspenders, and pants.  They have hairy faces and kick ass.  They will cut down any forest easy, because they are awesome.  

Fake Lumberjacks are the modern day lumberjacks who wear bright orange and they use chainsaws because they are too weak to use an ax.  They also eat lots of flapjacks.  Sing and breakdance.

The most awesome lumberjack ever was Paul Bunyan, he was kickass.  
A lumberjack's ax is NOT spelled with an e like "axe".  Only norsemen had axes.A gentleman who earns his living by felling trees. We all owe him a debt of gratitude for providing the material for our homes and furniture. This gentleman is soundly hated by the [environmentalist] who lives in a timber house.A red and black flanel jacket, coat, or shirt popular in the 80s and 90s.  Actual lumberjacks wear these often.To fuck over an entire fanbase by writing, producing, and airing a television series finale episode so poor that even a union of hookers think it sucks more than they do. Named after the surprise regarding protagonist Dexter Morgan's fate at the end of the series finale of television show [Dexter].Term used to describe a chick that gives a lot of handjobs...(hand ho). One who "jacks lumber" (Gives hand jobs)A sexual act involving 2 men and 1 woman with large, floppy breasts. The woman lays on her back, while each man slides his penis under a breast from each side. To avoid touching each other in the middle, the men coordinate going back and forth, like 2 lumberjacks sawing down a tree.

May also be referred to as a "See-saw"Someone who will tell you that religion is science and science is a religion.Polite way of saying "dumbass".A person who believes that the biblical account of Genesis is a literal, scientific document, and that all scientific knowledge of evolution and geology are mistaken and/or misrepresented by biased scientists. According to Creationists, the world was created in 6 days some 4 to 6 thousand years ago, God placed fossils into various depths of the Earth for no apparent reason (or that, since fossils are so rare, not all co-existing animals were fossilized together) all species where created individually (with allowance for individual variation and common design themes, but no common anscestry), that all life was harmonious before the fall of man (hence carnivores ate grass), that dinosaurs (which are said to be referred to in the bible as "leviathan" and "behemoth" and are supposedly represented in ancient art) lived at the same time as humans, and that they were whiped out in the biblical flood because they couldn't fit into Noah's Ark (or that he only fit the small ones, in which case some dinosaurs might be alive today). 

To promote these views, creationists often misrepresent the data themselves, in an effort to discredit science and abuse it to validate their own beliefs. Hence, they are extremely critical of any and all (overwhelming) evidence that does not support their views while using bogus or equivocal data to prove theirs. 

This doesn't work. 

Any close, unbiased examination of the evidence reveals that nearly all of the creationist's claims are found wanting. I will not list those reasons here but will instead include a few links below.

Creatonists aim to keep the American public ignorant of evolution and science (which they have done a pretty good job of doing, as recent polls suggest) and desire that creation be taught in public schools along with evolution. 

This would be about as ridiculous as teaching two different versions of the Holocaust in history classes (as some people claim that it never happened, and can back up this claim with phony evidence) or teaching an alternate flat earth theory (which another society can find "evidence" for) in geography. 

That is not to say that there isn't a place for Genesis in the sphere of public education, but that would most likely be in courses involving theology, religion, culture, anthropology, and philosophy. 

The moral here, of course, is that one shouldn't look to science to back up theology and vice versa.

Here are some links to learn the truth and why "creation scientists" are wrong (the links themselves can't be included because this site can't have words with more than 50 characters--wtf??). Go to a search engine and type in:

www.talkorigins.org

And perhaps Karl Thornley's page on Theistic Evolution for a few more good links.Mindless cretin who thinks that "Goddidit!"a person who believes, despite overwhelming evidence to the contrary, that every single word in the good book is 100 percent factual.  They tend to exhibit outward signs of basic intelligence and know a lot of big words, occasionally even well educated, but have the general intelligence of a shoe.  See also : brainwashed.One that thinks that hundreds of different scientist who all came to the same conclusionregarding the creation of the human species must be wrong because the Bible says so.  They tend to try and have scientific truth banned from their childrens' schools.An ignorant person who feels that the bible must be taken litteraly and any science that contradics what their book says (despite the fact there are different translations of the bible pointing to different things) is wrong. That would be all of science by the way. There is no science at all to suport their ignorant and idiotic claims.
 A creationist will not accept the theory of evolution, despite it being fundemental to modern biology & genetics, and do not understand what theory means in scientific literature. They realy dont like this theory at all. 
 They normaly try to discrace 'evolutionists' and often attempt to imply that science can only be science if it is looked at from a religious perspective when quite the opposite is true. They accept a point and then ty and prove it, the opposite of the scientific method.
 Finaly most know nothing about science and simply follow their faith. Many creationist leaders give themselves the title of Dr. Nearly all of these 'doctors' aquired their degrees from uncredited degree mills.

See www.talkorigins.com for a refutal of creationist claims.A person who thinks he/she knows more about science than an actual scientist.Synonymous with [idiot]often used to describe something stupid or unfortunate; can replace the common slang word "gay"Hatred of women. Often rewarded by a slap in the face.In reference to the city, let's just say that you know you're from there if any of the following apply to you:Power that comes form diversity.... Pride that comes from making it to the top....The greatest Fucking city in the world.Where my heart will always be no matter where I go.  

New York = Home1. The 11th state to join the union.
2. Also refers to NYC, or as most ignorant people think- Manhattan. (Oh, yeah, there's also The Bronx, Brooklyn, Queens and Staten Island)The Empire State where the greatest city and the capital of the world dwells. NYC or the five boroughs of south NY. The 1st capital of the country from 1785-1790. Home of Broadway theatre, home of the best pizza(NY style) in the world, home of the best franks(Nathans and Papiaya)in the world, also the place where the term 'Hot Dog' was coined, birth place of the potato chip(Saratoga ,NY),the media capital of the world, business capital of the world, largest department store in the world(Macy's 34th st.),Birth place of Hip Hop culture, one of the fashion capital of the world, home of the largest and greatest subway system in the world along with the 1st in the country. And home of the greatest and most successful team in sports(NY Yankees).best bagels, best pizza, best italian food period, best places to shop, its awesome.. u can go out east on LI or manhattan or upstate NY. new york is a great place to live. 

oh yeah and upstate is part of new york u idiot. if u wanna talk about the city say NYC. i'm sure upstate NY people write NY on their mail. you can't argue that or you're just dumb.I am from New York. I curse a lot. I say mad instead of wicked. I like the YANKEES. I know what REAL pizza tastes like, and I know that a bagel is much more than a roll with a hole in the middle. They're sprinkles...not jimmies. I play BEER PONG not beirut. I judge people by what exit they get off the highway. It's not called the shore, it's the BEACH. Its a wedge or a sub NOT a hoagie! It's not New York City or Manhattan, it's 'THE' CITY. Two words...MOTHER FUCKER. I know that 55 mph really means 85. When someone cuts me off, they get the horn AND the finger."Basically the greatest state in the entire country...better yet, the world.  New Yorkers are also the best people around.  Sure, we can be arrogant and yes, from time to time we're prissy bitches.  But NOTHING is finer than a New York girl...or the taste of REAL pizza and bagels.  We're the only state that you can say "The City" and know you're referring to NYC.  We have the best shopping, the best Christmas Tree, the best Parades...oh right and the best baseball team that ever existed and I'm NOT talking about the Mets.  All in all, New York rapes your state by being better in EVERY way imaginable.  I <3 NY.To the general public:
A large city on the United State's east coast

To the people who live there:
The center of the universeYour current boss.someone being arrogant, rude, obnoxious, or just a total dickhead....Your [butt] hole. Were your [shit] comes out.A person in another car who cuts you off to get to the next lane, almost hits you while talking on the phone.An obnoxious, arrogant, self-centered male who women can't seem to get enough of.Anyone who doesn't do exactly what you think they ought to do, exactly when you think they ought to do it.The worst kind of person.  You cannot fully construct a meaning that fully encompasses what this vicious insult means.  If you're an asshole, you are disgusting, loathesome, vile, distasteful, wrathful, belligerent, agoraphobic, and more.  Assholes are human fecal matter.  They are the lowest of the low.  They transcend all forms of immorality.  It is the very worst of insults; to be called an asshole is to have your very soul ripped apart and shat on.  I say that the word "asshole" is the worst cussword of the english language, worst than fuck, shit, and cunt combined.A grave in which to place a Donkey.An alternate word for aviator-style sunglasses with very dark or mirrored lenses.

While assholes are worn by people from all walks of life, these are the primary wearers: [pigs], pretty much everyone in the movie [Top Gun] (chicks included), obese motorcyclists, [rent-a-cop]s, yacht owners, hipsters, construction workers, and aging retirees who like to fish and drink watery American piss-beer.

Assholes may also worn by non-assholes for the ironic effect.1. A person who you feel needs to have the fuck beaten out of him
2. This dipshit I know named AlbertAn exceedingly large penis belonging to an opinionated man.A natural leader of men. Women want him and men want to be him. He drives a tank with three wind shield wipers. He commands an army of troops and often takes them on field trips for r. and r. He receives many perks from the civilian population such as a third free entree from applebees when he purchases the 2 for $20 meal deal. He is currently training troops in Orlando Florida.A Military rank for an Officer usualy below general and above Lieutenant Colonel, Major, Captain, and Lieutenant.Kentucky Fried Chicken or KFC [fast food] joint; after its deceased [mascot], Col. Harlan SandersAn [idiot] who lives for [slow pitch] [softball]. Plays [catcher]. Thinks he's [Batman]. Likes to give shit, doesn't like to get shit. Has an excuse for anything that doesn't go his way, yet will give you reasons why you can't do the same thing. Picks fights and then resorts to "I'll sue your ass" if you call him on it. Basically a 5 year old [spoiled child].1.Military rank

2.A characters from the video game Mega Man X4.
  Has a sister called Iris. He is working with Repliforce
  and later dies during the rebellion.
  Some people believe Iris and Colonel were the same person    
and got split into 2 : THIS IS NONSENSE AND BS.A shitty baseball teamname of the un popped pieces of corn at the bottom of a pop corn bowl.a short stalky man that is balding with comb over, stutters and says um constantly, very strict and continues to create problems with the cadets.  talks for hours on end and bores the students to sleep, treats the kids like they have not a clue in the world about whats going on and how they could do anything in the world to change a thing...A stocky man of medium height, very solid build, tends to draw himself up to full height when excited, or early in the mornings. Very poor sense of balance, becomes ill and vomits easily, especially when being talked to. Very popular, especially among ladies, talks to anyone. Enjoys the occasional flap in the wind. Cousin to [Princess Sophie].Believing that the group one belongs to, be it of sex, creed, or color, is automatically superior to another's.One who believes that their gender, group, or kind is superior to others.1. A British [chav] - a white urban Brit who enjoys picking fights with strangers and acting tough. Chav is a shortened version of the term and is used much more often.

2. A [jingoist] - a person who is fiercely nationalistic and will side with their country no matter what - right or wrong - and call anyone who disagrees with them a traitor. Common in parts of the UK and in the Southern and Midwestern US.

3. A [male chauvinist] - a man who treats women as inferior or considers men better than women. A [sexist]. Common in fundamentalist [Christian] and [Islamic] cultures.A usually male jerk who feel he is superior because he has a penis. Although many of us know that it is just them compensating because they have no penis, they may also compensate with a car their parents bought them. Typically, they have no standards, will have sex with just about anyone, and they are also CHEATERS.someone who tends to stay up late into the nightSomeone who stays up late and sleeps in the day.A girl you sleep with that you don't want your friends to know about. Typically some easy girl you meet at a bar or party that is willing to sleep with you A.S.A.P.A meth user that stays on the pourch all night at a the meth house, watching everything, usually a paranoid tweaker.Suffix added to any noun to describe the biggest/baddest/meanest/nastiest of its type. Dervied from Godzilla, Japan's national hero, 60's movie star, and general all around badass.A person (or gaming nerd) who has a complex about his/her status and image when playing Computer Games.

He / She doesn't like losing and will come up with all sorts of excuses.

It's what defines the person's life as he/she doesn't really have one and therefore they will vigorously defend their status so they are not seen as a 'noob' online.adj.; when used as a suffix for a proper name or specific entity, becomes part of that noun.

Derived from [Godzilla], the gargantuan reptilian star of Japanese "B" horror [movie] genre. Introduced in 1954 as "Gojira", Godzilla is the embodiment of all that is massive, destructive, and extremely difficult to defeat. Ergo, "'zilla" in both the stand-alone adjective and suffix forms represents those same charecteristics. Linguistically, the "z-l" [combo] has stronger audiological [punch] than "j-r", thus giving "'zilla" more connotative [power] than "'jira".Derived from Godzilla, it could be another word for "monster", or just the meanest, baddest thing of any type of person or animalreal biganother term of monster, basically, it come from godzilla, but now, zilla it self trend to means any type of monster, like kingkong, godzilla,dinosaur,Jaws..etca suffix which can be used on pretty much any word.  

(1) a suffix personifying the root word

(2) just a suffix used to make a word more intense (read: retarded)The ultimate compliment known to man and the highest achievement the common man can achieve. Closely followed by a Nobel Prize.1. a type of vann
2. a sooners fan
3. a chokeran individual who displays many animilastic qualities; stems from the species velocirapter, which was known for its rather savage dispositionA girl who gets around the block mostly from drunk hook ups and one night stands and has a ton miles. Pretty much the last resort for a dude just lookin for a nut. Also known as a one hitter quitter.something that is radical, cool, or otherwise awesome. something that is snow is generally the shit, being top score, bitchin, etc. the word is derived from the fact that snow is generally off the hook in its beauty, power, and pimperyCoke, cocaine. Used primarily by huffing through the nostrils snow can also be freebased and inhaled.1.  Frozen [precipitation] that is white, powdered and falls to the ground in winter.

2.  [Static] on the TV.

3.  [Coke] or [cocaine].

4.  A white Canadian rapper who had a hit in 1992 with the reggae influenced [Informer].  

5.  White girls.A frozen white fluffy form of rain that will keep you out of school for a day. Usually seen in the winter season.stuff that falls from the sky at christmas and it tastes nicefinely powdered cocainea white precipitate that turns every driver within a 75 mile radius of Chicago completely retarded.1 - White, cold, soft, slightly frozen water that falls from the sky in winter. Also tastes nice. Beware of yellow snow.
2 - Cocaine or crack. A white powder powder narcotic. Also called blow, charlie, snowflake.1. mislead, especially by overwhelming with (mis)information
2. deceive
3. hoodwink
4. bamboozleIt is the process of adding lots of small hole-punched papers into a [nugget]ed back pack.1. To whine
2. To Bitch
3. Also see "protesting" -A debate strategy commonly used by Ridgeview and Bakersfield High schools
4. The only lesson jv members at the aforementioned schools learn about
5. Protesting Manuals are equivalent to evidence at these schools.A temporary gathering of people designed to speak out against a cause or political event.  Rarely works because the politicians who are being protested against usually send the [riot police] to "calm down" the protesters.A [mosh pit] for [people] who [care] about [important issues].The act of a diabetic urinating in their partners mouth. Basically a stronger, more pungent lemonade mouth.Made from Orange Pekoe Tea leaves this non-alcoholic beverage, served cold and moslty below the [Mason Dixon line] is a Southerners favorite treat on a hot day (or with pork [BBQ]).  Sugar is added at the time just after brewing "while the tea is still hot".  This allows the sugar to disolve more evenly and produces a fine treat.  Can be garnished with a Lemon.   (See also [Ice Tea])Liquid amazing.A sweet drink said to extend the average human's life by 10-15 years.A reference to males that are sexually interested in minors (both male and female). Said males cannot refuse sweet tea and it is often used to lure them into police traps.

It is believed that pedophiles are fueled on the stuff. McDonalds has recently attempted to capitalize on this fact.

See: [To Catch a Predator]The act of dipping ones testicles in sugar, and smearing them across your opponents face.Semen, jizz, baby gravy. Usually spilled by the half gallon, sprayed all around a room, sometimes on electronic equipment for maximum effect.A female person who believes themself to be  amazing, astonishing , aweinspiring , impressive , intimidating, magnificent, majestic, mind-blowing,The One and Only.

Can also mean crazy woman.southern drink....specially in the area of Tennesse...where the hot bitches are...it is known that by drinking this beverage it will give an avarage girl the power of being hot...also gives you an awesome souther accent...but the word can be used as "cool" or "sweet" on any ocation..The drink of choice for the low class. Extremely low quality tea with a pound of sugar per cup. Also known as, rot your teeth out tea, and we wonder why southerners have such nasty teeth.Generally the acronym used for barbecue, it has evolved into a piece of the internet vernacular. 

Used to poke fun by attaching it to common acronyms such as [wtf], [omg] and [hax].an acronym used for barbecue but sometimes used to point out the absurdity of using acronyms online.Often used to parody online acronyms, this originally stood for "better be quick," usually used in online games.Short for "bitches be queefing". Queefing is the discharge of air from the vaginal tract, known as vaginal flatulence.Originally started on irc channels and then used in instant messengers meaning "be back quick". More recently used as a leet speak variant meaning "barbecue" in conjunction with phrases and other acronyms mainly meant to tease the lesser experienced.Melbourne Australian slang for sexual encounterCommonly used abbreviation meaning "Bitch Be Quiet". Other meanings have also been assigned to the same letter combination, however, these are of course wrong, as this usage is clearly the best and only possibly meaning for BBQ. (Not...)Big Bad Queer

A person who is trying to act all cool and badass ended up looking and sounding all gay,stupid,and hated by others.1. A shortened version of the word "barbecue"

2. An Internet slang term for things such as Be Back, Queers, Better be Quick, and Bitch Be Quiet, among other terms.bitch be quiet. linked with wtf bbqFoolish, destructive, evil sect.

I was happily married and had two wonderful little boys.
The mother of my first wife "got religion" with the JWs and then brainwashed her daughter to become one.
As an atheist I accept other's ideas, so I went along with the idea and accepted her going to the JW meetings where she was indocrinated into their ideas. However, at the insistence of her local JWs she started to try and convince me to go and become one if them.
I said that I was happily an atheist and that the bible was written by men not God.
From then on things went from bad to worse and I was officially and publicly declared to be The Devil.

We divorced and I am now happily remarried with two lovely girls.

Jehova's Witnesses directly caused the breakup of my marriage and caused two innocent young boys to be subjected to the pain and loss which now, after 30 years still affects my oldest boy.

Jehova's Witneses are evil fools.They are not lazy at all because they do all the normal stuff like raise a family, work, go to school and they still manage to get god's word out regurly. AND, it's spelled Jehovah's WitnessesFor the correct spelling and grammar, see [Jehovah's Witnesses].a group of annoying [pricks] who believe in some [shit] about this [god] or something.they go around "spreading gods message" if you ever see one pray to god that a double decker bus falls on them from the sky before they start [preaching] there shit to youUsually spelled Jehovah's Witness.  A strict religious group in which members cannot celebrate holidays or birthdays, but rather spend their time going door to door annoying people with their views and beliefs.A splinter movement of the Jehovah's Witnesses that considers excess of 'H's to be an abomination before the Lord. Jehovah's Witnesses believe their group to be founded on a spelling error, but Jehova's Witnesses know that is just the sort of blasphemy those H-lovers would resort to.annoyingAlso known as J DUB. A religion which grants its members a reason to be lazy and do nothing with their lives nor get involved in anything important as they are serving God, not man.A well-worn, unglamorous bar, often serving a cheap, simple selection of drinks to a regular clientele.  

The term can describe anything from a comfortable-but-basic neighborhood pub to the nastiest swill-slinging hole.Home.This place is going to be stinky and lame. You don't come here for the drinks, you come here to eliminate sobriety. All of the regulars there have a smoker's voice and a hard look to them. If you try to go there dressed nicely, you will get stared at and singled out. Wear shoes that you wouldn't mind squashing some roaches in.A scummy bar whose patrons are primarily on the prowl for a one night standA [bar] that is sleazy, poorly maintained and in overall bad shapeAt one time a deep, earthy, and universally respected genre of folk music embraced by people from all walks of life, and performed by heartland poets who wrote touching melodies and thought-provoking but subtle messages about life, love, and loss, country music has now grown into a dim shadow of its former greatness.  

Record companies have appropriated it for their own profit as they will with any great artistic movement.  Insipid, voiceless dandies with the depth of wading pools have been propped up as the new "idols."  Irresponsible and uninformed political rhetoric has usurped the lyrical foreground, alienating many fans and completely betraying the music's original status as art for the everyman, while mediocrity and uniformity sum up the musical direction.  

If we can ever be blessed again by another visionary, a Williams Sr., a Cash, a Cline, or a Miller, maybe things will change.  But for now, country music remains a brutally raped and distorted picture of art stolen from the artists.A form of music in which the words can be understood, any instrument is game, writing talent is critical, and every song doesn't have to be about horny depressed teenagers singing one or two lines over and over.A music style that used to be about "Cowboys" and "Tractors" and shit. The music was almost always made by a fiddle, acoustic guitar, harmonica, and/or a chello. 

Now, country music is basicly just badly done rock-guitar pop-ballads (or repitive piano pop-ballads) with such themes as "My Wife Left Me", "Im Leaving my Husband", "my Spouse is Dead or a thousnad miles away and i am lonley", and "Drinking Songs", sung by untalented Males who all try to sound the same, and females who either sing like a hurt timid female, or a Strong Independent Woman Who is Leaving Her Boyfriend For Some Unknown Reason. 

Hell, modern country wouldnt even be considered country music if it didnt include that stupid highpitched country noise (i cant describe it. If you have heard country music, you know what im talking about) made by some unknown instrument.a once-vital form of rustic music derived from European styles of folk and dance music made by European immigrants to [America]. It's generally played with instruments like the mandolin, acoustic and steel guitars, fiddle and so on. It used to be about observations of the world, life and love in its complexities. Now it's all cliched, with imagery of cowboys, macho bragadoccio, Southern pride, small town life, "she done him wrong", "tears in my beer", "redneck" living, sentimental tripe like the trend-chasing "Angels Among Us", and "[family values]". Oh yes, and "[God bless the U.S.A.]" [jingoism]. Ever since [Garth Brooks] (who is a watered down [Bob Seger]) hit it big in the [fucking PC 90s], country has been "yuppified" and formulaic. Now there boring piano ballads with cliched lyrics galore sung by lousy [Richard Marx] clones with cowboy hats, the generic [hat acts], pretty ladies singing tunes fit only for shopping mall opening-dedications, sexy ladies who sing corporate pop (no, it don't impress me much) and preachy, jingoistic sentimental crap in the aftermath of all this [9/11] business like the aw-shucks "Where Were You When the World Stopped Turning". This trash is pushed on the [sheep] public by corporate execs in suits.an unbearably irritating form of music that uses the same twangy gee-tar and awful wavering voice to sing about a very short list of topics such as: cheating spouse, alcoholics drinking to excess, pickup trucks, bein' a good-ol-boy, not havin' any a them-thar teeth and screwin' horses. this form of music is generally played at hoot n' annies, box socials, barn dances and every store north of georgia that douche bags go to buy cowboy hats even though they have no legitimate need for them. in order for a person to get any kind of enjoyment out of country music, however minimal, one must fall under one or more of the following categories: white women, having unnatural love for cheap beer, owning a yard full of garbage, 3 or more missing teeth, having a lip full of chewing tobacco, attenders of singles' mingles/family reunions, anyone that owns a tractor and thinks that it automatically makes them a cowboy. the more of these criteria met, the bigger the country music fan you are.example songs: 

"she thinks my trackers sexy"  
"i love this bar" 

enough saidCountry music evolved from folk ballads brought to America by immigrants.It was decent music until asshole record company execs and producers in Nashville, Tennessee (wanting all the money without having to have talent)started pushing the"Nashville sound"aka[Nashville Clowns] in the late 50s and continuing till today.Now all country songs are written by a formula.Whats selling,What topic is hot at the moment etc.. Country acts of today are told how to dress,act ,talk,what their background is ,if they are gonna be outlaws or good guys(stolen from wrestling promotors.also see:[Retards])and what companies products to be seen wearing,eating,drinking and wiping their ass with.Most country stars of today are gleened from Kareoke bars and lounges.Most are from the midwest or east coast but company excecs change their point of origin to Oklahoma,[Texas] or Tennessee.Most "Stars" of today do not write their own material,they purchase the rights to say they have written it.(Travis Tritt)Pose with Harleys and try to act like outlaws(Toby Keith.Although he had to be pulled on a trailer sitting on a bike for his vid after dropping the bike several times and having to receive medical attention to get his head removed from his ass).Most acts of today are a sad lot of record company flunkies listened to by plastic people who buy into their bullshit swaggering and studio player albums(watch their road bands who are paid next to nothing screw up every lick out live)(I dont blame them).The modern day fanbase for these "Stars" of today are a fickle bunch(fame IS fleeting)and the commercial lifespan for these people is short indeed.Most end up broke,without their songs or right to even sing them in public anymore within a year or less.But dont feel sorry for them.They sold out and perpetuated the machine.If they hadnt sold out and wouldve told the record execs to write their own songs, modern country may have stood a chance.Listen to Old(late 60s-late 70s) Waylon,Willie,David Allan Coe,Billy Joe Shaver for a taste of country music unspoiled by the "[Nashville Clowns]"A genre of music that used to be good until it all started sounding the same. After Garth Brooks came into the fold, there were really obcessed country fans and the selling out in country became more common. Nowadays country music is full of acts trying to sound a lot like each other and many artists do not have their individuality, but many did not have that from the start of the genre. Once Waylon Jennings demanded that he would play his own songs like it or not, individual began to increase in the genre. The creativity of the country singer or band is denied when they are not allowed to be creative. Ever since maybe ten years ago or even earlier many acts have been copying each other. Individuality has been more seen in some Alan Jackson, Willie Nelson, Johnny Cash, Waylon Jennings, Bocephus, Eric Church, Brad Paisley, and in the songs of a few other country acts. However Rock, Alternative, Punk, and Metal, and Metalcore ( the one with probably the most freedom of expression and by far the most lyrically deep the majority of the time are the best). However the legacy of country music is being ruined by an attempt to commercialize like pop artists is hurting the genre of country music when they try to be all hip hop and sing about a woman's booty or follow the same formula of every other band in country or rock music. These rock bands they seek to sometimes emulate are southern rock bands, Nickelback, 3 Dooors Down, and Hinder. Honestly, country music is so far on the decline that it has to the potential to turn worse than the pop/dance and techno genres.a type of music where you lose everything you own and takes no talent whatsoever to write lyrics for. Type of music listened to by people who have nothin better in life to do than complain about everything.A genre of music popular among white-trashy inbreeds.  Just listening to it has been proven to lower your IQ.  All the singers sound exactly the same, as if they were purposely trying to sound like hicks.  Someone who listens to country music is usually from a rural, white, bigoted community.A disease that started in Tokyo.  It first infected Gameboys in Japan in 1995.  Then in 1998 the disease infected Gameboys in America.  Soon channel WB11 was infected too, and now Cartoon Network.  The ever-so-popular "Gameboy Advance" systems got infected in 2002, and still is.  In 1999 the disease started spreading via cardboard aka "Pokemon Trading Card Game".  "Nintendo 64" and "Nintendo Gamecube" are infected too.  The disease is also spreading via plastic and metal in the toy isles at Wal-Mart, K-mart, toys-r-us, and every other toy store.  It is now July 2004, almost 10 years after the start of this addicting, argument instigating disease and it is still out there, but not as bad as its most powerful years(1999-2001).Say what you will folks, but Pokemon is one of the greatest games ever released for the Gameboy. Period. 

The problem is that Nintendo, through their misguided policy of inundating the market with a whole wack of crappy, kitschy merchandise, not to mention a t.v show and movies galore, alienated their older players. My theory is that most people who complain about how Pokemon is stupid, are actually disenfranchised former Pokemon players. Cause let's face it, back in the day, everybody, and I mean everybody, played it.

And all that is a real shame, because from a strictly gameplay point of view, Pokemon kicks ass. It should have gone down in history as one of the better video game franchises. But thanks to Nintendo's decision to sell the game to eight year olds, that won't happen.An anime, manga, and nintendo game created in Japan.  Pokemon are creatures that children and teenagers (as well as adults) can capture and train.  The trading card game was one of the first major trading card games that alowed players to not onle trade, but battle as well.  In the anime we follow the story of a young trainer, Ash, and his two friends, Misty and Brock, as they travel togeather on their pokemon journey.  The mange series revolves around rivils Red and Blue as they collect badges and compete in various compititions.no kids, not the garbage pokemon that they made. i mean, THE ORIGINAL. this goes back about 10 years. you guys remember when pokemon blue first came out? i know you all got it for christmas that year! cos i know i did. and i played it all night haha. and pokemon cards were the coolest thing ever. and EVERYONE had them in school, even the real popular kids. if you had a charizard, you were pretty much awesome. you sat for hours arranging your cards in a binder, just staring/reading each and every card. you pretty much had every fact about every pokemon memorized. YOU HAD LIKE 500 SLOWPOKES AND YOU HATED SLOWPOKE BECAUSE OF IT. you woke up at 5 am on school days to watch pokemon. you had a bunch of pokemon toys/stuffed animals. on christmas, if there werent 5 packs of pokemon cards in your stocking, you basically hated everything. when you found a "shiny" card you went completely insane. the number of holographic cards a person had defined how cool they were. you brought your gameboy color everywhere so you could level up your pikachu. you always wanted to evolve pikachu with a thunder stone, but dam game wouldnt let you! you snuck your gameboy into school to play, and the teacher never caught you. YOU SECRETLY STILL PLAY GAMEBOY COLOR SOMETIMES (i know i do). you could bust out your gameboy right now and play for 5 hours with no problem. im 17 now, and i can look back on this and it was such a fun time of my life. hah. so all you older people, do you remember these good old days?Something that you've pretended not to like since you turned 11, yet can't deny how sick it would be if they really existed.There are three destinct parts to Pokemon

anime:Responsible for giving Pokemon its "kiddie" reputation.

TCG:I must agree with people about this one, it was pretty horible.

GameBoy game:Aguably a great game. It is much more complex then it seems. Unfurtunatly, most people who bash pokemon because it is "kiddie" would most likely not have the intellegence to fully understand the game at all.

Why people that bashes pokemon always say something about gay sex or masturbating, I'll never know. That South Park episode don't help much either. I just pray that these people asociating the SP episode with the game are being sarcastic. After reading some of these definitions, I wouldn't suprised.a very fun rpg video game that i at 18 still injoy about capurturing and figting with kick ass monsters sounds like fun   to bad they went ruined in 97 98 by making a baby show about it ruing the 1995 video game(N.) A Game and an Anime that has been made popular by millions of kids. The Game itself, isn't too bad since they're so many Pokemon and so many different combinations of raising them and using them, whether it be the six Pokemon lineup or Moves they they have. 
The Show however, is the reason it has a kiddie reputation and is hated by most people. I don't blame most people when they say they hate Pokemon, cause the show makes them say all of that. If they tried the game, they might've thought otherwise. 
Still though, the many different games that come out aren't that nessacary. If you played one, you've played them all. I used to be really into Pokemon in middle school, and played it all the time, but knew better than to buy EVERY single different version and waste my money like that. Also avoided the Card Game.If you can ignore all the shitty spin-off games and marketing behind the series, it's still one of the best RPGs around.Once a very popular TV Show, Card game and video game which I myself was quite a fan of at the time. The TV Show and Card game sort of fizzled out after Poke'mon had had its time but the games were very good and they still exist to day. Of course I'm always seeing new card series's being brought out and am occasionally mildy interested because the artwork on some of the cards was rather good. In fact the card game was very popular and a lot of fights broke out about people not trading fairly and people even resorted to stealing others cards but I knew it had all gotten out of hand when at my first school they had people to watch over the swapping of Poke'mon cards and advising people on good swaps. Eventually most schools banned Poke'mon cards (and any others for that matter). So, when they began bringing out all those new Poke'mon and card sets it got a bit boring. So all in all the original Poke'mon cards, games and possibly the TV series was a rather good achievement but it never managed to keep a lot of fans after a few years, but, of course there are still dedicated Poke'mon fans all over the world.STD - stands for Sexualy Transmited Disease. The most commonly known is HIV/AIDS. To say the least you don't want an STD.Somewhat Tasty DonutsSexually Transmitted Disease. Anyone can get one, even virgins. Most common STDs are passed through skin contact, saliva, breast milk, & bodily fluids. You don't have to be a "nasty slut" to get an STD. It only takes 1 sexual experience...or with Herpes, alls you have to do is touch someone who has the virus on their skin  at that point and area.Sexually Transmitted Disease

See burned.Acronym meaning: Socially Transmitted Decepticons

Professional or professionally-organized social media users who use one or more online personas to launch political or personal attacks on opponents or their issues. Often, so called "persona software" is used to manage many such deceptive identities simultaneously in order to create the impression that multitudes hold similar points of view.

Sometimes called [Sock Puppets], STDs can infect multiple social media streams at one time, creating the illusion of mass interest or agreement sufficient to influence an issue or debate.Basically like a computer virus, but for people. You want the free Prada bag, you have to risk the attack on your computer, and possibility of it never working again.

You want the sex, you have to risk the attack on your 'down there' region, with the possibility of it never working again.Something you get from putting your dick in shit because you're too fucking poor to afford a single condom.STD stands for Snooki Transmitted Dumbness. Are girls in your school wearing super slutty clothes? Tanning their skin 24/7? Putting their hair in poofs the size of the Popes hat? Then they have the STD. After watching Jersey Shore for too long, some girls have acquired the STD. Signs include but are not limited to...
-drinking vodka for breakfast
-drinking vodka for lunch
-drinking vodka for dinner
-drinking vodka for dessert
-skin that is so tan, she is invisible in a dimly lit room
-causes public disturbances 24/7
-eats pickles... by sucking on them
-when asked why she does something, she replies with "I'm at the Jersey Shore... BITCH!"

-everywhere is the Jersey Shore for her
-a sudden interest for meat-heads and gorillas
-when someone calls her phone, and is looking a girl named Angelina, she replies with "No, she died"
-she is as smart as a...SnookiSpontaneous Torrential Diarrhea

Whenever you are normal one second, then randomly you get the urge to have explosive diarrhea and then, when you sit down, it just explodes out of your ass like a torrential rain...simultaneous text discussion.
When you are texting someone, and they send another text before you respond to the previous one. This is giving someone an STDCompany bitch.Free slaves in the workplace.poor innocent individual starting out with a whole set of impossible goals and naive ambitions that end up crushed under the path of some self-righteous menapausal bitch that is dissatisfied with her own life and for getting an office ass and taking it out on cute young girls that might actually make something of their lives and live their dreams...and work off the constantly invading office ass(1) A temporary worker who is employed to gain experiance/education rather than money. 
(2) Bill's gal.A Democratic Semen Recepticle.People who are hired to do menial monotonous work that you couldn't pay people people to do long term because they would quit or eat a .45 caliber.  So they hire some naive [college] or [high school] grad to do it until they give up , quit, or eat a .45 caliber.a person who willingly becomes a slave to the corporate world because they enjoy getting abused and whipped by supervisors.

interns do not get paid but they do enjoy the occasional snacks brought to work by the other rich employees. (usually interns steal those snacks, therefore get whipped).

also see "office puppy"an aspiring employee with whom you abstain from sexual relations.a noun referring to a person who is reduced to slave labor.

An intern works for no pay, and their main job is to get coffee and obey each demand by their employer.Homeless kids that you take in and support in exchange for ridiculous favors.  They can be summoned with a conch shell.What Kid Rock drives after being arrested for beating up Tommy Lee.Someone who doesn't have the skills or talent to hold down a permanent job. They are inherently lazy and sneaky.Faggy asian kids who believe they have the ability to kill someone without guilt.n. Mystery Science Theater 3000: A television show in which humorous comments are adlibbed during the viewing of a low quality B-movie.

v. To make a Mystery Science Theater 3000 episode that focuses on a specific film.

adj. The Mystery Science Theater 3000 version of a film.n. abbreviation for the cult hit television series "Mystery Science Theater 3000", in which 'B' movies are made fun of by the the show's three central characters.
Started on local access by creator Joel Hodgson, later moved on to Comedy Central through season seven, then the Sci-Fi Channel until its tenth and final season.
Also included a feature film, "Mystery Science Theater 3000: The Movie" with a limited theatrical release.The most awesome television show invented by the human race. Short for "Mystery Science Theater 3000" Originated in the late 80's and featured a man named Joel (Later to be replaced by Mike Nelson), Crow T. Robot, and Tom Servo.  This trio would make fun of ,while watching, terrible movies. Was featured mostly on Comedy Central and the Sci-Fi Channel. Aired for 11 seasons. In 1996 the MST3K movie was released into theaters.v. To make fun of a really pathetic  movie.An abbreviation for "pure comical genius". I reccomend Hobgoblins, Manos, and Godzilla vs Megalon.I've only seen the movie, but from that, I can tell that it is fucking hilarious.The only show that has EVER made me laugh outloud. I think it was funnier with TV's Frank and Joel, but still funnier in the later episodes, but hey, I love Tom Servo's Irish Tenor, too...The only show ever created that actually has something to tell you. Provided you come equipped with a great sense of humour. And good abs.Making fun of a particular video/scene/footage especially music videos.

Abbreviation of Mystery Science Theater 3000a delicious frozen treat that comes from cows. Ice cream comes in many different flavours and can often be found at your local grociery store.A relitively new shoe on the market. Created by Pharell Williams from the Neptunes (N.E.R.D) and Nigo, the creator of the Bathing Apes clothing and shoe line. They are marketed by Reebok. Only 3000 are currently in the market, ranging from around $300-$500 dollars.crack. hell even Master P calls it ice cream, and no one is more right them him.• The flavored cream of ice
• A common cure for broken hearted females
• A cold and delicious treat, perfect on hot summer daysflavored frozen cream that comes in different flavors.Release 4.0 of Google's [Android].

Although [Gingerbread] and [Honeycomb] are not yet available, Google is said to be already working on Android 4.0.

No idea what it will look like, but it will be greater than great!!

[Froyo] and [Gingerbread] are said to perform great with a 1 Ghz processor, [Honeycomb] and Ice Cream for sure will have a big impact on hardware.

Apple and Microsoft: be afraid, very afraid.code word for sexual pleasures when you are not behind closed doors and need to talk about the type of ice cream you had whether it be chocolate vanilla or better yet mocha.crack dope powder candyThe plural of [Ice Cream]The stuff that makes my head hurt when i eat too much of it... stupid fuckerA person that simply cannot be happy for another person's success.  So rather than be happy they make a point of exposing a flaw in that person.

Hating, the result of being a hater, is not exactly jealousy.  The hater doesnt really want to be the person he or she hates, rather the hater wants to knock somelse down a notch.Overused word that people like to use just because someone else expresses a dislike for a certain individual.most of the people in this siteA term used by others, usually being suburban "gangsters", whose lives are absolutely and undeniably defined by what others think.  These people "rumble" often and think  of themselves as original and/or indestructable.  People that use the term "haters" are the lowest stage of the evolutionary scale.  They bleed the fastest and have thought processes similar to that of a mentally underdeveloped cat.to be a hater is to descriminate or hate something, someone, or a certain type of something. 

If the world didn't have haters then it would be a better place. a much better place.

I mean not that there aren't assholes in the world. to hate somethings is good. i hate poverty, war, and bad shit like that. just try to have some morals, people.A person that develops a strong dislike for another, solely basing their own opinion on personal judgment rather than objective merit. The formation of a hater's contempt commonly arises from jealously and/or resentment. Individuals that make fun of, or "hate," others for justified reasons cannot be legitimately classified as "haters;" although many faggots attempt to rationalize their own situations by doing so. Additionally, the word "hater" is frequently overused, mainly by members of the rap and hip-hop communities.A person who feels anger and/or jealousy for someone who has succeeded in something they have worked hard for.
  A being who speaks badly,and/or takes negative actions in attempt to create problems for a successful person.Anyone with a opinion.The most non-insulting "insult" in existence. It's a waste of breath to say it and a waste of energy to type it. This term is often used by pre-teen girls whenever someone insults their favorite teeny bopper singers. If you ever call somene a hater, find the nearest knife and use it pierce your lungs for polluting our air with that fucking stupid word.People that make up reasons to hate certain people just because they aren't as wealthy or successfull as them. People are often hating:

1. [Bill Gates]
2. [Blink 182]
3. [George W. Bush]
4. [Halle Barry]
5. [Ben Affleck]P-Person
I-Into
M-Marketing
P-ProstitutesA man who beats up women and owns over a thousand sex slaves.one who brokers the sexual favors of women for profits1. Protection, Instruction, & Management of Prostitutes
2. Protectional Instructor Managing Professional
3. Prostitute's Instructional Management Professional
4. Professional In Management of Prostitutes 
5. Prostitute's Infamous Management Professional
6. Professionally Instructing Many Prostitutes
7. Professional Illegally Managing Prostitutes

Optional, but not recommended:
*Professional- replaced by Pro, Player, or Playa
*Into        - replaced by Intwined or Into
*Managing    - replaced by Marketing

Slang: noun or verb
1. Player(s/z)/Playa(s/z) Interested in(to) Making Progress/Prostitutes
2. (Put/Place It) or (Paper) in My/Men's Pants/Pocket(s)/Places
3. Party In My/Men's Pants/Panties
4. Pissin(g)/Peein(g) In(to) My Pants/Place/Partner/Potty 
5. Pissin(g)/Peein(g) In(to) Mouths of People/Prostitutes/Potty
6. People/Prostituts In Many/Money-filled Places/People
7. Perfect Independent Marvelous Playa(s/z) or Player(s/z)
8. Pooping In(to) My Place/Pants/Partner/Potty
9. Pennys In My Pocket/Place/Palace/Prostitutes
10. Put/Place It in My Pussy/Prostitute
11. Pussy Is My/Mens Prerogative/Purpose/PlaymateThe people wearing the purple suits on street corners who use dirt poor women to get money.  And later blowing it all on spinner's and gold lining for their three wheeled cycles.To make better, to fix up,some dumass middle school teenager who is as rich as hell and wear clothes like he's from the ghetto.Thinks he has he has hoes but the only one who he would lose his virginity to is his mom. Thinks rock is "for losers". Listens to too much 50 cent and tells everyone he used to live in "the projects". friends consist of a bunch of airheads who say LOL!! the whole time and his own dim-witted speciesPride Intelligence Money Power1. someone who profits off the money prostitutes make from selling their bodies
2. to seek out hookers to make a profit off of them selling their bodies.
3. to hit on several different girls
4. a guy who has alot of girlfriends or has been with alot women.
5. something that is really cool.v. Live off the earnings of a prostitutea machine for downloading pornWhat you are on nowThe most useful and most frustrating thing any human being will ever work with.If you're looking up this word, kill yourself.a very, very expensive punching bagA tool that is supposed to save time but intead wastes time.The most boring and frustrating thing in the world-however, I keep coming back.the thing people use to:
1. Go on MySpace or any other blog-related sites
2. download porn
3. illegally download music
4. play games
5. and use to look up the word "computer" on Urbandictionary.comThe answer to every single question.A $1000 facebook machineOne whose IQ exceeds his weight.An individual persecuted for his superior skills or intellect, most often by people who fear and envy him.An 'individual', i.e. a person who does not conform to society's beliefs that all people should follow trends and do what their peers do. Often highly intelligent but socially rejected because of their obesssion with a given subject, usually computers. Unfortunately, nerds seem to have problems breeding, to the detriment of mankind as a whole.Never
Ending
Radical
Dude.A stereotypical label used to describe a person that is socially inadequate.  A four letter word, but a six figure income.A person who gains pleasure from amassing large quantities of knowledge about subjects often too detailed or complicated for most other people to be bothered with.

Often mistaken for Geeks, who aspire to become nerds, yet lack the intelligence, and end up giving nerds a bad name due to their poor social skills.

Non-nerds are often scared of nerds, due to their detailed knowledge, and therefore seemingly high levels of intelligence - and subsequently denegrate them as much as possible as often as possible.

Nerds exist covertly within the fabric of society, often choosing to 'nerd it up' in private or in the company of fellow nerds.  It is for this reason they are feared the most - unlike geeks, who are easily identified, nerds can only be found out when casual conversation reaches a subject that they like nerding.the group of people who will most likely make a life changing invention that will radically change the world. the computer was invented by a nerd. the macintosh/apple and windows were invetned by nerds. jocks and normal people have no claim to civilization except for being the hard labor. nerds actually do the thinking. so jocks, fuck you, and go eat your steroidsThe person you will one day call "Boss"Guys with IQ higher than your weight. You made fun of them when you were at school but you would be lucky if you get employed as janitors in their businesses.A delicious candy made by Wonka.  They are pretty much crystalized sugar in a color coating that people love to give out on halloween.An individual who deals with the complex systems of todays military/civilian aircraft. Their entire mission is to make bricks "fly", and fix leaking electrons from parts, and they do it damn well. Usually pissed off individuals who are the be all end all of the sortie cock, they take and stride. Because one day, their enlistment will come to an end.Stands for AVIation electrONICSNot the best state in the country, but very far from the worst.  Home to three million people, some really sweet cities, three great univerties, a whole bunch of stellar small private colleges and a ton of true natural beauty in its lush northeast bluff country and statewide river valleys, lakes, and yes, rolling fields.  Iowa is a national leader in education (students in many other states including Texas take the Iowa Test of Basic Skills, and everyone's heard of the ACT, based in Iowa City) and is leading the way in biofuels to reduce the nation's dependence on oil.  To dispel the ignorance displayed elsewhere on this post, here's a state breakdown of cities and topography.  If seventy synonyms for boobs is alright to post, so is this.

Central Iowa:  [Des Moines], located at the intersection of I-80 and I-35, is the largest city with a metro of a half million and is the state capital, second only to London for the title of insurance capital of the world.  [Ames] (80,000 metro) is about a half hour north of Des Moines and is home to [Iowa State University], a land grant school of 30,000 respected around the world for its engineering and agricultural programs.  Central Iowa is, outside of river vallies, very flat, and outside of the Des Moines area and Ames is very sparsely populated.

Eastern Iowa:  The most densely populated area of the state.  Ethnically diverse [Iowa City] (115,000 metro) was Iowa's first state capital, was the first city in the world to elect a female mayor, has been named the most cultured city per capita in the nation, is always in the top five cities in the country for education, and is home to the [University of Iowa], 30,000, nationally renowned for its Carver College of Medicine and Iowa Hawkeye athletics.  The music departments of Iowa City's two large public high schools have won a total of five Grammy awards.  [Cedar Rapids], (200,000 metro) just twenty minutes north of Iowa City in the beautiful Cedar River valley, is the second largest single city, is the economic hub of eastern Iowa, has two private colleges, and is best known for being the place you get any of your Quaker Oats brand ceral from.  [Waterloo/Cedar Falls], two conjoined cities (130,000 metro) is where the [Unviersity of Northern Iowa], 18,000, is located.  The [Quad Cities], (375,000 metro) two in Iowa and two in Illinois, straddle the Mississippi and form the largest metro between Des Moines and Chicago.  The largest of the four cities is [Davenport], IA, home to the Bix 7 foot race whose hilly course and large prize attract runners from every part of the globe.  [Dubuque], (90,000 metro) on the Mississippi where Iowa meets Illinois and Wisconsin, is Iowa's oldest city. It is home to a ton of beautiful architecture, four private colleges, a far-reaching ELCA Lutheran seminary, and the Smithsonion affiliated National Mississippi River Musem and Aquarium.  Eastern Iowa's topography is for the most part very rolling farmland, with the exception of the hillier Iowa river valley, Cedar river valley, and the bluffs and hills skirting the whole eastern border along the Mississippi.  The northeast corner of the state is all bluffland, home to small town Decorah and reputed Luther College.

Western Iowa:  The vast majority of Iowa west of I-35 is flat farmland with the exception of the very westernmost strip.  [Sioux City] on the Missouri river (the western border) is a good sized city with nice amenities and lots of historyt.  [Council Bluffs] is the largest suburb of Omaha, just across the river in Nebraska.  The Iowa Great Lakes region contains many large lakes, most notably lake Okoboji, one of only three blue water lakes in the world.  The Loess Hills state park runs along the whole westernmost strip of the state, and offers lots of hilly hiking and some of the state's largest forests.

Iowa's motto should be "Iowa: Not as bad as you picture it."Pretty much the shit.  Make sure you're clear on the fact that the word "the" is in there, or else you'll get the meaning all wrong.  Iowa is home to the three million nicest people in the United States, probably in the world.  A leader in education, and home to some of the most beautiful scenery into the world.  It's a traquil beauty, and if you're into that, you'll love Iowa.  And if you're not into that, you can go take California or wherever you're from and fuck it.a farming state that isnt a bunch of dumb farmers thats [montana]A state that quietly grows corn and takes care of its own affairs. Residents think Des Moines compares to New York.People who dont live in Iowa refer to Iowa is full of corn and farmers. Its full of things pretty much from other states. 3 million awesome people live there. And its probably 3 million people you would never forget because they are so nice. Iowa is also one of the most beautiful places to live and only cool people can live in Iowa. Because Iowa is THE SHITT. Also home to the best college football team the IOWA HAWKEYES!The greatest state in the Union with education, and the ability to function with agriculture and good morals,When western civilization comes crashing down around you other 49 inferior states (Illinois is ok).BEST State in the entire united states of america!

Most, cocky dumbasses hate on iowa, and say that all there is is corn.. Thats completley wrong! EVERY state has agriculture and just about every state grows corn and has corn fields.
So what if iowa has corn, that dosnt mean thats the only thing to do!

Iowa is the best! Our hot chicks and all of our sports teams..

Iowa will fuck up anyone who tries to talk shit on us! were no pussys, we will fight any mother fucker who tries to hate on us!

Iowa has the best state fair too! The IOWA State Fair is possibly the best state fair in all of the US.

We have everything, Demo Derbys, Mudding, So much shit, youd just have to come here and check it out!State in the midwest, mostly farmland, but has a fantastic balance of rural, suberban, and highly populated areas. It is named after the Soux indian name meaning land between 2 rivers(missouri, Mississippi). Produces more corn and pork than any other state, and is not home to a bunch of hicks. in fact Iowa has the highest % of leteracy in the United states. statisticly its largest city, Des Moines, is in a perfect location for trade because it lies on interstate 35 and interstate 80, 2 of the buisiest highways in the US. however, because of Chicago's close proximity there isnt quite as many large factorys as there should be. Iowa is a beautiful state with hilly reigons in the east and hundreds of rivers and streams. The people are known for being friendly, usually hard working, and down to earth.

***to readers in the Northeast and california specificly***
No, just because someone lives in Iowa does not mean that they live on a farm. enough said. and another thing, stop mistaking Iowa for Idaho and Ohio. yes, they do sound the same but seriously, get it right its not that hardWhat the hell is this
I - Idiots

O - Out

W - Wondering

A - Around
shit?
We're the smartest state in the U.S!
For Christ's sake, stop your bitching about our "terrible driving" and go to New York, give me a review about their shitty driving.

God damn, Iowa has some of the nicest people, and there isn't corn EVERY WHERE.
To be honest, there isn't even as much corn as you think there would be, there are more cities than corn.

Plus, if you hate Iowa then promise me you'll never eat corn and or barilla noodles again.
So, all you more suberban suburban states can suck it because Iowa is the shit!A state full of beauty and 3 million of the nicest people in the universe. Also a pioneer in education, with the Iowa Test of Basic Skills and ACT being based in Iowa City. Is home to a ton of natural beauty: Ledgers State Park near Boone, the Des Moines, Missouri, and Mississippi Rivers, as well as numerous forests and woods. Tends to be judged by people who have never visited it.Place of extreme weather.A state of the south-central United States. It was admitted as the 28th state in 1845. Explored by the Spanish in the 16th and 17th centuries, the region became a province of Mexico in the early 19th century. Texans won their independence in 1836 after a gallant but losing stand at the Alamo in February and a defeat of Santa Anna's forces at the Battle of San Jacinto (April 21). Denied admission as a state by antislavery forces in the U.S. Congress, the leaders of Texas formed an independent republic that lasted until 1845. Austin is the capital and Houston the largest city. Population: 17,059,805. 

The Lonestar State, The State that still believes that criminals should be punished, Home of the Wataburger, home of Southern Hospitality, HTown, And Everythang thats bigger and better.

AND NO!! We Dont all walk around with cowboy hats and boots, and we're all not rednecks....for that...see oklahoma.The best Mexican food. Dr. Pepper on tap. Beautiful ladies. Awesomeness everywhere you turn. The best fucking place on earth. Move there now!the only state in the union that can fly its flag at the same height as the american flag.....
and the only reason texas doesnt fall into the gulf of mexico... is because oklahoma sucksHome to Dr. Pepper, several modern and well respected singers, activists, and the like, Sam Houston, and other great men and women before him, numerous plantlife and animals, and a few horrid idiots who give the rest of us a bad name-ie: George Bush.The biggest and baddest state of them all(15 states can be put into Texas and we'd still have 1000 miles left) where everything is bigger and much better than places such as California. Home of a Ranch bigger than Rhode Island,the home of trunk poppin, Dr.Pepper,home of the first word spoken from the moon which was Houston,home of swangin on 84's and vogues, chopped and screwed music, SA Town, D Town, and H Town which are all 3 in the top 10 most populated cities in the U.S.
The Lone Star State was the only state that was its own country, and the only state worthy of even making a definition of. 


If you aint a Texan, you wish you were.The greatest state everOkay.
I was born and raised in Houston.
So lets tell the truth.
-The weather in Texas changes very rapidly, and we get a bit of everything, except snow. That doesn't come around very often.
-We don't get married to our sisters or even distant cousins. A shock. I know. If you want to see some of that go to Oklahoma.
-Not everyone here talks with a distinct country accent.
You have to go to the smaller towns for that. Lufkin, Etoile, Waco, etc. It all depends on what area of Texas you were born in. People move here from New York and California all the time, and we don't sound any diffrent.
Our slang is the only true thing that seperates us.
-Yes, we have racism here. Just like any other state, but it's not as bad as people make it sound. The Africans, Mexicans, and Orientals, etc. out number us by more the 50%.
-Taking hits to our pride by informing us we cuss to much (yes, 'cuss') is low. We cuss just as much as anyone in California, or Florida would.
-No one walks around here in in full cowboy uniform. So if you think we do, maybe you should visit before opening your mouth.A state in the southern USA. Its in the south. There are billboards about Jesus. One can buy [waffles] there.The best damn state in the country!  That's all you need to know.The greatest and most popular sport in history with more than 5 times the TV audience of the next most popular (cricket - every radio and TV in the sub-continent is permanently tuned to Pakistan/India cricket matches - that's a big audience).

Only Americans call it 'soccer' owing to their vast ignorance of what goes on outside their national boundaries and the misnomer which has them thinking than a corruption of rugby, with all the danger and most of the skill removed can also be called 'football'. 

'The Beautiful Game' can be played anywhere, on almost any surface, by any number of players, for almost any length of time. And is. There is no country on earth that doesn't play. It has inspired more passion, more courage and more excitement than any other sport in history and dwarfs everything else.When a girl is playing footsie with you, and her foot travels up to your crotch.A name given to two different sports in which America and the rest of the world use to waste their lives away constantly arguing over which is better. Honestly, I'm an American. And I love the game of American football. But notice how I haven't said that I hate football (aka soccer). In fact, I love that sport, too. I just totally suck at it. Haha. C'mon, be real ya'll. Both games are cool. Even rugby too. It's cool. I have no idea how to play it, but I enjoy trying. It's all preference. For all ya'll that say football is whack cause we wear padding, go ahead and say whatever the fuck you want to say. That padding protects us so we can stay a little safer to enjoy the game a little longer. I don't care if I don't use it, I've tackled mofos twice my size without any padding on. The point I'm trying to make; All three games are great. They all require stratedgy, strength, speed, and endurance. So just shut the fuck up, grab the ball that suits you, and play your damn game already. You got that? Kay, just helping out. I'm just a 15yr old from a small town. Yeah, yeah... What do I know? Honestly? I know it's fucking pointless for ya'll to fight over sports. So just save your shit for someone who's still too much of a punk to simply enjoy a game of American football, football, or rugby. Peace people! Damn. Haha.Football - Only the best damn sport ever. Played with a round ball and feet. However, Americans tend to mistake it for American Football (which should truthfully be called tackleball for all that matters).Also Known As the BEAUTIFUL GAME. A real sport played with your FEET and an actual round BALL, hence the name FOOTBALL. This term should never be used to refer to our silly american game of putting on 30 pounds of armor and carrying a cone shaped piece of rubber while trying not to be touched by other guys. You'll note the lack of definitions calling this silly game football. And there is a reason for that. Some silly americans give us a bad name by not noticing what is going on in the rest of the world and don't realize that there was already a real sport called football when we made up our game, but everyone else in the world knows whats up.
P.S. Please, if you are American please stop saying the S word (s****r)and saying that our american game is better than real football. If you are not american just know that not all of us are confused faggots.A lovely game that alot of people play.
Also the most importmant sport in the world.
Very famous, but also fun for people who like football.
If you dont play football yet, i would say:
Give it a try!

Ofcourse if you start at older age, you wont get as good as Ronaldo, Messi, ...
But doesnt matter, its just for fun! ( Mostly )A variety of games that which Europeans and Americans tend to argue over pointlessly till the end of time as to which version is "right" never minding the fact that due to Cultural Mutation different words can mean different things in other places
Typically Americans profess love for the version that involves padding and an ovoid ball in which the point of the game is to move the ball ten yards down the field at a time through either rushing or passing before passing into the plain of the "End Zone" placed at either ends of a 100 Yard Field to score points
Europeans tend to extol the virtues of a much simpler sport that only requires a pair of goals placed at either end of a field and is played with a checkered Spherical BallOK, here goes... slowly:
The word describes a very populare game, which is played all over the world.
The word consists of two parts, which quite accurately descibes the game:
1) Foot
2) Ball

Part 1) Foot. This means that the foot is the main body part involved when playing this game.
Part 2) Ball. This means that the game is played with a spheric (globe-shaped) object.

This definition seems to be understood all over the world, except in the US, where they have misunderstood both parts of the word. Instead of using their feet, they mainly use their hands. And, instead of using a ball, they use an egg-shaped object.The round form of the drug Zanax that also comes in another form called [sticks] this form is in the shape of a football.A place on urbandictionary.com where obnoxious [eurofags] bitch about how Americans call football soccer and vice versa.A tongue of which the user speaks of something the complete opposite of what the user means. It often has the best comedic value.the bastard stepchild of ironyYour body's natural defense against stupid.A word that gives you the possibility to play with your imagination when asked stupid questions.Something that nobody on the internet can ever recognize.God's gift to man.
Incredibly humourous if used correctly.Noun.  A very British form of humour which derives laughs from saying something while really meaning something else.  Often (though not always, contrary to popular belief) used in scathing remarks.

The word 'Sarcasm' is derived from a Greek word meaning 'tearing flesh', which is why sarcastic vegetarians are so ironic.

See also [irony].The ability to insult idiots without them realizing it.A verbal reflex against stupidity. In my opinion one of the best types of humour.When one says something, but usually means the opposite.
Used sometimes in order to belittle someone and make them seem retarded... or equally to amuse and impress them with your mind. Indeed.Humorous name for oral sex.To drink an entire beverage in one goplace where brain livesOral sex, head.The nickname for members of the Phi Kappa Sigma fraternity.Another word for a female sucking cock. " Oh baby, give me some skull!!" It's the same thing as saying give me some head, or give me some brain. Cock-sucking words are great!!what the hardcore kids give instead of head.

see [skull fuck].to give or recieve oral sexTo bash another in the head,Created in an attempt to imagine what in the world someone could have going on in their head when they say or do something absolutely ridiculous/ illogical/ or straight up retarded. This person must be lacking a brain in their head i.e having nothing more than a flesh covered skull resting on their neck. Skull.A coat that makes you invisibleOne who lacks the skill to contribute balanced team work in an MMO. Also known as train mobber, skill-less peon and fearless noob.Cloak is another way of leaving without anyone else knowing.to smoke marijuana.To have sex, or to [fuck]. In the context of the vagina's ability to envelope, engulf or cover the penis like a piece of clothing. Perhaps a term originating from Canada.an extremely beautiful women/girl who everyone loves and will never forget. she has many friends and people feel they can always go to her for help, no matter what the situation is. cloaks is a great listener and speaker, she is also very creative and imaginative. She tends to be very artistic and athletic. Cloaks enjoys acting, dancing and singing, she is also very good at them. Cloaks is also a great lover in the bedroom, Every man thinks she is irresistible and falls in lover with her at first sight.a super gay homofag queer fairy buttpiratea friend or aqauntancethe result unprotected [sex] of a male and a female of the same species; also can be known as [offspring] and [brats]things that interupt you while your banging you wife.Anyone below the age of 18 (or 21, in some circles.) Don't listen to the idiotic fools who hate on little kids because they think it's "hip and cool".The stuff that gets shot all over the place during sex.the worst STD you can get.1.Something REALLY old people desire to be when their backs start breaking and their hearing and eyesight get poor.Krazy Individuals Destroying Societywhat teenagers claim they are notA baby goatThe word people use when you've done something that isn't technically "bad" or "wrong" but they still don't like it anyway and expect you to conform to their personal tastes.What your mom says when she catches you masturbating.The current euphemism for "wrong" or "bad." It is supposed to sound more objective than "wrong" and "bad," but it is not.putting it simply, not [appropriate]the [definition] of [urban dictionary]not suitable or proper in the circumstances. Action could be used in a talking, visual, or sexual manner.In high school settings, short skirts, low cut tops, see through clothing and skin tight jeans.  The student handbook says not to wear this, but many girls still wear it anyway to look skanky.The act of saying something irrelevant to the topic or becoming mad feisty with another person without an apparent reason. Usually accompanied with the action of standing up and pointing your hand down to the person it pertains to.The word that used to actually mean something, but doesn't mean anything anymore.To [curse] or '[cuss]'. Swears are considered inappropriate to use in public places, but are less offensive than other profanities. These '[bad word]s' are often referenced by pre-adolescents by their first letter (the 'f' word, the 's' word, even 'h-e-double-hockey-sticks').Any word that a person says when they can't think of anything intelligent to sayTo verbally abuse, or to rape an object with hatred wordsWords that people get offended by for some unexplained reason.when something is weird or funny and you sont have anything to say, you just point and say swear! swear this, omg swear that.

or it can be used like the world "seriously"Swear is used often for cursing someone, often with any consequences.

Perfect swearing language: Russian language is also the 5th officially used language over the world, aside English or Spanish. Russian language has more swear words in them, than any other language.

According to the infamous Taboo vocabulary, you can literally talk and swear in Russian and make lines, that make sense.Word that makes your sentence mean something, and actually prove a point.cannot really be defined but in terms to understand it can be understood as being dumb, stupid, retarded, saying something that is absurd.(verb) when someone thinks they're SO much better than others; someone who is conceited and vain, and definately wants others to notice.[fuck]
[ass]
[damn]
[hell]
[shit]
[bastard]
[bitch]
[crap]
All [racist] words.When someone else gets hurt.1. Something that causes you to laugh
2. A person who isn't quite rightA way of describing the girl you really like, either to said girl or your friends, without hinting too much. Either used by shy men who have a hard time admitting they really like someone or describing the girl you like to your friend that proclaims himself the matchmaker or love finder (yes, this is a stereotyped friend that every bro has, you may even be this person - if so, you have learned the secret code of bro hinting (ha, and you only thought girls spoke in hint))When someone else gets hurt.The only part of a newspaper worth looking at.  Located beside or near the crossword puzzles and cryptoquote.  Famous funnies include Garfield, Family Circus, Andy Capp, and Peanuts.Makes you laugh, oddA plural exclamation of extreme humourosity.  

OR

When followed by a question mark, a needy request to find out whether a joke has been accepted or not.The fact that you're wasting time looking up "funny".Definitions on urbandictionary tagged with 'funny', usually aren't.If you have to look up funny your probably a fag.Big
Gigantic
HugeA compliment- referring to either muscles or more commonly, the mail genitalia. Also associated with terms such as "biggie" or "bigs". Add "particularly", "fairly", or "rather" for added enjoyment.Something of excessive size.  Normally associated with [heavy] as well.the state of the penis when arousedone thousand United States dollarsa thousand dollars - they say it all the time in the Sopranosaka, huge, masssiv, ownageIn sarcasm, to refer to something as unworthwhile, lacking merit or otherwise derogatory.

Can be used with prefixes "fairly" and "particulary" for added effect.

See also: [small]Really good, excellent. Used by DJs and dance music fans to describe a track.When you are 'avin' it in a collosal fashion. One size fits all. It is possible to say "how are you avin' it?" as this means the same thing due to the fact that there is only one size to 'ave' itA good fun alternative to life.crack, in CD-ROM form.The most highly addictive game ever played. It will consume your soul and poison your water supply.A highly entertaining mmorpg that is played by a wide variety of people. some get addicted to it like its crack cocaine, and some only play it a few times a month. The level of addiction all depends on the person playing it.The world's most effective form of birth control.A computer game whose participants apparently don't know how to correctly make words plural.

Hint for WoW players: it doesn't involve an apostrophe.Taken mistakenly as a peer to EverQuest or EverQuest II, it is an entertaining game in which a player learns how to cooperate as a team, and harnesses competition, unlike EverQuest II. The irony behind half of the definitions under this category is this: If you'd read the back of the box, you would realize that it states "even if you only have a couple of minutes, World of Warcraft's superior quest system offers quick gameplay." The sad truth is that people don't want to accept the fact that many of the players on this game have lives, jobs, spouses, ect. They see that it is an MMORPG, and automatically assume that it's a parallel to EQ and EQ2.A game were nobody but the company taking your money wins. Often replaces one's social life.A game that manages by some divine power to completely waste your life and lets you have fun while doing so.World of Warcraft- WoW is kind of like smoking. You don't see what all the fuss is about in the beginning, until one of your friends gives you a free taste. Still, you can't see how addicting it is until you have tried it a few times. Then you start buying it, and using it by the bundle, and you can't seem to stop. You'll do anything just to get a few good hours in with your favorite pasttime. You slowly start to lose touch with former friends and family, and meet lots of strange new people with a similar addiction. Prolonged use can lead to death. It's very difficult to get out of your system, you must rely on the strangth of others, for your willpower has ben sapped.
General Surgeons Warning- Not intended for oral or anal use. WoW shouldn't be used if you suffer from seizures or are an expectant mother. Side effects include obsession, nausea, vomiting, and pink eye. Ask you doctor before using.Somebody who finds great pleasure in the art of Computer Programming.

Synonymous with: Hacker, ProgrammerThe low end of the scale as far as [software engineers] go.Slang word, used by idiots, for the term 'programmer'. Often used by communities for Private Servers. There are related words such as 'Code' or 'Coding'.a bitchy old, pregnant man with a beer belly. not just old but he ancient, he was in the same class as jesus when they were kids.short for code infraction, used at [Delbarton], get three and you're strongly encouraged to leave the school.Fake Fag Slang for ProgrammerJail guard, cop, security guard, etc.
Someone with power over you in a controlled surroundingswhen you lose your virginity or just has sex and you can't say it out loud you say you wore a "blue shirt"an extremely hot guy with a nice bodyA huge spokkerjones that will never know the embrace of a womanThe opposite of a Red Shirt. A character in a fictional series that will simply not die, regardless of fans hating them or the amount of injuries they sustain. Some true Blue Shirts even die and are resurrected through some means, just to spite the viewers.The opposite of a Red Shirt. A character in a fictional series that will simply not die, regardless of fans hating them or the amount of injuries they sustain. Some true Blue Shirts even die and are resurrected through some means, just to spite the viewers.The opposite of a Red Shirt. A character in a fictional series that will simply not die, regardless of fans hating them or the amount of injuries they sustain. Some true Blue Shirts even die and are resurrected through some means, just to spite the viewers.Someone under the 25th percentile for stature for their age, sex, and country.
(5'7" and under for men and 5'2" and under for women in the US)what i am.1.) noun, A cigarrette, having been previously smoked, but not completely, suggesting the later use and finish of said cigarette.The small coffee size at Starbuck's; the only size on the menu there that makes any sense (et al [Tall], [Grande], [Vente]).Comfy and easy to wear.Military and prison adjective for describing someone nearing the end of their tour of duty, enlistment or incarceration.  A [short-timer] is someone who has less then 90 days to serve.  A Korean War veteran told me these terms were in wide use in the late 1940s; they have been in continuous wide use in the military since then.outta luckto be not tall. under 5" tallsnoun; used by a third party person to express when somebody has insulted or humiliated another personShort was used long before there were compact cars.  It goes back to at least the Forties on the Southside of Chicago.  It means ANY car.  It was from the vernacular of hotrodders and black gangsters. It probably derives from "hot short", which evolved to "hotwire" ... a car.1. The Good Part - The woman you marry and live with for the rest of your life.

2. The Bad Part - The woman you marry and live with for the rest of your life.extreme hardcore version of a girlfriendThe beautiful, inteligent, classy and fulfilling companion of a man that is wise enough to notice such qualities. Usually despised and hated on by the [baby momma].A prostitute with a life-long contract to a single client.A woman that a man is married to.The person that is there for you whenever you need them, the person that makes you want to be better, the person that you love and cherish forever.

(Hint: getting married to a woman you don't love isn't a good idea, don't do it.)w.i.f.e.
wash, iron, fuck, ect.The reason I drink so much.The name of someone that is on a vendetta to make you regret ever choosing her as a partner.term used in reference to the woman in which a man is the most emotionally involved with & who he feels the most obligation toward. she typically has characteristics which would make her a desirable long-term partner.The cause of, and solution to all life's problems.Any of a class of chemical compounds having the general formula ROH, where R represents an alkyl group and -OH a hydroxyl group. Most commonly refers to ethanol, which you can drink to forget how much your life sucks, and methanol, which you can drink when you remember.Liquid Panty RemoverA substance found in beer (except American beer) and several other beverages that makes you excessively happy, sad, belligerent or horny.  It allows white men to dance and ugly men to get laid (when given to their victim).Alcohol. What most of your university/college life will revolve around.The buffer between reality and a good night. Has been known to make people seem more attractive and make obviously stupid idea's seem like good sense.The antidote to reality.The answer to the question "What made you move to North Dakota?"1) The active ingredient in alcohol is ethyl alcohol, which is produced by yeast. Working much like [ether], alcohol puts the brain to sleep. Alcohol functions as a depressant to the central nervous system and slows down body functions. In large amounts, alcohol causes sedation, intoxication, unconsciousness, and possible death. Aside from significant negative physical consequences, chronic use of alcohol can lead to physical and psychological addiction. 

2) Colorless, volatile liquid obtained by distillation and fermentation of carbohydrates (grain, molasses, potatoes [irish]). Alcohol is antiseptic and cooling but is also very drying to the hair and skin; care should thus be taken not to use too much. 

3) This constituent of wine is a natural by-product of fermentation. It is one of the main pillars of perceived flavor, the others being "Acid", "residual Sugar" (and/or "Glycerin") and "Tannin". The presence of these components define a wine that has "good balance". For tablewines the wine label must, by law, state the alcohol content of the wine within the bottle, usually expressed as a percentage of the volume. Table wines do not usually exceed 14% alcohol content - (11% to 12.5% is generally considered the optimum amount) - although a few, such as Zinfandel, can go up to a 17% level. Sweet dessert wines fall in the same range. Fortified wines - (eg: Sherry, Port etc) - range from 17% to 21% alcohol content. 

4) Ethanol or ethyl alcohol (C2H5OH), the liquid produced from sugar by fermentation that can make you drunk 

5) A chemical compound formed by the action of yeast on the sugar content of grapes during fermentation. Most wines have between 7 and 25 percent alcohol, which gives wine is vinosity. If wine has too much alcohol for its body weight, it is unbalanced, and will taste uncharacteristically heavy or hot. The quality will be noticeable in aroma and aftertaste. 

6) A general class of hydrocarbons that contain a hydroxyl group (OH). The term "alcohol" is often used interchangeably with the term "ethanol," even though there are many types of alcohol. (See Butanol, Ethanol, Methanol.)liquid stamina in a bottleA holiday that no Black people I know celebrate.
Well , one year my Uncle tried to , but we all laughed at him.A holiday developed by a Dr. Maulana "Ron" Karenga, a black militant, Marxist, and convicted felon.
Just five years after this, he was convicted of torturing two black women to death. 

Observed from December 26 to January 1, Kwanzaa is based on a mixture of East African harvest rituals, called "first fruits" by Karenga and 1960's radicalism. This is in spite of the fact most slaves came from West Africa.

Viewed as an "alternative" to Christmas, it, nonetheless, is based on race, and not in faith.1)A made up piece of shit holiday steeped in all the deepest traditions of Sweetest Day  or Secretary's Day. 

2)A holiday for African Americans that no African American observes or understands.It's the right-on power handshake of the 1990s.  Yet another politically correct tactic to get whites to pay attention to non-whites, primarily blacks.  It's a fabricated holiday based on race, invented by a convicted felon, which is too third world for most black Americans, too jewish for black muslims, and too stupid for everyone else.  Now that's a fine example for the ghetto children of the world!Kwanzaa is a Counterfeit made up, holiday started by a black convicted kidnaper, rapist, Karenga, whose criminal record includes having been convicted and jailed on charges of assault and false imprisonment for the torture of two black women.

There is no nothing ethnically African about it, it is all fake andObviously a manufactured holiday created by African Americans in the late 1980s/early 1990s, when the fad of that time was to be "African", which is why Eddie Murphy's "Coming to America" was a blockbuster hit in 1988, when in reality it was a [racist] shit movie that made fun of people from Africa.A fake and gay holiday made up by some random black guy in the 60's.A popular file sharing program for African-Americans.An African-American holiday that celebrates the deeds of a brave little boy who saved his village from man-eating tigers by having them follow each others tails until they turned into butter.
Flapjacks with loads of butter are served at the holiday meal.The black [Hanukkah]God's gift to the world.  Brings peace when used wisely.An ancient plant, refrenced biblically {the Holy Herb}.

Gets you rocked, and has been proven to be less harmful then alcohol or cigarettes. It has never been conclusively proven to have caused a single death in the entire world, ever.

Easily avalible in most forign countries, and Alaska, where everybody grows it anyway.

Can be purchased by the (if you're lucky) gram, or (not so lucky) by standard measurements. (1/8th of an ounce, 1/4er, 1/2, ect. An eigth usually weighs 3.75, depending on the weight of the baggie and weather or not you're buying from an asshole. There are dealers, and then there are professionals.) usual prices for the sticky-icky-icky (Not that cheap mexican shite, but tanqueray-and-chronic-chronic) can run from $30 to $50 and even $60 an eigth. I even heard it ran eighty an eigth out on Kodiack Island, but you gotta look at the market from a local poiont of view.

It's easier to get then liquor if you're under 21. 

It will not cause you to shoot your friend with the gun you found in your parent's bedroom while they weren't home. (That's shitty parenting, folks, not the pot!)

It's healthier then Xanax if you're just looking to ignore your troules for a few hours.

A biennial Youth Risk Behavior Survey, released May 21 by the U.S. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention stated that more of america's youth smoke pot then cigarettes.

It's a step in the right direction, folks!the answer to all in this horrible world of oursmarijuanaweed not a drug!the dried leaves and flowering tops of pistillate hemp plant that yeild cannabin and are sometimes smoked in cigarette form for its intoxicating effect   

aka

fucking awesomeweed is marijuana, stupid. here's some names i've collected
weed
chron or chronic
dro (hydroponics)
sticks and stems (shitty weed)
sticky-icky (dripping with THC)
mauie wowie
jamaican red hair
blueberry
strawberry
AK-47
kind bud
snowflake
skunk and super skunk
mary jane
MJ
grass (no one calls it that anymore)
ganga (pronounced GAHN-JAH)
herb or herbal
dank
trees
mids or middies (average weed)
damn, there's a ton more, i just can't remember from smoking all of the above.a beautiful thing if used properly. all it does is make you happy.an essential substance in most people's lives.A green plant god put on the earth for me and you.Type of [Christianity] that places authority in the Bible as the infallible word of God. This does not necessarily mean a literal interpretation of everything in the Bible (cf. [creationism]). Not to be confused with [evangelism], which means something entirely different.A generalization of multiple groups of Protestant Christianity. It's not actually a denomination, but a category that churches of many denominations fall under, ranging from some baptist churches in the south to non-denominational churches in the north and along the coastline. Using that criteria, the majority of protestant Christians in the US probably fall under the "Evangelical" category. Despite popular belief, they are real, tangible people, who are just as capable of being discriminated against as the people who they are frequently (and usually, falsely) accused of being discriminated against. An Evangelical Christian is best characterized as someone who wants to spread the Gospel of Christ by being living examples to the people around them. Real Evangelicals do not believe in forcing people who are not Christians to act like Christians, because they believe that Christ his followers to only come of their own free will.

Evangelical Christians should NOT be confused with "fundamentalists," a term that has come to mean someone who is far more mental than fun. Evangelicals tend to believe in more literal interpretations of the bible, but that does not mean that they are against scientific study or using critical thinking (after all, how can you understand how the Bible applies to your life without critical thinking?). Also, they do not want religion to control the government, because as [Martin Luther] figured out during the dark ages, religion controlling government is actually a cheap disguise for the government controlling religion. True Evangelicals want freedom of religion, and that includes the freedom to share the gospel with others.

Evangelical Christians are a large, and unfortunately, misunderstood part of the global population. They are constantly stereotyped as being hateful, bigoted people, even though many of them have done many great works for bringing rights to people and sending help to places. Evangelicals want to change their communities for the better by changing the people, one person at a time. Maybe if people came to realize that the large majority of Evangelical Christians are actually legitimately nice people who enjoy life and are happy to share their happiness with others, they'd realize that the mainstream perception of "evangelical" is merely an aggressively propagated stereotype that aims to strip Christians of their legitimacy as human beings.Comes from the word 'evangelism', which means spreading the good news about jesus christ.

So inturn evangelical is living your life in the way that god wants you to, so that others may see you and see how god has worked in your life. It is not a way of forcing a religion on someone.

It can also mean to speak to people about jesus.A sect of christianity that is full of mindless, brainwashed followers who spend their entire life in misery when they aren't spreading the gospel. The whole sect is full of middle class/rich white folks who want to go to church to be entertained by crying, hysterical preachers and find new prejudices to be in support of. They believe that their religion is the only way of life and refuse to accept any other ways.  There is no 'conversation' with evangelicals...they only convert. BEWARE.According to society, the only demographic that should feel ashamed of themselves when campaigning or when casting a vote.The Andromeda Strain of Christianity. Often called "conservative Christianity", when in reality it is a very modern radical version. Evangelicalism has no true theology, substituting apologetics for theology, and far more concerned with what will draw in people than in actual beliefs.

Evangelicals are often mistaken for Protestants, however the two groups a quite different. Protestantism is based on the idea that people can read and understand the Bible for themselves, without need of a mediator. In Evangelicalism, your minister is the final authority of what the Bible means.

Evangelicals gather to worship in thousands or tens of thousands in the belief that their minister is an intermediary to God, and that it is very important to get their religion directly from him.Describes Christians who try to uphold the tenants of the Protestant Reformation, but without all that courage, conviction, and critical-thinking baggage that got their 16th and 17th century forefathers burned at the stake.  Also known as "Evan-jelly-fish" due to apparent lack of brain and spine.christians who like to argue and force their ideas of religion on others. sometimes resulting in violence and always voice raising.Modern day nazi's. They brainwash there followers using group hysteria, which Hitler used. They try to convert everything that moves by forcing people to beleive what they think. They consider themselves an army of god, ready to fight for his bidding.

They are also hypocrite's. E.G. Ted haggard , who is one of the pastor's at a mega church i colorado, paid a male prostitute to butt fuck him after condeming gays and homosexual activity. He asked forgiveness and was forgiven and "cured", but if any one else who wasnt evangelical did that they would not be forgiven ( like Bill Clinton).1. an adjective synonymous with "mindless."

2. a noun synonymous with "fucking idiot."a broke ass mutha fucka who relies on crack to sustain daily life.  Often seen running at full speed for a multitude of reasons.People of any race that live to hit that nasty-ass rock. Usually real thin, dirty and smell like warm trash and/or spoiled milk, fecal matter, rotting corpses etc. Frequently bobbing, weaving, twitching and glitching. Large periodic spurts of energy. Always got something for sale or knows somebody that has just what you need. The most severe crackheads can be viewed in the wild missing standard items such as shoes, socks and teeth. If you come into contact with a crackhead it is suggested to secure all valuables and avoid any physical contact or direct contact with their breath (could cause dizzyness and/or vomitting).  If you lose property to a crackhead, accept the loss. If you find yourself chasing a crackhead, accept the loss .. crackheads are fast, they be gittin somewheres.. You ain't catching no crackhead...1.a person on crack
2.a moron1. one who does excessive amounts of crack.

2. one who acts as though they do excessive amounts of crack.Someone who smokes crack and will lie cheat and steal from anyone to get a hit1.one who is highly addicted to the euphoria brought on by crack cocaine.
2. one who does stupid things.1. one who partakes in smoking crack cocaine.
2. One who can run like the wind when s/he believes that quazimotto is chasing him/her.
3. one who will try to sell thier dog on e-bay.
4. If you live in a hotel, have no food, are pregnant, and your only worry is when/how to score...you are a crackhead.
5. one who acts "crackish"
6. A Jarrod or an Izatt.
7. A "parent" of a Crack baby.
8. The person who robbed you.A crackhead is the lowest form of a drug user. They abuse the drug crack cocaine. They are often liars, traitors, and thiefs. 

Crackheads are often paranoid and fidgety. 

Crackheads can be anyone, any race, any gender.

Crackheads will sell everything and anything to fuel their addiction. 

Crackheads cannot be trusted. If you ever find yourself to a person who is a known crackhead, try to get away as fast as possible, otherwise you may lose valauble jewerly, wallet, etc. 

Unless you don't mind having any of your prized possessions disappear, it is not wise to let a crackhead into your home. Never leave a crackhead unnattended to, or you will find things mysteriously go missing. 

It is important to never let a crackhead get to you, don't ever let them get under your skin. You are the stronger person in the situation, unless you too are a crackhead.

Crackheads are pathetic.Somebody who does [crack] regulary and gets addicted. Thus becoming a crackhead.The lowest form of a drug-user.The infamous act of a girl getting fucked by a donkey cock, whilst paying gentlemen gather around and watch.as stated above, refers to a woman getting fucked by a donkey, often performed for the pleasure of refined gentleman.  

one variation (specifically found in tijuana) is a competition in which different whores fuck the donkey.  the depth to which they are penetrated is marked by tying a red ribbon (a la tony orlando and dawn) 'round the donkey's cock.  the girl who takes it the deepest wins (i guess?).A sex act involving a woman and a donkey in which the woman fornicates with said donkey, typically performed in rural Mexican cities.An act where a horny woman gets corn-holed by a raging horny assa show where a woman has sex with a jackass1. A form of entertainment most commonly associated with being presented in Tijuana, in which (usually) men pay to observe a male donkey have sex with a female human.

2. A popular Oregon radio show, broadcast from Eugene with a transmitter powerful enough to be heard even outside the state depending on how good the receiving radio is (Vancouver, WA is an example). Syndicated in Medford (south of Eugene) at night time, though the hours the show is actually done is 2-6 PM. Broadcast on 101.5 KFLY FM, the show plays little music compared to most FM radio, and is mainly composed of the two co-hosts Tanner and Drew sharing their often humorous opinions and satires of current events and people currently in the news; as well as other commonly done humor-based radio bits. They refer to their listeners as throbbits (from a pornographic parody of Lord of the Rings).a live show in which a woman has sex (oral, anal, vaginal) with a mule or donkey. they are usually found in seedy areas of border towns in Mexico.  yes they really do exist and aren't terribly hard to findSomething you really don't want to be a part of or see.Donkey shows usually take place in TJ.  It is when a donkey's penis penetrates a (sometimes kidnapped) women.an obscene performance in which a woman copulates with a [literal] jackassthe police (see also [fuzz station])Comes from the fact that a lot of police back in the 60's joined straight of the military and they brought with them the very short military haircut that gave them the appearance of fuzz on their heads. When they took their hats off, your first comment might be, hey look, it's the fuzz. It's a style of haircut that made wearing a police hat more comfortable and cooler to wear......still in vogue today and used by many police officers around the world.A slang word for the police used by poor greasers.the fuzz refers to the polices like [the heat] i think the word is derived from the police always being on your ass or in you face like [peach fuzz]The fuzz is a word used when your so frikkin high that when the cops come to bust your ass that u call them the fuzz because the crack and chron are blurring your vision.Means "son of" (hence all the English surnames like Fitzpatrick, Fitzhenry) but can also refer to an illegitimate child, a bastard, someone born out of wedlock etc.A nick name for someone with the last name Fitzpatrick or Fitzgerald.1. noun- full retard

2. verb- to instantaneously lose control of your bowels in an unannounced fashion. Usually resulting in going commando for the remainder of the day.

3. adj.- awesomer than everybody and everything around you.

4. adj- The inability to come up with a response to an insult, usually resulting in threats of sodomy.1.  A suitable name to dipsnap to.
2.  A kid who is popular because his name sounds cool if you say it loud enough.A boy who used to be hot, but glowed down a lot!When someone agrees to do something and changes their mind five seconds laterthe art of coordinating clothing and accessories with name brand shoesTo take your workload and pass it on to an unsuspecting co-worker.a cut on your thumb or a cut on any finger(V) Otherwise known as pulling a Terry Tate, to tackle a coworker in a surprising manner across a row of cubicles. The tackle might be as aggressive as a flying pile-driver or as subtle as kicking another's leg out from underneath him.Analagous to their malevolent movie counterparts, the modern-day Gremlin is most often found on weekends in between the hours of 1800 and 0400. When in its passive form, the Gremlin is most often a well-intentioned and meaningful contributor to society. However, when provoked (usually by means of an ex-girlfriend or obnoxious fool at the bar), the Gremlin first becomes forlorn and introspective, then mischevious, and in some cases violent.

If you encounter a fully manifested Gremlin, you are advised to stay clear (especially when the Gremlin is in a doorway). If you feel the need to intervene, it has been said a trip to Burger King can passify the creature.

The Gremlin will return to its natural state by morning, usually feeling embarassed and apologetic.1.) Little meshevious devils that cause problems with everything around you.
2.) Little red men with horns you see when you are stoned.
3.) Imaginary little devils you can blame shit on.A Gremlin is a woman who a man likes to fuck but doesn't want to go out past dark to eat with......because shes a beast to look at or emotionally unstable.The gremlin is a furry critter that will use her petit stature and nubile appearance to gain the trust of others. Upon making the mistake of trusting a gremlin, she will then lurk in dark corners and attack at any given moment. This evil hobbit will engage in acts of deceit and general tomfoolery as a means of social interaction. Characteristics of the gremlin will include:
-Rage blackouts
-Violent attacks from behind, especially on the knees
-Full speed bodychecks
-Stealing food from gardens
-The belief that she is average height, when she is in fact, gremlin height
-The use of such phrases as "frig-a-mug" and "go S a D"A drunk friend after midnight. You don't feed them.Girl doesn't get wet for you.Making weird or distractive noices revolving around food.
Being generally weird and always hungry and wanting foods such as chocolate or spaghetti bolognese!A small ginger creature, usually found in a darkened room eating ham sandwiches. She sleeps for most of her life and only wakes to scuttle to the kitchen to make a sandwich. Gremlins can be located in the London area and on a quiet night you can here the high pitch cackle when she is amused. By all means stay out of Gremlins way in the mornings.Your girls fucking clingy ass best friend. Have you ever wanted to do something with your girl but her clingy ass best friend is just jealous of you, and doesn't want your girl whom is her best friend doing something because she can't so she tells her not to and your girl listens to her? That right there is being a fucking GREMLIN! GREMLINS are needy as hell and their jealousy of you grows exponentially. You're basically fucked when it comes to gremlins...there's no cure to this shit.The small pieces of [weed] that sometimes don't get smoked because they got stuck to the top inside edges of your [bowl].What this fucking definition is, asshole.1. [n]  the action of attacking the enemy

2. [adj]  of an offensive substitute for inoffensive terminology; "`nigger' is a dysphemistic term for `African-American'"

3. [adj]  unpleasant or disgusting especially to the senses; "offensive odors"

4. [adj]  morally offensive; "an unsavory reputation"; "an unsavory scandal"

5. [adj]  causing anger or annoyance; "offensive remarks"

6. [adj]  for the purpose of attack rather than defense; "offensive weapons"
   
7. [adj]  violating or tending to violate or offend against; "violative of the principles of liberty"; "considered such depravity offensive against all laws of humanity"
   
8. [adj]  causing or able to cause nausea; "a nauseating smell"; "nauseous offal"; "a sickening stench"

 
 	Synonyms:	 	abhorrent, abusive, antipersonnel, assault(a), assaultive, attack(a), attacking(a), charnel, creepy, detestable, disgustful, disgusting, distasteful, dysphemistic, foul, ghastly, ghoulish, hideous, hit-and-run, horrid, horrific, incursive, insulting, invading, invasive, loathly, loathsome, marauding, morbid, nauseating, nauseous, noisome, objectionable, obnoxious, obscene, odoriferous, offence, offending, offense, on the offensive(p), opprobrious, outrageous, predatory, raiding, rank, repellant, repellent, repelling, repugnant, repulsive, revolting, scornful, scrimy, scurrilous, sepulchral, sickening, skanky, tip-and-run, unpleasant, unsavory, unsavoury, unwholesome, verminous, vile, violative, wicked, yucky
 
 	Antonyms:	 	defensive, euphemistic, inoffensive, savory, savoury, unoffending, ylbissopA highly subjective interpretation of something real, imagined, or interpreted as being demeaning; very often the use of complaint to attack someone while paradoxically assuming both authority and victimhood; the use of complaint as a sociopolitical weapon or vehicle to often unmerited benefit, privilege, or compensation.Describes a statement politically or ideologically inconvenient, esp. in the judgment of one having no knowledge of the matter at hand.  Often used to stifle further discussion or pander to the lowest common denominator.  Cf: [fair and balanced].What you see that you don't like when you look in the mirror.The act of attacking & destroying an enemy's self esteem; utilizing unconventional remarks, stirring the enemy's emotions making them unable to network an insult measuring to your ego. If done correctly, the enemy will leave in anger to cry or to write about it in their diary, resulting in a successful response: rage quitting.1. merely mentioning anything about your "lifestyle and/or preference to women"
2. reading a book for class that has the word gay on the cover(that in no way to sexuality)
3. watching a movie where a girl says she loves another girl in a friend way
4.anything having to do with gay rights1. To take a stance or position against a percieved [assault].

2. The quality of an [attack] used against an [opponent] or [enemy] during [battle].

3. To find an [opinion], [act], [object] or [situation] to be [detestable].ANYTHING. LITERALLY ANYTHING THESE DAYS. ANGSTY TEENS GET OFFENDED BY EVERYTHING. IT'S ANNOYING. TAKE A JOKE.a person on social media-especially ifunny-who hates on and/or reports fandoms, furries, bronies, emos, porn, lgbtq, and anything else they don't like. also known as a hater.having no shame.A person who has no shame in getting what they want...often on there knees for best resultswhen someone makes a really stupid mistake, normaly blondes (like me n terri)1) Short for the drug, Cocaine.
2) Short for the beverage, Coca Cola.An addictive soda.

An addictive drug.1. A popular short term for the popular soft drink Coca Cola.

2. A popular short term for the popular, a illegal, drug Cocaine.Any drink served in the SouthWhat I would live the rest of my life on if I had enough money1* soda
2* short for coca cola
3* cocaineA highly addicted substance that ravages both mind and body!

....also the name of a powdered narcotic.1. Hard arse stimulant.  White powder derived from the Coca plant, native of Sth. America.  Very expensive but in small quantities is a fine buzz...

2. Short for Coca Cola - essence of American capitalist pigdog.  Made from [bumsweat] and sugar.1.What kept Tony Montana standing in the last 10 minutes of "Scarface."

2.Warm, its the best rust remover on the planet. (Put a little Coke in a cup and put a nail or small piece of sandwich meat on top. In the morning, meat is gone, wipe off rust.)

3. More popular than you think. I mean cocaine.Always available at bars, both over the counter as a soft drink or mixer and everywhere from the guest lounge to the toilets.

Often the word media or media bar means coke freindly, due to the common opinion that any person working in the media profession is a coke user.One of the smartest medical dramas to ever have aired, House, M.D. features the maverick, anti-social doctor Gregory House (Hugh Laurie) who specializes in infectious diseases and does whatever it takes to solve the puzzling cases that come his way.  

A show that should rob this year's Emmys if not for its sheer quality then for Laurie's brilliant acting.n. a style of electronic music originating in the late 80's in the USA characterized by four-on-the-floor bpms between 110-140, synthesized melodies and bass lines.A slang word with a hundred different definitions, 90% that were made up on the fly here at urbandictionary.com, to the point where it could be substituted for so many words you have no idea what the f**k someone would be talking about if he/she used each and every one.probably one of the best medical dramas ever to hit television, features Hugh Laurie, who plays the anti-social, sarcastic, pain in the ass doctor, who specializes in recognizing infectious diseases. He and his team of doctors take on extremely hard cases, House usually ends being right about the disease at the end of the day.

This show is truly great and it murders Scrubs.Nothing more or less than the best TV show that ever was or ever will be. HOUSE FTW!!the MOST awesome show on television! (well, next to Scrubs) which stars the wonderful British actor, Hugh Lauire, as the genius, pain in the ass, Gregory House.1. (v) to consume a substantial quantity quickly, completely, and with purpose.
2. (v) to beat in competition.
3. (v) to dominate.Pronunciation  (hous)

House Music: The original electronic incarnation from disco. House typically runs around 120 beats per minute (BPM) and uses a 4/4 time sequence and an eight bar repeating cycle. The beat is maintained by a heavy kick drum that alternates in a 1-3 pattern with a high hat accent. Like its disco roots, house often features vocal choruses, real instrumentation, and a more traditional song structure.A fucking wooden or brick fucking place where you live eat and sleep in.A bigger older woman with sexual desires towards younger men. (Usually a housewife.)To run over on a football fieldA vehicle of a redneck, which he drives to a date with his girlfriend instead of carring grass for cows.another four-wheeled vehicle with a flat bed in the back used for storage of equipment, groceries, small recreational vehicles, tools, or extra people. The pickup truck (as previously described) is the most popular automobile among men.A large vechile presumably with a bed for hauling, moving, towing, or even storing what needs be.

The absolute worst thing a person could do to a truck would include the following (these are all sins of god, and you will be punished accordingly):
-lowering it 'til it's an inch or less from the ground
-adding neon lights
-adding a fuckin ricer exhaust system... which most of time would just include tips or some other retarded peice of chrome
-PUTTIN A FUCKIN SPOILER ON IT
-adding giant ass rims to it, then stretching these tiny ass treads over'em that look like they'll pop any second


A real fuckin truck would include the following:
-A "body-on-frame"
-A real fuckin engine, varies from size of the truck (ex. an S10 with a small block, a brand new giant Ram 2500 with a Cummins Diesel)
-Four wheel drive... because some of us have the balls to get off the blacktop, just for fun or required for certain jobs, which most of you BMW pricks would be afraid of, don't wanna raw up them soft hands
-bedliner

optional:
-a nice leveling kit and/or lift kit
-some differential lockers with some beefy axles
-winch
-good ol' 15"/16"/17" wrapped with some treads depending on what terrian you work/play in (crawlers, boggers, LT's, swampers, AT's, 32"-40", etc.)
-sway bars, roll bars
-engine upgrades

Trucks are great vehicles. They are designed to do things cars can't, and most of them are built solid like a rock. Last long. Work hard and play hard. Besides the MPG... why wouldn't you want a truck?The metal part underneath a skateboard that holds the wheels in place (kind of like an axle on a car).  Used for grinding (riding on rails or waxed services).They are the device that attaches the wheels to the [skateboard].When a person does something that you didn't expect or you are so amazed at what happend your speechless.Someone who draws negative attention by not having their shit together. Most commonly used in jail.a word to describe someone/things extreme greatness. it is also a multi use term and can mean anything. it also can be used as an action word.Connection, association, or interaction with a person/place/thing; usually used in a negative sense.The hair on the back of you neck that is nappy, un-tameableA woman's natural habitat.The room where grandma hides her shotgun shells.A mysterious place full of sharp, pointed objects, deadly gas-operated incinerators, things that go 'ping' and a big, cold wardrobe full of beer which is the only true incentive for entering the room in the first placeA nickname for the holdem hand ten three (T-3) offsuit, a term used by many prominent online poker players, and coined by the professional online poker player Jamie Armstrong, aka pokerjamersa word used to describe nappy-naps in the back of a females head...On the sitcom "Martin" he often uses this word to insult the character "Pam"...because her back edges are apparently nappy and rough...Where the goods are cooked, things are shipped/delivered, people get swerved, and basically all the dope shit happens. Sometimes referred to as the bakery.a sammich factorythe back of the nape. (usually used in the phrase nape of the neck).Afro-amerain women or southen women call it"The Kitchen"(Traditional) The place in a home where a woman belongssomething that happens when the condom breaks on prom nightThe worst STD ever.  Causes pain, poverty, and eighteen year of torture.Carrying developing offspring within the body.your end of life...

you are totally fucked.

OWNEDSupposed to be the happiest moment in a couples lives but the dumb asses who conceived by accident just ruin the definition.

Don't have sex until your ready for the consequences.The condition of being able to make twice as much money in the porn industry due to supply and demand.The blossoming of a new life...in your life.When are girl has a baby growing inside her! After she has had unprotected sex!This is what happens when a male and a female have sexual intercourse and the sperm fertilises one of the woman's eggs after ovulation.

Contrary to popular (male) belief, pregnancy is not the woman's fault, it takes 2 to tango if you know what I mean...

Women also do not get pregnant to 'trap' a man. Because if he was indeed worth holding onto, she would not need to get pregnant to keep him, nor would a rubbish guy stick around if he got a woman pregnant either. (See scum or coward)

Pregnancy is the aprox 40 weeks of gestation in which it takes a human being to develop and grow inside his or her mothers body before birth.

It is in 3 stages (known as trimesters)
Pregnancy is divided into three stages called trimesters, each of which lasts three months. The first trimester covers the first 12 weeks of your pregnancy. This stage is often the worst with morning sickness and fatigue as common symptoms.

The baby grows inside the uterus, gaining it's nutrition from the placenta and kept safe and protected by the amniotic sack.

The woman's body goes through serious changes both physical and mental.

The mental changes include, hormonal, she may feel depressed,anxious,happy and angry, her mood changes often, she is not going mad, she is just pregnant!

the physical changes include: her tummy growing (obviously)
her breasts growing and producing milk ready for the babies arrival, usually in later stages of pregnancy she may leak milk.
Her nipples will also swell and darken, her breasts will grow larger, she may also get other skin conditions depending on hormone levels.
Aside from good changes to her body she may also find her immune system is weak, leaving her susceptible to colds,flu and other virus' and infections. When a woman is pregnant, her immune system is in over drive to stop her body from rejecting the unborn baby.

Pregnancy can be both a wonderful and horrible experience for someone. (including the babies daddy who has to put up with a very hormonal pregnant lady)

And before any man can insult a pregnant woman let me just say, if you get a girl pregnant and blame her for it, she is not going to want or need you anyway, so don't think your so great :)
A baby growing up with one parent is better than a baby growing up with an asshole for a father.

Not all pregnancies end with a baby though.
Some women for what ever reason choose to terminate the pregnancy, this does not make a woman a bad person, If she is not ready or in a good position to have a child, or say she became pregnant after rape, then she may choose to abort. No one has the right to judge someone for terminating pregnancy. Abortion is neither right or wrong.
Some pregnancies also end in miscarriage, and some pregnancies are ectopic.

Pregnancy is a natural thing and without it the life of all species would cease to exist.1. A state a woman may find herself in after having unprotected sex with a man.  Involves a child growing within her body and can be discovered by the absence of menstruation.  May cause illness.

2. Bloated, held out, prolonged.

I'd also like to say something to all the men out there who think that getting a girl pregnant is a death sentence!
Being pregnant is a wonderful and painful experience that you'll never have, so just shut the hell up about your selfish views.  Women don't trap men by getting pregnant.  It's not their choice!The act of receiving a serious butt whoopin at the hands of a person or group of persons.A severe beating delivered with the hands and feet; a pummeling so bad, the recipient needs to use his health insurance; see [open a can of whup ass]A good, old-fashioned ass kickin',Assault by the police after being arrested1. To beat someone up very badly, to the point of them being on the ground. This can happen with a combination of the following:

* Punching
* Kicking
* Kicking [Balls]
* [Curbstomping]
* [Fist Fight]ing

After the victim is on the ground, various forms of abuse may happen. Beatdown is then concurred, and a broken limb is required before it's real beatdown.

2. Another way of expressing utter defeat of someone. Can be used in celebration or defeat.v. (1) to verbally berate into submission (publicly) (2) to physically rough up or convincingly administer authority over another person or thing (3) the exercise of legitimate authority, rules, or known customs which leaves a person or persons in a poor position and often disappointed.
n. the act of beating down (2) a disappointing and unexpected result to an attempted action1. A fistfight where the odds are stacked highly in one of the two participants favours, commonly resulting in broken bones and softening of the face.

2. The climax of a hardcore song, usually a down-tempo combination of palm muted open strings/extensive pinch harmonics and low end chords, where crowd participant's can quite simply unleash the beast on one another.

3. fucking awesome.To receive a BEAT DOWN would be equivalent to getting your ass seriously beaten by another person or persons; to have one's ass handed to them; to be "pounded into the ground" by someone who doesn't like you.the dance of the hardcore kid.... it is when the guitarist simply stums the D or C string open.....The act of pumbling, destroying, and smashing a disgusting creature, especially ostriches, salamanders, junebugs, armadillos, and orangutang. Beat downs are given if and only if the act of being crusty or ugly is committed. They are given very often and involve fists and feet, or anything wet.Yellow bread made from cornmeal ubiquitous in Southern cuisine; it is slightly sweet, and usually served with butter.A baked foodstuff for which the primary ingredient is maize, which many people call corn, a grain.  Tradition holds that the Pilgrims ate corn bread because it was a plentiful grain - and the only grain - readily available where they settled in Massachusetts.1. A food commonly eaten by big booty black bitches.

2. Ur ass cherry(virginity),A girl with an extremely large ass, this refers to the fact that she must "eat her cornbread" in order to obtain such a fine ass.Money a prostitute makes from performing anal sex acts, as in getting [cornholed].a staple in African-American cuisine, often served with greens, coated with yam juice.The most delicious bread on the planet that was invented by Indians and is made out of corn.A name that no one will take seriouslyReference to the song "No sex in the champagne room" by Chris Rock. In it he says "Cornbread. Ain't nothin' wrong with that." So this word means that someone is perfect and you can't find anything wrong with her, just like cornbread.An affirmative statement.  A word mumbled when in acquiescence with another.  Used in place of the words: agreed or indeed.

It can also be used in random outbursts when feeling elated or quirky.Where you sleep when you get your girlfriend mad; but not mad enough to be kicked out of the house.when a girl sits on your lap and subtly grinds your cock with her ass in public, pretending that shes not (like a couch dance)the second best thing to use next to the bed ;)One's system of morals or beliefsA piece of furniture more diverse than a coffee table.A word used to replace words such as "fuck", or "shit", and has multiple uses as saying "back off". Or it is a piece of furniture that is ussually sat on.referrers  to the "sit-able" [plateau] of an excessively [fat] [booty]couch - an offensive term used to diminish someones social standing. Inferring that the person in question enjoys anus on his/her face.

A amicable term in some social spheres.The place where young children get ston'd in the morning.A lazy person.The reproductive system (gender neutral).Bhe act of saving a life when a person is drowning or choking by repetitively thrusting one's penis in and out of the person's throat. The thrusting creates a plumbing effect that forces the obstruction to move up the throat. This action is in no way sexual; it should only be used during times of grave danger.The act of purposefully stopping up your toilet so that the plumber will come to your house and unclog it.Wearing one's pants so low as to display one's asscrack. Derived from the state of many a fat plumber's pants.(verb) Very deep anal penetration
Deep-sea plumbing: Anal penetration over 10 inchesGeneric term for the bars of a jail cellTo forcefully insert a hollow metal pipe into the rectum of a woman and suck out all of faecal matter. It is similar to a [filthy fiddler].Plumbing is a sexual act involving a man and a female. The aforementioned male pops his penis in the girl's vagina, lubricating her ring, tickling and widening the said orifice. When that there hole is at maximum size, the man pops the scrotum and both balls in that bottomless pit of love.Any brass wind instrument, because of the appearance of the tubing.A Farm-veihicle that can pull farm-implements.  Tractors are usually used to pull items, and often have a [Front-end Loader] attacthed.Something you like, alot, think is attractive.A really, really fat girl that you bang because your stupid/high/desperate.A Techie, and a Actor; this person does both on stage and behind stage work, for theater.  This term was invented by WMHS Techie/Actors who needed a name in MoCoSomething really good. Mostly used in Kansas but also widely used throughout the midwest.An insult describing, someone who is slow and annoying.Big ass black bitch screwing a little white man while intoxicated.One who has ways from the rural Southern U.S., particularly Texas and most particularly, the town of Thorton, TX.word for female genitals.
aka. twat lol.(TRAK-tor) Used with [trash] to create [tractor trash]. Describes [white trash] from predominantly farming communities.Any opposite sex escort taken to an event in an effort to give a homosexaul person the apperance of being out on a date with a person of the opposite sex.a man or woman used as a cover for a gay partnerA female or male(though,mainly female) who is used as a cover-up for a homosexual.The single most manly, and great thing a man can do. To have a beard is to be a true man. If you have a beard, show it off proudly, and enjoy the satisfaction of the envy in the eyes of people around you who don't have beards. If you don't have a beard, grow one. If you cant grow one and your not past puberty yet, hold out my young friend, your time will come. If you don't have a beard and your past puberty, go get that sex change you know you need.The best solution to any problem. A sort of spiritual band-aid that's only effective when used by men.A common word used to address a homosexual's female friend who he takes around town; he normally calls this companion his "girlfriend" to prove to the world that he is a masculine, football watching, titty grabbing heterosexual male. Although, he may think that this so called 'image' is working, he's actually fooling himself. It's completely obvious to on-lookers that he is a flamboyant homo. Gayer than a chihuahua in pink shades. 

Here are some warning signs that you may be a beard...

1. He wears more makeup than you.
2. He looks fucking FIERCE in pictures 'cause he smiles wit' his eyes.
3. Uses bronzer as blush
4. Plucks his own eyebrows and his eyebrows look more groomed than yours.
5. Stands with hands on his hips.A condition that causes hair to grow from the chin and lower face. Symptoms include itching, divinity and gratuitous awesomeness.

Synonyms include: Jesus.The term 'Beard' is used to describe a person who is being used by another person to cover something up. This can range from gay men using a girlfriend as a beard to make people think he is straight, or someone using a friend to make people think they are hanging out with them when really they are with someone else.1. A boy or girl hired as a celebritys boyfriend/girlfriend by that celebritys management, usually for publicity.when a gay man and a gay woman date each other to hide that fact that they're gaya woman's hair arranged at the back of her head, held together with a band and to be used by a man as a handle while receiving oral sex from a willing female.

A straight ponytail is grasped near the base in a male's fist, medium grip. This allows nice control of the female's head, but is limiting due to awkward bending of the male's wrist. It is a carpal tunnel syndrome hazard for men who receive a high volume of blowjobs. The height of the ponytail on the back of the woman's head can be adjusted for better torque.

Another type of ponytail is the balled ponytail. The straight ponytail is simply folded under itself and tucked back into the band, resembling a ball of hair. Grasped with an open palm, the fingers should meet at the band, thus the "ball" is contained in the man's hand. Called the "palm sander" grip, it allows full control of the woman's head with no wrist strain.

A third type of ponytail is the double ponytail. Two tails are formed toward the rear left and right sides of the female's head. A favorite among bikers as each tail can be grasped by a separate hand. The willing lady's head is steered like a motorcycle.

Caution: though clearly sexual stimuli for men, it is important for men to remember women do not always view it in the same context. Women often use ponytails just to keep hair out of their faces. The confused male should never just assume when a woman's hair is in a ponytail her head is ready for mounting. He should always ask first.Ponytail; verb.  To grab a girl by her ponytail and remove her from whatever current situation she is in.1) the thing that's on a ponies butt

2) when a person with long hair puts it in a singular hair elasticA meme that took the Bioware Social Network by storm in anticipation for Dragon Age 2.

The second day of live feed from gamescom in Germany proved to be nothing but slow, dull hours of people standing by the DA2 booth and taking pictures in front of its poster.

Bored, the online viewers took note of one booth workers' Godly hairstyle of a long, blonde ponytail-braid. So enthralled were they that within just a couple hours; a Facebook page, several threads, a Chant of Ponytail (parody of DA:O's Chant of Light) and a social group on the Bioware forums had been created in honor of her.

Bioware remarked on it via Twitter, and Ponytail occasionally waved at the camera and appeared generally entertained by her sudden popularity from her self-titled army.Where a girl puts her hair up in a single rubber band.
why:
So she can smack a bitch
So she can smack someone in the face with her hair
To try and impress someone
To give head

It also the most impossible thing to do when you have messy, snarled hair i do not reccomend it you will look terrible unless you have bobby pins to fix that shitGetting alot of head.Basically it is a term used for people whose skin color is darker than most. Normally referred to as "nigger", "negro", "knee's grow", or "samo-niggaz". They are typically found wandering around in Compton shooting down samo-niggaz, also if you are trying to find them in the dark, say a funny joke it will make them laugh and you will see their teeth. For example: "What do you get when you cross a samoan and a negro?" -pause- and then say "SAMO-NIGGGGAAZZ!!!!!" in a very niggerish accent. When you come across a ponytail you have to holler at them for example...When someone has a cock stuck on the back of their head that resembles a cleft of hair being draped down the back of their neck.(from a hairstyle popular with the people described, usage invented by Kaecyy in 2005)

A generally amiable but hopelessly nerdy person-- not necessarily possessing an actual ponytail or even long hair-- who is usually immersed in a combination of science fiction and fantasy literature (and their derivatives), roleplaying games (often in their live action varieties), the gothic-industrial subculture, and/or the historical reenactment of pre-industrial periods of European history (often at what are called "Renaissance fairs")-- among other influences-- to or nearly to the point of lifestyle.Ponytail is when a gay or bi guy gets mad at his balding lover for not satisfying him sexually. When his lover falls asleep, he jacks off on the guy's bald spot and then  affixes a tube sock to it. The guy wakes up with a "ponytail". A variation of the [superman].A man who is fascinated with large breasted women, who as a child was deprived of his mother's breast milk and was a bottle fed baby.Heroin supplier; a penny balloon that contains narcoticsa heroin dealerslang for [condom]; slang for protection during sex.A woman's breasts, AKA [boobs], [tits], [jugs], [hooters], [knockers].Elegant strip club located at 233 Porno Ave in Providence, RI. Famous for allowing men (and women) of all ages, including those 15-17.  Home of the infamous "referee" (bouncer) who also offers lap dances for a discounted price.A fool; a person who has just made a pretty obvious mistakeBalloons are used to hold heroin (usually low grade H). A dealer will use un-filled balloons (the multi-colored, water balloons, most of the time) to place a small, universal weight, amount of heroin into. The weight of the heroin inside each balloon can vary depending on who packaged or "tied" them. The amount is usually about .1grams per balloon. People buy them in packs of 10 or more, and rarely buy/sell a single "balloon." Rumor has it, the reason heroin was originally put into these balloons, was so you could swallow them if need be, and not need medical attention.Another name for [breasts].A very weird thing that is basically a colored plastic sack of your breath to give your friend on their birthday.1. A source of information.

2. A source of entertainment.

3. A tool barely used by todays societies, because it is not 'cool' to read a book.verb meaning to run or to leave in a hurryan object used as a coaster, increase the hight of small children, or increase the stability of poorly built furniture.What people don't read enough today.cool: the first option given when trying to type 'cool' in a text message using t9Did you know there HAVE been books printed since the fifties and the new ones are cool?  They have them so anyone can understand them.  Books can be about video games, sex, drugs, sports, people, pretty much everything.  They come with cuss words, funny characters and you might understand some more of you those weird things...that's right. Words.Something we stopped caring about after the [internet] came along.Portable sanctuaries.Words assembled on pages. They usually tell stories of things the reader is interested in. That is, unless you're reading in [school]. Then, you have to read books nobody cares about or even likes. Maybe more people would like reading if they weren't forced to read books that they didn't like. I know I would.cool.

In the T9 predictive text on cell phones, the numbers 2665 spell both "book" and "cool," but "book" is the first word to display. To save time, it is left and understood to mean "cool."The best thing in the worldthe reason you need a new hard drive.The traditional way for young female Americans to afford university education (those not from wealthy families).A great American pastime.something that both sexes can enjoy.Arousing materials usually employed for masturbatory purposes.

It's often said that the most senstive part of your body during a porn session is your ears - no one likes getting busted with their undies around their ankles.

But, the use of porn doesn't need to be such an ugly experience.  'The Big Wank' (see below) is an example of how you can add more mystique and romance to your evening at home alone.peas and corn mixed together in a bowln. Reading and viewing material, otherwise known as 'cliterature'.Will never die, as long as there are folks willing to strip for the camera, the people who wish to browse it, and the assholes who wish to destroy it.something that the user loses interest in after masturbation has occurredhairy mofo.Heartless, 
Having no emotions,v. used to describe something awesome or nice ; something worthy of hatinBetter than [cool]
To be cooler than cool
The coolest level of coolwhat a girl says she is when she wants to snuggle :]plain, obviously, flat out, straight upan annoying and contagious illness that causes sniffling, sneezing, coughing, and other symptomsharsh, mean, icyCold was a rock band that started in 1986. They released 4 cd's: Cold, 13 ways to bleed on stage, year of the spider, and a different kind of pain. They also released an ep called Oddity. The band consisted of lead singer Scooter Ward, Matt Louhgran, Zachary Gilbert, both guitarists, Jeremy Marshall on bass, and Sam McCandless on drums. Former members included Mike Booth, Sean Lay, Terry Balsamo, Kelly Hayes and Eddie Rendini.
On February 27, 2006, Ward left a message on their official website saying they had disbanded. However, he said he and Sam will continue writing music.An infectious disease that usually spreads like wildfire around people, because people don't give a shit worth about others. They would yawn cough and not wash their hands properly to prevent others from catching the cold. If you catch a fucking cold, don't cough, cover your fucking mouth, and if you go to either 1-12 grades, go to the back of the class, and don't spread your fucking cold.Pretty, beautiful, hot1- *FRIDGE; - ph-ry-dJG ; verb- the action of destroying or assassinating a persons anus with a penis of considerable magnitude often resembling a 57 bus. The action, ususally performed in a violatory sense, produces the aftermath of either one of the following symptoms; laseration and/or complete tearing of the anal orifice, the dissemination of part or the entirety of the subjects' internal organs where the giant girder cock forced its entry, and/or the complete annihliation of the victims existance to the extent where it would be more appropriate to use the remains to bury the compost that would have been used to otherwise bury the remains.

2- As above but via a huge hit during a Football game.

3- Literally a Football player of such magnitude that he resembles a walking samsung fridge/freezer combo.someone who has never french kissedshort version of refridgeratorAn extremely cool person, the phrase was coined by BriBry (A YouTuber with 21,000+ subscribers) on a blogTV show in April 2011.A girl who is frigid and only hangs out with girls. Perhaps the date, but they are too scared to do anything.

They also are overly sacarstic.someone who hasn't got on (french kissed) anyone yet.place to store cold drinks and food

since when do u keep ice-cream in da fridge-noun, /frɪdʒ/: A common kitchen appliance used to store and preserve dead human bodies and body parts for consumption.Anyone from Shenendehowa HS knows that the fridge is 'a place to go sit and chill'A very appealing being full of human desires. When the fridge is full, it can make anyone very happy. But when not full, it has the potential to kill.A maker of [trouble] is not one who "causes" trouble, but who achieves a level of trouble by being [Mischievous], [Stunning]!, [Sensational]! and [Smart]...1. When knowingly, and consciously getting into trouble with no regard or care for the potential repercussions.

2. When one said person has one or more warrants for their arrest at one time.
3. If your name is Brittany Rivera.(n). 1. A poo that is very stubborn, requires a lot of force to eject., 2. Hardened feces which is lodged at the anus, preventing soft feces behind it to pass.

Example. "Where's a magazine? I've got a trouble-maker to work out."A troublemaker is someone who expresses a view on a forum that differs from those of the Administrator and/or, as is more common, a moderator of a forum. The person deemed to be a troublemaker will usually be 100% correct in their statements, but the moderator will object, making statements that could be classified as being a [bigland].

As a result the troublemaker will then be told to go and form their own forum, even though everything they said was both reasonable and correct.When you pair a shot of tequila with a Guinness.[Spike],the troublemaker. Generally considered out to [lunch]. Known for wildly outlandish behavior. Highly unstable antisocial personality however incredibly sexy.a person who escalates a situation.Someone who brings about or initiates something.A person who starts fights or arguments.A blow up alligator; short for instant gator.A person who instigates.  To instigate is to conspire, plan and prank the local populationtype of person that gets information from people by overhearin wat they say ...and then tell their bestfriend <3Bunty, officially known as the instigator.1. (before 1997) Something really bad; a failure

2. (after 1997) Something considered excellent and/or the best (uses modifier "the")something very cool/ goodA graffitti slang wordrefers to a person male/female who's attractive , on they steez and or carries themselves well .Fast Graffiti Pieces, more than two colors, uses all of your letters. not much details just enough to look good and be on your way.(verb) the act of writing a grafitti tag in a highly visible public place.To fail spectacularly.Something you never say on air airplane.Slang for Ecstasy pillscool, awesome. Also see shita baby cat! sometimes they can't meow properly yet and they are sooo cute!An baby [cat]. Also known as a [kitty]. They have sharp little claws and teeth and can be nasty sometimes, but they are soft, cute, and totally lovable. Their meow is just precious to hear. Be gentle; kittens are delicate.1.  An immature cat.
2.  An adorable ball of fur with big eyes that uses its powers of cuteness to manipulate human beings into submission and slavery.
3.  An adorable, yet insane, tiny monster with teeth and claws.Cute little fluffballskitten (kit'en) n. 

 A small, sometimes domesticated animal; usually a pet; a member of the cat family, wants to grow up to be a lion, tiger, leopard, etc; thinks the world revolves around her; is probably right.little fluffy bastardsa woman who likes to date men older than her, usually by about 10 years, or more depending on the woman. Also the opposite of a cougar.The casualties of masturbation.(n) Term of coolness for a female from the 1950's and still used in [rockabilly] circles.Small balls of fluff that people perceive as being "cute". Everytime you do something naughty, they die.random weather patterns. makeing meteorology nearly imposibleThe 17th state of the United States -- in 1803. Contains 13,000,000 people and its chief cities are Cleveland, Cincinnati, and the capital of Columbus. Ohio is known for being the home of the Wright Brothers, the first man in space, more presidents than any other state, and Generals William T. Sherman and U.S. Grant. Also home of the champion OSU Buckeyes. Unlike what others may tell you, there are larger hellholes in the universe. Ohio has a lot to offer and is a decent place full of decent people.A land of shifting mists, Ohio is the most mysterious state in America.  There are some who claim that it does not exist at all, but is merely a hoax perpetrated by a strong core of dedicated jokesters in the "neighboring" states of Michigan, Pennsylvania, Indiana, and West Virginia (we're pretty sure no one tells Kentucky anything).  

Most people believe, however, that Ohio DOES in fact exists, and that its mystery is due solely to the mysterious mists that seem to enshroud the entirety of the state in...well...mystery, deterring all but the most stalwart of travelers.  Constituents to this belief also hold that Ohio is, in fact, the last home of the dinosaurs, and that Ohioan economy is based almost solely on quarrying and agricultural works using highly-trained dinosaurs as the primary (and literal) beasts of burden.The Buckeye State. One of the best states to live in, and all around best in the Union. We have 3 major cities: our Capital; [Columbus] (aka C-Bus, Bus Town), [Cincinnati] (aka the dirty/nasty Nati) and [Cleveland] (the Mistake by the Lake). Home to smaller cities such as; Dayton, Toledo and Akron. 1 NBA team, 1 NHL team, 1 MLS team, 2 NFL teams, 2 MLB teams. We are also home to THE Ohio State University Buckeyes, one of the largest/best universities in the country. Also home to Ohio University, which is filled with raging alcoholics that refer to themselves as "students". Most of us in Ohio, (especially us in Columbus) were born and raised with the Bucks. We bleed Scarlett & Grey. We say things like "you guys" and a drive-thru liquor store is not strange to us. It's the beach, not the shore, and pop, not soda. We are the Eastern most state in the MidWest, and have some of the friendliest people around. Ohio girls are some of the coolest/nicest you will ever meet. We are a big football state, but Lacrosse is another sport everyone plays. We play a little game called [Cornhole] anywhere we can. We love our corn & we love our beer. We are Ohio. The Heart of it All, and you'd be nothing without us.The only place in the world where you can experience all four seasons in one week.A chant that occurs in Columbus, Ohio between 2 individuals or 2 groups of people who are too stupid to get that not everyone they see gives a rat's ass about sports and can't spell the name of the four letter state they live in without help from other idiots. Proof that OSU students don't learn anything but how to get arrested, drink, fight, watch football and date rape each other. Anyone who yells "O-H" at you in Columbus is a complete waste of flesh and deserves to get their ass kicked.1) One of the states of the United States of America.
Home to a bunch of formerly bad but now improving pro sports teams, a ton of colleges, the OSU Buckeyes, actual buckeyes, part of the Rust Belt, Cedar Point and a lot of soybeans, cows, and corn.
Ohio contains a little bit of all the typical Midwestern environments- college towns, suburbs, cities, urban areas trying to reinvent themseles, farmlands, etc.  It also contains part of Appalachia, and a large number of "swing voters".  It has quite a few ardent liberals and conservatives, and has been the home and/or birthplace of eight presidents.  The weather, it being part of the Midwest region, is often "crazy" and swings between hot, mild, cold, and freezing.  The four seasons are widely known to be "winter, still winter, almost winter, and construction" or something to that effect (believed to be taken from a Jeff Foxworthy chain email).
There's definitely a lot more there than bad drivers, "hicks", and cows, and just driving through the state does not really do it justice.  You've got to experience it to really understand it, and then you can pass judgement.
2) A song written by Neil Young (while he was working with Crosby, Stills, Nash, and Young) in response to the [Kent State Massacre], which occured at Kent State University in Ohio on May 4, 1970 when National Guardsmen opened fire on student protesters on the KSU campus.I used to think that this state was propably the most suckish, boring state EVER.
I think a lot differently now.
Here are a few things about this Awesome state.

HISTORRRYYY
This was one of the first states of the Northeast, Established in 1803. The three main cities are Columbus, the capitol, Cleveland, and Cinncinati.
The Wright Brothers were raised in Ohio.
So were eight of America's presidents.
Aaand the first man to walk on the moon.
Akron was the first town to use police cars.
Cleveland was the first fully electric powered city.
Also the first state to use traffic lights.
And many many other things that I can't remember.

TIPS, HINT, AND INFO FOR ANY TOURIST...

1; STAY. AWAY. FROM. SPRINGFEILD. TOWNSHIP. This is basically the cespoo of Ohio. Unless you are crazy, like everyone else that lives in that weird place :D

2; ..I suggest dont go to Toledo.

3; If you have the courage to yell, 'I LOVE MICHIGAN' in a public area...You. Will. Be. Eaten. Alive. Unless you're in Toledo.

4; When you hear someone yell, 'O-H', you yell 'I-O'. Dont ask questions. Just do it. 

5; Don't. Diss. OSU. You will also be eaten alive for that also. Again, unless you're in Toledo

6; In response to number one, stay away from Ellet too.

7; Our weather is crap and very unpredictable. Deal with it. I suggest bringing snowboots in the middle of summer and shorts in the dead of winter.

8; Only we can diss our state. If you diss it, we'll agree with you for that second, then again, eat you alive.

9; There's a 3/4 chance you will be eaten alive.

So, that's only 1/4 of the stuff in Ohio. Come here to figure out the rest for yourself :D
But...Try not to be eaten alive...America is the melting pot of the world; Ohio is the melting pot of America.  There will never be a pot more melting than Ohio.  Some say this makes Ohio a blurry combination of everything, and that it is not very distinct among the states, but this is cantrary to the truth.  No other state is like Ohio, in that it is a melting pot.  Also, Ohio's flag is one of only three non-rectangular significant world flags, and the only non-rectangular flag of the states.  Ohio's also cool cuz I live there.Ohio is the heart of America and is well known for it's amusement park in Sandusky Ohio called Cedar Point, which has over fourteen rides and loads of tourists come summer.

Ohio also has a huge historical background which can be seen almost everywhere you go.

Ohio is one of the states with the most American accent.

It's pronounced, OH-HIGH-OH, not OH-HAI-UH. If you go to any person who was raised in Ohio they will laugh at you for pronouncing it differently than 99% of America.

Ohio rivals with Michigan about sports, and they don't like each other because Michigan thinks Ohioan's drive slow -- while Ohioans think they drive like bats out of hell. (Which they do.)

Most of Ohio is taken up by farms and fields, but don't judge it by the land, for there is many neat things you can discover in Ohio.The religious belief that every word of the sacred texts is literally true; stereotypically in Christianity and taken to such extremes. See also: [fundamentalist].A group of people comprising 0.002% of the world's population yet drawing unproportional amount of media coverage (especially Israeli Jews).1. Someone who practices Judaism.

2. Derogatory term for someone tight with their money or someone not very generous.The only people in the world that are simultaneously hated by both the extreme Left and the extreme Right.

Synonym: [scapegoat]A person of the jewish faith.Let's Clear up some of the Misconceptions in these postings.

A Jew is a person who's mother is Jewish. (Some streams of Judaism argue that Jewish patrimony can be acquired through the father as well). 
Jews are not a race but an eclectic mix of different races, nationalities, and cultures; they are a truly multi-cultural and multi-ethnic people. However, within this mix, there are distinct ethnic groups such as the Ashkenazic and Sephardic Jews that make up the overwhelming majority of the Jewish People. 
Most American Jews are of Ashkenazic origin -- usually originating from Eastern Europe or the former Soviet Union. Therefore, American Jews could largely be classified as an ethnic group, hence the characteristic stereotypes, although there are exceptions.
 A Jew is not a person who practices Judaism, although most Jews do adhere to some form of Jewish practice or cultural tradition.
 A Jew is not an Israeli and an Israeli is not a Jew. An Israeli is a citizen of the state of Israel. While most Israeli's are Jewish, there are also non-Jewish citizens of Israel. 
A Jew is not automatically a citizen of the state of Israel. A Jew must apply for and be granted citizenship to the state just like everyone else, although most are awarded citizenship rather easily.1) someone who practises judaism

2) is also a culture/ethnicity, that is to say it has a certain sense of humour, certain type of food and music etc.

3) A person who Mel Gibson talks smack about after he has had too much to drink.A southern bastardization and contraction of the two words "did you".Something you blame something.Like Christians, but without all that Jesus stuffone who practices the world's oldest monotheistic religionLacking any class. Dumb and unartful, like most of the words in this dictionary.
[fool]the classy way of saying awkward. use it.Adjective

gauche (comparative more gauche, superlative most gauche)

Positive
gauche
		

Comparative
more gauche
		

Superlative
most gauche

   1. Awkward or lacking in social graces; bumbling.

          Quotations:
              * "Seeking by vulgar pomp and gauche display" — Samuel Griswold (1793-1860)nuveau riche, "cursi", expensive but tackySocially ackward and lacking Social experienceThe hair on a dogs cock after the lipstick has been withdrawn.Male genitalia. Pronounced "gooch".A girl's boyfriend/crusha classy, sophisticated manner, much like audrey hepburn. it is classy, glamorous, without being a pushover, and without being flashy. its an element of class.Glam without being trampy - attention grabbing class! It is sophisticated, intelligent, and gorgeous.Chic is an elegant fashion sense, that is also very glamorous, and does NOT mean a girl, thats CHICK!Hard to define, a certain eliment of style and sophistication in your fashion sense. Almost artisticly stylish (don't ask).An abbreviation for Cherry Coke. Commonly herd in the hood.It's simply just another word for stylish.

FACTVery attractive lady with an air of elegance flowing around her but at the same time she is very friendly and approachable.

She is a very genuine character and there's nothing pretentious about her.

Very sexy but not slutty, not a skank. She dresses herself decently, and appropriately.To be super stylish. One of the cool people. Effortlessly awesome.An abbreviation of the word chica that close girlfriends or besties say to one another. Usually girls who are called this are hot, sassy and feisty!One of the tightest disco-funk band of all time.to groom a man.  Shaving, waxing, cleaning up the superfluous fur.A term used to define male grooming below the belt. A male can use both an electric razor or a regular razor. A Mach 3 is preferable with the ladies on the testicular area. No female likes to deal with hairy balls, so men must education themselves on proper manscaping and maintenance techniquesWhen men shave or trim their cock and ballsA mans grooming of his body hair.  Like landscaping, but for the body."I have no idea what this is."

- Jonathan GoldsmithA fine artform exclusive to men;  the continued upkeep of exceptional hygeine and strategic hair removal as they pertain to the male body.For a guy to trim his pubic hair or to style it fashionably.To trim male pubes back to a reasonable bush."I have no idea what this is"
- Jonathan GoldsmithA word used to discribe the shaving of a Males pubic /chest/ and back hairs.

-Its pronounced like Landscaping but with a (man) instead of (land).Describes the complicated love and affection shared by two straight males.-noun
1. A [non-sexual] [relationship] between two men that are unusually close.

-verb  -mans-ing
1. The act of wooing a fellow male friend for the purpose of becoming closer.
2. Going to unusual lengths in an attempt to become closer with another male friend.

also: "Bromancing the Stone"
1. The act of truly and thoroughly  enjoying the process of getting and/or being high/stoned. 

Provenance/Origin: "Bromance" is a [portmanteau] of the two words "brother" and "romance". Originally coined by author/editor Dave Carnie in "Big Brother Magazine." [Big Brother] was a sort of R rated [skateboarding]/skate culture magazine that was eventually purchased by [Larry Flynt]'s [Hustler] [conglomerate] and consequently taken out of [circulation] due to unsatisfactory sales [performance]. Carnie used the word on several occasions to describe relationships between [skate-buddies] who spent a lot of time together and/or shared hotel rooms on every tour/skate [road trip].A close relationship between two bros to such a point where they start to seem like a couple.The relationship between two straight guys. They enjoy each others company and even though they may constantly joke about being gay they are not.a highly formed friendship between male friends, or "bro's".(N) The intense complicated love shared between two heterosexual males that consists of but not limited to wrestling, numerous man-dates, and tons of other stories that will only remain between the two.

Also a form of male bonding to such a point where they start to seem like a couple.

This bond is normally only shared between two males that have a deeper understanding of each other, in a way no woman could ever realize.Bromance

-noun

A strictly non-sexual relationship between two completely heterosexual men that are close and enjoy eachothers company but still enjoy the company of women.What House and Wilson or George Clooney and Brad Pitt have.

Dating back to Plato and Socrates, a close but non-sexual relationship between two men. The whole is greater than the sum of the individual parts.

To girls this means, George Clooney + Brad Pitt>George Clooney or Brad Pittwhen two guys have a very close bond, to the point where they act like a couple, except that they are both straight. Signs of a bromance include, but are not limited to: knowing what the other is thinking, hanging out 27/7, hugging, extensive high-fiving, and sharing clothes. Some famous examples include Sherlock Holmes and Watson, and Captain Kirk and Spock.Noun- An intense and extreme non-sexual bond between two straight males. Said to be a “deep emotional bond” that no woman could satisfy.As a rule of thumb, it is profoundly unwise to take crack-cocaine. The brain has evolved a truly vicious set of negative feedback mechanisms. Their functional effect is to stop us from being truly happy for long. Nature is cruelly parsimonious with pleasure. The initial short-lived euphoria of a reinforcer as powerful as crack will be followed by a "crash". This involves anxiety, depression, irritability, extreme fatigue and possibly paranoia. Physical health may deteriorate. An intense craving for more cocaine develops. In heavy users, stereotyped compulsive and repetitive patterns of behaviour may occur. So may tactile hallucinations of insects crawling underneath the skin ("formication"). Severe depressive conditions may follow; agitated delirium; and also a syndrome sometimes known as toxic paranoid psychosis. The neural aftereffects of chronic cocaine use include changes in monoamine metabolites and uptake transporters. There is down-regulation of dopamine D2 receptors to compensate for their drug-induced overstimulation. Thus the brain's capacity to experience pleasure is diminished.Crack is something that is sold by both drug dealers and prostitutes. The only difference is that a prostitute can wash her crack and sell it again.Another form of cocaine:  2 parts cocaine to one part baking soda, with a little water, heat gently until a precipitate forms: this is your crack1. Smokeable cocain 
2. A program to unlock trial versions of programs 
3. "[butt cleavage]"Otherwise known as crack-cocaine, this illegal drug is a mixture of two parts cocaine and one part baking soda. This chemical process reverts the powder-cocaine mkaing process by one step, producing a smokable form of the naturally found alkaloid cocaine. Because of its nature as an inhalable substance, the high is quicker and more intense, leading to a larger number of addicts. In present society, it is considered to be much more distasteful to use crack-cocaine then powder-cocaine as crack is mainly viewed as a drug for poor people whereas powder cocaine is used by a richer constituancy. Contrary to popular belief, crack-cocaine is not freebase cocaine. Freebase cocaine is a mixture of cocaine, ether, and other dangerous and combustable materials. Baking soda was replaced as the ingredient in the 1980's to make production easier and less dangerous. Either way, crack and freebase cocaine produce the same smokable form of the drug.A small, illegal program who's sole purpose is to trick another program (by editting, imputting a registration key, or some other method) into thinking it has been registered.The area between the ass cheeks and, in females, including the crevices of the genitalia.Basically, crack is silly, intentionally non-serious, and has a high tendency to be extremely crazy and unfounded, such as purposeful [OOC]-ness or playing on cliches, inside jokes, and/or [fanon].
  
The term crack probably stems from crack as in crack cocaine, as opposed to a crack in a wall. As in, so horrendously unfounded/silly that only one could have come up with it while under the influence of crack.Something that is great, awesome, good.NOUN:
1. The solid form of the illicit, recreational drug, cocaine.
2. A small gap on the surface of an object.
3. An illegally obtained password or file to a copyrighted computer program.

ADJECTIVE:
1. The quality or state of excellence. (often used to describe music)
2. Having a small gap on the surface of an object. [-ed]

VERB:
1. To make a small gap on the surface of an object.
2. To illegally pass through some form of passive security (often used with computer programs, see NOUN-3).
3. To punch someone in an altercation.
4. To start. [-ing]
5. To be occurring. (often used in the greeting, "What's crackin'?!")An abbreviation for methamphetamine, a drug that stimulates the central nervous system by causing it to release more dopamine, a neurotransmitter that gives someone a feeling of satisfaction.a horrible drug that ruins lives, breaks up families, and does considerable damage to one's looks (its true, look at the before and after pictures). All the people who write definitions promoting it have no idea, and will be o-so-happy when all of their teeth fall out :)the stupidest shit EVERAn abbreviation for [methamphetamine], a drug that stimulates the central nervous system by causing it to release more dopamine, a neurotransmitter that gives someone a feeling of satisfaction.A stupid drug made used and made by [white trash] that's made out of cold medicine and other easily obtained chemicals.The lonely situation you find yourself in, after using methamphetamine. Typically, broke, with no job, falling apart, stuttering, wondering why you pulled into this parking lot "What the hell was I doing just now?" when all your "new best friends" have left you for better and you feel like it's the end of the world.A drug for fuckups.. Invented by some japenese guy approx. 80 years ago.. The hippie version is speed...Will fuck up ones life and their love ones; HIGHLY addictive, probably the most addictive drug; not only popular with so called "white trash" but very big in the Filipino community all across USA. (esp. cali, vegas, NY & JERSEY). Most users/dealers/runners and THE SOURCE know or have "heard" of one another.

They say, "don't knock it, until you TRY it" or "Try anything once", etc. etc. CRYSTAL METH does NOT apply to these sayings! DO NOT TRY IT!1. The reason why it is so hard to get decent over the counter meds for your freaking hayfever. 2. [Crack] for [rural] and [suburban] white people.Short for methamphetamines. The most highly addictive illicit narcotic made from all sorts of deadly toxins: metals, cold medicines, rat poison, chlorine, bleach, etc. The drug is so dangerous and deadly, that it can explode when being produced incorrectly. Unfortunately, the drug has a strangle hold on America and destroys cities, families, and eventually the addict themself. It makes the addict lose their looks, teeth, health, personality, etc. On the streets its known as ICE, SPEED and CRYSTAL METH. The drug turns you into a loser and eventually a criminal and convict. It is highly addictive because it stimulates the central nervous system, giving a feeling of euphoria and relaxation. Meth is the fastest-growing illegal drug in the United States, and is actually growing the fastest among caucasians in upper middle-class suburbs and rural areas.Gin is an unaged [liquor] made by [distill]ing [grain]s such as [barley], [corn] or [rye]. Its [bouquet] comes from [juniper] berries, [coriander], [herb]s and [spice]s, usually added to the grain mash during [distillation]. The gin is stored in [glass], [earthenware] or [stainless steel] containers, but does not mature in these. The storage time serves only to harmonize the product.

Someone once said that "A [bar] without gin is like an Italian kitchen without pasta". No other [liquor] provides for the creation of so many classic [cocktail]s. Gin is in fact a liquor that is harmonious with almost anything.

Without gin the king of [cocktail]s, the dry [Martini], would not exist.An often strong liquor, usually clear but with a strong smell, much like rubbing alcohol. Sold under brands like Gordon's 'London Dry Gin' and Bombay 'Sapphire'. Often used to escape life temporarily or make high skool more interesting.An archaeic word for Aboriginal Females
considered offensive but curiosly still allowed to be used to name Australian places. Gin-Gin Falls for example(n) An individual of aboriginal origin. (Offensive)(n) in poker, drawing/flopping/turning the best card or combination of cards (typically it gives one a very strong hand and one's opponent a strong but second-best hand); frequently used with the verb 'to hit' and occasionally followed by 'card(s)'

etymology: probably originating from the card game of the same namePronounced "gĭn" not "jĭn" -Bahamian slang meaning "going to".A grain liquor that smells and tastes like pine needles.Slang for the female genitalia.In hold 'em poker: Describes a hand's relationship to a flop when conditions exist where not only is the hand likely the strongest, but can also easily improve to the [nuts] (aka best hand possible).a girl who is ready to suck any nigga up just for popularity or cause they happen to be real thirsty.The surest way of getting nothing from something.when your not sure if you have to fart or shit and you take the chance any way thats what gambling is all aboutGiving money to native americans.1. An improvident activity in which winning gleefully proceeds losing. 2. The saddled process of chasing one's loses or blowing one's winnings. 3. Chinese finger cuffs. 4. An insatiable itch erroneously believed to be satisfied by scratching. 5. The willingness to ask Chance for Certainty.just a way to get ahead.v., intransitive

A quick way to riches and power.

It's a sure thing.the act of masturbating. the reference is to the hand gesture made to imply masturbation, which greatly resembles the shaking of dice.custom-made; looking like it cost a million bucksOne of the powerful masculin [trends] for 2008 in fashion. Bespoke [tailoring] reffers to a particularity of british fashion, but the term 'bespoke' is now extended to all life's domains, as a powerful mark of [luxury], an anti-brand/ anti-globalisation reaction.The act of shoving a bicycle pump up a woman's rectum while going down on her.(1)A drink that often burns when consumed by itself, but goes good mixed with various sodas (see: [pepsi], [coke], [7-up]) and sometimes even water. Straight shots are smoother if chilled, and some whiskeys such as Seagram's Seven can be consumed straight by even those with the weakest stomachs.

(2)A drink which makes old men's I.Q.s increase exponentially after every shot, eventually leading to a bar full of omniscient men who can't even begin to consider that for once they might just be wrong.

(3)Something good to come out of Canada.The life giving substance that has intoxicated many a man. (better than eve and that god damn apple)Part of the military phonetic alphabet. As one might expect, Whiskey = W.An alcoholic beverage made from ingredients similar to beer, but intended for grown ups. Suitable for use as an aftershave, by men who consider that perfumed stuff too girly.The best fucking drink in the world. Not too mention the manliest. Mixed with [weed], it can cause one to become fucking [crunk]. Puts hair on your chest.1. The oil of conversation, the philosophic wine, the ale that is consumed when good fellows get together, that puts a song in their hearts and laughter on their lips, and the warm glow of contentment in their eyes;

2. Christmas cheer;

3. The stimulating drink that puts the spring in the old gentleman’s step on a frosty, crispy morning;

4. The drink which enables a man to magnify his joy, and his happiness, and to forget, if only for a little while, life’s great tragedies, and heartaches, and sorrows;The reason I get up in the morning and the reason I pass out at night.Proof that God loves us and wants us to be happy.The cause of and solution to all life's problems!Its the fifth element after water, fire, earth and wind... Nothing exists without it!A magic potion used to make people of the opposite look bettera liquid form of carbohydrates that should be drank as a replacement for all other liquids, especially waterwhat men need to function dailyThe piss of angels.- After Bacon. it's the way of life
- The saver of old lonely men
- It even sounds cool..heh..heh.. Beer.a substance imbibed by males which, in time improves the appearance of ugly women and should be purchased more than makeup cuz it does a whole hell of a lot more for ya if yer really ugly than any makeup ever willA drink which makes you strong and clever.What you put in water bottles and bring to school.Vodka is a clear, colorless, unaged [liquor] "made from [ethyl alcohol] from agricultural origin". It was originally made in [Russia] from [potato]es, but today's vodka, which is almost odorless and tasteless, is usually made from [grain], primarily [barley] and [wheat], and occationally from [rye].

Vodka is integral to many [cocktail]s such as the [Screwdriver], [Bloody Mary] and Vodka [Martini]. If served straight, it should always be icy-cold.

Flavored vodkas have become popular in the [United States] and may be flavored with anything from [fruit]s to hot [pepper]s. Some flavored vodkas are even sweetened slightly.As a Russian who is experienced in the art of vodka consumption i feel obligated to provide the following information about vodka drinking.
A) Vodka should never ever under any circumstances be bought in a plastic bottle
B) Vodka should never be served ice-cold or even moderately could when straight. BUT!!!!! the shoot glass should be ice cold.
C) Just because you have a carton of Tropicana and a bottle of Smirnoff doesn't mean you can make a screwdriver. Screwdrivers never have any plump in them
D) When drinking vodka never sip it, or drink it slowly! This way of drinking vodka leads to loss of taste buds and a reeking smell.
E) Before taking a shot of vodka cheers must be said, then let out all the air you have in your lungs, drink and inhale at the same time.
F) NEVER EVER CHASE VODKA WTH BEAR
G) A good tactic for not getting sick while drinking vodka, is to supplement it with soda and some snacks.
H) Drinking vodka together with bear and champagne leads to short term memory loss.

facts
Vodka a 40% alcoholic drink. In theory it can be made out of anything, even wood or marijuana. The solution to this magnificent drink is extremely simple: a 2/5 ratio of alcohol and water. Non-mass produced vodka, which is available in most of Europe and Russia, is an expensive high quality drink, which went through as many as 8 stages of filtration and sold for more that 100$ a bottle.
Rarely it is mixed in to cocktails, such as vodka martini and the screw driver.
In the United States only commercial, mass produced vodka is available and has a number of flaws. A) it is not made in Russia, even if it is called Smirnoff of Stolichnaya, but New Jersey or in the best case scenario Sweden.
Best brand of Vodka are: VEDA and BELUGA BLACK, these two brands made Stoli and Absolute look like absolute shit!
Please drink responsibly and enjoy.Low cost and effective engine fuel, industrial solvent and poison. Some people also like to drink the stuff.quite strong alocolic liquid (40-60%).
not brewed, like wine, so it doesn`t taste like yeast. what most people will use to get [shitfaced]. To avoid death, it is adviced to mix the vodka with a non-alcohol liquid.Unfortunately it has become a pop culture joke. Most popular vodkas (smirnoff, absolut) are absolut shit and made in Sweden or Finland or something. Real and good vodka must be made in a slavic country. There is an ongoing argument with Poland and Russia over who created the drink. There is more evidence that says Poland coined the term vodka(wódka) for it and first started mass consumption of it. However, it was most likely created by persians or arabs. Slavic and also celtic people have the highest alcohol tolerances.A drink that can be either complete shit or damn fine. Has one of the most delicate tastes if properly filtered. Quartz filtered vodka recomended over a charcoal filterBasically, alcohol mixed with water. An alternative to just plain raw alcohol, invented by people who did not die like 4 seconds after drinking it (and apparently wanted more). Go to any spot in Russia you can buy it for like 50 kopeiks (2 cents) a bottle

Comes from the Russian word "water" (meaning that the Russians practically drink it as if it was water)Has 3 meanings:

1. Clear alcoholic beverage made from fermented grain or potatoes

2. Water in Russia, since most water found in russia that is not frozen is hazordous to your health and may be fatal

3. God in Russia, the Russian God, or, the God of the Russian people, or perhaps just the poor bums on the streets of RussiaWhen you have to hold on to the grass to keep from falling off the earth.A word defining a person who has had too much alcohol.  See also:  hammered, sloshed, shit-faced, tanked, blitzed, bombed, wrecked, three sheets to the wind, drunkened, loose, tipsy, defcon 1, well-done, trashed, jagged up, Irish, canned, smashed, fucked-up, intoxicated, inebriated, aniahalated, laced, (etc.)Chemically incovienencedA sublime way of existing in a world full of idiots.One's alter ego who is blamed for all things of a regrettable nature.The state you're in when you won't give two shits about what you say. You will be fucking uninhibited and won't give a shit what anyone thinks. You will be happy and motherfucking confident. You will be sippin dranks and feeling like a baller. Euphoria on a scale of 1 to 10: a motherfuckign 10................
So give it up to alcohol, bitches. this shit is legit, and deserves fucking respect, (that bottle of sailor jerrys was fucking good by the way)
Nigger. if you dont like alcohol, you can just kill yourself cause your iq is in the negatives!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!1. Past tense of "drink".
2. Your girlfriend's dad.
3. Spinning without moving.when you have to close one eye to keep people from splitting in two.Intoxicated with alcoholic liquor to the point of impairment of physical and mental faculties. 
Caused or influenced by intoxication.a state of being that one can only hope to constantly attainThe magic wand that can make a man dissappearaccident indicatorThe alternative to the orange.THE MOST BADASS FUCKING FRUIT ON THE FUCKING PLANET. SERIOUSLY, THIS MOTHERFUCKER KICKS THE SHIT OUT OF THE PUSSY ORANGE OR BANANA. THIS JUICY, RED MOTHERFUCKER IS THE BEST FUCKING THING THAT GOD HAS EVER CREATED. EAT AN A APPLE AND YOUR DICK WILL GROW 3 INCHES. FUCK.A horrendous company that has somehow managed to stay afloat for years and appeal to a mass of misguided people.  They specialize in taking existing technology, making it all shiny and fancy looking, and re-selling it for double the price.  Ironically, their slogan is "Think Different".

Their latest and greatest gadget that's getting all the attention is, of course, the iPhone, which is basically comparable to any high-quality $150 phone, except it has "innovative" touch screen technology, and it sells for $600.

Apple couldn't quite figure out how to make an operating system, so they just stole the freeBSD kernel and repackaged a bastardized version of it as Mac OS X.  It's funny that Apple brags that it's "Unix-based", since no one with experience in Unix would ever use a Mac.

Apple frequently runs "clever" ads.  Although they've made a ton of them, all the ads boil down to how Windows has viruses and crashes all the time.  Apple also have an enormous, cult-like fanbase that like to remind us of these things every five seconds.  Apple fanboys are generally smug, annoying, and arrogant, despite the fact that most of them don't know jack shit about computers.what the fuck are you looking at the definition of apples for you stupid fuck?The truly heinous name of Chris Martin and Gwenyth Paltrow's lovechild.The result of a mindblowing or humiliating situation in which the victim is posed one question:A greedy-ass company that makes a shit tone of money and over-prices their productsA manufacturer of computers, peripherials, and software with around a 3% share of the pc market. 
Most well-known products include:
imac
ipod
itunes
OS X
final cut pro
ibook

While their operating system's market share may be significantly below that of Microsoft's windows, many still prefer to use Apple's computers and software, especially for graphical design and audio work. 

Many people like to debate over the superiority of macs over pcs and visa versa, such people have no lives.A shortened version of [apples and pears], which is cockneyrhyming slang for stairs.Australian Slang for goodThe kind of guy most girls ACTUALLY want when they say they want a [Nice Guy].

Jerks are selfish, manipulative bastards who see women as little more then sexual conquests to brag about to their buddies or mere objects that are there for their personal pleasure. As to ensure the post-sex breakup will be in their favor, Jerks often play the "sensative guy" early on so the girl will make most of the moves on HIM, and after he's done with her and dumps her for some other girl just like her, he can make it look like she's at fault for coming on too strong, and consequently she'll take him back if he chooses to return for seconds.

Typically are/were [Frat Boy]s, [Jock]s, and [Prep]s in school.Noun. An [idiot] or stupid person. An insensitive, selfish, ignorant, cocky person who is inconsiderate and does stupid things.1.  Final stage of evolution of any male who spent at least one year dating in America, no matter his origin
2.  Mandatory mindset for self-survival within corporate America
3.  At this point of no return, group synonym for an elusive + cocky + self-confident + self-centered + loud + crazy male
4.  A guy that doesn’t give a flyin’ fuck about anything else but his handsome allure and annoying success.
5.  THE abusive attitude that will surely attract any girl’s love in America. For life
6.  A guy that enhances any girl’s low self-esteem and insecurity without meaning it. Then gets blamed for it.
7.  A guy that does not return any “I love you” s but keeps smiling at his girl’s face until she melts down and asks for more of that shit :)
8.  Every bitches’ openly discussed concern. Yet every bitches’ secret love.
9.  A challenge  aka any girl’s biggest turn-on.
10.  A bitch with a dick.1. A mean/heartless person.

2. More common: A guy who perfectly fits the gender stereotype, and is insensitive, controlling, and will treat women like sex objects. Though many women constantly complain about guys like that, most end up with one, because they didn't dig deeper and didn't try to see through the jerk's crap. Instead of going for a [nice guy] who will obviously be there for a girl, most girls choose what's right in front of them, a cold-hearted bastard who happens to look "macho", who is a big-time flirt and wears his penis on his sleeve.An alternative to dating.A very powerful word to call someone... Unlike the f-word, "jerk" doesn't lose it's power the more you say it.A person you really love that just doesn't see how much you care for them, and yet, every so often actually treats you good, only to then act completely different from who they were when you first met them.In medival Europe,masturbation was considered to be on the brink of insanity. So as an insult, people would call each other "jerk-offs", and soon, jerk was enough to get the point across.The man all girls are attracted to.A person who does not use their turn signal.(uh-nak-ruh-niz-uhm)

From Middle Greek anachronismo, the word Anachronism refers to an event, person, object or custom that is chronologically out of place. It can also be an error in chronology, in which a person, object, event, etc., is assigned a date or period other than the correct one.out of place or at the wrong timeAn object or event that is seemingly out of place in time.out of the proper time.A hospital you never ever want to be admitted to. We all have that one wacko job for a relative or friend. Multiply that by like 300 and stick them all in a tiny room painted baby blue and make them talk about the issues they have and watch them go. It's like playing a game of stick the yellow shapes in the right spots and wait for the red box to explode and blow pieces everywhere. If you live near one I suggest you move because the crazy ass-holes break out the glass and run free. Then it is like playing a game of "Where's Weirdo". I worked at one and I will say that I could not wait to get to work. There was never a dull moment. If you love caos and mayhem you really should consider a career at the nut house.1. Sci-fi movie/book about a retro-ish gang leader who after beating people up, raping, stealing, etc, is taken to prison where he later is chosen to participate in a "special treatment" program to "cure" him.

2. Also, a term used in the CWO book to describe a person who is perfectly moral, nonviolent, etc; but has no free will.A object (or person in the case of the movie) which appears normal on the outside but is completely artificial on the inside.someone who appears normal to the eye and holds the colors of life (orange), but is really a tool for someone or something else (clockwork)A clockwork orange comes from an old London saying "queer as a clockwork orange". A clockwork orange is actually a wind up doll that is controlled by both god and the devil. Anthony Burgess uses this for his book to symbolize the government almost brainwashing Alex in order to control his bad behavior.A novel which came out BEFORE the movie, commonly fooling idiots. Learn to read.Oddest, most kickass movie. 
Alex is a stud.one of the best damn movies everThe orbital subway around Glasgow. So named due to it's circular route and orange subway trains. Also famous for it's central role in The [Glasgow Subcrawl].Person who has no free will, is a victim of a cruel psyhological therapy (A Clockwork Orange), or a person who is unable to make it's own choices between good and bad1.Original a from slang (from a part of London) that means a homosexual.
2.A novel by Anthony Brugess.  The novel was based somewhat on his life, such as one of the rape scenes.  The novel was about  totalirism and the good and evil of humans.
3.An amazing movie based on Anthony Burgess' Novel.  The director banned the film himself due to it's 'ultra violent' nature.Judgment (American English); judgement (British English)1. Judgement occurs when the judgee is struck with; either "the stick of judgement" (1 - 4) or with "the ball of judgement", both currently in use in Devon, UK.

2.  The act of vigilante violence.The collective term for a group of [hipsters].What is considered justA clan of fags lead by 2 old people who no one like except for the fags who join it.The Pirate is an oft misunderstood individual who can be seen absolutely pwning everyone around him/her. Well versed in the arts of cheekiness, deceit, extortion(sp), theft, blackmail, smarmery, and crazy acrobatic sword and or knife fighting. The  pirate always lands on his feet, and always wins, even when you think not. naturally hates the ninja, as ninjas are overated far too serious for their own good. 
the most 31337 p1r4735 sometimes join the ranks of the mysterious Shadow Pirates.1. One who drinks rum, get angry, and stab things.
2. A sailing criminal who, sails on a ship, steals from other ships, lives without any law:only a set of morals, survives on goods stolen from other ships/ports.When a woman is giving you head pull out before ejaculation and blow your load in her eye. Then kick her in the shin. After completing those 2 tasks you have gave a women the pirate.Pirates are a sea fearing folk, oft to be seen pilaging, raping, murdering, or commiting other acts of piracy. They usually own a monkey, parrot, or sexy wench.The coolest motherfucking people to ever exist.1. n. Arch rival of the [ninja].
2. n. Devotee of the [Flying Spaghetti Monster].1. Always land on their feet
2. have cool eye patches ... even if they have both eyes
3. have dice
4. have guns
5. pirates are not ordinary humans so they can kill ninjas!
6. have cool ships
7. have better swords then ninjas
8. are all around better then ninjas
9. have a lot of movies about them (way more then ninjas)
10. wear red on thursdays
11. have graduated from Pyro Pirate Academy of One-Eyed Peter!
12. polish their peg legs
13. say thinds like scally-wagger and scurvy-chap
14. Arrrrr! need i say more
15. pack a mean punch
16. always have the best snacks
17. will make you walk the plank if your not as cool as them
18. start all the major fashion trends
19. don't go crying to their mommies ... like ninjas
20. know how to handle a lady
21. knows how to DAG people better then ninjas
22. have pretty cool boots
23. get all the tasty rum
24. have pretty good cursive
25. have more extended vocabualary then ninjas
26. are absolutley amazing!!!
ARRRR!The name given to the coolest dudes to ever sail the seven seas. They have cool boats, cool planks and cool wooden legs. Parrots are also optional. Their main duties include searching far and wide for, "pluder," or, "bling," as it would now be known.The holy being in the religion of Pastafarianism. Often prayed to by followers of the Flying Spaghetti Monster. R'amen.Better than ninjasa small sexy piece of underwear that girls wear and it attracts men. When a girl bends over, it tends to show out from under her jeans or hipsters. Men love them.By far one of the best forms of underwear.  It is small, with strings going around the hips, a small piece of cloth in the back, and cloth in the front.  Many girls wear them, useful in preventing "Panty Lines" from coming through when they wear tight pants.  Also, a huge turnon for guys when girls bend over, and they pop up about the pants.What comes out when someone with a lisp tries to say the word "song"1.underwear that makes guys horny when they see the strings pulled up and the cheeks of an ass when a girl wheres a dress on a windy day
2. Panties that girls where so that they leave a less distinct pantyline so they dont look like there wearing grandma panties in booty shorts1). A peice of lingerie that goes up your ass. Comfortable. Most would disagree, but some say it is comfy, like me.

2). A sandle or flip flop worn in Summer.Retro Definition: Rubber, slip-on sandals (a.k.a. 'flip-flops' or 'jap-flaps'), usually worn for water activities. This definition has been provided as a Public Service Announcement.Thongs are a type of footwear, also known as 'Flip-Flops'. Not to be mistaken with the sexy [thong] garment of underwear.Australian for cheap rubber footwear, known as [flip flops]or [jandles] in New zealand, dunno what yanks call them.A perpetual wedgie.the word used in Australia, to define flip flops.an occupation that involves taking (stripping) one's clothes off for the sexual stimulation of others. most strippers are female.A girl that guys are dumb enough pay $20 for a 5 minute dry hump.  She swoons at his ridiculous pickup lines and laughs at his stupid jokes to make him think he's getting somewhere with her, so he continues to fork out the money in hopes of impressing her to the point that he'll get more than just a case of blue balls and an experience to jack off to before going to bed that night.  But after giving her the last of his money, she tells him she'll be right back.  After several minutes he realizes she isn't coming back, so he leaves the club disappointed and flat broke, and as he's leaving, he sees her grindin her ass into some other dumb bastard's lap.A stupid bitch who got pregnant when she was a teenager by a losser and now gets naked for dollars to support her bastard childSomebody (usually a woman) who uses provocative dance whilst dis-robing to extract money from sad, sex-starves letches.A woman who seeks to relive her chaotic childhood experience by disrobing and rubbing her snatch on a brass pole in front of men that care for her like her father did.woman with a hot body that is really dead inside. they give u pleasure without sex and take all ur cash. if u make a move on her, her big black bitches will beat the shit out of you and take all ur moneyThe official occupation of a  [single mother],  or any struggling woman trying to make  [ends]  meet1.  A person who takes off their clothes and dances around to make money.
2.  A peeler or ripperFlashy, showy. An item or person who, superficially, appears better than they actually are.
Deliberately trying to look good but lacking substance(unlike [spongey]) 
In the case of people, usually accompanied by an arrogant or over-confident sense of self-absorbtion.An individual; male or female, with the athletic prowess of a jungle cat and the tits (or balls) enough to take off their clothes and dance around butt naked in front of a crowd of people for tips. These people are adept in the art of flirting, fantasy creation and erotic dance. Not a profession for the weak willed or faint of heart, it is an art not understood by many and thus often disrespected.prostitute. started in the civil war When Gen.Hooker of the Union Army (the first [pimp]) tried to protect his troops from VD by buying the best chicks and pimping them to his corps of 20,000 men. orginally hooker's girls.A not-so-rare breed of female that is overtly loose between the legs.  Much like dinosaurs, these creatures cannot see anything unless it moves.

Sometimes called "street t-rex"1. A source of pleasure, mainly sex, bt only if payed.
2. Target practice.The "new" cool. Sort of like kool, kewl, wet, or badass. This word can be used to replace cool to make your sentences all the better!Term used to describe a type of female that is:

- Easy to [bang]
- Takes money for sex
- Disappointed male does not get anyA woman who is wise above others in the art of sexual satisfaction and [love].  In ancient times, these women were considered to be priestesses and were given their own temples where they could teach their art to others for a large sum of money.   These women were highly respected and cherished for their extensive knowledge of lovemaking/giving, and their spiritual understanding.  

Later, the christian religion would have a great negative effect on these women's lives, mostly because the spiritual beliefs of these cunt-lovin' cultures were pagan (a big no-no to chiristianity).   as christianity spread, people started to see sex as a sin, and the priestesses were slowly blacklisted.  today, this christian idea of sex as a sin still stands, and hookers are now considered criminals.A woman (usu) who receives money for chugging the snotty end of a piss pump until the "john's" fuck stick blows a bileous ball bilge bolis of throat yogurt down the back of her crack smoking gullet.A [prostitute]. Usually, prostitutes are females, but plenty of prositutes are males.

Hookers sell their bodies to a variety of people, from unassuming men to really freaky characters. Just imagine having sex with half a dozen strange men each day for money: it's not a pleasant thought.

And prostitutes don't have sex for money because they like it; it's about the money. They might often hate their line of work, but they have no other way out.

Hookers range from the [chic] [call girl], who is higher class and has control over the situation, to the lowly [streetwalker], who is vulnerable to attack or police entrapment.

And remember: use a [condom] if you're with a prostitute, unless you want [clamydia], [gonorrhea], [herpes], [AIDS], [hepatitis], [syphilis], or other *charming* diseases.A sexy woman who fucks men who need to be fucked. A woman who gives pleasure to desperate males like me when In need of pussy.Slang,What you might call a close friend. used like the word buddy or pal.not the traditional definition. OR, a reference to girls or women that might, or might not be actual women for hire.What i always call my friend Bill X when i see him, and he responds in the same fashion.1.Actual bowling, with 10 pins and 1 ball.
2. Masturbating, with 2 balls and 1 pin.Simply a codeword for smoking Cannabis to be used around non-users1. Noun; The sport in which you throw a bowling ball at pins.
2. Verb; usually means to smoke weed (hints the word "bowl"ing)When engaging in sexual intercourse, in the doggy style position, place your middle finger and ring finger in the females anal sphincter and your thumb in her vagina and grip vigorously like it's a bowling ball while you pump and thrust.Same rules as bowling except instead of knocking down pins each player must cash a bowl.
Strike = One hit to cash the bowl
Spare = Two hits to cash the bowl
Gutter Ball = A person Volcano's or drops the pins (danks)When a female rubs her breast against another females vagina in an up and down motion which can lead to orgasm.Filling all three of a woman's holes during the act of sexual intercourse, as if she was a bowling ball.  This can be done by three men, or by one man using the penis and hands (a modified [shocker]) or by one man taking turns at each hole.throwing an oversized, [extremely] heavy, painted coconut at pinsThe act of sticking you thumb in a womans ass while hitting it from the back, holding her ass such as a bowling ball.The act of transferring a joint roach into a bowl to finish it off.Someone who frequently dates girls that other guys have thrown out like trash.  Usually goes for girls that are getting over a bad breakup.bench player, who has the primary quality of burning minutes and chipping in the occassional goal.

Term mostly used in hockey, but can also be used in basketball or baseball.individual(s) who pick up your trash.  If left out on a certain day each week.1) someone who picks up girls who have recently split from their partners. Regarded as a [twat] by all those around him.
2) Someone who picks up a lot of points from rebounds in American Sports.A guy who constantly picks up, or takes out, horrifically trashy women."Who can take the trash and the twisty things too? 

--- The garbage man can, the garbage man can!"The process of which a man shits inside a girls vagina then fucks her. This could be used instead of lube.When you see someone hitting on a person and it falls through so that person continues to hit on someone else until they succeed. It can also be a person that is a last resort.A garbageman is a man with a massive package, and he flaunts it, by wearing tight shorts, undies, kilts, etc.
He WILL place his 'junk' on you, if he feels aroused and/or threatened.  Typically used in homosexual/incestual type situationsA sex move during which a man penetrates a woman who is in the process of vomiting.  Ideally, pelvic thrusts will coincide with gastric contractions.The black man's 747.A special mode of transportation of asorted goods and persons. Involving large vehicles claimed to be 'busses' which are secretly cheaply created allein space-crafts bringing the opeouts to the masses.Very short skirt, only an inch from the *hare*.Best pets every! there lazy and dont move most of the time... but will get up every one and awhile to greet you1. A large bus, derived from the company greyhound. Commonly used to transport those who cannot afford faster, more efficient or more luxurious transportation.

2. An alcoholic beverage mixing gin, and grapefruit juice.Racing dog.

A bus that goes state to state.The Runaway's method of running awayTo fatally injure by decapitation with a hunting knife.For people unable to afford quicker and more efficient methods of transportation.

A wonderful way to see the worst parts of many cities across the country.1. A hot, older man aged 56 yo and up a dilf. 2. The final step in the dilf/hound dog continuum.Short for [Warped Tour]. A punk rock concert tour that occurs every summer. It usualy has around 6 stages and near or more than 50 bands. The Warped Tour is sponsered by Vans and has been running for just over 10 years.To be convoluted, twisted, rippled or distorted.when a person gets so crazy high that they begin to see things with a distorted appearance, as if they are warped.

usually affective after smoking very chronic weed or getting hella fucked up from anything else.Cool or funny in a weird way.1. something that is so insanely cool
2. unbelieveableAfter you have smoked a lot of marajuana, u feel in the zone, (the place where you want to be)and altered

(another meaning for stoned,baked,blazed)1)getting high.2)severly underrated red hot chili peppers songAnother way of saying WTFOne sexy biatch, Constantly harrased by Flea, Moxin and Subotai for sexual favors but they're below Warped and not in his his league.When a person gets so [seshed] they start to lose touch with reality.  Almost a high sensation.

See [sesh].The act of vomiting, hurling, barfing, losing lunch, tossing cookies, ralfing, throwing up, yacking, retching, technicolour yawning, spewing, blowing chunks, and/or other forms of physical illness.What happened that time in seventh grade when you walked in on your parents.Slang meaning to vomit.  The word 'puke' is sometimes considered offensive.1. the act of vomiting
2. vomit itself

See also [word]mag[/word]to pour acidic vomit from you stomach out your face.to vomitFilipino term for vagina or pussy; the hole between the legs of a woman where the penis goes in and out until ejaculation occurs; (pronounced as "pooh - key")Tagalog for female genitalsExtremely annoyingThe act of or the action of relieving your stomach contents in a matter of bile, food, or other stomach contents is projected from the stomach to the esophagus out of the mouth. Also known as throwing up.Indifference; to be used when one simply does not care."The verbal equivalent of a shrug of the shoulders." -quoth meused in the greatest tv show of all time [The Simpsons]. in the episode Hungry, Hungry Homer, bart and lisa respond to a homer inquiry with "meh". mystery solvedMeh is used to describe any and every word possible, including:
Yes
No
maybe
kind of
never
always
ok
alright
no thankyou
yes please
look bitch i really dont care so just shut the fuck up
if you want
whatever
If you wnat
i dont want to really
well
shut up
i dont really care
no honestly, i dont care...

...and is never explained on which is actually used...An interjection used to imply indifference towards a subject; "a verbal shrug".  This particular interjection has somehow become quite popular among teens, the reason for this popularity is a mystery.  Other popular interjections are "bleh", "dah", and "mih".  Usu. pronounced shortly, without eye contact or body movement.This is a universal, non-commital answer to every question ever posed. Its the answer that deosn't actually give any answer.A random word when people either don't know what to say, don't care, can't answer a question or are too drunk to form a coherent english phrase.Indifference, or I do not care, also whateverAn expression of [apathy].Meh is used to say whatever, I don't care, I don't have an answer, I have nothing else to say, I'm frustrated, not interested or your joke isn't funny.The only thing that's fun to do anymore.An escape from life, like (see [weed]).  When you get back, the problems of life hit you in the face like a brick.The only thing that brings me joy.computerized games involving many gernes of typesa form of entertainment that is composed of any type of game put into a digital image on a screen and is operated by the player through means of a control connected to a form of a console 

commonly a scapegoat for politicians and crappy parents 

my hobbyThe target of every [Soccer mom], [politician], and [feminist] who (1) has never played a videogame in her life, (2) doesn't know how to discipline her kid, thanks to all the time she spent marrying and divorcing 4 or 5 times, and (3) is looking for an easy [scapegoat] for her incompetence.3D or 2D virtual games that can waste your time for good and fun.One of the best forms of entertainment.a true test of skill, unless you have it on fuckin easy you nerd!A program that is more than a form of entertainment. It offers us an escape from the dullness of reality, a place where we can do things we actually can't.passing a homeless person on your way to a [coin star] machine.a word used by prude or unattractive girls in situation in which they feel weirded out by the presence of a confident young guy trying to make conversationhaving your flat mate walk in on you while you are making out with yourself in the mirror, moaning, and saying in a deep, sexy, voice: "oh, baby".1. Ungraceful; ungainly.
2. Clumsily or unskillfully performed.
3. Marked by or causing embarrassment or discomfort.When two pedophiles meet up after chatting as 15 year olds online.A common word overused by kids in junior high, almost in the same group with "LOL" and "random!". Used to try and impress your preteen friends after or during a long pause between conversations. Also used by idiots whenever there is a pause in speech. Sometimes accompanied by a hand motion resembling a turtle or a turkey.Interjection used in a situation that is slightly uncomfortable, often accompanied by a gesture where the lower arm is thrust out parallel to the ground with the hand open and fingers together with thumb on top.Interjection used in a situation that is slightly uncomfortable, often accompanied by a virety of gestures: 1. Pulling the collar with one finger (this represents the sweat collecting under the collar from the AWKWARD situation) 2. Arms form a triangle over the head (such as the A in YMCA) 3. One finger pointing at the back of the other hands wrist 4. Pointing at the back of the neckA comment made by a third party in response to someone saying something inappropriate or embarrasing themselves in some way, thus causing an awkward silence for several seconds.

Saying "awkard" is often a remark deliberately aimed at stating the obvious to make the situation just that little bit more cringe-worthy.

for related topic please see [ground swallow me up], [dig a hole] and [keep digging]A situation which is of a significant amount of discomfort, and a subject of hilarity and confusion for those not involved.Round objects dangling in a scrotum. Only men have testicles. Women love to kick, knee, squeeze, or otherwise abuse them. When struck, testicles cause extreme pain.A word you say when there is awkward silence in a room with three or more people.1. Two walnut-sized coils of tubing inside the [scrotum] containing the reproductive fluid of a male, [semen]. 

2. An ancient greek hero.Testicles or testes are the pair of male glands that produce sperm fluid; the tiny sperm in the fluid each contain half the 'information' required to produce another being of the same species. The other half is provided by the egg that is produced in the female equivalent glands called ovaries. When sperm is spurted into the female via the penis and has travelled through the cervix into the womb, the thousands of sperm surround the 'waiting' egg and when one sperm is successful in piercing the egg, the egg, which is hundreds of times larger than the sperm, then prevents further sperm from doing so. The egg is then "fertilized" and eventually grows into a new being of the same species.

The testicles also produce a hormone called testosterone; this hormone in large doses is what makes a being grow into a male. Thus testicles are what makes a male a male!

Unfortunately for mammals, the testicles have to be on the outside of the body so that they do not get too warm. They are composed of tiny tubes or sperm ducts where the sperm are produced; these tubes are coiled up like very thin coils of spaghetti and are contained within an outer cover attached to the body by a thicker tube (the testicle or sperm chord). This chord has a thin walled swelling at the testicle end called the “Epididymis” and this is protected by being at the back of the testicle. This swelling is very important because it is where the sperm is stored and reaches full maturity after being produced in the sperm ducts or tubes. Both the testicles are contained in a special skin bag called the scrotum that adjusts to keep the testicles at the right temperature; closer to the body in cold external temperatures and further from the body in warm external temperatures.

Because they are delicate, testicles have many nerve endings and these are made to cause pain if struck or put under pressure so that the owner will take care not to damage them. This pain is extreme and is not solely confined to the testicles and even a fairly moderate blow can cause debilitation by causing the owner to go into shock; a very hard blow can not only rupture the testicle, but can cause so much shock that the owner dies.

Human nature being what it is, testicles are very often the subject of torture to force a man to tell all he knows as in almost all cases, no man can withstand the pain caused.

Women also find testicles a welcome vulnerability in an otherwise much stronger assailant in self-defence; the famous kick in the balls is a great equalizer.

Additionally, because testicles, along with the penis, are an observable difference in the sexes and because they are what make a man a man, they are often the target (both mental and real!) of female hate (and revenge!) for making men “the way they are”!The Fountains of Cum. Where all the [cum] cums from. Ladies: love'em, tickle'em, lick'em but just don't squeeze'em!A greek philosopher from 348 BCE, worked along Socrates.
His name is pronounced (pronounced Test-uh-cleez)The symbol of manhood. They are what makes a man a man.you gotta be fucking kidding me... looking up testicles in the urban dictionary??1. What no one would be here without.
2. Source of extra muscle, adrenaline, and power.
3. What makes feminists hypocritical.The two [round[ [balls] in the sack under the mans '[shaft]'.a streatchy strapless top for woman that is one of the hottest, sexyest most gorgious femane articles of clothing ever invented. they look amazing on the right girls but when worn by the rong girl it's just plain creepy!a person who is consistently a bad time; a bummera strapless, cylindrical top.Euphemism for someone who drops a huge, usually long, piece of shit. As a lumberjack lays logs, this person laid their log into the toilet.The lumberjack is an exciting sexual maneuver which should be only attempted by professionals.  

In this case, the woman is on all fours and the man enters her from behind (see "doggie style").  Hole choice is completely up to the lumberjack himself.  When he is ready to cum, he yells "TIMmmBERRRrrrr" and takes out the woman's arms with a svelte swooping motion.  The woman then, like a tree, falls to the bed.  During the fall, the woman experiences excitement as well as fear during her zero gravity experience as she realizes impact is imminent.  This leads to the tightening of her vaginal and anal cavities, yielding an astonishing feeling and hence orgasm for the lumberjack.

Extra points can be scored on this maneuver by the close and careful placement of the woman in relation to the headboard.  When the woman's arms are taken out, her head slams into the headboard.  Very fun!The man who singsA girl that is so disgusting, that she makes you lose a boner. she "cuts down your wood".Lumberjacks are the second most awesome people group, after [Pirates], and before [Ninjas].  

Real Lumberjacks have an ax and existed long ago and wear flannel, suspenders, and pants.  They have hairy faces and kick ass.  They will cut down any forest easy, because they are awesome.  

Fake Lumberjacks are the modern day lumberjacks who wear bright orange and they use chainsaws because they are too weak to use an ax.  They also eat lots of flapjacks.  Sing and breakdance.

The most awesome lumberjack ever was Paul Bunyan, he was kickass.  
A lumberjack's ax is NOT spelled with an e like "axe".  Only norsemen had axes.A gentleman who earns his living by felling trees. We all owe him a debt of gratitude for providing the material for our homes and furniture. This gentleman is soundly hated by the [environmentalist] who lives in a timber house.A red and black flanel jacket, coat, or shirt popular in the 80s and 90s.  Actual lumberjacks wear these often.To fuck over an entire fanbase by writing, producing, and airing a television series finale episode so poor that even a union of hookers think it sucks more than they do. Named after the surprise regarding protagonist Dexter Morgan's fate at the end of the series finale of television show [Dexter].Term used to describe a chick that gives a lot of handjobs...(hand ho). One who "jacks lumber" (Gives hand jobs)A sexual act involving 2 men and 1 woman with large, floppy breasts. The woman lays on her back, while each man slides his penis under a breast from each side. To avoid touching each other in the middle, the men coordinate going back and forth, like 2 lumberjacks sawing down a tree.

May also be referred to as a "See-saw"Someone who will tell you that religion is science and science is a religion.Polite way of saying "dumbass".A person who believes that the biblical account of Genesis is a literal, scientific document, and that all scientific knowledge of evolution and geology are mistaken and/or misrepresented by biased scientists. According to Creationists, the world was created in 6 days some 4 to 6 thousand years ago, God placed fossils into various depths of the Earth for no apparent reason (or that, since fossils are so rare, not all co-existing animals were fossilized together) all species where created individually (with allowance for individual variation and common design themes, but no common anscestry), that all life was harmonious before the fall of man (hence carnivores ate grass), that dinosaurs (which are said to be referred to in the bible as "leviathan" and "behemoth" and are supposedly represented in ancient art) lived at the same time as humans, and that they were whiped out in the biblical flood because they couldn't fit into Noah's Ark (or that he only fit the small ones, in which case some dinosaurs might be alive today). 

To promote these views, creationists often misrepresent the data themselves, in an effort to discredit science and abuse it to validate their own beliefs. Hence, they are extremely critical of any and all (overwhelming) evidence that does not support their views while using bogus or equivocal data to prove theirs. 

This doesn't work. 

Any close, unbiased examination of the evidence reveals that nearly all of the creationist's claims are found wanting. I will not list those reasons here but will instead include a few links below.

Creatonists aim to keep the American public ignorant of evolution and science (which they have done a pretty good job of doing, as recent polls suggest) and desire that creation be taught in public schools along with evolution. 

This would be about as ridiculous as teaching two different versions of the Holocaust in history classes (as some people claim that it never happened, and can back up this claim with phony evidence) or teaching an alternate flat earth theory (which another society can find "evidence" for) in geography. 

That is not to say that there isn't a place for Genesis in the sphere of public education, but that would most likely be in courses involving theology, religion, culture, anthropology, and philosophy. 

The moral here, of course, is that one shouldn't look to science to back up theology and vice versa.

Here are some links to learn the truth and why "creation scientists" are wrong (the links themselves can't be included because this site can't have words with more than 50 characters--wtf??). Go to a search engine and type in:

www.talkorigins.org

And perhaps Karl Thornley's page on Theistic Evolution for a few more good links.Mindless cretin who thinks that "Goddidit!"a person who believes, despite overwhelming evidence to the contrary, that every single word in the good book is 100 percent factual.  They tend to exhibit outward signs of basic intelligence and know a lot of big words, occasionally even well educated, but have the general intelligence of a shoe.  See also : brainwashed.One that thinks that hundreds of different scientist who all came to the same conclusionregarding the creation of the human species must be wrong because the Bible says so.  They tend to try and have scientific truth banned from their childrens' schools.An ignorant person who feels that the bible must be taken litteraly and any science that contradics what their book says (despite the fact there are different translations of the bible pointing to different things) is wrong. That would be all of science by the way. There is no science at all to suport their ignorant and idiotic claims.
 A creationist will not accept the theory of evolution, despite it being fundemental to modern biology & genetics, and do not understand what theory means in scientific literature. They realy dont like this theory at all. 
 They normaly try to discrace 'evolutionists' and often attempt to imply that science can only be science if it is looked at from a religious perspective when quite the opposite is true. They accept a point and then ty and prove it, the opposite of the scientific method.
 Finaly most know nothing about science and simply follow their faith. Many creationist leaders give themselves the title of Dr. Nearly all of these 'doctors' aquired their degrees from uncredited degree mills.

See www.talkorigins.com for a refutal of creationist claims.A person who thinks he/she knows more about science than an actual scientist.Synonymous with [idiot]often used to describe something stupid or unfortunate; can replace the common slang word "gay"Hatred of women. Often rewarded by a slap in the face.In reference to the city, let's just say that you know you're from there if any of the following apply to you:Power that comes form diversity.... Pride that comes from making it to the top....The greatest Fucking city in the world.Where my heart will always be no matter where I go.  

New York = Home1. The 11th state to join the union.
2. Also refers to NYC, or as most ignorant people think- Manhattan. (Oh, yeah, there's also The Bronx, Brooklyn, Queens and Staten Island)The Empire State where the greatest city and the capital of the world dwells. NYC or the five boroughs of south NY. The 1st capital of the country from 1785-1790. Home of Broadway theatre, home of the best pizza(NY style) in the world, home of the best franks(Nathans and Papiaya)in the world, also the place where the term 'Hot Dog' was coined, birth place of the potato chip(Saratoga ,NY),the media capital of the world, business capital of the world, largest department store in the world(Macy's 34th st.),Birth place of Hip Hop culture, one of the fashion capital of the world, home of the largest and greatest subway system in the world along with the 1st in the country. And home of the greatest and most successful team in sports(NY Yankees).best bagels, best pizza, best italian food period, best places to shop, its awesome.. u can go out east on LI or manhattan or upstate NY. new york is a great place to live. 

oh yeah and upstate is part of new york u idiot. if u wanna talk about the city say NYC. i'm sure upstate NY people write NY on their mail. you can't argue that or you're just dumb.I am from New York. I curse a lot. I say mad instead of wicked. I like the YANKEES. I know what REAL pizza tastes like, and I know that a bagel is much more than a roll with a hole in the middle. They're sprinkles...not jimmies. I play BEER PONG not beirut. I judge people by what exit they get off the highway. It's not called the shore, it's the BEACH. Its a wedge or a sub NOT a hoagie! It's not New York City or Manhattan, it's 'THE' CITY. Two words...MOTHER FUCKER. I know that 55 mph really means 85. When someone cuts me off, they get the horn AND the finger."Basically the greatest state in the entire country...better yet, the world.  New Yorkers are also the best people around.  Sure, we can be arrogant and yes, from time to time we're prissy bitches.  But NOTHING is finer than a New York girl...or the taste of REAL pizza and bagels.  We're the only state that you can say "The City" and know you're referring to NYC.  We have the best shopping, the best Christmas Tree, the best Parades...oh right and the best baseball team that ever existed and I'm NOT talking about the Mets.  All in all, New York rapes your state by being better in EVERY way imaginable.  I <3 NY.To the general public:
A large city on the United State's east coast

To the people who live there:
The center of the universeYour current boss.someone being arrogant, rude, obnoxious, or just a total dickhead....Your [butt] hole. Were your [shit] comes out.A person in another car who cuts you off to get to the next lane, almost hits you while talking on the phone.An obnoxious, arrogant, self-centered male who women can't seem to get enough of.Anyone who doesn't do exactly what you think they ought to do, exactly when you think they ought to do it.The worst kind of person.  You cannot fully construct a meaning that fully encompasses what this vicious insult means.  If you're an asshole, you are disgusting, loathesome, vile, distasteful, wrathful, belligerent, agoraphobic, and more.  Assholes are human fecal matter.  They are the lowest of the low.  They transcend all forms of immorality.  It is the very worst of insults; to be called an asshole is to have your very soul ripped apart and shat on.  I say that the word "asshole" is the worst cussword of the english language, worst than fuck, shit, and cunt combined.A grave in which to place a Donkey.An alternate word for aviator-style sunglasses with very dark or mirrored lenses.

While assholes are worn by people from all walks of life, these are the primary wearers: [pigs], pretty much everyone in the movie [Top Gun] (chicks included), obese motorcyclists, [rent-a-cop]s, yacht owners, hipsters, construction workers, and aging retirees who like to fish and drink watery American piss-beer.

Assholes may also worn by non-assholes for the ironic effect.1. A person who you feel needs to have the fuck beaten out of him
2. This dipshit I know named AlbertAn exceedingly large penis belonging to an opinionated man.A natural leader of men. Women want him and men want to be him. He drives a tank with three wind shield wipers. He commands an army of troops and often takes them on field trips for r. and r. He receives many perks from the civilian population such as a third free entree from applebees when he purchases the 2 for $20 meal deal. He is currently training troops in Orlando Florida.A Military rank for an Officer usualy below general and above Lieutenant Colonel, Major, Captain, and Lieutenant.Kentucky Fried Chicken or KFC [fast food] joint; after its deceased [mascot], Col. Harlan SandersAn [idiot] who lives for [slow pitch] [softball]. Plays [catcher]. Thinks he's [Batman]. Likes to give shit, doesn't like to get shit. Has an excuse for anything that doesn't go his way, yet will give you reasons why you can't do the same thing. Picks fights and then resorts to "I'll sue your ass" if you call him on it. Basically a 5 year old [spoiled child].1.Military rank

2.A characters from the video game Mega Man X4.
  Has a sister called Iris. He is working with Repliforce
  and later dies during the rebellion.
  Some people believe Iris and Colonel were the same person    
and got split into 2 : THIS IS NONSENSE AND BS.A shitty baseball teamname of the un popped pieces of corn at the bottom of a pop corn bowl.a short stalky man that is balding with comb over, stutters and says um constantly, very strict and continues to create problems with the cadets.  talks for hours on end and bores the students to sleep, treats the kids like they have not a clue in the world about whats going on and how they could do anything in the world to change a thing...A stocky man of medium height, very solid build, tends to draw himself up to full height when excited, or early in the mornings. Very poor sense of balance, becomes ill and vomits easily, especially when being talked to. Very popular, especially among ladies, talks to anyone. Enjoys the occasional flap in the wind. Cousin to [Princess Sophie].Believing that the group one belongs to, be it of sex, creed, or color, is automatically superior to another's.One who believes that their gender, group, or kind is superior to others.1. A British [chav] - a white urban Brit who enjoys picking fights with strangers and acting tough. Chav is a shortened version of the term and is used much more often.

2. A [jingoist] - a person who is fiercely nationalistic and will side with their country no matter what - right or wrong - and call anyone who disagrees with them a traitor. Common in parts of the UK and in the Southern and Midwestern US.

3. A [male chauvinist] - a man who treats women as inferior or considers men better than women. A [sexist]. Common in fundamentalist [Christian] and [Islamic] cultures.A usually male jerk who feel he is superior because he has a penis. Although many of us know that it is just them compensating because they have no penis, they may also compensate with a car their parents bought them. Typically, they have no standards, will have sex with just about anyone, and they are also CHEATERS.someone who tends to stay up late into the nightSomeone who stays up late and sleeps in the day.A girl you sleep with that you don't want your friends to know about. Typically some easy girl you meet at a bar or party that is willing to sleep with you A.S.A.P.A meth user that stays on the pourch all night at a the meth house, watching everything, usually a paranoid tweaker.Suffix added to any noun to describe the biggest/baddest/meanest/nastiest of its type. Dervied from Godzilla, Japan's national hero, 60's movie star, and general all around badass.A person (or gaming nerd) who has a complex about his/her status and image when playing Computer Games.

He / She doesn't like losing and will come up with all sorts of excuses.

It's what defines the person's life as he/she doesn't really have one and therefore they will vigorously defend their status so they are not seen as a 'noob' online.adj.; when used as a suffix for a proper name or specific entity, becomes part of that noun.

Derived from [Godzilla], the gargantuan reptilian star of Japanese "B" horror [movie] genre. Introduced in 1954 as "Gojira", Godzilla is the embodiment of all that is massive, destructive, and extremely difficult to defeat. Ergo, "'zilla" in both the stand-alone adjective and suffix forms represents those same charecteristics. Linguistically, the "z-l" [combo] has stronger audiological [punch] than "j-r", thus giving "'zilla" more connotative [power] than "'jira".Derived from Godzilla, it could be another word for "monster", or just the meanest, baddest thing of any type of person or animalreal biganother term of monster, basically, it come from godzilla, but now, zilla it self trend to means any type of monster, like kingkong, godzilla,dinosaur,Jaws..etca suffix which can be used on pretty much any word.  

(1) a suffix personifying the root word

(2) just a suffix used to make a word more intense (read: retarded)The ultimate compliment known to man and the highest achievement the common man can achieve. Closely followed by a Nobel Prize.1. a type of vann
2. a sooners fan
3. a chokeran individual who displays many animilastic qualities; stems from the species velocirapter, which was known for its rather savage dispositionA girl who gets around the block mostly from drunk hook ups and one night stands and has a ton miles. Pretty much the last resort for a dude just lookin for a nut. Also known as a one hitter quitter.something that is radical, cool, or otherwise awesome. something that is snow is generally the shit, being top score, bitchin, etc. the word is derived from the fact that snow is generally off the hook in its beauty, power, and pimperyCoke, cocaine. Used primarily by huffing through the nostrils snow can also be freebased and inhaled.1.  Frozen [precipitation] that is white, powdered and falls to the ground in winter.

2.  [Static] on the TV.

3.  [Coke] or [cocaine].

4.  A white Canadian rapper who had a hit in 1992 with the reggae influenced [Informer].  

5.  White girls.A frozen white fluffy form of rain that will keep you out of school for a day. Usually seen in the winter season.stuff that falls from the sky at christmas and it tastes nicefinely powdered cocainea white precipitate that turns every driver within a 75 mile radius of Chicago completely retarded.1 - White, cold, soft, slightly frozen water that falls from the sky in winter. Also tastes nice. Beware of yellow snow.
2 - Cocaine or crack. A white powder powder narcotic. Also called blow, charlie, snowflake.1. mislead, especially by overwhelming with (mis)information
2. deceive
3. hoodwink
4. bamboozleIt is the process of adding lots of small hole-punched papers into a [nugget]ed back pack.1. To whine
2. To Bitch
3. Also see "protesting" -A debate strategy commonly used by Ridgeview and Bakersfield High schools
4. The only lesson jv members at the aforementioned schools learn about
5. Protesting Manuals are equivalent to evidence at these schools.A temporary gathering of people designed to speak out against a cause or political event.  Rarely works because the politicians who are being protested against usually send the [riot police] to "calm down" the protesters.A [mosh pit] for [people] who [care] about [important issues].The act of a diabetic urinating in their partners mouth. Basically a stronger, more pungent lemonade mouth.Made from Orange Pekoe Tea leaves this non-alcoholic beverage, served cold and moslty below the [Mason Dixon line] is a Southerners favorite treat on a hot day (or with pork [BBQ]).  Sugar is added at the time just after brewing "while the tea is still hot".  This allows the sugar to disolve more evenly and produces a fine treat.  Can be garnished with a Lemon.   (See also [Ice Tea])Liquid amazing.A sweet drink said to extend the average human's life by 10-15 years.A reference to males that are sexually interested in minors (both male and female). Said males cannot refuse sweet tea and it is often used to lure them into police traps.

It is believed that pedophiles are fueled on the stuff. McDonalds has recently attempted to capitalize on this fact.

See: [To Catch a Predator]The act of dipping ones testicles in sugar, and smearing them across your opponents face.Semen, jizz, baby gravy. Usually spilled by the half gallon, sprayed all around a room, sometimes on electronic equipment for maximum effect.A female person who believes themself to be  amazing, astonishing , aweinspiring , impressive , intimidating, magnificent, majestic, mind-blowing,The One and Only.

Can also mean crazy woman.southern drink....specially in the area of Tennesse...where the hot bitches are...it is known that by drinking this beverage it will give an avarage girl the power of being hot...also gives you an awesome souther accent...but the word can be used as "cool" or "sweet" on any ocation..The drink of choice for the low class. Extremely low quality tea with a pound of sugar per cup. Also known as, rot your teeth out tea, and we wonder why southerners have such nasty teeth.Generally the acronym used for barbecue, it has evolved into a piece of the internet vernacular. 

Used to poke fun by attaching it to common acronyms such as [wtf], [omg] and [hax].an acronym used for barbecue but sometimes used to point out the absurdity of using acronyms online.Often used to parody online acronyms, this originally stood for "better be quick," usually used in online games.Short for "bitches be queefing". Queefing is the discharge of air from the vaginal tract, known as vaginal flatulence.Originally started on irc channels and then used in instant messengers meaning "be back quick". More recently used as a leet speak variant meaning "barbecue" in conjunction with phrases and other acronyms mainly meant to tease the lesser experienced.Melbourne Australian slang for sexual encounterCommonly used abbreviation meaning "Bitch Be Quiet". Other meanings have also been assigned to the same letter combination, however, these are of course wrong, as this usage is clearly the best and only possibly meaning for BBQ. (Not...)Big Bad Queer

A person who is trying to act all cool and badass ended up looking and sounding all gay,stupid,and hated by others.1. A shortened version of the word "barbecue"

2. An Internet slang term for things such as Be Back, Queers, Better be Quick, and Bitch Be Quiet, among other terms.bitch be quiet. linked with wtf bbqFoolish, destructive, evil sect.

I was happily married and had two wonderful little boys.
The mother of my first wife "got religion" with the JWs and then brainwashed her daughter to become one.
As an atheist I accept other's ideas, so I went along with the idea and accepted her going to the JW meetings where she was indocrinated into their ideas. However, at the insistence of her local JWs she started to try and convince me to go and become one if them.
I said that I was happily an atheist and that the bible was written by men not God.
From then on things went from bad to worse and I was officially and publicly declared to be The Devil.

We divorced and I am now happily remarried with two lovely girls.

Jehova's Witnesses directly caused the breakup of my marriage and caused two innocent young boys to be subjected to the pain and loss which now, after 30 years still affects my oldest boy.

Jehova's Witneses are evil fools.They are not lazy at all because they do all the normal stuff like raise a family, work, go to school and they still manage to get god's word out regurly. AND, it's spelled Jehovah's WitnessesFor the correct spelling and grammar, see [Jehovah's Witnesses].a group of annoying [pricks] who believe in some [shit] about this [god] or something.they go around "spreading gods message" if you ever see one pray to god that a double decker bus falls on them from the sky before they start [preaching] there shit to youUsually spelled Jehovah's Witness.  A strict religious group in which members cannot celebrate holidays or birthdays, but rather spend their time going door to door annoying people with their views and beliefs.A splinter movement of the Jehovah's Witnesses that considers excess of 'H's to be an abomination before the Lord. Jehovah's Witnesses believe their group to be founded on a spelling error, but Jehova's Witnesses know that is just the sort of blasphemy those H-lovers would resort to.annoyingAlso known as J DUB. A religion which grants its members a reason to be lazy and do nothing with their lives nor get involved in anything important as they are serving God, not man.A well-worn, unglamorous bar, often serving a cheap, simple selection of drinks to a regular clientele.  

The term can describe anything from a comfortable-but-basic neighborhood pub to the nastiest swill-slinging hole.Home.This place is going to be stinky and lame. You don't come here for the drinks, you come here to eliminate sobriety. All of the regulars there have a smoker's voice and a hard look to them. If you try to go there dressed nicely, you will get stared at and singled out. Wear shoes that you wouldn't mind squashing some roaches in.A scummy bar whose patrons are primarily on the prowl for a one night standA [bar] that is sleazy, poorly maintained and in overall bad shapeAt one time a deep, earthy, and universally respected genre of folk music embraced by people from all walks of life, and performed by heartland poets who wrote touching melodies and thought-provoking but subtle messages about life, love, and loss, country music has now grown into a dim shadow of its former greatness.  

Record companies have appropriated it for their own profit as they will with any great artistic movement.  Insipid, voiceless dandies with the depth of wading pools have been propped up as the new "idols."  Irresponsible and uninformed political rhetoric has usurped the lyrical foreground, alienating many fans and completely betraying the music's original status as art for the everyman, while mediocrity and uniformity sum up the musical direction.  

If we can ever be blessed again by another visionary, a Williams Sr., a Cash, a Cline, or a Miller, maybe things will change.  But for now, country music remains a brutally raped and distorted picture of art stolen from the artists.A form of music in which the words can be understood, any instrument is game, writing talent is critical, and every song doesn't have to be about horny depressed teenagers singing one or two lines over and over.A music style that used to be about "Cowboys" and "Tractors" and shit. The music was almost always made by a fiddle, acoustic guitar, harmonica, and/or a chello. 

Now, country music is basicly just badly done rock-guitar pop-ballads (or repitive piano pop-ballads) with such themes as "My Wife Left Me", "Im Leaving my Husband", "my Spouse is Dead or a thousnad miles away and i am lonley", and "Drinking Songs", sung by untalented Males who all try to sound the same, and females who either sing like a hurt timid female, or a Strong Independent Woman Who is Leaving Her Boyfriend For Some Unknown Reason. 

Hell, modern country wouldnt even be considered country music if it didnt include that stupid highpitched country noise (i cant describe it. If you have heard country music, you know what im talking about) made by some unknown instrument.a once-vital form of rustic music derived from European styles of folk and dance music made by European immigrants to [America]. It's generally played with instruments like the mandolin, acoustic and steel guitars, fiddle and so on. It used to be about observations of the world, life and love in its complexities. Now it's all cliched, with imagery of cowboys, macho bragadoccio, Southern pride, small town life, "she done him wrong", "tears in my beer", "redneck" living, sentimental tripe like the trend-chasing "Angels Among Us", and "[family values]". Oh yes, and "[God bless the U.S.A.]" [jingoism]. Ever since [Garth Brooks] (who is a watered down [Bob Seger]) hit it big in the [fucking PC 90s], country has been "yuppified" and formulaic. Now there boring piano ballads with cliched lyrics galore sung by lousy [Richard Marx] clones with cowboy hats, the generic [hat acts], pretty ladies singing tunes fit only for shopping mall opening-dedications, sexy ladies who sing corporate pop (no, it don't impress me much) and preachy, jingoistic sentimental crap in the aftermath of all this [9/11] business like the aw-shucks "Where Were You When the World Stopped Turning". This trash is pushed on the [sheep] public by corporate execs in suits.an unbearably irritating form of music that uses the same twangy gee-tar and awful wavering voice to sing about a very short list of topics such as: cheating spouse, alcoholics drinking to excess, pickup trucks, bein' a good-ol-boy, not havin' any a them-thar teeth and screwin' horses. this form of music is generally played at hoot n' annies, box socials, barn dances and every store north of georgia that douche bags go to buy cowboy hats even though they have no legitimate need for them. in order for a person to get any kind of enjoyment out of country music, however minimal, one must fall under one or more of the following categories: white women, having unnatural love for cheap beer, owning a yard full of garbage, 3 or more missing teeth, having a lip full of chewing tobacco, attenders of singles' mingles/family reunions, anyone that owns a tractor and thinks that it automatically makes them a cowboy. the more of these criteria met, the bigger the country music fan you are.example songs: 

"she thinks my trackers sexy"  
"i love this bar" 

enough saidCountry music evolved from folk ballads brought to America by immigrants.It was decent music until asshole record company execs and producers in Nashville, Tennessee (wanting all the money without having to have talent)started pushing the"Nashville sound"aka[Nashville Clowns] in the late 50s and continuing till today.Now all country songs are written by a formula.Whats selling,What topic is hot at the moment etc.. Country acts of today are told how to dress,act ,talk,what their background is ,if they are gonna be outlaws or good guys(stolen from wrestling promotors.also see:[Retards])and what companies products to be seen wearing,eating,drinking and wiping their ass with.Most country stars of today are gleened from Kareoke bars and lounges.Most are from the midwest or east coast but company excecs change their point of origin to Oklahoma,[Texas] or Tennessee.Most "Stars" of today do not write their own material,they purchase the rights to say they have written it.(Travis Tritt)Pose with Harleys and try to act like outlaws(Toby Keith.Although he had to be pulled on a trailer sitting on a bike for his vid after dropping the bike several times and having to receive medical attention to get his head removed from his ass).Most acts of today are a sad lot of record company flunkies listened to by plastic people who buy into their bullshit swaggering and studio player albums(watch their road bands who are paid next to nothing screw up every lick out live)(I dont blame them).The modern day fanbase for these "Stars" of today are a fickle bunch(fame IS fleeting)and the commercial lifespan for these people is short indeed.Most end up broke,without their songs or right to even sing them in public anymore within a year or less.But dont feel sorry for them.They sold out and perpetuated the machine.If they hadnt sold out and wouldve told the record execs to write their own songs, modern country may have stood a chance.Listen to Old(late 60s-late 70s) Waylon,Willie,David Allan Coe,Billy Joe Shaver for a taste of country music unspoiled by the "[Nashville Clowns]"A genre of music that used to be good until it all started sounding the same. After Garth Brooks came into the fold, there were really obcessed country fans and the selling out in country became more common. Nowadays country music is full of acts trying to sound a lot like each other and many artists do not have their individuality, but many did not have that from the start of the genre. Once Waylon Jennings demanded that he would play his own songs like it or not, individual began to increase in the genre. The creativity of the country singer or band is denied when they are not allowed to be creative. Ever since maybe ten years ago or even earlier many acts have been copying each other. Individuality has been more seen in some Alan Jackson, Willie Nelson, Johnny Cash, Waylon Jennings, Bocephus, Eric Church, Brad Paisley, and in the songs of a few other country acts. However Rock, Alternative, Punk, and Metal, and Metalcore ( the one with probably the most freedom of expression and by far the most lyrically deep the majority of the time are the best). However the legacy of country music is being ruined by an attempt to commercialize like pop artists is hurting the genre of country music when they try to be all hip hop and sing about a woman's booty or follow the same formula of every other band in country or rock music. These rock bands they seek to sometimes emulate are southern rock bands, Nickelback, 3 Dooors Down, and Hinder. Honestly, country music is so far on the decline that it has to the potential to turn worse than the pop/dance and techno genres.a type of music where you lose everything you own and takes no talent whatsoever to write lyrics for. Type of music listened to by people who have nothin better in life to do than complain about everything.A genre of music popular among white-trashy inbreeds.  Just listening to it has been proven to lower your IQ.  All the singers sound exactly the same, as if they were purposely trying to sound like hicks.  Someone who listens to country music is usually from a rural, white, bigoted community.A disease that started in Tokyo.  It first infected Gameboys in Japan in 1995.  Then in 1998 the disease infected Gameboys in America.  Soon channel WB11 was infected too, and now Cartoon Network.  The ever-so-popular "Gameboy Advance" systems got infected in 2002, and still is.  In 1999 the disease started spreading via cardboard aka "Pokemon Trading Card Game".  "Nintendo 64" and "Nintendo Gamecube" are infected too.  The disease is also spreading via plastic and metal in the toy isles at Wal-Mart, K-mart, toys-r-us, and every other toy store.  It is now July 2004, almost 10 years after the start of this addicting, argument instigating disease and it is still out there, but not as bad as its most powerful years(1999-2001).Say what you will folks, but Pokemon is one of the greatest games ever released for the Gameboy. Period. 

The problem is that Nintendo, through their misguided policy of inundating the market with a whole wack of crappy, kitschy merchandise, not to mention a t.v show and movies galore, alienated their older players. My theory is that most people who complain about how Pokemon is stupid, are actually disenfranchised former Pokemon players. Cause let's face it, back in the day, everybody, and I mean everybody, played it.

And all that is a real shame, because from a strictly gameplay point of view, Pokemon kicks ass. It should have gone down in history as one of the better video game franchises. But thanks to Nintendo's decision to sell the game to eight year olds, that won't happen.An anime, manga, and nintendo game created in Japan.  Pokemon are creatures that children and teenagers (as well as adults) can capture and train.  The trading card game was one of the first major trading card games that alowed players to not onle trade, but battle as well.  In the anime we follow the story of a young trainer, Ash, and his two friends, Misty and Brock, as they travel togeather on their pokemon journey.  The mange series revolves around rivils Red and Blue as they collect badges and compete in various compititions.no kids, not the garbage pokemon that they made. i mean, THE ORIGINAL. this goes back about 10 years. you guys remember when pokemon blue first came out? i know you all got it for christmas that year! cos i know i did. and i played it all night haha. and pokemon cards were the coolest thing ever. and EVERYONE had them in school, even the real popular kids. if you had a charizard, you were pretty much awesome. you sat for hours arranging your cards in a binder, just staring/reading each and every card. you pretty much had every fact about every pokemon memorized. YOU HAD LIKE 500 SLOWPOKES AND YOU HATED SLOWPOKE BECAUSE OF IT. you woke up at 5 am on school days to watch pokemon. you had a bunch of pokemon toys/stuffed animals. on christmas, if there werent 5 packs of pokemon cards in your stocking, you basically hated everything. when you found a "shiny" card you went completely insane. the number of holographic cards a person had defined how cool they were. you brought your gameboy color everywhere so you could level up your pikachu. you always wanted to evolve pikachu with a thunder stone, but dam game wouldnt let you! you snuck your gameboy into school to play, and the teacher never caught you. YOU SECRETLY STILL PLAY GAMEBOY COLOR SOMETIMES (i know i do). you could bust out your gameboy right now and play for 5 hours with no problem. im 17 now, and i can look back on this and it was such a fun time of my life. hah. so all you older people, do you remember these good old days?Something that you've pretended not to like since you turned 11, yet can't deny how sick it would be if they really existed.There are three destinct parts to Pokemon

anime:Responsible for giving Pokemon its "kiddie" reputation.

TCG:I must agree with people about this one, it was pretty horible.

GameBoy game:Aguably a great game. It is much more complex then it seems. Unfurtunatly, most people who bash pokemon because it is "kiddie" would most likely not have the intellegence to fully understand the game at all.

Why people that bashes pokemon always say something about gay sex or masturbating, I'll never know. That South Park episode don't help much either. I just pray that these people asociating the SP episode with the game are being sarcastic. After reading some of these definitions, I wouldn't suprised.a very fun rpg video game that i at 18 still injoy about capurturing and figting with kick ass monsters sounds like fun   to bad they went ruined in 97 98 by making a baby show about it ruing the 1995 video game(N.) A Game and an Anime that has been made popular by millions of kids. The Game itself, isn't too bad since they're so many Pokemon and so many different combinations of raising them and using them, whether it be the six Pokemon lineup or Moves they they have. 
The Show however, is the reason it has a kiddie reputation and is hated by most people. I don't blame most people when they say they hate Pokemon, cause the show makes them say all of that. If they tried the game, they might've thought otherwise. 
Still though, the many different games that come out aren't that nessacary. If you played one, you've played them all. I used to be really into Pokemon in middle school, and played it all the time, but knew better than to buy EVERY single different version and waste my money like that. Also avoided the Card Game.If you can ignore all the shitty spin-off games and marketing behind the series, it's still one of the best RPGs around.Once a very popular TV Show, Card game and video game which I myself was quite a fan of at the time. The TV Show and Card game sort of fizzled out after Poke'mon had had its time but the games were very good and they still exist to day. Of course I'm always seeing new card series's being brought out and am occasionally mildy interested because the artwork on some of the cards was rather good. In fact the card game was very popular and a lot of fights broke out about people not trading fairly and people even resorted to stealing others cards but I knew it had all gotten out of hand when at my first school they had people to watch over the swapping of Poke'mon cards and advising people on good swaps. Eventually most schools banned Poke'mon cards (and any others for that matter). So, when they began bringing out all those new Poke'mon and card sets it got a bit boring. So all in all the original Poke'mon cards, games and possibly the TV series was a rather good achievement but it never managed to keep a lot of fans after a few years, but, of course there are still dedicated Poke'mon fans all over the world.STD - stands for Sexualy Transmited Disease. The most commonly known is HIV/AIDS. To say the least you don't want an STD.Somewhat Tasty DonutsSexually Transmitted Disease. Anyone can get one, even virgins. Most common STDs are passed through skin contact, saliva, breast milk, & bodily fluids. You don't have to be a "nasty slut" to get an STD. It only takes 1 sexual experience...or with Herpes, alls you have to do is touch someone who has the virus on their skin  at that point and area.Sexually Transmitted Disease

See burned.Acronym meaning: Socially Transmitted Decepticons

Professional or professionally-organized social media users who use one or more online personas to launch political or personal attacks on opponents or their issues. Often, so called "persona software" is used to manage many such deceptive identities simultaneously in order to create the impression that multitudes hold similar points of view.

Sometimes called [Sock Puppets], STDs can infect multiple social media streams at one time, creating the illusion of mass interest or agreement sufficient to influence an issue or debate.Basically like a computer virus, but for people. You want the free Prada bag, you have to risk the attack on your computer, and possibility of it never working again.

You want the sex, you have to risk the attack on your 'down there' region, with the possibility of it never working again.Something you get from putting your dick in shit because you're too fucking poor to afford a single condom.STD stands for Snooki Transmitted Dumbness. Are girls in your school wearing super slutty clothes? Tanning their skin 24/7? Putting their hair in poofs the size of the Popes hat? Then they have the STD. After watching Jersey Shore for too long, some girls have acquired the STD. Signs include but are not limited to...
-drinking vodka for breakfast
-drinking vodka for lunch
-drinking vodka for dinner
-drinking vodka for dessert
-skin that is so tan, she is invisible in a dimly lit room
-causes public disturbances 24/7
-eats pickles... by sucking on them
-when asked why she does something, she replies with "I'm at the Jersey Shore... BITCH!"

-everywhere is the Jersey Shore for her
-a sudden interest for meat-heads and gorillas
-when someone calls her phone, and is looking a girl named Angelina, she replies with "No, she died"
-she is as smart as a...SnookiSpontaneous Torrential Diarrhea

Whenever you are normal one second, then randomly you get the urge to have explosive diarrhea and then, when you sit down, it just explodes out of your ass like a torrential rain...simultaneous text discussion.
When you are texting someone, and they send another text before you respond to the previous one. This is giving someone an STDCompany bitch.Free slaves in the workplace.poor innocent individual starting out with a whole set of impossible goals and naive ambitions that end up crushed under the path of some self-righteous menapausal bitch that is dissatisfied with her own life and for getting an office ass and taking it out on cute young girls that might actually make something of their lives and live their dreams...and work off the constantly invading office ass(1) A temporary worker who is employed to gain experiance/education rather than money. 
(2) Bill's gal.A Democratic Semen Recepticle.People who are hired to do menial monotonous work that you couldn't pay people people to do long term because they would quit or eat a .45 caliber.  So they hire some naive [college] or [high school] grad to do it until they give up , quit, or eat a .45 caliber.a person who willingly becomes a slave to the corporate world because they enjoy getting abused and whipped by supervisors.

interns do not get paid but they do enjoy the occasional snacks brought to work by the other rich employees. (usually interns steal those snacks, therefore get whipped).

also see "office puppy"an aspiring employee with whom you abstain from sexual relations.a noun referring to a person who is reduced to slave labor.

An intern works for no pay, and their main job is to get coffee and obey each demand by their employer.Homeless kids that you take in and support in exchange for ridiculous favors.  They can be summoned with a conch shell.What Kid Rock drives after being arrested for beating up Tommy Lee.Someone who doesn't have the skills or talent to hold down a permanent job. They are inherently lazy and sneaky.Faggy asian kids who believe they have the ability to kill someone without guilt.n. Mystery Science Theater 3000: A television show in which humorous comments are adlibbed during the viewing of a low quality B-movie.

v. To make a Mystery Science Theater 3000 episode that focuses on a specific film.

adj. The Mystery Science Theater 3000 version of a film.n. abbreviation for the cult hit television series "Mystery Science Theater 3000", in which 'B' movies are made fun of by the the show's three central characters.
Started on local access by creator Joel Hodgson, later moved on to Comedy Central through season seven, then the Sci-Fi Channel until its tenth and final season.
Also included a feature film, "Mystery Science Theater 3000: The Movie" with a limited theatrical release.The most awesome television show invented by the human race. Short for "Mystery Science Theater 3000" Originated in the late 80's and featured a man named Joel (Later to be replaced by Mike Nelson), Crow T. Robot, and Tom Servo.  This trio would make fun of ,while watching, terrible movies. Was featured mostly on Comedy Central and the Sci-Fi Channel. Aired for 11 seasons. In 1996 the MST3K movie was released into theaters.v. To make fun of a really pathetic  movie.An abbreviation for "pure comical genius". I reccomend Hobgoblins, Manos, and Godzilla vs Megalon.I've only seen the movie, but from that, I can tell that it is fucking hilarious.The only show that has EVER made me laugh outloud. I think it was funnier with TV's Frank and Joel, but still funnier in the later episodes, but hey, I love Tom Servo's Irish Tenor, too...The only show ever created that actually has something to tell you. Provided you come equipped with a great sense of humour. And good abs.Making fun of a particular video/scene/footage especially music videos.

Abbreviation of Mystery Science Theater 3000National Republican Bullshit Network. Watched by ignorant, gun-toting, flag-waving ultra-nationalistic right-wing Christian fundamentalists who think George Bush is the new fucking Messiah or something; basically, the scum of American society who, if they had their way, would turn America in a fascistic police state in order to feel safe from the "terrorists" (aka: "brown people").A pseudo-news channel catering to the bottom of the American right-wing extremist barrel - people who are deathly afraid of anyone and anything that's even the slightest bit different from them.  About as "fair and balanced" as the Iranian government, which it closely resembles.Sensationlist trash channel.  State media dumbed down so even Dubya can understand it.Funniest Tv station ever. Good source of entertainment. But seriously, I trust the Daily Show more.news for red neck ass republicansA far right neo-con "talk show" that presents itself as news. In fact if the news does not favor their distorted view they focus on sensational tabloid stories of rape and murder to titillate the religious right that pretends morality. This show is so hilarious that I might even rate it as a comedy if it werent for the fact that some ignorant americans really believe it is fair and balanced. It is a show for lower IQ people who want to be reassured their small minds are correct and that everyone in the world who isnt white,right wing extremists re evil. Fox news hates you if you are Democrat, moderate thinking republican. Catholic, Lutheran,asian,black,hispanic, and the list goes on. They have a narrow box of extreme radical fundalmentalist with a corporate agenda and if you look closely rather perverted. The owner (Rupert Murdich" specializes in tabloids that exploit crimes against women and children then report every delicious sexual detail so the "moral" religious right" can get their jollies while exclaing how hrrible everyone else is. It really promotes rich big corporations and Republicans like George W. and use their guise as a "conservative" station to manipulate the average, easily manipulated person who wants to think of themselves as moral citizens while their mind is being filled with anything but factual news reporting. Wake up america and start watching C-span and see what is really happening.Completely and utterly without merit. A news station that not only presents the most wildly conservative of biases with the slogan "Fair and Balanced," but also presents worse television than Jerry Springer. I am NOT watching the news to see Sean Hannity and Bill O'Reilly scream "SHUT UP!" at every single guest they have.Total BullshitThe most pathetic excuse for a television news channel that I've ever seen.  I could personally shit in a bucket and then write a report saying that I did not take a shit in the bucket and be more accurate than Fox News.  These people fucking disgust me.  I can't believe there are idiots this fucking stupid.  See [republican] for more examples of idiocy.Real news put through a conservative Republican filter and then dumbed down.The world's second-largest ocean, separating the eastern Americas and western Europe and Africa, extending from the Artic in the North and the Antartic in the South.1. A man-made body of water usually found in gardens and parks.

2. A website based around weird animations, usually crap) flash games and a weird (really weird) storys.

3. Home of the Billy ChroniclesTo pond - to have sexual intercourse with someone affectionately.cool water where people go to cool off - located on a farm. a place for sexual explorations. 

it is also a secret meeting place on hot summer nights, for college homosexuals.A body of water similar in size to a pool. Larger than a puddle but smaller than a lake, ponds usually have some time of small lifeforms living within.What the boyfriend of a duck lover calls his girlfriend's vagina.To Brutally own someone. In the use of ownage.
Formed from the words Pwned, Pwnt, Owned, and Ownt.A place where you go pick up dogs.  (dog pound)the past tense of "pwned" which is technically already past tense but who cares(Always all caps)
A replacement for the words [PWN], [PWND], and all derivatives.A term formerly useful for describing websites consisting entirely of intentionally fabricated news stories, but now used to describe virtually anything that does not mesh with one's own views.Any news reported by mainstream media which is deemed unflattering, incriminating or otherwise hitting too close to home for Donald Trump and/or his cabinet of lap dog Republicans, regardless of it's actual factualness or validity.Fake news is produced by web sites or tabloids for the purpose of attracting viewers to ads. Fake news are sensational false (fiction) news-like stories created purely to attract readers.

Comedy shows, like the Daily Show, commonly mix real news with humor, including fictitious humor. But the news part of it is real. True, people who fall for fake news sites are very gullible, and perhaps can't tell which parts of the Daily Show are fiction, but those people aren't the Daily Show's target audience. Fake news has come to mean fiction for fiction's sake.

Fake news should also be distinguished from false news, also called dishonest news or lies that are told for political purposes. Many of the anti-Hillary stories were created by fake news sites, but then posted as lies on sites like Fox and Breitbart.Used to defend an illogical position, or a way to avoid using critical thinking skills when a news source does not match a personal or ideological bias.Any statement or report that truthfully exposes the lies, ignorance, conflicts of interest, erroneous statements, megalomania, and racist, misogynistic, illegal, traitorous and tyrannical activities of the so-called President Trump and his administration. Syn. Newspeak., Ant. propaganda1) False or otherwise extremely exaggerated news stories used to generate money from ad revenue by using [clickbait] titles or used to sell tabloids in the grocery check-out line.

2) A term for a news article that doesn't validate one's political opinion.Typical coverage from Fox News.  Their reporting contains so many exagerations, falsities, and interjected opinions, that it can in no way be considered proper and informative.Normally typed in ALL CAPS, It is the only type of news that Mr. Trump loves.Print or online information that make [President Trump], his advisors, and his administration look like dishonest or incompetent policymakers or office-bearers.Fake News is a term for news organizations that constantly put out fake or modified stories to control their viewers and readers perceptions. Fake News intentionally manipulates and controls the main stream narrative with misinformation and censorship to serve the agenda of promoting a progressive new world order. This is the primary reason we have liberal bias among all major news organizations. The following list is FAKE NEWS.

ABC,AP, AURN, BLOOMBERG,BUZZFEED,CBS,CNBC,CNN,HUFF POST,LA TIMES, MSNBC,NBC, NEW YORK TIMES,NPR, POLITICO,REUTERS, THE HILL,WALL STREET JOURNAL,WASHINGTON POST, MEDIA MATTERS,SNOPES.a dirty pirate hookerA voluptuous female pirate type woman, usally with a firey attitude, and usually seen around taverns and bars, seaside fishing towns, and wherever pirates roam.a beautiful women who engages particularly in duties concerning domestic affairs, kitchen cleaning, or ale serving

the object of a pirate's affection

usually found in sea faring ports, in the back of the kitchen scrubbing pots, passed out under a pirate ship's deck, or tending to the wash.A [stout], [voluptuous] [maiden]. Usually associated with the [Rennaissance] and [tavern]s, where the wench is pictured as a bar-maid, boldly flirting with the [swashbuckler]s and [pirate]s.

Is a softer, less-[offend]ing version of [bitch]. 

A [mispronunciation] of "wrench".historically a non-derrogatory word for a woman who was not a lady. thus a waitress in times of yore was a "serving wench." more modernly synonimous with bitch or slut but slightly less ofencivePeasant girl. Can also be used as a slightly and less aggresive version of bitch.An admired woman in your crew, a talented warrior seductress, that can inspire adventure or take a bland situation and make it rife with excitement.a slightly less offensive term similar in meaning to "bitch"Local term for women or girlsA Wench is a loose (not necessarily literally) yet powerful woman. The Wench is part of a growing sisterhood devoted to torturing men in the nicest of ways.

1. If men require an "adjustment" after kissing you? 
2. If your tongue can be registered as a precision surgical instrument? 
3. If you have you been accused of smuggling melons across state lines?
4. If you really know what a sponge is for?
5. If "Soak a Bloke" is considered your time off?
6. If you think it's wise to use ice cubes and menthol together?
7. If you know that whipped cream is more than just a dessert topping?
8. If men lose the power of speech when you adjust your bodice or breath deeply?
9. If you are vertically challenged but horizontally gifted?
10.If you like to play with your food? 
11.If when removing your bra on Monday, you find enough loose change to buy breakfast? 

If you answered any 3 of the questions above with an "oh yeah," then you are obviously a woman of distinction, a product of excellent breeding, possessed of stunning (if not vaguely dubious) talents and appetitesA tattoo above a woman's ass crack.“Tramp Stamp” is a derogatory term referring to a tattoo which a women places on her lower back.  It is especially popular among women born in the late 70’s, 80‘s, and even early 90’s.  Fair or unfair, these tattoos have a socially constructed connotation associated with them.  These women are labeled as tramps, whores, or other derogatory sexually promiscuous terms.  Although these are often bias generalized claims, there have been sociological studies done by the American Psychological Association, Federal Bureau of Prisons, and other demographic researchers showing strong correlative evidence associating tattoos with high risk behavior, illegal substance abuse and sexual promiscuity.  These risk factors are greatest in the age range which these types of tattoos are gaining main stream popularity.  Some have also jokingly stated that by 2050, the “tramp stamp” will be renamed the “gramp stamp”.1. a tattoo located above a womans ass.
2. a girl who has been certified by your neighborhood, frat or group of friends as a slut.A tattoo on the small of a woman's back... a good clue if you should wrap it up or not.a horribly cliche, or common tattoo that makes girls look like dumb bitches.  Found on the lower back, and usually a butterfly...sometimes a happy flower of some sort.A tattoo on the lower back of a female. Denotes the perceived correlation between having a tattoo in this location and being sexually promiscuous. The larger the tramp stamp, the more promiscuous the female, goes the common lore. Popular designs include butterflies, flowers, vines, tribal designs, wings....A tattoo on a woman's lower back.  Just think of it as a target.Tattoo usually positioned on the lower back of a exotic dancer and or a female. Usually accompanied with low rising pants with a "Thong" underwear exposed.The Tattoo found on the lower region of a womans back. Often a tribal symbol or artwork that is wider than tall, such as angel wings, vines, and butterflies. It origins are believed to have started with early indian tribe(s) when a male would place his 'brand' on his female partners lower back to discourage other males, where the strategically placed brand would be seen during sexual acts, such as the 'doggie style' position. 

Ironically, today it is usually understood by society as associated with sexual promiscuity and commonly reffered to using derogatory terms. Popular with women in their 20's, and frowned upon in their later years.A lower back tattoo on any female.A kick ass 24 hour place to get waffles.  Popular in the [dirty south][sketchy] sketchy restuarant that is defined by it's sketchiness.  has a certain culture about it: "great" coffee, hasbrowns scattered and smothered, and the classic waffle.  frequently visited in the middle of the night by drunk and/or high college students.1. a 24-hour dive with underpaid waitresses, classically bad juke box music, bathrooms a la truckstop, and food that no respectable arteries woulc bear.
2. the only place to go-- besides [Wal-Mart]-- after 11pm in Arkadelphia, Arkansas and similiar ends of the worldThe only reason to go to disney world. An exact opposite of the magic kingdom and a lot more enjoyable.to be left in bed with covers that equal the size of a waffle house napkin.The poor man's IHOP. An interesting place for a first date. The only place you could imagine going if your drunk/high and it's 2 a.m. You almost ALWAYS see someone you know at the Waffle House (three of the last four times I went I saw people I knew). The waitresses at Waffle House are way better than the ones at Hooters.A crappy diner where you can buy food or meth at 3 a.m.A slang term meaning "female prison."the greatest fucking breakfast place ever, open 24-7, breakfast all day, good shitThe place to go when you want some good waffles at an economical price. Also a good late-night place.Zord is like the empasis of making something more elite than it is. It is similar to the word "zors" also. It is actually a suffix such as zors. The meaning is very similar except zord is a unique word because it is like the show power rangers.

The way this came out is that one's user name named PandaBoyx kept saying Zors while his friend started saying "WOW its like zord from power rangers!" ever since, they all started saying zord. Similar as "z0rs", you may also use the suffix "z0rd".A colossal assault vehicle used by the Power Rangers.  

See also [Megazord].Childhood game of fashioning the largest clunkiest legos into crude spacecraft. To play the game, two children slam their "zords" into each other and whoever's breaks first loses.A word... or half a word... that you add on the end of words... to make them more wordy... and generally more... [AWESOME]!!! ...in every way...Also an expression requently used by stoners and hippies for something of high quality.sticky, hairy, stinky, and highly potent marijuana.really potent weed, produced by proper slow drying of harvested plant material, usually requiring curing (putting plant material in paper bag, folding over top, placing that bag in another bag. Thus reducing air and light contact on said plant materials, so when you go to retrieve some of said plant materials, it is still moist, green and sticky because the resin glands are still intact and 'sweating'.1. Potent weed.
i.e. [Krippy], [KindBud], [Bomb Nugget]
2.Adjective meaning good.Formerly used to denote really potent weed, it now means really or awesomeHigh quality weed (chronic).high quality, really strong weedDank, is an adjective which is over-used by people in general and mostly by people trying to appear cool to their stoner friends. Dank means dark, sticky, gooey, and potent. It was originally a common word to describe disgusting basements and caves ect. Then the world of pot took it over and was using it very correctly to describe very potent strains of marijuana, seeing as the definition of dank meets all the qualities you find in good marijuana. Then "squares" and people who wanted to look cool to stoners started using it to describe anything they think is "cool" which in turns makes them believe they themselves are "cool" as well. In reality it makes them seem as illiterate as an ape. M&M's are not dank, chips are not dank, and your clothes are definitely not dank, you need to stop overusing and killing the word.a word used to describe good weedThe word dank can be:

An adjective describing unpleasant dampness or humidity. 

a word used to describe high potency [cannabis] that is still moist. 

An adjective describing something as positive or awesome.A state of mind which occurs after smoking enough marijuana to the point where the user stares blankly into whatever catches his/her attentionThe ultimate state of mind.To be under the influence of [marijuana]. Usually associated with bloodshot eyes, the [munchies], and unexplained laughter.the greatest feeling in the world. it is the state you are in after hitting a nice big bowl of marijuanna or hash. I personally prefer pipes, but you can  smoke out of anything, i.e. a bong, spliff, joint, vaporizer, popcan, pop bottle, parachute, hotboxing is always fun. im quite high right now. 1.sometimes you laught alot, 2.other times you stare at absolutley nothing, 3.other times you get into indepth discussions about aliens and the CIA,4. or you think youre capable of things like backflips.

all of the above i have experienced and so much more, so todays lesson kids, is smoke as much marijuanna as you damn well please. goodday younglings.a time when you come up with the funniest quotes in the world and your a fucking genious but dont remember any of it in the morning...when you smoke so much marijuana that you are unmotivated to even move-  and every muscle in your body feels like it's being weighed down by a huge weight like a stone  (hence the word STONED) you feel really heavy and have intense, very enjoyable tactile hallucinations and usually feel complete euphoria so you just stare off blankly and enjoy it.The greatest feeling in the world followed by engulfing a bag of doritos and reeses pieces.when you're so high that you almost feel unable to move your muscles.  everything feels weird and you kind of just sit back with your mouth agape staring off into space and enjoying it.  contrary to popular belief, "stoned" and "high" are different in that, the word "stoned" originated from the idea that you feel like you're being weighed down by big heavy stones.The art of dying by geology.The very slow, yet rapid course of time in which you may find yourself reading and creating these definitions for words that quite simply seem to be the most hilarious thing you've seen in a recent while. (The word "egg" for example, let it sink in if you are high at the moment)

Contrary to popular belief, you will not be "raiding" the kitchen, and refrigerator, rather, you will likely see a Quiznos commercial which will either A) Remind you of the cold cuts you have in your refrigerator and proceed to make yourself 5 sandwiches, as you will not be able to tell when you're "full", or B) you will immediately rush to the nearest Taco Bell, because at one point you will forget why you got in the car, at which point a Taco Bell will present itself along any major highway.

You will be less likely to go to the movie theater, as instead your first person experiences will be as if you are viewing yourself through a television set, so watching movies will only cause you to lose control of yourself, as you will be uncertain of whether you're watching a movie, or whether you're watching a movie of a person watching a movie. (That person, being you)

You will giggle when I remind you of the word "egg", and that will cause you to go onto some intellectual brainstorm about things completely unrelated to eggs, such as poison dart frogs, discovery channel's Deadliest Catch, or how you managed to read all of this definition.1. A psychopathological condition characterized by delusional fantasies of wealth, power, or omnipotence. 
2. An obsession with grandiose or extravagant things or actions.1)Someone obsessed with power

2)A kick ass song by incubus1)A person obsessed with greed and/or power.
2)A great song from one of the greatest bands in the world; Incubusan insane person who is obsessed with power, one who thinks they are beyond greatnessA megalomaniac is a self-centered, power-crazed egomaniac that is obsessed with their goals for conquering cities and countries and world domination, they're rather over-obsessed with power rather than actual conquest. They also often fantasize of greatness, fame, wealth, grandeur, omnipotence predominate and servitude. Because of all the power driving them to becoming critically insane their minds are separated from reality since they also don't care what happens to anything at all as they care about themselves.

Despite having the word maniac in the name of them being a megalomaniac, it does not mean they are always clinically insane.My Definition is a belief is so strong that I am so powerful even more powerful than god  
I am paronaid of all things and make sure all my phones are not tapped
I say bring it on to take over the world
Any one standing in my way is un patroticone who has dillusions of granduer, such as one who thinks they are jesus or that they are the air to the seceret leader of the illuminati.A symptom of mental illness marked by delusions of greatness, wealth, etc. See also, Glenn BeckA bad-ass song by the founders of industrial rock, [KMFDM].Megalomaniac = George DubyaA girl who gives really good head, but her very annoying personality slowly sucks away your soul.They guard the prison of Azkaban. They suck all the happiness out of people and you'll feel like you'd never be happy again when a dementor comes near you.The worst part of prison, according to Prison Mike.dementors,scary creatures who gaurd azakaban.they attacked harry mostly in the third movie because of his tragic past.1. n. A fictional creature from the Harry Potter series. Dementors guard the wizard prison Azkaban and suck all of the happiness from anything in their presence. Their worst weapon is called the dementor's kiss, which is when a dementor sucks a person's soul out through their mouth.

2. n. A person who kills a good moment or sucks all of the fun out of a situation.Creatures of everlasting darkness. These creatures are the only things born evil.

Just being in proximity with a dementor drains all happy thoughts away from. They make you relive your worst memory.
They also take away anything warm, whether they be thoughts or the accual tempature.
They are also some of the only creature that do not sleep, they also never walk. They are the only known creature that can suck the very soul from a living thing.
Because of these special abilities they are used as gaurds to the wizard prizion of [Azkaban].

The only know way of fighting a dementor is to use a petronus charm.Someone who is in the fringe of your group of friends who is tolerated because it would be a shame to tell them to Fuck off!
They also have some strange ability to turn even the funniest momements into akward ones and sap all happiness from those around.Woman's [menstrual period]. Goes along with Blast-ended Skrewts (cramps) and Azkaban (uterus).
It sucks.1. A really really hot chick. She's so hot she's scary. It can also be a really really hot guy, but it mostly for women. This dementor makes something silvery come out of your wand.The most Ballin Drink you can make, Brass Monkey a 40 of Old English with Purple Drink, called the Dementor because it resembles "Dementor Piss" according to Jonny Haworth. WARNING: you will feel like you just got the kiss of death from a Dementor if you can conquer this beast.a delicious frozen treat that comes from cows. Ice cream comes in many different flavours and can often be found at your local grociery store.A relitively new shoe on the market. Created by Pharell Williams from the Neptunes (N.E.R.D) and Nigo, the creator of the Bathing Apes clothing and shoe line. They are marketed by Reebok. Only 3000 are currently in the market, ranging from around $300-$500 dollars.crack. hell even Master P calls it ice cream, and no one is more right them him.• The flavored cream of ice
• A common cure for broken hearted females
• A cold and delicious treat, perfect on hot summer daysflavored frozen cream that comes in different flavors.Release 4.0 of Google's [Android].

Although [Gingerbread] and [Honeycomb] are not yet available, Google is said to be already working on Android 4.0.

No idea what it will look like, but it will be greater than great!!

[Froyo] and [Gingerbread] are said to perform great with a 1 Ghz processor, [Honeycomb] and Ice Cream for sure will have a big impact on hardware.

Apple and Microsoft: be afraid, very afraid.code word for sexual pleasures when you are not behind closed doors and need to talk about the type of ice cream you had whether it be chocolate vanilla or better yet mocha.crack dope powder candyThe plural of [Ice Cream]The stuff that makes my head hurt when i eat too much of it... stupid fuckerA person that simply cannot be happy for another person's success.  So rather than be happy they make a point of exposing a flaw in that person.

Hating, the result of being a hater, is not exactly jealousy.  The hater doesnt really want to be the person he or she hates, rather the hater wants to knock somelse down a notch.Overused word that people like to use just because someone else expresses a dislike for a certain individual.most of the people in this siteA term used by others, usually being suburban "gangsters", whose lives are absolutely and undeniably defined by what others think.  These people "rumble" often and think  of themselves as original and/or indestructable.  People that use the term "haters" are the lowest stage of the evolutionary scale.  They bleed the fastest and have thought processes similar to that of a mentally underdeveloped cat.to be a hater is to descriminate or hate something, someone, or a certain type of something. 

If the world didn't have haters then it would be a better place. a much better place.

I mean not that there aren't assholes in the world. to hate somethings is good. i hate poverty, war, and bad shit like that. just try to have some morals, people.A person that develops a strong dislike for another, solely basing their own opinion on personal judgment rather than objective merit. The formation of a hater's contempt commonly arises from jealously and/or resentment. Individuals that make fun of, or "hate," others for justified reasons cannot be legitimately classified as "haters;" although many faggots attempt to rationalize their own situations by doing so. Additionally, the word "hater" is frequently overused, mainly by members of the rap and hip-hop communities.A person who feels anger and/or jealousy for someone who has succeeded in something they have worked hard for.
  A being who speaks badly,and/or takes negative actions in attempt to create problems for a successful person.Anyone with a opinion.The most non-insulting "insult" in existence. It's a waste of breath to say it and a waste of energy to type it. This term is often used by pre-teen girls whenever someone insults their favorite teeny bopper singers. If you ever call somene a hater, find the nearest knife and use it pierce your lungs for polluting our air with that fucking stupid word.People that make up reasons to hate certain people just because they aren't as wealthy or successfull as them. People are often hating:

1. [Bill Gates]
2. [Blink 182]
3. [George W. Bush]
4. [Halle Barry]
5. [Ben Affleck]P-Person
I-Into
M-Marketing
P-ProstitutesA man who beats up women and owns over a thousand sex slaves.one who brokers the sexual favors of women for profits1. Protection, Instruction, & Management of Prostitutes
2. Protectional Instructor Managing Professional
3. Prostitute's Instructional Management Professional
4. Professional In Management of Prostitutes 
5. Prostitute's Infamous Management Professional
6. Professionally Instructing Many Prostitutes
7. Professional Illegally Managing Prostitutes

Optional, but not recommended:
*Professional- replaced by Pro, Player, or Playa
*Into        - replaced by Intwined or Into
*Managing    - replaced by Marketing

Slang: noun or verb
1. Player(s/z)/Playa(s/z) Interested in(to) Making Progress/Prostitutes
2. (Put/Place It) or (Paper) in My/Men's Pants/Pocket(s)/Places
3. Party In My/Men's Pants/Panties
4. Pissin(g)/Peein(g) In(to) My Pants/Place/Partner/Potty 
5. Pissin(g)/Peein(g) In(to) Mouths of People/Prostitutes/Potty
6. People/Prostituts In Many/Money-filled Places/People
7. Perfect Independent Marvelous Playa(s/z) or Player(s/z)
8. Pooping In(to) My Place/Pants/Partner/Potty
9. Pennys In My Pocket/Place/Palace/Prostitutes
10. Put/Place It in My Pussy/Prostitute
11. Pussy Is My/Mens Prerogative/Purpose/PlaymateThe people wearing the purple suits on street corners who use dirt poor women to get money.  And later blowing it all on spinner's and gold lining for their three wheeled cycles.To make better, to fix up,some dumass middle school teenager who is as rich as hell and wear clothes like he's from the ghetto.Thinks he has he has hoes but the only one who he would lose his virginity to is his mom. Thinks rock is "for losers". Listens to too much 50 cent and tells everyone he used to live in "the projects". friends consist of a bunch of airheads who say LOL!! the whole time and his own dim-witted speciesPride Intelligence Money Power1. someone who profits off the money prostitutes make from selling their bodies
2. to seek out hookers to make a profit off of them selling their bodies.
3. to hit on several different girls
4. a guy who has alot of girlfriends or has been with alot women.
5. something that is really cool.v. Live off the earnings of a prostitutea machine for downloading pornWhat you are on nowThe most useful and most frustrating thing any human being will ever work with.If you're looking up this word, kill yourself.a very, very expensive punching bagA tool that is supposed to save time but intead wastes time.The most boring and frustrating thing in the world-however, I keep coming back.the thing people use to:
1. Go on MySpace or any other blog-related sites
2. download porn
3. illegally download music
4. play games
5. and use to look up the word "computer" on Urbandictionary.comThe answer to every single question.A $1000 facebook machineOne whose IQ exceeds his weight.An individual persecuted for his superior skills or intellect, most often by people who fear and envy him.An 'individual', i.e. a person who does not conform to society's beliefs that all people should follow trends and do what their peers do. Often highly intelligent but socially rejected because of their obesssion with a given subject, usually computers. Unfortunately, nerds seem to have problems breeding, to the detriment of mankind as a whole.Never
Ending
Radical
Dude.A stereotypical label used to describe a person that is socially inadequate.  A four letter word, but a six figure income.A person who gains pleasure from amassing large quantities of knowledge about subjects often too detailed or complicated for most other people to be bothered with.

Often mistaken for Geeks, who aspire to become nerds, yet lack the intelligence, and end up giving nerds a bad name due to their poor social skills.

Non-nerds are often scared of nerds, due to their detailed knowledge, and therefore seemingly high levels of intelligence - and subsequently denegrate them as much as possible as often as possible.

Nerds exist covertly within the fabric of society, often choosing to 'nerd it up' in private or in the company of fellow nerds.  It is for this reason they are feared the most - unlike geeks, who are easily identified, nerds can only be found out when casual conversation reaches a subject that they like nerding.the group of people who will most likely make a life changing invention that will radically change the world. the computer was invented by a nerd. the macintosh/apple and windows were invetned by nerds. jocks and normal people have no claim to civilization except for being the hard labor. nerds actually do the thinking. so jocks, fuck you, and go eat your steroidsThe person you will one day call "Boss"Guys with IQ higher than your weight. You made fun of them when you were at school but you would be lucky if you get employed as janitors in their businesses.A delicious candy made by Wonka.  They are pretty much crystalized sugar in a color coating that people love to give out on halloween.An individual who deals with the complex systems of todays military/civilian aircraft. Their entire mission is to make bricks "fly", and fix leaking electrons from parts, and they do it damn well. Usually pissed off individuals who are the be all end all of the sortie cock, they take and stride. Because one day, their enlistment will come to an end.Stands for AVIation electrONICSNot the best state in the country, but very far from the worst.  Home to three million people, some really sweet cities, three great univerties, a whole bunch of stellar small private colleges and a ton of true natural beauty in its lush northeast bluff country and statewide river valleys, lakes, and yes, rolling fields.  Iowa is a national leader in education (students in many other states including Texas take the Iowa Test of Basic Skills, and everyone's heard of the ACT, based in Iowa City) and is leading the way in biofuels to reduce the nation's dependence on oil.  To dispel the ignorance displayed elsewhere on this post, here's a state breakdown of cities and topography.  If seventy synonyms for boobs is alright to post, so is this.

Central Iowa:  [Des Moines], located at the intersection of I-80 and I-35, is the largest city with a metro of a half million and is the state capital, second only to London for the title of insurance capital of the world.  [Ames] (80,000 metro) is about a half hour north of Des Moines and is home to [Iowa State University], a land grant school of 30,000 respected around the world for its engineering and agricultural programs.  Central Iowa is, outside of river vallies, very flat, and outside of the Des Moines area and Ames is very sparsely populated.

Eastern Iowa:  The most densely populated area of the state.  Ethnically diverse [Iowa City] (115,000 metro) was Iowa's first state capital, was the first city in the world to elect a female mayor, has been named the most cultured city per capita in the nation, is always in the top five cities in the country for education, and is home to the [University of Iowa], 30,000, nationally renowned for its Carver College of Medicine and Iowa Hawkeye athletics.  The music departments of Iowa City's two large public high schools have won a total of five Grammy awards.  [Cedar Rapids], (200,000 metro) just twenty minutes north of Iowa City in the beautiful Cedar River valley, is the second largest single city, is the economic hub of eastern Iowa, has two private colleges, and is best known for being the place you get any of your Quaker Oats brand ceral from.  [Waterloo/Cedar Falls], two conjoined cities (130,000 metro) is where the [Unviersity of Northern Iowa], 18,000, is located.  The [Quad Cities], (375,000 metro) two in Iowa and two in Illinois, straddle the Mississippi and form the largest metro between Des Moines and Chicago.  The largest of the four cities is [Davenport], IA, home to the Bix 7 foot race whose hilly course and large prize attract runners from every part of the globe.  [Dubuque], (90,000 metro) on the Mississippi where Iowa meets Illinois and Wisconsin, is Iowa's oldest city. It is home to a ton of beautiful architecture, four private colleges, a far-reaching ELCA Lutheran seminary, and the Smithsonion affiliated National Mississippi River Musem and Aquarium.  Eastern Iowa's topography is for the most part very rolling farmland, with the exception of the hillier Iowa river valley, Cedar river valley, and the bluffs and hills skirting the whole eastern border along the Mississippi.  The northeast corner of the state is all bluffland, home to small town Decorah and reputed Luther College.

Western Iowa:  The vast majority of Iowa west of I-35 is flat farmland with the exception of the very westernmost strip.  [Sioux City] on the Missouri river (the western border) is a good sized city with nice amenities and lots of historyt.  [Council Bluffs] is the largest suburb of Omaha, just across the river in Nebraska.  The Iowa Great Lakes region contains many large lakes, most notably lake Okoboji, one of only three blue water lakes in the world.  The Loess Hills state park runs along the whole westernmost strip of the state, and offers lots of hilly hiking and some of the state's largest forests.

Iowa's motto should be "Iowa: Not as bad as you picture it."Pretty much the shit.  Make sure you're clear on the fact that the word "the" is in there, or else you'll get the meaning all wrong.  Iowa is home to the three million nicest people in the United States, probably in the world.  A leader in education, and home to some of the most beautiful scenery into the world.  It's a traquil beauty, and if you're into that, you'll love Iowa.  And if you're not into that, you can go take California or wherever you're from and fuck it.a farming state that isnt a bunch of dumb farmers thats [montana]A state that quietly grows corn and takes care of its own affairs. Residents think Des Moines compares to New York.People who dont live in Iowa refer to Iowa is full of corn and farmers. Its full of things pretty much from other states. 3 million awesome people live there. And its probably 3 million people you would never forget because they are so nice. Iowa is also one of the most beautiful places to live and only cool people can live in Iowa. Because Iowa is THE SHITT. Also home to the best college football team the IOWA HAWKEYES!The greatest state in the Union with education, and the ability to function with agriculture and good morals,When western civilization comes crashing down around you other 49 inferior states (Illinois is ok).BEST State in the entire united states of america!

Most, cocky dumbasses hate on iowa, and say that all there is is corn.. Thats completley wrong! EVERY state has agriculture and just about every state grows corn and has corn fields.
So what if iowa has corn, that dosnt mean thats the only thing to do!

Iowa is the best! Our hot chicks and all of our sports teams..

Iowa will fuck up anyone who tries to talk shit on us! were no pussys, we will fight any mother fucker who tries to hate on us!

Iowa has the best state fair too! The IOWA State Fair is possibly the best state fair in all of the US.

We have everything, Demo Derbys, Mudding, So much shit, youd just have to come here and check it out!State in the midwest, mostly farmland, but has a fantastic balance of rural, suberban, and highly populated areas. It is named after the Soux indian name meaning land between 2 rivers(missouri, Mississippi). Produces more corn and pork than any other state, and is not home to a bunch of hicks. in fact Iowa has the highest % of leteracy in the United states. statisticly its largest city, Des Moines, is in a perfect location for trade because it lies on interstate 35 and interstate 80, 2 of the buisiest highways in the US. however, because of Chicago's close proximity there isnt quite as many large factorys as there should be. Iowa is a beautiful state with hilly reigons in the east and hundreds of rivers and streams. The people are known for being friendly, usually hard working, and down to earth.

***to readers in the Northeast and california specificly***
No, just because someone lives in Iowa does not mean that they live on a farm. enough said. and another thing, stop mistaking Iowa for Idaho and Ohio. yes, they do sound the same but seriously, get it right its not that hardWhat the hell is this
I - Idiots

O - Out

W - Wondering

A - Around
shit?
We're the smartest state in the U.S!
For Christ's sake, stop your bitching about our "terrible driving" and go to New York, give me a review about their shitty driving.

God damn, Iowa has some of the nicest people, and there isn't corn EVERY WHERE.
To be honest, there isn't even as much corn as you think there would be, there are more cities than corn.

Plus, if you hate Iowa then promise me you'll never eat corn and or barilla noodles again.
So, all you more suberban suburban states can suck it because Iowa is the shit!A state full of beauty and 3 million of the nicest people in the universe. Also a pioneer in education, with the Iowa Test of Basic Skills and ACT being based in Iowa City. Is home to a ton of natural beauty: Ledgers State Park near Boone, the Des Moines, Missouri, and Mississippi Rivers, as well as numerous forests and woods. Tends to be judged by people who have never visited it.Place of extreme weather.A state of the south-central United States. It was admitted as the 28th state in 1845. Explored by the Spanish in the 16th and 17th centuries, the region became a province of Mexico in the early 19th century. Texans won their independence in 1836 after a gallant but losing stand at the Alamo in February and a defeat of Santa Anna's forces at the Battle of San Jacinto (April 21). Denied admission as a state by antislavery forces in the U.S. Congress, the leaders of Texas formed an independent republic that lasted until 1845. Austin is the capital and Houston the largest city. Population: 17,059,805. 

The Lonestar State, The State that still believes that criminals should be punished, Home of the Wataburger, home of Southern Hospitality, HTown, And Everythang thats bigger and better.

AND NO!! We Dont all walk around with cowboy hats and boots, and we're all not rednecks....for that...see oklahoma.The best Mexican food. Dr. Pepper on tap. Beautiful ladies. Awesomeness everywhere you turn. The best fucking place on earth. Move there now!the only state in the union that can fly its flag at the same height as the american flag.....
and the only reason texas doesnt fall into the gulf of mexico... is because oklahoma sucksHome to Dr. Pepper, several modern and well respected singers, activists, and the like, Sam Houston, and other great men and women before him, numerous plantlife and animals, and a few horrid idiots who give the rest of us a bad name-ie: George Bush.The biggest and baddest state of them all(15 states can be put into Texas and we'd still have 1000 miles left) where everything is bigger and much better than places such as California. Home of a Ranch bigger than Rhode Island,the home of trunk poppin, Dr.Pepper,home of the first word spoken from the moon which was Houston,home of swangin on 84's and vogues, chopped and screwed music, SA Town, D Town, and H Town which are all 3 in the top 10 most populated cities in the U.S.
The Lone Star State was the only state that was its own country, and the only state worthy of even making a definition of. 


If you aint a Texan, you wish you were.The greatest state everOkay.
I was born and raised in Houston.
So lets tell the truth.
-The weather in Texas changes very rapidly, and we get a bit of everything, except snow. That doesn't come around very often.
-We don't get married to our sisters or even distant cousins. A shock. I know. If you want to see some of that go to Oklahoma.
-Not everyone here talks with a distinct country accent.
You have to go to the smaller towns for that. Lufkin, Etoile, Waco, etc. It all depends on what area of Texas you were born in. People move here from New York and California all the time, and we don't sound any diffrent.
Our slang is the only true thing that seperates us.
-Yes, we have racism here. Just like any other state, but it's not as bad as people make it sound. The Africans, Mexicans, and Orientals, etc. out number us by more the 50%.
-Taking hits to our pride by informing us we cuss to much (yes, 'cuss') is low. We cuss just as much as anyone in California, or Florida would.
-No one walks around here in in full cowboy uniform. So if you think we do, maybe you should visit before opening your mouth.A state in the southern USA. Its in the south. There are billboards about Jesus. One can buy [waffles] there.The best damn state in the country!  That's all you need to know.The greatest and most popular sport in history with more than 5 times the TV audience of the next most popular (cricket - every radio and TV in the sub-continent is permanently tuned to Pakistan/India cricket matches - that's a big audience).

Only Americans call it 'soccer' owing to their vast ignorance of what goes on outside their national boundaries and the misnomer which has them thinking than a corruption of rugby, with all the danger and most of the skill removed can also be called 'football'. 

'The Beautiful Game' can be played anywhere, on almost any surface, by any number of players, for almost any length of time. And is. There is no country on earth that doesn't play. It has inspired more passion, more courage and more excitement than any other sport in history and dwarfs everything else.When a girl is playing footsie with you, and her foot travels up to your crotch.A name given to two different sports in which America and the rest of the world use to waste their lives away constantly arguing over which is better. Honestly, I'm an American. And I love the game of American football. But notice how I haven't said that I hate football (aka soccer). In fact, I love that sport, too. I just totally suck at it. Haha. C'mon, be real ya'll. Both games are cool. Even rugby too. It's cool. I have no idea how to play it, but I enjoy trying. It's all preference. For all ya'll that say football is whack cause we wear padding, go ahead and say whatever the fuck you want to say. That padding protects us so we can stay a little safer to enjoy the game a little longer. I don't care if I don't use it, I've tackled mofos twice my size without any padding on. The point I'm trying to make; All three games are great. They all require stratedgy, strength, speed, and endurance. So just shut the fuck up, grab the ball that suits you, and play your damn game already. You got that? Kay, just helping out. I'm just a 15yr old from a small town. Yeah, yeah... What do I know? Honestly? I know it's fucking pointless for ya'll to fight over sports. So just save your shit for someone who's still too much of a punk to simply enjoy a game of American football, football, or rugby. Peace people! Damn. Haha.Football - Only the best damn sport ever. Played with a round ball and feet. However, Americans tend to mistake it for American Football (which should truthfully be called tackleball for all that matters).Also Known As the BEAUTIFUL GAME. A real sport played with your FEET and an actual round BALL, hence the name FOOTBALL. This term should never be used to refer to our silly american game of putting on 30 pounds of armor and carrying a cone shaped piece of rubber while trying not to be touched by other guys. You'll note the lack of definitions calling this silly game football. And there is a reason for that. Some silly americans give us a bad name by not noticing what is going on in the rest of the world and don't realize that there was already a real sport called football when we made up our game, but everyone else in the world knows whats up.
P.S. Please, if you are American please stop saying the S word (s****r)and saying that our american game is better than real football. If you are not american just know that not all of us are confused faggots.A lovely game that alot of people play.
Also the most importmant sport in the world.
Very famous, but also fun for people who like football.
If you dont play football yet, i would say:
Give it a try!

Ofcourse if you start at older age, you wont get as good as Ronaldo, Messi, ...
But doesnt matter, its just for fun! ( Mostly )A variety of games that which Europeans and Americans tend to argue over pointlessly till the end of time as to which version is "right" never minding the fact that due to Cultural Mutation different words can mean different things in other places
Typically Americans profess love for the version that involves padding and an ovoid ball in which the point of the game is to move the ball ten yards down the field at a time through either rushing or passing before passing into the plain of the "End Zone" placed at either ends of a 100 Yard Field to score points
Europeans tend to extol the virtues of a much simpler sport that only requires a pair of goals placed at either end of a field and is played with a checkered Spherical BallOK, here goes... slowly:
The word describes a very populare game, which is played all over the world.
The word consists of two parts, which quite accurately descibes the game:
1) Foot
2) Ball

Part 1) Foot. This means that the foot is the main body part involved when playing this game.
Part 2) Ball. This means that the game is played with a spheric (globe-shaped) object.

This definition seems to be understood all over the world, except in the US, where they have misunderstood both parts of the word. Instead of using their feet, they mainly use their hands. And, instead of using a ball, they use an egg-shaped object.The round form of the drug Zanax that also comes in another form called [sticks] this form is in the shape of a football.A place on urbandictionary.com where obnoxious [eurofags] bitch about how Americans call football soccer and vice versa.A tongue of which the user speaks of something the complete opposite of what the user means. It often has the best comedic value.the bastard stepchild of ironyYour body's natural defense against stupid.A word that gives you the possibility to play with your imagination when asked stupid questions.Something that nobody on the internet can ever recognize.God's gift to man.
Incredibly humourous if used correctly.Noun.  A very British form of humour which derives laughs from saying something while really meaning something else.  Often (though not always, contrary to popular belief) used in scathing remarks.

The word 'Sarcasm' is derived from a Greek word meaning 'tearing flesh', which is why sarcastic vegetarians are so ironic.

See also [irony].The ability to insult idiots without them realizing it.A verbal reflex against stupidity. In my opinion one of the best types of humour.When one says something, but usually means the opposite.
Used sometimes in order to belittle someone and make them seem retarded... or equally to amuse and impress them with your mind. Indeed.Humorous name for oral sex.To drink an entire beverage in one goplace where brain livesOral sex, head.The nickname for members of the Phi Kappa Sigma fraternity.Another word for a female sucking cock. " Oh baby, give me some skull!!" It's the same thing as saying give me some head, or give me some brain. Cock-sucking words are great!!what the hardcore kids give instead of head.

see [skull fuck].to give or recieve oral sexTo bash another in the head,Created in an attempt to imagine what in the world someone could have going on in their head when they say or do something absolutely ridiculous/ illogical/ or straight up retarded. This person must be lacking a brain in their head i.e having nothing more than a flesh covered skull resting on their neck. Skull.A coat that makes you invisibleOne who lacks the skill to contribute balanced team work in an MMO. Also known as train mobber, skill-less peon and fearless noob.Cloak is another way of leaving without anyone else knowing.to smoke marijuana.To have sex, or to [fuck]. In the context of the vagina's ability to envelope, engulf or cover the penis like a piece of clothing. Perhaps a term originating from Canada.an extremely beautiful women/girl who everyone loves and will never forget. she has many friends and people feel they can always go to her for help, no matter what the situation is. cloaks is a great listener and speaker, she is also very creative and imaginative. She tends to be very artistic and athletic. Cloaks enjoys acting, dancing and singing, she is also very good at them. Cloaks is also a great lover in the bedroom, Every man thinks she is irresistible and falls in lover with her at first sight.a super gay homofag queer fairy buttpiratea friend or aqauntancethe result unprotected [sex] of a male and a female of the same species; also can be known as [offspring] and [brats]things that interupt you while your banging you wife.Anyone below the age of 18 (or 21, in some circles.) Don't listen to the idiotic fools who hate on little kids because they think it's "hip and cool".The stuff that gets shot all over the place during sex.the worst STD you can get.1.Something REALLY old people desire to be when their backs start breaking and their hearing and eyesight get poor.Krazy Individuals Destroying Societywhat teenagers claim they are notA baby goatThe word people use when you've done something that isn't technically "bad" or "wrong" but they still don't like it anyway and expect you to conform to their personal tastes.What your mom says when she catches you masturbating.The current euphemism for "wrong" or "bad." It is supposed to sound more objective than "wrong" and "bad," but it is not.putting it simply, not [appropriate]the [definition] of [urban dictionary]not suitable or proper in the circumstances. Action could be used in a talking, visual, or sexual manner.In high school settings, short skirts, low cut tops, see through clothing and skin tight jeans.  The student handbook says not to wear this, but many girls still wear it anyway to look skanky.The act of saying something irrelevant to the topic or becoming mad feisty with another person without an apparent reason. Usually accompanied with the action of standing up and pointing your hand down to the person it pertains to.The word that used to actually mean something, but doesn't mean anything anymore.To [curse] or '[cuss]'. Swears are considered inappropriate to use in public places, but are less offensive than other profanities. These '[bad word]s' are often referenced by pre-adolescents by their first letter (the 'f' word, the 's' word, even 'h-e-double-hockey-sticks').Any word that a person says when they can't think of anything intelligent to sayTo verbally abuse, or to rape an object with hatred wordsWords that people get offended by for some unexplained reason.when something is weird or funny and you sont have anything to say, you just point and say swear! swear this, omg swear that.

or it can be used like the world "seriously"Swear is used often for cursing someone, often with any consequences.

Perfect swearing language: Russian language is also the 5th officially used language over the world, aside English or Spanish. Russian language has more swear words in them, than any other language.

According to the infamous Taboo vocabulary, you can literally talk and swear in Russian and make lines, that make sense.Word that makes your sentence mean something, and actually prove a point.cannot really be defined but in terms to understand it can be understood as being dumb, stupid, retarded, saying something that is absurd.(verb) when someone thinks they're SO much better than others; someone who is conceited and vain, and definately wants others to notice.[fuck]
[ass]
[damn]
[hell]
[shit]
[bastard]
[bitch]
[crap]
All [racist] words.When someone else gets hurt.1. Something that causes you to laugh
2. A person who isn't quite rightA way of describing the girl you really like, either to said girl or your friends, without hinting too much. Either used by shy men who have a hard time admitting they really like someone or describing the girl you like to your friend that proclaims himself the matchmaker or love finder (yes, this is a stereotyped friend that every bro has, you may even be this person - if so, you have learned the secret code of bro hinting (ha, and you only thought girls spoke in hint))When someone else gets hurt.The only part of a newspaper worth looking at.  Located beside or near the crossword puzzles and cryptoquote.  Famous funnies include Garfield, Family Circus, Andy Capp, and Peanuts.Makes you laugh, oddA plural exclamation of extreme humourosity.  

OR

When followed by a question mark, a needy request to find out whether a joke has been accepted or not.The fact that you're wasting time looking up "funny".Definitions on urbandictionary tagged with 'funny', usually aren't.If you have to look up funny your probably a fag.Big
Gigantic
HugeA compliment- referring to either muscles or more commonly, the mail genitalia. Also associated with terms such as "biggie" or "bigs". Add "particularly", "fairly", or "rather" for added enjoyment.Something of excessive size.  Normally associated with [heavy] as well.the state of the penis when arousedone thousand United States dollarsa thousand dollars - they say it all the time in the Sopranosaka, huge, masssiv, ownageIn sarcasm, to refer to something as unworthwhile, lacking merit or otherwise derogatory.

Can be used with prefixes "fairly" and "particulary" for added effect.

See also: [small]Really good, excellent. Used by DJs and dance music fans to describe a track.When you are 'avin' it in a collosal fashion. One size fits all. It is possible to say "how are you avin' it?" as this means the same thing due to the fact that there is only one size to 'ave' itA good fun alternative to life.crack, in CD-ROM form.The most highly addictive game ever played. It will consume your soul and poison your water supply.A highly entertaining mmorpg that is played by a wide variety of people. some get addicted to it like its crack cocaine, and some only play it a few times a month. The level of addiction all depends on the person playing it.The world's most effective form of birth control.A computer game whose participants apparently don't know how to correctly make words plural.

Hint for WoW players: it doesn't involve an apostrophe.Taken mistakenly as a peer to EverQuest or EverQuest II, it is an entertaining game in which a player learns how to cooperate as a team, and harnesses competition, unlike EverQuest II. The irony behind half of the definitions under this category is this: If you'd read the back of the box, you would realize that it states "even if you only have a couple of minutes, World of Warcraft's superior quest system offers quick gameplay." The sad truth is that people don't want to accept the fact that many of the players on this game have lives, jobs, spouses, ect. They see that it is an MMORPG, and automatically assume that it's a parallel to EQ and EQ2.A game were nobody but the company taking your money wins. Often replaces one's social life.A game that manages by some divine power to completely waste your life and lets you have fun while doing so.World of Warcraft- WoW is kind of like smoking. You don't see what all the fuss is about in the beginning, until one of your friends gives you a free taste. Still, you can't see how addicting it is until you have tried it a few times. Then you start buying it, and using it by the bundle, and you can't seem to stop. You'll do anything just to get a few good hours in with your favorite pasttime. You slowly start to lose touch with former friends and family, and meet lots of strange new people with a similar addiction. Prolonged use can lead to death. It's very difficult to get out of your system, you must rely on the strangth of others, for your willpower has ben sapped.
General Surgeons Warning- Not intended for oral or anal use. WoW shouldn't be used if you suffer from seizures or are an expectant mother. Side effects include obsession, nausea, vomiting, and pink eye. Ask you doctor before using.Somebody who finds great pleasure in the art of Computer Programming.

Synonymous with: Hacker, ProgrammerThe low end of the scale as far as [software engineers] go.Slang word, used by idiots, for the term 'programmer'. Often used by communities for Private Servers. There are related words such as 'Code' or 'Coding'.a bitchy old, pregnant man with a beer belly. not just old but he ancient, he was in the same class as jesus when they were kids.short for code infraction, used at [Delbarton], get three and you're strongly encouraged to leave the school.Fake Fag Slang for ProgrammerJail guard, cop, security guard, etc.
Someone with power over you in a controlled surroundingswhen you lose your virginity or just has sex and you can't say it out loud you say you wore a "blue shirt"an extremely hot guy with a nice bodyA huge spokkerjones that will never know the embrace of a womanThe opposite of a Red Shirt. A character in a fictional series that will simply not die, regardless of fans hating them or the amount of injuries they sustain. Some true Blue Shirts even die and are resurrected through some means, just to spite the viewers.The opposite of a Red Shirt. A character in a fictional series that will simply not die, regardless of fans hating them or the amount of injuries they sustain. Some true Blue Shirts even die and are resurrected through some means, just to spite the viewers.The opposite of a Red Shirt. A character in a fictional series that will simply not die, regardless of fans hating them or the amount of injuries they sustain. Some true Blue Shirts even die and are resurrected through some means, just to spite the viewers.Someone under the 25th percentile for stature for their age, sex, and country.
(5'7" and under for men and 5'2" and under for women in the US)what i am.1.) noun, A cigarrette, having been previously smoked, but not completely, suggesting the later use and finish of said cigarette.The small coffee size at Starbuck's; the only size on the menu there that makes any sense (et al [Tall], [Grande], [Vente]).Comfy and easy to wear.Military and prison adjective for describing someone nearing the end of their tour of duty, enlistment or incarceration.  A [short-timer] is someone who has less then 90 days to serve.  A Korean War veteran told me these terms were in wide use in the late 1940s; they have been in continuous wide use in the military since then.outta luckto be not tall. under 5" tallsnoun; used by a third party person to express when somebody has insulted or humiliated another personShort was used long before there were compact cars.  It goes back to at least the Forties on the Southside of Chicago.  It means ANY car.  It was from the vernacular of hotrodders and black gangsters. It probably derives from "hot short", which evolved to "hotwire" ... a car.1. The Good Part - The woman you marry and live with for the rest of your life.

2. The Bad Part - The woman you marry and live with for the rest of your life.extreme hardcore version of a girlfriendThe beautiful, inteligent, classy and fulfilling companion of a man that is wise enough to notice such qualities. Usually despised and hated on by the [baby momma].A prostitute with a life-long contract to a single client.A woman that a man is married to.The person that is there for you whenever you need them, the person that makes you want to be better, the person that you love and cherish forever.

(Hint: getting married to a woman you don't love isn't a good idea, don't do it.)w.i.f.e.
wash, iron, fuck, ect.The reason I drink so much.The name of someone that is on a vendetta to make you regret ever choosing her as a partner.term used in reference to the woman in which a man is the most emotionally involved with & who he feels the most obligation toward. she typically has characteristics which would make her a desirable long-term partner.The cause of, and solution to all life's problems.Any of a class of chemical compounds having the general formula ROH, where R represents an alkyl group and -OH a hydroxyl group. Most commonly refers to ethanol, which you can drink to forget how much your life sucks, and methanol, which you can drink when you remember.Liquid Panty RemoverA substance found in beer (except American beer) and several other beverages that makes you excessively happy, sad, belligerent or horny.  It allows white men to dance and ugly men to get laid (when given to their victim).Alcohol. What most of your university/college life will revolve around.The buffer between reality and a good night. Has been known to make people seem more attractive and make obviously stupid idea's seem like good sense.The antidote to reality.The answer to the question "What made you move to North Dakota?"1) The active ingredient in alcohol is ethyl alcohol, which is produced by yeast. Working much like [ether], alcohol puts the brain to sleep. Alcohol functions as a depressant to the central nervous system and slows down body functions. In large amounts, alcohol causes sedation, intoxication, unconsciousness, and possible death. Aside from significant negative physical consequences, chronic use of alcohol can lead to physical and psychological addiction. 

2) Colorless, volatile liquid obtained by distillation and fermentation of carbohydrates (grain, molasses, potatoes [irish]). Alcohol is antiseptic and cooling but is also very drying to the hair and skin; care should thus be taken not to use too much. 

3) This constituent of wine is a natural by-product of fermentation. It is one of the main pillars of perceived flavor, the others being "Acid", "residual Sugar" (and/or "Glycerin") and "Tannin". The presence of these components define a wine that has "good balance". For tablewines the wine label must, by law, state the alcohol content of the wine within the bottle, usually expressed as a percentage of the volume. Table wines do not usually exceed 14% alcohol content - (11% to 12.5% is generally considered the optimum amount) - although a few, such as Zinfandel, can go up to a 17% level. Sweet dessert wines fall in the same range. Fortified wines - (eg: Sherry, Port etc) - range from 17% to 21% alcohol content. 

4) Ethanol or ethyl alcohol (C2H5OH), the liquid produced from sugar by fermentation that can make you drunk 

5) A chemical compound formed by the action of yeast on the sugar content of grapes during fermentation. Most wines have between 7 and 25 percent alcohol, which gives wine is vinosity. If wine has too much alcohol for its body weight, it is unbalanced, and will taste uncharacteristically heavy or hot. The quality will be noticeable in aroma and aftertaste. 

6) A general class of hydrocarbons that contain a hydroxyl group (OH). The term "alcohol" is often used interchangeably with the term "ethanol," even though there are many types of alcohol. (See Butanol, Ethanol, Methanol.)liquid stamina in a bottleA holiday that no Black people I know celebrate.
Well , one year my Uncle tried to , but we all laughed at him.A holiday developed by a Dr. Maulana "Ron" Karenga, a black militant, Marxist, and convicted felon.
Just five years after this, he was convicted of torturing two black women to death. 

Observed from December 26 to January 1, Kwanzaa is based on a mixture of East African harvest rituals, called "first fruits" by Karenga and 1960's radicalism. This is in spite of the fact most slaves came from West Africa.

Viewed as an "alternative" to Christmas, it, nonetheless, is based on race, and not in faith.1)A made up piece of shit holiday steeped in all the deepest traditions of Sweetest Day  or Secretary's Day. 

2)A holiday for African Americans that no African American observes or understands.It's the right-on power handshake of the 1990s.  Yet another politically correct tactic to get whites to pay attention to non-whites, primarily blacks.  It's a fabricated holiday based on race, invented by a convicted felon, which is too third world for most black Americans, too jewish for black muslims, and too stupid for everyone else.  Now that's a fine example for the ghetto children of the world!Kwanzaa is a Counterfeit made up, holiday started by a black convicted kidnaper, rapist, Karenga, whose criminal record includes having been convicted and jailed on charges of assault and false imprisonment for the torture of two black women.

There is no nothing ethnically African about it, it is all fake andObviously a manufactured holiday created by African Americans in the late 1980s/early 1990s, when the fad of that time was to be "African", which is why Eddie Murphy's "Coming to America" was a blockbuster hit in 1988, when in reality it was a [racist] shit movie that made fun of people from Africa.A fake and gay holiday made up by some random black guy in the 60's.A popular file sharing program for African-Americans.An African-American holiday that celebrates the deeds of a brave little boy who saved his village from man-eating tigers by having them follow each others tails until they turned into butter.
Flapjacks with loads of butter are served at the holiday meal.The black [Hanukkah]God's gift to the world.  Brings peace when used wisely.An ancient plant, refrenced biblically {the Holy Herb}.

Gets you rocked, and has been proven to be less harmful then alcohol or cigarettes. It has never been conclusively proven to have caused a single death in the entire world, ever.

Easily avalible in most forign countries, and Alaska, where everybody grows it anyway.

Can be purchased by the (if you're lucky) gram, or (not so lucky) by standard measurements. (1/8th of an ounce, 1/4er, 1/2, ect. An eigth usually weighs 3.75, depending on the weight of the baggie and weather or not you're buying from an asshole. There are dealers, and then there are professionals.) usual prices for the sticky-icky-icky (Not that cheap mexican shite, but tanqueray-and-chronic-chronic) can run from $30 to $50 and even $60 an eigth. I even heard it ran eighty an eigth out on Kodiack Island, but you gotta look at the market from a local poiont of view.

It's easier to get then liquor if you're under 21. 

It will not cause you to shoot your friend with the gun you found in your parent's bedroom while they weren't home. (That's shitty parenting, folks, not the pot!)

It's healthier then Xanax if you're just looking to ignore your troules for a few hours.

A biennial Youth Risk Behavior Survey, released May 21 by the U.S. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention stated that more of america's youth smoke pot then cigarettes.

It's a step in the right direction, folks!the answer to all in this horrible world of oursmarijuanaweed not a drug!the dried leaves and flowering tops of pistillate hemp plant that yeild cannabin and are sometimes smoked in cigarette form for its intoxicating effect   

aka

fucking awesomeweed is marijuana, stupid. here's some names i've collected
weed
chron or chronic
dro (hydroponics)
sticks and stems (shitty weed)
sticky-icky (dripping with THC)
mauie wowie
jamaican red hair
blueberry
strawberry
AK-47
kind bud
snowflake
skunk and super skunk
mary jane
MJ
grass (no one calls it that anymore)
ganga (pronounced GAHN-JAH)
herb or herbal
dank
trees
mids or middies (average weed)
damn, there's a ton more, i just can't remember from smoking all of the above.a beautiful thing if used properly. all it does is make you happy.an essential substance in most people's lives.A green plant god put on the earth for me and you.Type of [Christianity] that places authority in the Bible as the infallible word of God. This does not necessarily mean a literal interpretation of everything in the Bible (cf. [creationism]). Not to be confused with [evangelism], which means something entirely different.A generalization of multiple groups of Protestant Christianity. It's not actually a denomination, but a category that churches of many denominations fall under, ranging from some baptist churches in the south to non-denominational churches in the north and along the coastline. Using that criteria, the majority of protestant Christians in the US probably fall under the "Evangelical" category. Despite popular belief, they are real, tangible people, who are just as capable of being discriminated against as the people who they are frequently (and usually, falsely) accused of being discriminated against. An Evangelical Christian is best characterized as someone who wants to spread the Gospel of Christ by being living examples to the people around them. Real Evangelicals do not believe in forcing people who are not Christians to act like Christians, because they believe that Christ his followers to only come of their own free will.

Evangelical Christians should NOT be confused with "fundamentalists," a term that has come to mean someone who is far more mental than fun. Evangelicals tend to believe in more literal interpretations of the bible, but that does not mean that they are against scientific study or using critical thinking (after all, how can you understand how the Bible applies to your life without critical thinking?). Also, they do not want religion to control the government, because as [Martin Luther] figured out during the dark ages, religion controlling government is actually a cheap disguise for the government controlling religion. True Evangelicals want freedom of religion, and that includes the freedom to share the gospel with others.

Evangelical Christians are a large, and unfortunately, misunderstood part of the global population. They are constantly stereotyped as being hateful, bigoted people, even though many of them have done many great works for bringing rights to people and sending help to places. Evangelicals want to change their communities for the better by changing the people, one person at a time. Maybe if people came to realize that the large majority of Evangelical Christians are actually legitimately nice people who enjoy life and are happy to share their happiness with others, they'd realize that the mainstream perception of "evangelical" is merely an aggressively propagated stereotype that aims to strip Christians of their legitimacy as human beings.Comes from the word 'evangelism', which means spreading the good news about jesus christ.

So inturn evangelical is living your life in the way that god wants you to, so that others may see you and see how god has worked in your life. It is not a way of forcing a religion on someone.

It can also mean to speak to people about jesus.A sect of christianity that is full of mindless, brainwashed followers who spend their entire life in misery when they aren't spreading the gospel. The whole sect is full of middle class/rich white folks who want to go to church to be entertained by crying, hysterical preachers and find new prejudices to be in support of. They believe that their religion is the only way of life and refuse to accept any other ways.  There is no 'conversation' with evangelicals...they only convert. BEWARE.According to society, the only demographic that should feel ashamed of themselves when campaigning or when casting a vote.The Andromeda Strain of Christianity. Often called "conservative Christianity", when in reality it is a very modern radical version. Evangelicalism has no true theology, substituting apologetics for theology, and far more concerned with what will draw in people than in actual beliefs.

Evangelicals are often mistaken for Protestants, however the two groups a quite different. Protestantism is based on the idea that people can read and understand the Bible for themselves, without need of a mediator. In Evangelicalism, your minister is the final authority of what the Bible means.

Evangelicals gather to worship in thousands or tens of thousands in the belief that their minister is an intermediary to God, and that it is very important to get their religion directly from him.Describes Christians who try to uphold the tenants of the Protestant Reformation, but without all that courage, conviction, and critical-thinking baggage that got their 16th and 17th century forefathers burned at the stake.  Also known as "Evan-jelly-fish" due to apparent lack of brain and spine.christians who like to argue and force their ideas of religion on others. sometimes resulting in violence and always voice raising.Modern day nazi's. They brainwash there followers using group hysteria, which Hitler used. They try to convert everything that moves by forcing people to beleive what they think. They consider themselves an army of god, ready to fight for his bidding.

They are also hypocrite's. E.G. Ted haggard , who is one of the pastor's at a mega church i colorado, paid a male prostitute to butt fuck him after condeming gays and homosexual activity. He asked forgiveness and was forgiven and "cured", but if any one else who wasnt evangelical did that they would not be forgiven ( like Bill Clinton).1. an adjective synonymous with "mindless."

2. a noun synonymous with "fucking idiot."a broke ass mutha fucka who relies on crack to sustain daily life.  Often seen running at full speed for a multitude of reasons.People of any race that live to hit that nasty-ass rock. Usually real thin, dirty and smell like warm trash and/or spoiled milk, fecal matter, rotting corpses etc. Frequently bobbing, weaving, twitching and glitching. Large periodic spurts of energy. Always got something for sale or knows somebody that has just what you need. The most severe crackheads can be viewed in the wild missing standard items such as shoes, socks and teeth. If you come into contact with a crackhead it is suggested to secure all valuables and avoid any physical contact or direct contact with their breath (could cause dizzyness and/or vomitting).  If you lose property to a crackhead, accept the loss. If you find yourself chasing a crackhead, accept the loss .. crackheads are fast, they be gittin somewheres.. You ain't catching no crackhead...1.a person on crack
2.a moron1. one who does excessive amounts of crack.

2. one who acts as though they do excessive amounts of crack.Someone who smokes crack and will lie cheat and steal from anyone to get a hit1.one who is highly addicted to the euphoria brought on by crack cocaine.
2. one who does stupid things.1. one who partakes in smoking crack cocaine.
2. One who can run like the wind when s/he believes that quazimotto is chasing him/her.
3. one who will try to sell thier dog on e-bay.
4. If you live in a hotel, have no food, are pregnant, and your only worry is when/how to score...you are a crackhead.
5. one who acts "crackish"
6. A Jarrod or an Izatt.
7. A "parent" of a Crack baby.
8. The person who robbed you.A crackhead is the lowest form of a drug user. They abuse the drug crack cocaine. They are often liars, traitors, and thiefs. 

Crackheads are often paranoid and fidgety. 

Crackheads can be anyone, any race, any gender.

Crackheads will sell everything and anything to fuel their addiction. 

Crackheads cannot be trusted. If you ever find yourself to a person who is a known crackhead, try to get away as fast as possible, otherwise you may lose valauble jewerly, wallet, etc. 

Unless you don't mind having any of your prized possessions disappear, it is not wise to let a crackhead into your home. Never leave a crackhead unnattended to, or you will find things mysteriously go missing. 

It is important to never let a crackhead get to you, don't ever let them get under your skin. You are the stronger person in the situation, unless you too are a crackhead.

Crackheads are pathetic.Somebody who does [crack] regulary and gets addicted. Thus becoming a crackhead.The lowest form of a drug-user.The infamous act of a girl getting fucked by a donkey cock, whilst paying gentlemen gather around and watch.as stated above, refers to a woman getting fucked by a donkey, often performed for the pleasure of refined gentleman.  

one variation (specifically found in tijuana) is a competition in which different whores fuck the donkey.  the depth to which they are penetrated is marked by tying a red ribbon (a la tony orlando and dawn) 'round the donkey's cock.  the girl who takes it the deepest wins (i guess?).A sex act involving a woman and a donkey in which the woman fornicates with said donkey, typically performed in rural Mexican cities.An act where a horny woman gets corn-holed by a raging horny assa show where a woman has sex with a jackass1. A form of entertainment most commonly associated with being presented in Tijuana, in which (usually) men pay to observe a male donkey have sex with a female human.

2. A popular Oregon radio show, broadcast from Eugene with a transmitter powerful enough to be heard even outside the state depending on how good the receiving radio is (Vancouver, WA is an example). Syndicated in Medford (south of Eugene) at night time, though the hours the show is actually done is 2-6 PM. Broadcast on 101.5 KFLY FM, the show plays little music compared to most FM radio, and is mainly composed of the two co-hosts Tanner and Drew sharing their often humorous opinions and satires of current events and people currently in the news; as well as other commonly done humor-based radio bits. They refer to their listeners as throbbits (from a pornographic parody of Lord of the Rings).a live show in which a woman has sex (oral, anal, vaginal) with a mule or donkey. they are usually found in seedy areas of border towns in Mexico.  yes they really do exist and aren't terribly hard to findSomething you really don't want to be a part of or see.Donkey shows usually take place in TJ.  It is when a donkey's penis penetrates a (sometimes kidnapped) women.an obscene performance in which a woman copulates with a [literal] jackassthe police (see also [fuzz station])Comes from the fact that a lot of police back in the 60's joined straight of the military and they brought with them the very short military haircut that gave them the appearance of fuzz on their heads. When they took their hats off, your first comment might be, hey look, it's the fuzz. It's a style of haircut that made wearing a police hat more comfortable and cooler to wear......still in vogue today and used by many police officers around the world.A slang word for the police used by poor greasers.the fuzz refers to the polices like [the heat] i think the word is derived from the police always being on your ass or in you face like [peach fuzz]The fuzz is a word used when your so frikkin high that when the cops come to bust your ass that u call them the fuzz because the crack and chron are blurring your vision.Means "son of" (hence all the English surnames like Fitzpatrick, Fitzhenry) but can also refer to an illegitimate child, a bastard, someone born out of wedlock etc.A nick name for someone with the last name Fitzpatrick or Fitzgerald.1. noun- full retard

2. verb- to instantaneously lose control of your bowels in an unannounced fashion. Usually resulting in going commando for the remainder of the day.

3. adj.- awesomer than everybody and everything around you.

4. adj- The inability to come up with a response to an insult, usually resulting in threats of sodomy.1.  A suitable name to dipsnap to.
2.  A kid who is popular because his name sounds cool if you say it loud enough.A boy who used to be hot, but glowed down a lot!When someone agrees to do something and changes their mind five seconds laterthe art of coordinating clothing and accessories with name brand shoesTo take your workload and pass it on to an unsuspecting co-worker.a cut on your thumb or a cut on any finger(V) Otherwise known as pulling a Terry Tate, to tackle a coworker in a surprising manner across a row of cubicles. The tackle might be as aggressive as a flying pile-driver or as subtle as kicking another's leg out from underneath him.Analagous to their malevolent movie counterparts, the modern-day Gremlin is most often found on weekends in between the hours of 1800 and 0400. When in its passive form, the Gremlin is most often a well-intentioned and meaningful contributor to society. However, when provoked (usually by means of an ex-girlfriend or obnoxious fool at the bar), the Gremlin first becomes forlorn and introspective, then mischevious, and in some cases violent.

If you encounter a fully manifested Gremlin, you are advised to stay clear (especially when the Gremlin is in a doorway). If you feel the need to intervene, it has been said a trip to Burger King can passify the creature.

The Gremlin will return to its natural state by morning, usually feeling embarassed and apologetic.1.) Little meshevious devils that cause problems with everything around you.
2.) Little red men with horns you see when you are stoned.
3.) Imaginary little devils you can blame shit on.A Gremlin is a woman who a man likes to fuck but doesn't want to go out past dark to eat with......because shes a beast to look at or emotionally unstable.The gremlin is a furry critter that will use her petit stature and nubile appearance to gain the trust of others. Upon making the mistake of trusting a gremlin, she will then lurk in dark corners and attack at any given moment. This evil hobbit will engage in acts of deceit and general tomfoolery as a means of social interaction. Characteristics of the gremlin will include:
-Rage blackouts
-Violent attacks from behind, especially on the knees
-Full speed bodychecks
-Stealing food from gardens
-The belief that she is average height, when she is in fact, gremlin height
-The use of such phrases as "frig-a-mug" and "go S a D"A drunk friend after midnight. You don't feed them.Girl doesn't get wet for you.Making weird or distractive noices revolving around food.
Being generally weird and always hungry and wanting foods such as chocolate or spaghetti bolognese!A small ginger creature, usually found in a darkened room eating ham sandwiches. She sleeps for most of her life and only wakes to scuttle to the kitchen to make a sandwich. Gremlins can be located in the London area and on a quiet night you can here the high pitch cackle when she is amused. By all means stay out of Gremlins way in the mornings.Your girls fucking clingy ass best friend. Have you ever wanted to do something with your girl but her clingy ass best friend is just jealous of you, and doesn't want your girl whom is her best friend doing something because she can't so she tells her not to and your girl listens to her? That right there is being a fucking GREMLIN! GREMLINS are needy as hell and their jealousy of you grows exponentially. You're basically fucked when it comes to gremlins...there's no cure to this shit.The small pieces of [weed] that sometimes don't get smoked because they got stuck to the top inside edges of your [bowl].What this fucking definition is, asshole.1. [n]  the action of attacking the enemy

2. [adj]  of an offensive substitute for inoffensive terminology; "`nigger' is a dysphemistic term for `African-American'"

3. [adj]  unpleasant or disgusting especially to the senses; "offensive odors"

4. [adj]  morally offensive; "an unsavory reputation"; "an unsavory scandal"

5. [adj]  causing anger or annoyance; "offensive remarks"

6. [adj]  for the purpose of attack rather than defense; "offensive weapons"
   
7. [adj]  violating or tending to violate or offend against; "violative of the principles of liberty"; "considered such depravity offensive against all laws of humanity"
   
8. [adj]  causing or able to cause nausea; "a nauseating smell"; "nauseous offal"; "a sickening stench"

 
 	Synonyms:	 	abhorrent, abusive, antipersonnel, assault(a), assaultive, attack(a), attacking(a), charnel, creepy, detestable, disgustful, disgusting, distasteful, dysphemistic, foul, ghastly, ghoulish, hideous, hit-and-run, horrid, horrific, incursive, insulting, invading, invasive, loathly, loathsome, marauding, morbid, nauseating, nauseous, noisome, objectionable, obnoxious, obscene, odoriferous, offence, offending, offense, on the offensive(p), opprobrious, outrageous, predatory, raiding, rank, repellant, repellent, repelling, repugnant, repulsive, revolting, scornful, scrimy, scurrilous, sepulchral, sickening, skanky, tip-and-run, unpleasant, unsavory, unsavoury, unwholesome, verminous, vile, violative, wicked, yucky
 
 	Antonyms:	 	defensive, euphemistic, inoffensive, savory, savoury, unoffending, ylbissopA highly subjective interpretation of something real, imagined, or interpreted as being demeaning; very often the use of complaint to attack someone while paradoxically assuming both authority and victimhood; the use of complaint as a sociopolitical weapon or vehicle to often unmerited benefit, privilege, or compensation.Describes a statement politically or ideologically inconvenient, esp. in the judgment of one having no knowledge of the matter at hand.  Often used to stifle further discussion or pander to the lowest common denominator.  Cf: [fair and balanced].What you see that you don't like when you look in the mirror.The act of attacking & destroying an enemy's self esteem; utilizing unconventional remarks, stirring the enemy's emotions making them unable to network an insult measuring to your ego. If done correctly, the enemy will leave in anger to cry or to write about it in their diary, resulting in a successful response: rage quitting.1. merely mentioning anything about your "lifestyle and/or preference to women"
2. reading a book for class that has the word gay on the cover(that in no way to sexuality)
3. watching a movie where a girl says she loves another girl in a friend way
4.anything having to do with gay rights1. To take a stance or position against a percieved [assault].

2. The quality of an [attack] used against an [opponent] or [enemy] during [battle].

3. To find an [opinion], [act], [object] or [situation] to be [detestable].ANYTHING. LITERALLY ANYTHING THESE DAYS. ANGSTY TEENS GET OFFENDED BY EVERYTHING. IT'S ANNOYING. TAKE A JOKE.a person on social media-especially ifunny-who hates on and/or reports fandoms, furries, bronies, emos, porn, lgbtq, and anything else they don't like. also known as a hater.having no shame.A person who has no shame in getting what they want...often on there knees for best resultswhen someone makes a really stupid mistake, normaly blondes (like me n terri)1) Short for the drug, Cocaine.
2) Short for the beverage, Coca Cola.An addictive soda.

An addictive drug.1. A popular short term for the popular soft drink Coca Cola.

2. A popular short term for the popular, a illegal, drug Cocaine.Any drink served in the SouthWhat I would live the rest of my life on if I had enough money1* soda
2* short for coca cola
3* cocaineA highly addicted substance that ravages both mind and body!

....also the name of a powdered narcotic.1. Hard arse stimulant.  White powder derived from the Coca plant, native of Sth. America.  Very expensive but in small quantities is a fine buzz...

2. Short for Coca Cola - essence of American capitalist pigdog.  Made from [bumsweat] and sugar.1.What kept Tony Montana standing in the last 10 minutes of "Scarface."

2.Warm, its the best rust remover on the planet. (Put a little Coke in a cup and put a nail or small piece of sandwich meat on top. In the morning, meat is gone, wipe off rust.)

3. More popular than you think. I mean cocaine.Always available at bars, both over the counter as a soft drink or mixer and everywhere from the guest lounge to the toilets.

Often the word media or media bar means coke freindly, due to the common opinion that any person working in the media profession is a coke user.One of the smartest medical dramas to ever have aired, House, M.D. features the maverick, anti-social doctor Gregory House (Hugh Laurie) who specializes in infectious diseases and does whatever it takes to solve the puzzling cases that come his way.  

A show that should rob this year's Emmys if not for its sheer quality then for Laurie's brilliant acting.n. a style of electronic music originating in the late 80's in the USA characterized by four-on-the-floor bpms between 110-140, synthesized melodies and bass lines.A slang word with a hundred different definitions, 90% that were made up on the fly here at urbandictionary.com, to the point where it could be substituted for so many words you have no idea what the f**k someone would be talking about if he/she used each and every one.probably one of the best medical dramas ever to hit television, features Hugh Laurie, who plays the anti-social, sarcastic, pain in the ass doctor, who specializes in recognizing infectious diseases. He and his team of doctors take on extremely hard cases, House usually ends being right about the disease at the end of the day.

This show is truly great and it murders Scrubs.Nothing more or less than the best TV show that ever was or ever will be. HOUSE FTW!!the MOST awesome show on television! (well, next to Scrubs) which stars the wonderful British actor, Hugh Lauire, as the genius, pain in the ass, Gregory House.1. (v) to consume a substantial quantity quickly, completely, and with purpose.
2. (v) to beat in competition.
3. (v) to dominate.Pronunciation  (hous)

House Music: The original electronic incarnation from disco. House typically runs around 120 beats per minute (BPM) and uses a 4/4 time sequence and an eight bar repeating cycle. The beat is maintained by a heavy kick drum that alternates in a 1-3 pattern with a high hat accent. Like its disco roots, house often features vocal choruses, real instrumentation, and a more traditional song structure.A fucking wooden or brick fucking place where you live eat and sleep in.A bigger older woman with sexual desires towards younger men. (Usually a housewife.)To run over on a football fieldA vehicle of a redneck, which he drives to a date with his girlfriend instead of carring grass for cows.another four-wheeled vehicle with a flat bed in the back used for storage of equipment, groceries, small recreational vehicles, tools, or extra people. The pickup truck (as previously described) is the most popular automobile among men.A large vechile presumably with a bed for hauling, moving, towing, or even storing what needs be.

The absolute worst thing a person could do to a truck would include the following (these are all sins of god, and you will be punished accordingly):
-lowering it 'til it's an inch or less from the ground
-adding neon lights
-adding a fuckin ricer exhaust system... which most of time would just include tips or some other retarded peice of chrome
-PUTTIN A FUCKIN SPOILER ON IT
-adding giant ass rims to it, then stretching these tiny ass treads over'em that look like they'll pop any second


A real fuckin truck would include the following:
-A "body-on-frame"
-A real fuckin engine, varies from size of the truck (ex. an S10 with a small block, a brand new giant Ram 2500 with a Cummins Diesel)
-Four wheel drive... because some of us have the balls to get off the blacktop, just for fun or required for certain jobs, which most of you BMW pricks would be afraid of, don't wanna raw up them soft hands
-bedliner

optional:
-a nice leveling kit and/or lift kit
-some differential lockers with some beefy axles
-winch
-good ol' 15"/16"/17" wrapped with some treads depending on what terrian you work/play in (crawlers, boggers, LT's, swampers, AT's, 32"-40", etc.)
-sway bars, roll bars
-engine upgrades

Trucks are great vehicles. They are designed to do things cars can't, and most of them are built solid like a rock. Last long. Work hard and play hard. Besides the MPG... why wouldn't you want a truck?The metal part underneath a skateboard that holds the wheels in place (kind of like an axle on a car).  Used for grinding (riding on rails or waxed services).They are the device that attaches the wheels to the [skateboard].When a person does something that you didn't expect or you are so amazed at what happend your speechless.Someone who draws negative attention by not having their shit together. Most commonly used in jail.a word to describe someone/things extreme greatness. it is also a multi use term and can mean anything. it also can be used as an action word.Connection, association, or interaction with a person/place/thing; usually used in a negative sense.The hair on the back of you neck that is nappy, un-tameableA woman's natural habitat.The room where grandma hides her shotgun shells.A mysterious place full of sharp, pointed objects, deadly gas-operated incinerators, things that go 'ping' and a big, cold wardrobe full of beer which is the only true incentive for entering the room in the first placeA nickname for the holdem hand ten three (T-3) offsuit, a term used by many prominent online poker players, and coined by the professional online poker player Jamie Armstrong, aka pokerjamersa word used to describe nappy-naps in the back of a females head...On the sitcom "Martin" he often uses this word to insult the character "Pam"...because her back edges are apparently nappy and rough...Where the goods are cooked, things are shipped/delivered, people get swerved, and basically all the dope shit happens. Sometimes referred to as the bakery.a sammich factorythe back of the nape. (usually used in the phrase nape of the neck).Afro-amerain women or southen women call it"The Kitchen"(Traditional) The place in a home where a woman belongssomething that happens when the condom breaks on prom nightThe worst STD ever.  Causes pain, poverty, and eighteen year of torture.Carrying developing offspring within the body.your end of life...

you are totally fucked.

OWNEDSupposed to be the happiest moment in a couples lives but the dumb asses who conceived by accident just ruin the definition.

Don't have sex until your ready for the consequences.The condition of being able to make twice as much money in the porn industry due to supply and demand.The blossoming of a new life...in your life.When are girl has a baby growing inside her! After she has had unprotected sex!This is what happens when a male and a female have sexual intercourse and the sperm fertilises one of the woman's eggs after ovulation.

Contrary to popular (male) belief, pregnancy is not the woman's fault, it takes 2 to tango if you know what I mean...

Women also do not get pregnant to 'trap' a man. Because if he was indeed worth holding onto, she would not need to get pregnant to keep him, nor would a rubbish guy stick around if he got a woman pregnant either. (See scum or coward)

Pregnancy is the aprox 40 weeks of gestation in which it takes a human being to develop and grow inside his or her mothers body before birth.

It is in 3 stages (known as trimesters)
Pregnancy is divided into three stages called trimesters, each of which lasts three months. The first trimester covers the first 12 weeks of your pregnancy. This stage is often the worst with morning sickness and fatigue as common symptoms.

The baby grows inside the uterus, gaining it's nutrition from the placenta and kept safe and protected by the amniotic sack.

The woman's body goes through serious changes both physical and mental.

The mental changes include, hormonal, she may feel depressed,anxious,happy and angry, her mood changes often, she is not going mad, she is just pregnant!

the physical changes include: her tummy growing (obviously)
her breasts growing and producing milk ready for the babies arrival, usually in later stages of pregnancy she may leak milk.
Her nipples will also swell and darken, her breasts will grow larger, she may also get other skin conditions depending on hormone levels.
Aside from good changes to her body she may also find her immune system is weak, leaving her susceptible to colds,flu and other virus' and infections. When a woman is pregnant, her immune system is in over drive to stop her body from rejecting the unborn baby.

Pregnancy can be both a wonderful and horrible experience for someone. (including the babies daddy who has to put up with a very hormonal pregnant lady)

And before any man can insult a pregnant woman let me just say, if you get a girl pregnant and blame her for it, she is not going to want or need you anyway, so don't think your so great :)
A baby growing up with one parent is better than a baby growing up with an asshole for a father.

Not all pregnancies end with a baby though.
Some women for what ever reason choose to terminate the pregnancy, this does not make a woman a bad person, If she is not ready or in a good position to have a child, or say she became pregnant after rape, then she may choose to abort. No one has the right to judge someone for terminating pregnancy. Abortion is neither right or wrong.
Some pregnancies also end in miscarriage, and some pregnancies are ectopic.

Pregnancy is a natural thing and without it the life of all species would cease to exist.1. A state a woman may find herself in after having unprotected sex with a man.  Involves a child growing within her body and can be discovered by the absence of menstruation.  May cause illness.

2. Bloated, held out, prolonged.

I'd also like to say something to all the men out there who think that getting a girl pregnant is a death sentence!
Being pregnant is a wonderful and painful experience that you'll never have, so just shut the hell up about your selfish views.  Women don't trap men by getting pregnant.  It's not their choice!The act of receiving a serious butt whoopin at the hands of a person or group of persons.A severe beating delivered with the hands and feet; a pummeling so bad, the recipient needs to use his health insurance; see [open a can of whup ass]A good, old-fashioned ass kickin',Assault by the police after being arrested1. To beat someone up very badly, to the point of them being on the ground. This can happen with a combination of the following:

* Punching
* Kicking
* Kicking [Balls]
* [Curbstomping]
* [Fist Fight]ing

After the victim is on the ground, various forms of abuse may happen. Beatdown is then concurred, and a broken limb is required before it's real beatdown.

2. Another way of expressing utter defeat of someone. Can be used in celebration or defeat.v. (1) to verbally berate into submission (publicly) (2) to physically rough up or convincingly administer authority over another person or thing (3) the exercise of legitimate authority, rules, or known customs which leaves a person or persons in a poor position and often disappointed.
n. the act of beating down (2) a disappointing and unexpected result to an attempted action1. A fistfight where the odds are stacked highly in one of the two participants favours, commonly resulting in broken bones and softening of the face.

2. The climax of a hardcore song, usually a down-tempo combination of palm muted open strings/extensive pinch harmonics and low end chords, where crowd participant's can quite simply unleash the beast on one another.

3. fucking awesome.To receive a BEAT DOWN would be equivalent to getting your ass seriously beaten by another person or persons; to have one's ass handed to them; to be "pounded into the ground" by someone who doesn't like you.the dance of the hardcore kid.... it is when the guitarist simply stums the D or C string open.....The act of pumbling, destroying, and smashing a disgusting creature, especially ostriches, salamanders, junebugs, armadillos, and orangutang. Beat downs are given if and only if the act of being crusty or ugly is committed. They are given very often and involve fists and feet, or anything wet.Yellow bread made from cornmeal ubiquitous in Southern cuisine; it is slightly sweet, and usually served with butter.A baked foodstuff for which the primary ingredient is maize, which many people call corn, a grain.  Tradition holds that the Pilgrims ate corn bread because it was a plentiful grain - and the only grain - readily available where they settled in Massachusetts.1. A food commonly eaten by big booty black bitches.

2. Ur ass cherry(virginity),A girl with an extremely large ass, this refers to the fact that she must "eat her cornbread" in order to obtain such a fine ass.Money a prostitute makes from performing anal sex acts, as in getting [cornholed].a staple in African-American cuisine, often served with greens, coated with yam juice.The most delicious bread on the planet that was invented by Indians and is made out of corn.A name that no one will take seriouslyReference to the song "No sex in the champagne room" by Chris Rock. In it he says "Cornbread. Ain't nothin' wrong with that." So this word means that someone is perfect and you can't find anything wrong with her, just like cornbread.An affirmative statement.  A word mumbled when in acquiescence with another.  Used in place of the words: agreed or indeed.

It can also be used in random outbursts when feeling elated or quirky.Where you sleep when you get your girlfriend mad; but not mad enough to be kicked out of the house.when a girl sits on your lap and subtly grinds your cock with her ass in public, pretending that shes not (like a couch dance)the second best thing to use next to the bed ;)One's system of morals or beliefsA piece of furniture more diverse than a coffee table.A word used to replace words such as "fuck", or "shit", and has multiple uses as saying "back off". Or it is a piece of furniture that is ussually sat on.referrers  to the "sit-able" [plateau] of an excessively [fat] [booty]couch - an offensive term used to diminish someones social standing. Inferring that the person in question enjoys anus on his/her face.

A amicable term in some social spheres.The place where young children get ston'd in the morning.A lazy person.The reproductive system (gender neutral).Bhe act of saving a life when a person is drowning or choking by repetitively thrusting one's penis in and out of the person's throat. The thrusting creates a plumbing effect that forces the obstruction to move up the throat. This action is in no way sexual; it should only be used during times of grave danger.The act of purposefully stopping up your toilet so that the plumber will come to your house and unclog it.Wearing one's pants so low as to display one's asscrack. Derived from the state of many a fat plumber's pants.(verb) Very deep anal penetration
Deep-sea plumbing: Anal penetration over 10 inchesGeneric term for the bars of a jail cellTo forcefully insert a hollow metal pipe into the rectum of a woman and suck out all of faecal matter. It is similar to a [filthy fiddler].Plumbing is a sexual act involving a man and a female. The aforementioned male pops his penis in the girl's vagina, lubricating her ring, tickling and widening the said orifice. When that there hole is at maximum size, the man pops the scrotum and both balls in that bottomless pit of love.Any brass wind instrument, because of the appearance of the tubing.A Farm-veihicle that can pull farm-implements.  Tractors are usually used to pull items, and often have a [Front-end Loader] attacthed.Something you like, alot, think is attractive.A really, really fat girl that you bang because your stupid/high/desperate.A Techie, and a Actor; this person does both on stage and behind stage work, for theater.  This term was invented by WMHS Techie/Actors who needed a name in MoCoSomething really good. Mostly used in Kansas but also widely used throughout the midwest.An insult describing, someone who is slow and annoying.Big ass black bitch screwing a little white man while intoxicated.One who has ways from the rural Southern U.S., particularly Texas and most particularly, the town of Thorton, TX.word for female genitals.
aka. twat lol.(TRAK-tor) Used with [trash] to create [tractor trash]. Describes [white trash] from predominantly farming communities.Any opposite sex escort taken to an event in an effort to give a homosexaul person the apperance of being out on a date with a person of the opposite sex.a man or woman used as a cover for a gay partnerA female or male(though,mainly female) who is used as a cover-up for a homosexual.The single most manly, and great thing a man can do. To have a beard is to be a true man. If you have a beard, show it off proudly, and enjoy the satisfaction of the envy in the eyes of people around you who don't have beards. If you don't have a beard, grow one. If you cant grow one and your not past puberty yet, hold out my young friend, your time will come. If you don't have a beard and your past puberty, go get that sex change you know you need.The best solution to any problem. A sort of spiritual band-aid that's only effective when used by men.A common word used to address a homosexual's female friend who he takes around town; he normally calls this companion his "girlfriend" to prove to the world that he is a masculine, football watching, titty grabbing heterosexual male. Although, he may think that this so called 'image' is working, he's actually fooling himself. It's completely obvious to on-lookers that he is a flamboyant homo. Gayer than a chihuahua in pink shades. 

Here are some warning signs that you may be a beard...

1. He wears more makeup than you.
2. He looks fucking FIERCE in pictures 'cause he smiles wit' his eyes.
3. Uses bronzer as blush
4. Plucks his own eyebrows and his eyebrows look more groomed than yours.
5. Stands with hands on his hips.A condition that causes hair to grow from the chin and lower face. Symptoms include itching, divinity and gratuitous awesomeness.

Synonyms include: Jesus.The term 'Beard' is used to describe a person who is being used by another person to cover something up. This can range from gay men using a girlfriend as a beard to make people think he is straight, or someone using a friend to make people think they are hanging out with them when really they are with someone else.1. A boy or girl hired as a celebritys boyfriend/girlfriend by that celebritys management, usually for publicity.when a gay man and a gay woman date each other to hide that fact that they're gaya woman's hair arranged at the back of her head, held together with a band and to be used by a man as a handle while receiving oral sex from a willing female.

A straight ponytail is grasped near the base in a male's fist, medium grip. This allows nice control of the female's head, but is limiting due to awkward bending of the male's wrist. It is a carpal tunnel syndrome hazard for men who receive a high volume of blowjobs. The height of the ponytail on the back of the woman's head can be adjusted for better torque.

Another type of ponytail is the balled ponytail. The straight ponytail is simply folded under itself and tucked back into the band, resembling a ball of hair. Grasped with an open palm, the fingers should meet at the band, thus the "ball" is contained in the man's hand. Called the "palm sander" grip, it allows full control of the woman's head with no wrist strain.

A third type of ponytail is the double ponytail. Two tails are formed toward the rear left and right sides of the female's head. A favorite among bikers as each tail can be grasped by a separate hand. The willing lady's head is steered like a motorcycle.

Caution: though clearly sexual stimuli for men, it is important for men to remember women do not always view it in the same context. Women often use ponytails just to keep hair out of their faces. The confused male should never just assume when a woman's hair is in a ponytail her head is ready for mounting. He should always ask first.Ponytail; verb.  To grab a girl by her ponytail and remove her from whatever current situation she is in.1) the thing that's on a ponies butt

2) when a person with long hair puts it in a singular hair elasticA meme that took the Bioware Social Network by storm in anticipation for Dragon Age 2.

The second day of live feed from gamescom in Germany proved to be nothing but slow, dull hours of people standing by the DA2 booth and taking pictures in front of its poster.

Bored, the online viewers took note of one booth workers' Godly hairstyle of a long, blonde ponytail-braid. So enthralled were they that within just a couple hours; a Facebook page, several threads, a Chant of Ponytail (parody of DA:O's Chant of Light) and a social group on the Bioware forums had been created in honor of her.

Bioware remarked on it via Twitter, and Ponytail occasionally waved at the camera and appeared generally entertained by her sudden popularity from her self-titled army.Where a girl puts her hair up in a single rubber band.
why:
So she can smack a bitch
So she can smack someone in the face with her hair
To try and impress someone
To give head

It also the most impossible thing to do when you have messy, snarled hair i do not reccomend it you will look terrible unless you have bobby pins to fix that shitGetting alot of head.Basically it is a term used for people whose skin color is darker than most. Normally referred to as "nigger", "negro", "knee's grow", or "samo-niggaz". They are typically found wandering around in Compton shooting down samo-niggaz, also if you are trying to find them in the dark, say a funny joke it will make them laugh and you will see their teeth. For example: "What do you get when you cross a samoan and a negro?" -pause- and then say "SAMO-NIGGGGAAZZ!!!!!" in a very niggerish accent. When you come across a ponytail you have to holler at them for example...When someone has a cock stuck on the back of their head that resembles a cleft of hair being draped down the back of their neck.(from a hairstyle popular with the people described, usage invented by Kaecyy in 2005)

A generally amiable but hopelessly nerdy person-- not necessarily possessing an actual ponytail or even long hair-- who is usually immersed in a combination of science fiction and fantasy literature (and their derivatives), roleplaying games (often in their live action varieties), the gothic-industrial subculture, and/or the historical reenactment of pre-industrial periods of European history (often at what are called "Renaissance fairs")-- among other influences-- to or nearly to the point of lifestyle.Ponytail is when a gay or bi guy gets mad at his balding lover for not satisfying him sexually. When his lover falls asleep, he jacks off on the guy's bald spot and then  affixes a tube sock to it. The guy wakes up with a "ponytail". A variation of the [superman].A man who is fascinated with large breasted women, who as a child was deprived of his mother's breast milk and was a bottle fed baby.Heroin supplier; a penny balloon that contains narcoticsa heroin dealerslang for [condom]; slang for protection during sex.A woman's breasts, AKA [boobs], [tits], [jugs], [hooters], [knockers].Elegant strip club located at 233 Porno Ave in Providence, RI. Famous for allowing men (and women) of all ages, including those 15-17.  Home of the infamous "referee" (bouncer) who also offers lap dances for a discounted price.A fool; a person who has just made a pretty obvious mistakeBalloons are used to hold heroin (usually low grade H). A dealer will use un-filled balloons (the multi-colored, water balloons, most of the time) to place a small, universal weight, amount of heroin into. The weight of the heroin inside each balloon can vary depending on who packaged or "tied" them. The amount is usually about .1grams per balloon. People buy them in packs of 10 or more, and rarely buy/sell a single "balloon." Rumor has it, the reason heroin was originally put into these balloons, was so you could swallow them if need be, and not need medical attention.Another name for [breasts].A very weird thing that is basically a colored plastic sack of your breath to give your friend on their birthday.1. A source of information.

2. A source of entertainment.

3. A tool barely used by todays societies, because it is not 'cool' to read a book.verb meaning to run or to leave in a hurryan object used as a coaster, increase the hight of small children, or increase the stability of poorly built furniture.What people don't read enough today.cool: the first option given when trying to type 'cool' in a text message using t9Did you know there HAVE been books printed since the fifties and the new ones are cool?  They have them so anyone can understand them.  Books can be about video games, sex, drugs, sports, people, pretty much everything.  They come with cuss words, funny characters and you might understand some more of you those weird things...that's right. Words.Something we stopped caring about after the [internet] came along.Portable sanctuaries.Words assembled on pages. They usually tell stories of things the reader is interested in. That is, unless you're reading in [school]. Then, you have to read books nobody cares about or even likes. Maybe more people would like reading if they weren't forced to read books that they didn't like. I know I would.cool.

In the T9 predictive text on cell phones, the numbers 2665 spell both "book" and "cool," but "book" is the first word to display. To save time, it is left and understood to mean "cool."The best thing in the worldthe reason you need a new hard drive.The traditional way for young female Americans to afford university education (those not from wealthy families).A great American pastime.something that both sexes can enjoy.Arousing materials usually employed for masturbatory purposes.

It's often said that the most senstive part of your body during a porn session is your ears - no one likes getting busted with their undies around their ankles.

But, the use of porn doesn't need to be such an ugly experience.  'The Big Wank' (see below) is an example of how you can add more mystique and romance to your evening at home alone.peas and corn mixed together in a bowln. Reading and viewing material, otherwise known as 'cliterature'.Will never die, as long as there are folks willing to strip for the camera, the people who wish to browse it, and the assholes who wish to destroy it.something that the user loses interest in after masturbation has occurredhairy mofo.Heartless, 
Having no emotions,v. used to describe something awesome or nice ; something worthy of hatinBetter than [cool]
To be cooler than cool
The coolest level of coolwhat a girl says she is when she wants to snuggle :]plain, obviously, flat out, straight upan annoying and contagious illness that causes sniffling, sneezing, coughing, and other symptomsharsh, mean, icyCold was a rock band that started in 1986. They released 4 cd's: Cold, 13 ways to bleed on stage, year of the spider, and a different kind of pain. They also released an ep called Oddity. The band consisted of lead singer Scooter Ward, Matt Louhgran, Zachary Gilbert, both guitarists, Jeremy Marshall on bass, and Sam McCandless on drums. Former members included Mike Booth, Sean Lay, Terry Balsamo, Kelly Hayes and Eddie Rendini.
On February 27, 2006, Ward left a message on their official website saying they had disbanded. However, he said he and Sam will continue writing music.An infectious disease that usually spreads like wildfire around people, because people don't give a shit worth about others. They would yawn cough and not wash their hands properly to prevent others from catching the cold. If you catch a fucking cold, don't cough, cover your fucking mouth, and if you go to either 1-12 grades, go to the back of the class, and don't spread your fucking cold.Pretty, beautiful, hot1- *FRIDGE; - ph-ry-dJG ; verb- the action of destroying or assassinating a persons anus with a penis of considerable magnitude often resembling a 57 bus. The action, ususally performed in a violatory sense, produces the aftermath of either one of the following symptoms; laseration and/or complete tearing of the anal orifice, the dissemination of part or the entirety of the subjects' internal organs where the giant girder cock forced its entry, and/or the complete annihliation of the victims existance to the extent where it would be more appropriate to use the remains to bury the compost that would have been used to otherwise bury the remains.

2- As above but via a huge hit during a Football game.

3- Literally a Football player of such magnitude that he resembles a walking samsung fridge/freezer combo.someone who has never french kissedshort version of refridgeratorAn extremely cool person, the phrase was coined by BriBry (A YouTuber with 21,000+ subscribers) on a blogTV show in April 2011.A girl who is frigid and only hangs out with girls. Perhaps the date, but they are too scared to do anything.

They also are overly sacarstic.someone who hasn't got on (french kissed) anyone yet.place to store cold drinks and food

since when do u keep ice-cream in da fridge-noun, /frɪdʒ/: A common kitchen appliance used to store and preserve dead human bodies and body parts for consumption.Anyone from Shenendehowa HS knows that the fridge is 'a place to go sit and chill'A very appealing being full of human desires. When the fridge is full, it can make anyone very happy. But when not full, it has the potential to kill.A maker of [trouble] is not one who "causes" trouble, but who achieves a level of trouble by being [Mischievous], [Stunning]!, [Sensational]! and [Smart]...1. When knowingly, and consciously getting into trouble with no regard or care for the potential repercussions.

2. When one said person has one or more warrants for their arrest at one time.
3. If your name is Brittany Rivera.(n). 1. A poo that is very stubborn, requires a lot of force to eject., 2. Hardened feces which is lodged at the anus, preventing soft feces behind it to pass.

Example. "Where's a magazine? I've got a trouble-maker to work out."A troublemaker is someone who expresses a view on a forum that differs from those of the Administrator and/or, as is more common, a moderator of a forum. The person deemed to be a troublemaker will usually be 100% correct in their statements, but the moderator will object, making statements that could be classified as being a [bigland].

As a result the troublemaker will then be told to go and form their own forum, even though everything they said was both reasonable and correct.When you pair a shot of tequila with a Guinness.[Spike],the troublemaker. Generally considered out to [lunch]. Known for wildly outlandish behavior. Highly unstable antisocial personality however incredibly sexy.a person who escalates a situation.Someone who brings about or initiates something.A person who starts fights or arguments.A blow up alligator; short for instant gator.A person who instigates.  To instigate is to conspire, plan and prank the local populationtype of person that gets information from people by overhearin wat they say ...and then tell their bestfriend <3Bunty, officially known as the instigator.1. (before 1997) Something really bad; a failure

2. (after 1997) Something considered excellent and/or the best (uses modifier "the")something very cool/ goodA graffitti slang wordrefers to a person male/female who's attractive , on they steez and or carries themselves well .Fast Graffiti Pieces, more than two colors, uses all of your letters. not much details just enough to look good and be on your way.(verb) the act of writing a grafitti tag in a highly visible public place.To fail spectacularly.Something you never say on air airplane.Slang for Ecstasy pillscool, awesome. Also see shita baby cat! sometimes they can't meow properly yet and they are sooo cute!An baby [cat]. Also known as a [kitty]. They have sharp little claws and teeth and can be nasty sometimes, but they are soft, cute, and totally lovable. Their meow is just precious to hear. Be gentle; kittens are delicate.1.  An immature cat.
2.  An adorable ball of fur with big eyes that uses its powers of cuteness to manipulate human beings into submission and slavery.
3.  An adorable, yet insane, tiny monster with teeth and claws.Cute little fluffballskitten (kit'en) n. 

 A small, sometimes domesticated animal; usually a pet; a member of the cat family, wants to grow up to be a lion, tiger, leopard, etc; thinks the world revolves around her; is probably right.little fluffy bastardsa woman who likes to date men older than her, usually by about 10 years, or more depending on the woman. Also the opposite of a cougar.The casualties of masturbation.(n) Term of coolness for a female from the 1950's and still used in [rockabilly] circles.Small balls of fluff that people perceive as being "cute". Everytime you do something naughty, they die.random weather patterns. makeing meteorology nearly imposibleThe 17th state of the United States -- in 1803. Contains 13,000,000 people and its chief cities are Cleveland, Cincinnati, and the capital of Columbus. Ohio is known for being the home of the Wright Brothers, the first man in space, more presidents than any other state, and Generals William T. Sherman and U.S. Grant. Also home of the champion OSU Buckeyes. Unlike what others may tell you, there are larger hellholes in the universe. Ohio has a lot to offer and is a decent place full of decent people.A land of shifting mists, Ohio is the most mysterious state in America.  There are some who claim that it does not exist at all, but is merely a hoax perpetrated by a strong core of dedicated jokesters in the "neighboring" states of Michigan, Pennsylvania, Indiana, and West Virginia (we're pretty sure no one tells Kentucky anything).  

Most people believe, however, that Ohio DOES in fact exists, and that its mystery is due solely to the mysterious mists that seem to enshroud the entirety of the state in...well...mystery, deterring all but the most stalwart of travelers.  Constituents to this belief also hold that Ohio is, in fact, the last home of the dinosaurs, and that Ohioan economy is based almost solely on quarrying and agricultural works using highly-trained dinosaurs as the primary (and literal) beasts of burden.The Buckeye State. One of the best states to live in, and all around best in the Union. We have 3 major cities: our Capital; [Columbus] (aka C-Bus, Bus Town), [Cincinnati] (aka the dirty/nasty Nati) and [Cleveland] (the Mistake by the Lake). Home to smaller cities such as; Dayton, Toledo and Akron. 1 NBA team, 1 NHL team, 1 MLS team, 2 NFL teams, 2 MLB teams. We are also home to THE Ohio State University Buckeyes, one of the largest/best universities in the country. Also home to Ohio University, which is filled with raging alcoholics that refer to themselves as "students". Most of us in Ohio, (especially us in Columbus) were born and raised with the Bucks. We bleed Scarlett & Grey. We say things like "you guys" and a drive-thru liquor store is not strange to us. It's the beach, not the shore, and pop, not soda. We are the Eastern most state in the MidWest, and have some of the friendliest people around. Ohio girls are some of the coolest/nicest you will ever meet. We are a big football state, but Lacrosse is another sport everyone plays. We play a little game called [Cornhole] anywhere we can. We love our corn & we love our beer. We are Ohio. The Heart of it All, and you'd be nothing without us.The only place in the world where you can experience all four seasons in one week.A chant that occurs in Columbus, Ohio between 2 individuals or 2 groups of people who are too stupid to get that not everyone they see gives a rat's ass about sports and can't spell the name of the four letter state they live in without help from other idiots. Proof that OSU students don't learn anything but how to get arrested, drink, fight, watch football and date rape each other. Anyone who yells "O-H" at you in Columbus is a complete waste of flesh and deserves to get their ass kicked.1) One of the states of the United States of America.
Home to a bunch of formerly bad but now improving pro sports teams, a ton of colleges, the OSU Buckeyes, actual buckeyes, part of the Rust Belt, Cedar Point and a lot of soybeans, cows, and corn.
Ohio contains a little bit of all the typical Midwestern environments- college towns, suburbs, cities, urban areas trying to reinvent themseles, farmlands, etc.  It also contains part of Appalachia, and a large number of "swing voters".  It has quite a few ardent liberals and conservatives, and has been the home and/or birthplace of eight presidents.  The weather, it being part of the Midwest region, is often "crazy" and swings between hot, mild, cold, and freezing.  The four seasons are widely known to be "winter, still winter, almost winter, and construction" or something to that effect (believed to be taken from a Jeff Foxworthy chain email).
There's definitely a lot more there than bad drivers, "hicks", and cows, and just driving through the state does not really do it justice.  You've got to experience it to really understand it, and then you can pass judgement.
2) A song written by Neil Young (while he was working with Crosby, Stills, Nash, and Young) in response to the [Kent State Massacre], which occured at Kent State University in Ohio on May 4, 1970 when National Guardsmen opened fire on student protesters on the KSU campus.I used to think that this state was propably the most suckish, boring state EVER.
I think a lot differently now.
Here are a few things about this Awesome state.

HISTORRRYYY
This was one of the first states of the Northeast, Established in 1803. The three main cities are Columbus, the capitol, Cleveland, and Cinncinati.
The Wright Brothers were raised in Ohio.
So were eight of America's presidents.
Aaand the first man to walk on the moon.
Akron was the first town to use police cars.
Cleveland was the first fully electric powered city.
Also the first state to use traffic lights.
And many many other things that I can't remember.

TIPS, HINT, AND INFO FOR ANY TOURIST...

1; STAY. AWAY. FROM. SPRINGFEILD. TOWNSHIP. This is basically the cespoo of Ohio. Unless you are crazy, like everyone else that lives in that weird place :D

2; ..I suggest dont go to Toledo.

3; If you have the courage to yell, 'I LOVE MICHIGAN' in a public area...You. Will. Be. Eaten. Alive. Unless you're in Toledo.

4; When you hear someone yell, 'O-H', you yell 'I-O'. Dont ask questions. Just do it. 

5; Don't. Diss. OSU. You will also be eaten alive for that also. Again, unless you're in Toledo

6; In response to number one, stay away from Ellet too.

7; Our weather is crap and very unpredictable. Deal with it. I suggest bringing snowboots in the middle of summer and shorts in the dead of winter.

8; Only we can diss our state. If you diss it, we'll agree with you for that second, then again, eat you alive.

9; There's a 3/4 chance you will be eaten alive.

So, that's only 1/4 of the stuff in Ohio. Come here to figure out the rest for yourself :D
But...Try not to be eaten alive...America is the melting pot of the world; Ohio is the melting pot of America.  There will never be a pot more melting than Ohio.  Some say this makes Ohio a blurry combination of everything, and that it is not very distinct among the states, but this is cantrary to the truth.  No other state is like Ohio, in that it is a melting pot.  Also, Ohio's flag is one of only three non-rectangular significant world flags, and the only non-rectangular flag of the states.  Ohio's also cool cuz I live there.Ohio is the heart of America and is well known for it's amusement park in Sandusky Ohio called Cedar Point, which has over fourteen rides and loads of tourists come summer.

Ohio also has a huge historical background which can be seen almost everywhere you go.

Ohio is one of the states with the most American accent.

It's pronounced, OH-HIGH-OH, not OH-HAI-UH. If you go to any person who was raised in Ohio they will laugh at you for pronouncing it differently than 99% of America.

Ohio rivals with Michigan about sports, and they don't like each other because Michigan thinks Ohioan's drive slow -- while Ohioans think they drive like bats out of hell. (Which they do.)

Most of Ohio is taken up by farms and fields, but don't judge it by the land, for there is many neat things you can discover in Ohio.The religious belief that every word of the sacred texts is literally true; stereotypically in Christianity and taken to such extremes. See also: [fundamentalist].A group of people comprising 0.002% of the world's population yet drawing unproportional amount of media coverage (especially Israeli Jews).1. Someone who practices Judaism.

2. Derogatory term for someone tight with their money or someone not very generous.The only people in the world that are simultaneously hated by both the extreme Left and the extreme Right.

Synonym: [scapegoat]A person of the jewish faith.Let's Clear up some of the Misconceptions in these postings.

A Jew is a person who's mother is Jewish. (Some streams of Judaism argue that Jewish patrimony can be acquired through the father as well). 
Jews are not a race but an eclectic mix of different races, nationalities, and cultures; they are a truly multi-cultural and multi-ethnic people. However, within this mix, there are distinct ethnic groups such as the Ashkenazic and Sephardic Jews that make up the overwhelming majority of the Jewish People. 
Most American Jews are of Ashkenazic origin -- usually originating from Eastern Europe or the former Soviet Union. Therefore, American Jews could largely be classified as an ethnic group, hence the characteristic stereotypes, although there are exceptions.
 A Jew is not a person who practices Judaism, although most Jews do adhere to some form of Jewish practice or cultural tradition.
 A Jew is not an Israeli and an Israeli is not a Jew. An Israeli is a citizen of the state of Israel. While most Israeli's are Jewish, there are also non-Jewish citizens of Israel. 
A Jew is not automatically a citizen of the state of Israel. A Jew must apply for and be granted citizenship to the state just like everyone else, although most are awarded citizenship rather easily.1) someone who practises judaism

2) is also a culture/ethnicity, that is to say it has a certain sense of humour, certain type of food and music etc.

3) A person who Mel Gibson talks smack about after he has had too much to drink.A southern bastardization and contraction of the two words "did you".Something you blame something.Like Christians, but without all that Jesus stuffone who practices the world's oldest monotheistic religionLacking any class. Dumb and unartful, like most of the words in this dictionary.
[fool]the classy way of saying awkward. use it.Adjective

gauche (comparative more gauche, superlative most gauche)

Positive
gauche
		

Comparative
more gauche
		

Superlative
most gauche

   1. Awkward or lacking in social graces; bumbling.

          Quotations:
              * "Seeking by vulgar pomp and gauche display" — Samuel Griswold (1793-1860)nuveau riche, "cursi", expensive but tackySocially ackward and lacking Social experienceThe hair on a dogs cock after the lipstick has been withdrawn.Male genitalia. Pronounced "gooch".A girl's boyfriend/crusha classy, sophisticated manner, much like audrey hepburn. it is classy, glamorous, without being a pushover, and without being flashy. its an element of class.Glam without being trampy - attention grabbing class! It is sophisticated, intelligent, and gorgeous.Chic is an elegant fashion sense, that is also very glamorous, and does NOT mean a girl, thats CHICK!Hard to define, a certain eliment of style and sophistication in your fashion sense. Almost artisticly stylish (don't ask).An abbreviation for Cherry Coke. Commonly herd in the hood.It's simply just another word for stylish.

FACTVery attractive lady with an air of elegance flowing around her but at the same time she is very friendly and approachable.

She is a very genuine character and there's nothing pretentious about her.

Very sexy but not slutty, not a skank. She dresses herself decently, and appropriately.To be super stylish. One of the cool people. Effortlessly awesome.An abbreviation of the word chica that close girlfriends or besties say to one another. Usually girls who are called this are hot, sassy and feisty!One of the tightest disco-funk band of all time.to groom a man.  Shaving, waxing, cleaning up the superfluous fur.A term used to define male grooming below the belt. A male can use both an electric razor or a regular razor. A Mach 3 is preferable with the ladies on the testicular area. No female likes to deal with hairy balls, so men must education themselves on proper manscaping and maintenance techniquesWhen men shave or trim their cock and ballsA mans grooming of his body hair.  Like landscaping, but for the body."I have no idea what this is."

- Jonathan GoldsmithA fine artform exclusive to men;  the continued upkeep of exceptional hygeine and strategic hair removal as they pertain to the male body.For a guy to trim his pubic hair or to style it fashionably.To trim male pubes back to a reasonable bush."I have no idea what this is"
- Jonathan GoldsmithA word used to discribe the shaving of a Males pubic /chest/ and back hairs.

-Its pronounced like Landscaping but with a (man) instead of (land).Describes the complicated love and affection shared by two straight males.-noun
1. A [non-sexual] [relationship] between two men that are unusually close.

-verb  -mans-ing
1. The act of wooing a fellow male friend for the purpose of becoming closer.
2. Going to unusual lengths in an attempt to become closer with another male friend.

also: "Bromancing the Stone"
1. The act of truly and thoroughly  enjoying the process of getting and/or being high/stoned. 

Provenance/Origin: "Bromance" is a [portmanteau] of the two words "brother" and "romance". Originally coined by author/editor Dave Carnie in "Big Brother Magazine." [Big Brother] was a sort of R rated [skateboarding]/skate culture magazine that was eventually purchased by [Larry Flynt]'s [Hustler] [conglomerate] and consequently taken out of [circulation] due to unsatisfactory sales [performance]. Carnie used the word on several occasions to describe relationships between [skate-buddies] who spent a lot of time together and/or shared hotel rooms on every tour/skate [road trip].A close relationship between two bros to such a point where they start to seem like a couple.The relationship between two straight guys. They enjoy each others company and even though they may constantly joke about being gay they are not.a highly formed friendship between male friends, or "bro's".(N) The intense complicated love shared between two heterosexual males that consists of but not limited to wrestling, numerous man-dates, and tons of other stories that will only remain between the two.

Also a form of male bonding to such a point where they start to seem like a couple.

This bond is normally only shared between two males that have a deeper understanding of each other, in a way no woman could ever realize.Bromance

-noun

A strictly non-sexual relationship between two completely heterosexual men that are close and enjoy eachothers company but still enjoy the company of women.What House and Wilson or George Clooney and Brad Pitt have.

Dating back to Plato and Socrates, a close but non-sexual relationship between two men. The whole is greater than the sum of the individual parts.

To girls this means, George Clooney + Brad Pitt>George Clooney or Brad Pittwhen two guys have a very close bond, to the point where they act like a couple, except that they are both straight. Signs of a bromance include, but are not limited to: knowing what the other is thinking, hanging out 27/7, hugging, extensive high-fiving, and sharing clothes. Some famous examples include Sherlock Holmes and Watson, and Captain Kirk and Spock.Noun- An intense and extreme non-sexual bond between two straight males. Said to be a “deep emotional bond” that no woman could satisfy.As a rule of thumb, it is profoundly unwise to take crack-cocaine. The brain has evolved a truly vicious set of negative feedback mechanisms. Their functional effect is to stop us from being truly happy for long. Nature is cruelly parsimonious with pleasure. The initial short-lived euphoria of a reinforcer as powerful as crack will be followed by a "crash". This involves anxiety, depression, irritability, extreme fatigue and possibly paranoia. Physical health may deteriorate. An intense craving for more cocaine develops. In heavy users, stereotyped compulsive and repetitive patterns of behaviour may occur. So may tactile hallucinations of insects crawling underneath the skin ("formication"). Severe depressive conditions may follow; agitated delirium; and also a syndrome sometimes known as toxic paranoid psychosis. The neural aftereffects of chronic cocaine use include changes in monoamine metabolites and uptake transporters. There is down-regulation of dopamine D2 receptors to compensate for their drug-induced overstimulation. Thus the brain's capacity to experience pleasure is diminished.Crack is something that is sold by both drug dealers and prostitutes. The only difference is that a prostitute can wash her crack and sell it again.Another form of cocaine:  2 parts cocaine to one part baking soda, with a little water, heat gently until a precipitate forms: this is your crack1. Smokeable cocain 
2. A program to unlock trial versions of programs 
3. "[butt cleavage]"Otherwise known as crack-cocaine, this illegal drug is a mixture of two parts cocaine and one part baking soda. This chemical process reverts the powder-cocaine mkaing process by one step, producing a smokable form of the naturally found alkaloid cocaine. Because of its nature as an inhalable substance, the high is quicker and more intense, leading to a larger number of addicts. In present society, it is considered to be much more distasteful to use crack-cocaine then powder-cocaine as crack is mainly viewed as a drug for poor people whereas powder cocaine is used by a richer constituancy. Contrary to popular belief, crack-cocaine is not freebase cocaine. Freebase cocaine is a mixture of cocaine, ether, and other dangerous and combustable materials. Baking soda was replaced as the ingredient in the 1980's to make production easier and less dangerous. Either way, crack and freebase cocaine produce the same smokable form of the drug.A small, illegal program who's sole purpose is to trick another program (by editting, imputting a registration key, or some other method) into thinking it has been registered.The area between the ass cheeks and, in females, including the crevices of the genitalia.Basically, crack is silly, intentionally non-serious, and has a high tendency to be extremely crazy and unfounded, such as purposeful [OOC]-ness or playing on cliches, inside jokes, and/or [fanon].
  
The term crack probably stems from crack as in crack cocaine, as opposed to a crack in a wall. As in, so horrendously unfounded/silly that only one could have come up with it while under the influence of crack.Something that is great, awesome, good.NOUN:
1. The solid form of the illicit, recreational drug, cocaine.
2. A small gap on the surface of an object.
3. An illegally obtained password or file to a copyrighted computer program.

ADJECTIVE:
1. The quality or state of excellence. (often used to describe music)
2. Having a small gap on the surface of an object. [-ed]

VERB:
1. To make a small gap on the surface of an object.
2. To illegally pass through some form of passive security (often used with computer programs, see NOUN-3).
3. To punch someone in an altercation.
4. To start. [-ing]
5. To be occurring. (often used in the greeting, "What's crackin'?!")An abbreviation for methamphetamine, a drug that stimulates the central nervous system by causing it to release more dopamine, a neurotransmitter that gives someone a feeling of satisfaction.a horrible drug that ruins lives, breaks up families, and does considerable damage to one's looks (its true, look at the before and after pictures). All the people who write definitions promoting it have no idea, and will be o-so-happy when all of their teeth fall out :)the stupidest shit EVERAn abbreviation for [methamphetamine], a drug that stimulates the central nervous system by causing it to release more dopamine, a neurotransmitter that gives someone a feeling of satisfaction.A stupid drug made used and made by [white trash] that's made out of cold medicine and other easily obtained chemicals.The lonely situation you find yourself in, after using methamphetamine. Typically, broke, with no job, falling apart, stuttering, wondering why you pulled into this parking lot "What the hell was I doing just now?" when all your "new best friends" have left you for better and you feel like it's the end of the world.A drug for fuckups.. Invented by some japenese guy approx. 80 years ago.. The hippie version is speed...Will fuck up ones life and their love ones; HIGHLY addictive, probably the most addictive drug; not only popular with so called "white trash" but very big in the Filipino community all across USA. (esp. cali, vegas, NY & JERSEY). Most users/dealers/runners and THE SOURCE know or have "heard" of one another.

They say, "don't knock it, until you TRY it" or "Try anything once", etc. etc. CRYSTAL METH does NOT apply to these sayings! DO NOT TRY IT!1. The reason why it is so hard to get decent over the counter meds for your freaking hayfever. 2. [Crack] for [rural] and [suburban] white people.Short for methamphetamines. The most highly addictive illicit narcotic made from all sorts of deadly toxins: metals, cold medicines, rat poison, chlorine, bleach, etc. The drug is so dangerous and deadly, that it can explode when being produced incorrectly. Unfortunately, the drug has a strangle hold on America and destroys cities, families, and eventually the addict themself. It makes the addict lose their looks, teeth, health, personality, etc. On the streets its known as ICE, SPEED and CRYSTAL METH. The drug turns you into a loser and eventually a criminal and convict. It is highly addictive because it stimulates the central nervous system, giving a feeling of euphoria and relaxation. Meth is the fastest-growing illegal drug in the United States, and is actually growing the fastest among caucasians in upper middle-class suburbs and rural areas.Gin is an unaged [liquor] made by [distill]ing [grain]s such as [barley], [corn] or [rye]. Its [bouquet] comes from [juniper] berries, [coriander], [herb]s and [spice]s, usually added to the grain mash during [distillation]. The gin is stored in [glass], [earthenware] or [stainless steel] containers, but does not mature in these. The storage time serves only to harmonize the product.

Someone once said that "A [bar] without gin is like an Italian kitchen without pasta". No other [liquor] provides for the creation of so many classic [cocktail]s. Gin is in fact a liquor that is harmonious with almost anything.

Without gin the king of [cocktail]s, the dry [Martini], would not exist.An often strong liquor, usually clear but with a strong smell, much like rubbing alcohol. Sold under brands like Gordon's 'London Dry Gin' and Bombay 'Sapphire'. Often used to escape life temporarily or make high skool more interesting.An archaeic word for Aboriginal Females
considered offensive but curiosly still allowed to be used to name Australian places. Gin-Gin Falls for example(n) An individual of aboriginal origin. (Offensive)(n) in poker, drawing/flopping/turning the best card or combination of cards (typically it gives one a very strong hand and one's opponent a strong but second-best hand); frequently used with the verb 'to hit' and occasionally followed by 'card(s)'

etymology: probably originating from the card game of the same namePronounced "gĭn" not "jĭn" -Bahamian slang meaning "going to".A grain liquor that smells and tastes like pine needles.Slang for the female genitalia.In hold 'em poker: Describes a hand's relationship to a flop when conditions exist where not only is the hand likely the strongest, but can also easily improve to the [nuts] (aka best hand possible).a girl who is ready to suck any nigga up just for popularity or cause they happen to be real thirsty.The surest way of getting nothing from something.when your not sure if you have to fart or shit and you take the chance any way thats what gambling is all aboutGiving money to native americans.1. An improvident activity in which winning gleefully proceeds losing. 2. The saddled process of chasing one's loses or blowing one's winnings. 3. Chinese finger cuffs. 4. An insatiable itch erroneously believed to be satisfied by scratching. 5. The willingness to ask Chance for Certainty.just a way to get ahead.v., intransitive

A quick way to riches and power.

It's a sure thing.the act of masturbating. the reference is to the hand gesture made to imply masturbation, which greatly resembles the shaking of dice.custom-made; looking like it cost a million bucksOne of the powerful masculin [trends] for 2008 in fashion. Bespoke [tailoring] reffers to a particularity of british fashion, but the term 'bespoke' is now extended to all life's domains, as a powerful mark of [luxury], an anti-brand/ anti-globalisation reaction.The act of shoving a bicycle pump up a woman's rectum while going down on her.(1)A drink that often burns when consumed by itself, but goes good mixed with various sodas (see: [pepsi], [coke], [7-up]) and sometimes even water. Straight shots are smoother if chilled, and some whiskeys such as Seagram's Seven can be consumed straight by even those with the weakest stomachs.

(2)A drink which makes old men's I.Q.s increase exponentially after every shot, eventually leading to a bar full of omniscient men who can't even begin to consider that for once they might just be wrong.

(3)Something good to come out of Canada.The life giving substance that has intoxicated many a man. (better than eve and that god damn apple)Part of the military phonetic alphabet. As one might expect, Whiskey = W.An alcoholic beverage made from ingredients similar to beer, but intended for grown ups. Suitable for use as an aftershave, by men who consider that perfumed stuff too girly.The best fucking drink in the world. Not too mention the manliest. Mixed with [weed], it can cause one to become fucking [crunk]. Puts hair on your chest.1. The oil of conversation, the philosophic wine, the ale that is consumed when good fellows get together, that puts a song in their hearts and laughter on their lips, and the warm glow of contentment in their eyes;

2. Christmas cheer;

3. The stimulating drink that puts the spring in the old gentleman’s step on a frosty, crispy morning;

4. The drink which enables a man to magnify his joy, and his happiness, and to forget, if only for a little while, life’s great tragedies, and heartaches, and sorrows;The reason I get up in the morning and the reason I pass out at night.Proof that God loves us and wants us to be happy.The cause of and solution to all life's problems!Its the fifth element after water, fire, earth and wind... Nothing exists without it!A magic potion used to make people of the opposite look bettera liquid form of carbohydrates that should be drank as a replacement for all other liquids, especially waterwhat men need to function dailyThe piss of angels.- After Bacon. it's the way of life
- The saver of old lonely men
- It even sounds cool..heh..heh.. Beer.a substance imbibed by males which, in time improves the appearance of ugly women and should be purchased more than makeup cuz it does a whole hell of a lot more for ya if yer really ugly than any makeup ever willA drink which makes you strong and clever.What you put in water bottles and bring to school.Vodka is a clear, colorless, unaged [liquor] "made from [ethyl alcohol] from agricultural origin". It was originally made in [Russia] from [potato]es, but today's vodka, which is almost odorless and tasteless, is usually made from [grain], primarily [barley] and [wheat], and occationally from [rye].

Vodka is integral to many [cocktail]s such as the [Screwdriver], [Bloody Mary] and Vodka [Martini]. If served straight, it should always be icy-cold.

Flavored vodkas have become popular in the [United States] and may be flavored with anything from [fruit]s to hot [pepper]s. Some flavored vodkas are even sweetened slightly.As a Russian who is experienced in the art of vodka consumption i feel obligated to provide the following information about vodka drinking.
A) Vodka should never ever under any circumstances be bought in a plastic bottle
B) Vodka should never be served ice-cold or even moderately could when straight. BUT!!!!! the shoot glass should be ice cold.
C) Just because you have a carton of Tropicana and a bottle of Smirnoff doesn't mean you can make a screwdriver. Screwdrivers never have any plump in them
D) When drinking vodka never sip it, or drink it slowly! This way of drinking vodka leads to loss of taste buds and a reeking smell.
E) Before taking a shot of vodka cheers must be said, then let out all the air you have in your lungs, drink and inhale at the same time.
F) NEVER EVER CHASE VODKA WTH BEAR
G) A good tactic for not getting sick while drinking vodka, is to supplement it with soda and some snacks.
H) Drinking vodka together with bear and champagne leads to short term memory loss.

facts
Vodka a 40% alcoholic drink. In theory it can be made out of anything, even wood or marijuana. The solution to this magnificent drink is extremely simple: a 2/5 ratio of alcohol and water. Non-mass produced vodka, which is available in most of Europe and Russia, is an expensive high quality drink, which went through as many as 8 stages of filtration and sold for more that 100$ a bottle.
Rarely it is mixed in to cocktails, such as vodka martini and the screw driver.
In the United States only commercial, mass produced vodka is available and has a number of flaws. A) it is not made in Russia, even if it is called Smirnoff of Stolichnaya, but New Jersey or in the best case scenario Sweden.
Best brand of Vodka are: VEDA and BELUGA BLACK, these two brands made Stoli and Absolute look like absolute shit!
Please drink responsibly and enjoy.Low cost and effective engine fuel, industrial solvent and poison. Some people also like to drink the stuff.quite strong alocolic liquid (40-60%).
not brewed, like wine, so it doesn`t taste like yeast. what most people will use to get [shitfaced]. To avoid death, it is adviced to mix the vodka with a non-alcohol liquid.Unfortunately it has become a pop culture joke. Most popular vodkas (smirnoff, absolut) are absolut shit and made in Sweden or Finland or something. Real and good vodka must be made in a slavic country. There is an ongoing argument with Poland and Russia over who created the drink. There is more evidence that says Poland coined the term vodka(wódka) for it and first started mass consumption of it. However, it was most likely created by persians or arabs. Slavic and also celtic people have the highest alcohol tolerances.A drink that can be either complete shit or damn fine. Has one of the most delicate tastes if properly filtered. Quartz filtered vodka recomended over a charcoal filterBasically, alcohol mixed with water. An alternative to just plain raw alcohol, invented by people who did not die like 4 seconds after drinking it (and apparently wanted more). Go to any spot in Russia you can buy it for like 50 kopeiks (2 cents) a bottle

Comes from the Russian word "water" (meaning that the Russians practically drink it as if it was water)Has 3 meanings:

1. Clear alcoholic beverage made from fermented grain or potatoes

2. Water in Russia, since most water found in russia that is not frozen is hazordous to your health and may be fatal

3. God in Russia, the Russian God, or, the God of the Russian people, or perhaps just the poor bums on the streets of RussiaWhen you have to hold on to the grass to keep from falling off the earth.A word defining a person who has had too much alcohol.  See also:  hammered, sloshed, shit-faced, tanked, blitzed, bombed, wrecked, three sheets to the wind, drunkened, loose, tipsy, defcon 1, well-done, trashed, jagged up, Irish, canned, smashed, fucked-up, intoxicated, inebriated, aniahalated, laced, (etc.)Chemically incovienencedA sublime way of existing in a world full of idiots.One's alter ego who is blamed for all things of a regrettable nature.The state you're in when you won't give two shits about what you say. You will be fucking uninhibited and won't give a shit what anyone thinks. You will be happy and motherfucking confident. You will be sippin dranks and feeling like a baller. Euphoria on a scale of 1 to 10: a motherfuckign 10................
So give it up to alcohol, bitches. this shit is legit, and deserves fucking respect, (that bottle of sailor jerrys was fucking good by the way)
Nigger. if you dont like alcohol, you can just kill yourself cause your iq is in the negatives!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!1. Past tense of "drink".
2. Your girlfriend's dad.
3. Spinning without moving.when you have to close one eye to keep people from splitting in two.Intoxicated with alcoholic liquor to the point of impairment of physical and mental faculties. 
Caused or influenced by intoxication.a state of being that one can only hope to constantly attainThe magic wand that can make a man dissappearaccident indicatorThe alternative to the orange.THE MOST BADASS FUCKING FRUIT ON THE FUCKING PLANET. SERIOUSLY, THIS MOTHERFUCKER KICKS THE SHIT OUT OF THE PUSSY ORANGE OR BANANA. THIS JUICY, RED MOTHERFUCKER IS THE BEST FUCKING THING THAT GOD HAS EVER CREATED. EAT AN A APPLE AND YOUR DICK WILL GROW 3 INCHES. FUCK.A horrendous company that has somehow managed to stay afloat for years and appeal to a mass of misguided people.  They specialize in taking existing technology, making it all shiny and fancy looking, and re-selling it for double the price.  Ironically, their slogan is "Think Different".

Their latest and greatest gadget that's getting all the attention is, of course, the iPhone, which is basically comparable to any high-quality $150 phone, except it has "innovative" touch screen technology, and it sells for $600.

Apple couldn't quite figure out how to make an operating system, so they just stole the freeBSD kernel and repackaged a bastardized version of it as Mac OS X.  It's funny that Apple brags that it's "Unix-based", since no one with experience in Unix would ever use a Mac.

Apple frequently runs "clever" ads.  Although they've made a ton of them, all the ads boil down to how Windows has viruses and crashes all the time.  Apple also have an enormous, cult-like fanbase that like to remind us of these things every five seconds.  Apple fanboys are generally smug, annoying, and arrogant, despite the fact that most of them don't know jack shit about computers.what the fuck are you looking at the definition of apples for you stupid fuck?The truly heinous name of Chris Martin and Gwenyth Paltrow's lovechild.The result of a mindblowing or humiliating situation in which the victim is posed one question:A greedy-ass company that makes a shit tone of money and over-prices their productsA manufacturer of computers, peripherials, and software with around a 3% share of the pc market. 
Most well-known products include:
imac
ipod
itunes
OS X
final cut pro
ibook

While their operating system's market share may be significantly below that of Microsoft's windows, many still prefer to use Apple's computers and software, especially for graphical design and audio work. 

Many people like to debate over the superiority of macs over pcs and visa versa, such people have no lives.A shortened version of [apples and pears], which is cockneyrhyming slang for stairs.Australian Slang for goodThe kind of guy most girls ACTUALLY want when they say they want a [Nice Guy].

Jerks are selfish, manipulative bastards who see women as little more then sexual conquests to brag about to their buddies or mere objects that are there for their personal pleasure. As to ensure the post-sex breakup will be in their favor, Jerks often play the "sensative guy" early on so the girl will make most of the moves on HIM, and after he's done with her and dumps her for some other girl just like her, he can make it look like she's at fault for coming on too strong, and consequently she'll take him back if he chooses to return for seconds.

Typically are/were [Frat Boy]s, [Jock]s, and [Prep]s in school.Noun. An [idiot] or stupid person. An insensitive, selfish, ignorant, cocky person who is inconsiderate and does stupid things.1.  Final stage of evolution of any male who spent at least one year dating in America, no matter his origin
2.  Mandatory mindset for self-survival within corporate America
3.  At this point of no return, group synonym for an elusive + cocky + self-confident + self-centered + loud + crazy male
4.  A guy that doesn’t give a flyin’ fuck about anything else but his handsome allure and annoying success.
5.  THE abusive attitude that will surely attract any girl’s love in America. For life
6.  A guy that enhances any girl’s low self-esteem and insecurity without meaning it. Then gets blamed for it.
7.  A guy that does not return any “I love you” s but keeps smiling at his girl’s face until she melts down and asks for more of that shit :)
8.  Every bitches’ openly discussed concern. Yet every bitches’ secret love.
9.  A challenge  aka any girl’s biggest turn-on.
10.  A bitch with a dick.1. A mean/heartless person.

2. More common: A guy who perfectly fits the gender stereotype, and is insensitive, controlling, and will treat women like sex objects. Though many women constantly complain about guys like that, most end up with one, because they didn't dig deeper and didn't try to see through the jerk's crap. Instead of going for a [nice guy] who will obviously be there for a girl, most girls choose what's right in front of them, a cold-hearted bastard who happens to look "macho", who is a big-time flirt and wears his penis on his sleeve.An alternative to dating.A very powerful word to call someone... Unlike the f-word, "jerk" doesn't lose it's power the more you say it.A person you really love that just doesn't see how much you care for them, and yet, every so often actually treats you good, only to then act completely different from who they were when you first met them.In medival Europe,masturbation was considered to be on the brink of insanity. So as an insult, people would call each other "jerk-offs", and soon, jerk was enough to get the point across.The man all girls are attracted to.A person who does not use their turn signal.(uh-nak-ruh-niz-uhm)

From Middle Greek anachronismo, the word Anachronism refers to an event, person, object or custom that is chronologically out of place. It can also be an error in chronology, in which a person, object, event, etc., is assigned a date or period other than the correct one.out of place or at the wrong timeAn object or event that is seemingly out of place in time.out of the proper time.A hospital you never ever want to be admitted to. We all have that one wacko job for a relative or friend. Multiply that by like 300 and stick them all in a tiny room painted baby blue and make them talk about the issues they have and watch them go. It's like playing a game of stick the yellow shapes in the right spots and wait for the red box to explode and blow pieces everywhere. If you live near one I suggest you move because the crazy ass-holes break out the glass and run free. Then it is like playing a game of "Where's Weirdo". I worked at one and I will say that I could not wait to get to work. There was never a dull moment. If you love caos and mayhem you really should consider a career at the nut house.1. Sci-fi movie/book about a retro-ish gang leader who after beating people up, raping, stealing, etc, is taken to prison where he later is chosen to participate in a "special treatment" program to "cure" him.

2. Also, a term used in the CWO book to describe a person who is perfectly moral, nonviolent, etc; but has no free will.A object (or person in the case of the movie) which appears normal on the outside but is completely artificial on the inside.someone who appears normal to the eye and holds the colors of life (orange), but is really a tool for someone or something else (clockwork)A clockwork orange comes from an old London saying "queer as a clockwork orange". A clockwork orange is actually a wind up doll that is controlled by both god and the devil. Anthony Burgess uses this for his book to symbolize the government almost brainwashing Alex in order to control his bad behavior.A novel which came out BEFORE the movie, commonly fooling idiots. Learn to read.Oddest, most kickass movie. 
Alex is a stud.one of the best damn movies everThe orbital subway around Glasgow. So named due to it's circular route and orange subway trains. Also famous for it's central role in The [Glasgow Subcrawl].Person who has no free will, is a victim of a cruel psyhological therapy (A Clockwork Orange), or a person who is unable to make it's own choices between good and bad1.Original a from slang (from a part of London) that means a homosexual.
2.A novel by Anthony Brugess.  The novel was based somewhat on his life, such as one of the rape scenes.  The novel was about  totalirism and the good and evil of humans.
3.An amazing movie based on Anthony Burgess' Novel.  The director banned the film himself due to it's 'ultra violent' nature.Judgment (American English); judgement (British English)1. Judgement occurs when the judgee is struck with; either "the stick of judgement" (1 - 4) or with "the ball of judgement", both currently in use in Devon, UK.

2.  The act of vigilante violence.The collective term for a group of [hipsters].What is considered justA clan of fags lead by 2 old people who no one like except for the fags who join it.The Pirate is an oft misunderstood individual who can be seen absolutely pwning everyone around him/her. Well versed in the arts of cheekiness, deceit, extortion(sp), theft, blackmail, smarmery, and crazy acrobatic sword and or knife fighting. The  pirate always lands on his feet, and always wins, even when you think not. naturally hates the ninja, as ninjas are overated far too serious for their own good. 
the most 31337 p1r4735 sometimes join the ranks of the mysterious Shadow Pirates.1. One who drinks rum, get angry, and stab things.
2. A sailing criminal who, sails on a ship, steals from other ships, lives without any law:only a set of morals, survives on goods stolen from other ships/ports.When a woman is giving you head pull out before ejaculation and blow your load in her eye. Then kick her in the shin. After completing those 2 tasks you have gave a women the pirate.Pirates are a sea fearing folk, oft to be seen pilaging, raping, murdering, or commiting other acts of piracy. They usually own a monkey, parrot, or sexy wench.The coolest motherfucking people to ever exist.1. n. Arch rival of the [ninja].
2. n. Devotee of the [Flying Spaghetti Monster].1. Always land on their feet
2. have cool eye patches ... even if they have both eyes
3. have dice
4. have guns
5. pirates are not ordinary humans so they can kill ninjas!
6. have cool ships
7. have better swords then ninjas
8. are all around better then ninjas
9. have a lot of movies about them (way more then ninjas)
10. wear red on thursdays
11. have graduated from Pyro Pirate Academy of One-Eyed Peter!
12. polish their peg legs
13. say thinds like scally-wagger and scurvy-chap
14. Arrrrr! need i say more
15. pack a mean punch
16. always have the best snacks
17. will make you walk the plank if your not as cool as them
18. start all the major fashion trends
19. don't go crying to their mommies ... like ninjas
20. know how to handle a lady
21. knows how to DAG people better then ninjas
22. have pretty cool boots
23. get all the tasty rum
24. have pretty good cursive
25. have more extended vocabualary then ninjas
26. are absolutley amazing!!!
ARRRR!The name given to the coolest dudes to ever sail the seven seas. They have cool boats, cool planks and cool wooden legs. Parrots are also optional. Their main duties include searching far and wide for, "pluder," or, "bling," as it would now be known.The holy being in the religion of Pastafarianism. Often prayed to by followers of the Flying Spaghetti Monster. R'amen.Better than ninjasa small sexy piece of underwear that girls wear and it attracts men. When a girl bends over, it tends to show out from under her jeans or hipsters. Men love them.By far one of the best forms of underwear.  It is small, with strings going around the hips, a small piece of cloth in the back, and cloth in the front.  Many girls wear them, useful in preventing "Panty Lines" from coming through when they wear tight pants.  Also, a huge turnon for guys when girls bend over, and they pop up about the pants.What comes out when someone with a lisp tries to say the word "song"1.underwear that makes guys horny when they see the strings pulled up and the cheeks of an ass when a girl wheres a dress on a windy day
2. Panties that girls where so that they leave a less distinct pantyline so they dont look like there wearing grandma panties in booty shorts1). A peice of lingerie that goes up your ass. Comfortable. Most would disagree, but some say it is comfy, like me.

2). A sandle or flip flop worn in Summer.Retro Definition: Rubber, slip-on sandals (a.k.a. 'flip-flops' or 'jap-flaps'), usually worn for water activities. This definition has been provided as a Public Service Announcement.Thongs are a type of footwear, also known as 'Flip-Flops'. Not to be mistaken with the sexy [thong] garment of underwear.Australian for cheap rubber footwear, known as [flip flops]or [jandles] in New zealand, dunno what yanks call them.A perpetual wedgie.the word used in Australia, to define flip flops.an occupation that involves taking (stripping) one's clothes off for the sexual stimulation of others. most strippers are female.A girl that guys are dumb enough pay $20 for a 5 minute dry hump.  She swoons at his ridiculous pickup lines and laughs at his stupid jokes to make him think he's getting somewhere with her, so he continues to fork out the money in hopes of impressing her to the point that he'll get more than just a case of blue balls and an experience to jack off to before going to bed that night.  But after giving her the last of his money, she tells him she'll be right back.  After several minutes he realizes she isn't coming back, so he leaves the club disappointed and flat broke, and as he's leaving, he sees her grindin her ass into some other dumb bastard's lap.A stupid bitch who got pregnant when she was a teenager by a losser and now gets naked for dollars to support her bastard childSomebody (usually a woman) who uses provocative dance whilst dis-robing to extract money from sad, sex-starves letches.A woman who seeks to relive her chaotic childhood experience by disrobing and rubbing her snatch on a brass pole in front of men that care for her like her father did.woman with a hot body that is really dead inside. they give u pleasure without sex and take all ur cash. if u make a move on her, her big black bitches will beat the shit out of you and take all ur moneyThe official occupation of a  [single mother],  or any struggling woman trying to make  [ends]  meet1.  A person who takes off their clothes and dances around to make money.
2.  A peeler or ripperFlashy, showy. An item or person who, superficially, appears better than they actually are.
Deliberately trying to look good but lacking substance(unlike [spongey]) 
In the case of people, usually accompanied by an arrogant or over-confident sense of self-absorbtion.An individual; male or female, with the athletic prowess of a jungle cat and the tits (or balls) enough to take off their clothes and dance around butt naked in front of a crowd of people for tips. These people are adept in the art of flirting, fantasy creation and erotic dance. Not a profession for the weak willed or faint of heart, it is an art not understood by many and thus often disrespected.prostitute. started in the civil war When Gen.Hooker of the Union Army (the first [pimp]) tried to protect his troops from VD by buying the best chicks and pimping them to his corps of 20,000 men. orginally hooker's girls.A not-so-rare breed of female that is overtly loose between the legs.  Much like dinosaurs, these creatures cannot see anything unless it moves.

Sometimes called "street t-rex"1. A source of pleasure, mainly sex, bt only if payed.
2. Target practice.The "new" cool. Sort of like kool, kewl, wet, or badass. This word can be used to replace cool to make your sentences all the better!Term used to describe a type of female that is:

- Easy to [bang]
- Takes money for sex
- Disappointed male does not get anyA woman who is wise above others in the art of sexual satisfaction and [love].  In ancient times, these women were considered to be priestesses and were given their own temples where they could teach their art to others for a large sum of money.   These women were highly respected and cherished for their extensive knowledge of lovemaking/giving, and their spiritual understanding.  

Later, the christian religion would have a great negative effect on these women's lives, mostly because the spiritual beliefs of these cunt-lovin' cultures were pagan (a big no-no to chiristianity).   as christianity spread, people started to see sex as a sin, and the priestesses were slowly blacklisted.  today, this christian idea of sex as a sin still stands, and hookers are now considered criminals.A woman (usu) who receives money for chugging the snotty end of a piss pump until the "john's" fuck stick blows a bileous ball bilge bolis of throat yogurt down the back of her crack smoking gullet.A [prostitute]. Usually, prostitutes are females, but plenty of prositutes are males.

Hookers sell their bodies to a variety of people, from unassuming men to really freaky characters. Just imagine having sex with half a dozen strange men each day for money: it's not a pleasant thought.

And prostitutes don't have sex for money because they like it; it's about the money. They might often hate their line of work, but they have no other way out.

Hookers range from the [chic] [call girl], who is higher class and has control over the situation, to the lowly [streetwalker], who is vulnerable to attack or police entrapment.

And remember: use a [condom] if you're with a prostitute, unless you want [clamydia], [gonorrhea], [herpes], [AIDS], [hepatitis], [syphilis], or other *charming* diseases.A sexy woman who fucks men who need to be fucked. A woman who gives pleasure to desperate males like me when In need of pussy.Slang,What you might call a close friend. used like the word buddy or pal.not the traditional definition. OR, a reference to girls or women that might, or might not be actual women for hire.What i always call my friend Bill X when i see him, and he responds in the same fashion.1.Actual bowling, with 10 pins and 1 ball.
2. Masturbating, with 2 balls and 1 pin.Simply a codeword for smoking Cannabis to be used around non-users1. Noun; The sport in which you throw a bowling ball at pins.
2. Verb; usually means to smoke weed (hints the word "bowl"ing)When engaging in sexual intercourse, in the doggy style position, place your middle finger and ring finger in the females anal sphincter and your thumb in her vagina and grip vigorously like it's a bowling ball while you pump and thrust.Same rules as bowling except instead of knocking down pins each player must cash a bowl.
Strike = One hit to cash the bowl
Spare = Two hits to cash the bowl
Gutter Ball = A person Volcano's or drops the pins (danks)When a female rubs her breast against another females vagina in an up and down motion which can lead to orgasm.Filling all three of a woman's holes during the act of sexual intercourse, as if she was a bowling ball.  This can be done by three men, or by one man using the penis and hands (a modified [shocker]) or by one man taking turns at each hole.throwing an oversized, [extremely] heavy, painted coconut at pinsThe act of sticking you thumb in a womans ass while hitting it from the back, holding her ass such as a bowling ball.The act of transferring a joint roach into a bowl to finish it off.Someone who frequently dates girls that other guys have thrown out like trash.  Usually goes for girls that are getting over a bad breakup.bench player, who has the primary quality of burning minutes and chipping in the occassional goal.

Term mostly used in hockey, but can also be used in basketball or baseball.individual(s) who pick up your trash.  If left out on a certain day each week.1) someone who picks up girls who have recently split from their partners. Regarded as a [twat] by all those around him.
2) Someone who picks up a lot of points from rebounds in American Sports.A guy who constantly picks up, or takes out, horrifically trashy women."Who can take the trash and the twisty things too? 

--- The garbage man can, the garbage man can!"The process of which a man shits inside a girls vagina then fucks her. This could be used instead of lube.When you see someone hitting on a person and it falls through so that person continues to hit on someone else until they succeed. It can also be a person that is a last resort.A garbageman is a man with a massive package, and he flaunts it, by wearing tight shorts, undies, kilts, etc.
He WILL place his 'junk' on you, if he feels aroused and/or threatened.  Typically used in homosexual/incestual type situationsA sex move during which a man penetrates a woman who is in the process of vomiting.  Ideally, pelvic thrusts will coincide with gastric contractions.The black man's 747.A special mode of transportation of asorted goods and persons. Involving large vehicles claimed to be 'busses' which are secretly cheaply created allein space-crafts bringing the opeouts to the masses.Very short skirt, only an inch from the *hare*.Best pets every! there lazy and dont move most of the time... but will get up every one and awhile to greet you1. A large bus, derived from the company greyhound. Commonly used to transport those who cannot afford faster, more efficient or more luxurious transportation.

2. An alcoholic beverage mixing gin, and grapefruit juice.Racing dog.

A bus that goes state to state.The Runaway's method of running awayTo fatally injure by decapitation with a hunting knife.For people unable to afford quicker and more efficient methods of transportation.

A wonderful way to see the worst parts of many cities across the country.1. A hot, older man aged 56 yo and up a dilf. 2. The final step in the dilf/hound dog continuum.Short for [Warped Tour]. A punk rock concert tour that occurs every summer. It usualy has around 6 stages and near or more than 50 bands. The Warped Tour is sponsered by Vans and has been running for just over 10 years.To be convoluted, twisted, rippled or distorted.when a person gets so crazy high that they begin to see things with a distorted appearance, as if they are warped.

usually affective after smoking very chronic weed or getting hella fucked up from anything else.Cool or funny in a weird way.1. something that is so insanely cool
2. unbelieveableAfter you have smoked a lot of marajuana, u feel in the zone, (the place where you want to be)and altered

(another meaning for stoned,baked,blazed)1)getting high.2)severly underrated red hot chili peppers songAnother way of saying WTFOne sexy biatch, Constantly harrased by Flea, Moxin and Subotai for sexual favors but they're below Warped and not in his his league.When a person gets so [seshed] they start to lose touch with reality.  Almost a high sensation.

See [sesh].The act of vomiting, hurling, barfing, losing lunch, tossing cookies, ralfing, throwing up, yacking, retching, technicolour yawning, spewing, blowing chunks, and/or other forms of physical illness.What happened that time in seventh grade when you walked in on your parents.Slang meaning to vomit.  The word 'puke' is sometimes considered offensive.1. the act of vomiting
2. vomit itself

See also [word]mag[/word]to pour acidic vomit from you stomach out your face.to vomitFilipino term for vagina or pussy; the hole between the legs of a woman where the penis goes in and out until ejaculation occurs; (pronounced as "pooh - key")Tagalog for female genitalsExtremely annoyingThe act of or the action of relieving your stomach contents in a matter of bile, food, or other stomach contents is projected from the stomach to the esophagus out of the mouth. Also known as throwing up.Indifference; to be used when one simply does not care."The verbal equivalent of a shrug of the shoulders." -quoth meused in the greatest tv show of all time [The Simpsons]. in the episode Hungry, Hungry Homer, bart and lisa respond to a homer inquiry with "meh". mystery solvedMeh is used to describe any and every word possible, including:
Yes
No
maybe
kind of
never
always
ok
alright
no thankyou
yes please
look bitch i really dont care so just shut the fuck up
if you want
whatever
If you wnat
i dont want to really
well
shut up
i dont really care
no honestly, i dont care...

...and is never explained on which is actually used...An interjection used to imply indifference towards a subject; "a verbal shrug".  This particular interjection has somehow become quite popular among teens, the reason for this popularity is a mystery.  Other popular interjections are "bleh", "dah", and "mih".  Usu. pronounced shortly, without eye contact or body movement.This is a universal, non-commital answer to every question ever posed. Its the answer that deosn't actually give any answer.A random word when people either don't know what to say, don't care, can't answer a question or are too drunk to form a coherent english phrase.Indifference, or I do not care, also whateverAn expression of [apathy].Meh is used to say whatever, I don't care, I don't have an answer, I have nothing else to say, I'm frustrated, not interested or your joke isn't funny.The only thing that's fun to do anymore.An escape from life, like (see [weed]).  When you get back, the problems of life hit you in the face like a brick.The only thing that brings me joy.computerized games involving many gernes of typesa form of entertainment that is composed of any type of game put into a digital image on a screen and is operated by the player through means of a control connected to a form of a console 

commonly a scapegoat for politicians and crappy parents 

my hobbyThe target of every [Soccer mom], [politician], and [feminist] who (1) has never played a videogame in her life, (2) doesn't know how to discipline her kid, thanks to all the time she spent marrying and divorcing 4 or 5 times, and (3) is looking for an easy [scapegoat] for her incompetence.3D or 2D virtual games that can waste your time for good and fun.One of the best forms of entertainment.a true test of skill, unless you have it on fuckin easy you nerd!A program that is more than a form of entertainment. It offers us an escape from the dullness of reality, a place where we can do things we actually can't.passing a homeless person on your way to a [coin star] machine.a word used by prude or unattractive girls in situation in which they feel weirded out by the presence of a confident young guy trying to make conversationhaving your flat mate walk in on you while you are making out with yourself in the mirror, moaning, and saying in a deep, sexy, voice: "oh, baby".1. Ungraceful; ungainly.
2. Clumsily or unskillfully performed.
3. Marked by or causing embarrassment or discomfort.When two pedophiles meet up after chatting as 15 year olds online.A common word overused by kids in junior high, almost in the same group with "LOL" and "random!". Used to try and impress your preteen friends after or during a long pause between conversations. Also used by idiots whenever there is a pause in speech. Sometimes accompanied by a hand motion resembling a turtle or a turkey.Interjection used in a situation that is slightly uncomfortable, often accompanied by a gesture where the lower arm is thrust out parallel to the ground with the hand open and fingers together with thumb on top.Interjection used in a situation that is slightly uncomfortable, often accompanied by a virety of gestures: 1. Pulling the collar with one finger (this represents the sweat collecting under the collar from the AWKWARD situation) 2. Arms form a triangle over the head (such as the A in YMCA) 3. One finger pointing at the back of the other hands wrist 4. Pointing at the back of the neckA comment made by a third party in response to someone saying something inappropriate or embarrasing themselves in some way, thus causing an awkward silence for several seconds.

Saying "awkard" is often a remark deliberately aimed at stating the obvious to make the situation just that little bit more cringe-worthy.

for related topic please see [ground swallow me up], [dig a hole] and [keep digging]A situation which is of a significant amount of discomfort, and a subject of hilarity and confusion for those not involved.Round objects dangling in a scrotum. Only men have testicles. Women love to kick, knee, squeeze, or otherwise abuse them. When struck, testicles cause extreme pain.A word you say when there is awkward silence in a room with three or more people.1. Two walnut-sized coils of tubing inside the [scrotum] containing the reproductive fluid of a male, [semen]. 

2. An ancient greek hero.Testicles or testes are the pair of male glands that produce sperm fluid; the tiny sperm in the fluid each contain half the 'information' required to produce another being of the same species. The other half is provided by the egg that is produced in the female equivalent glands called ovaries. When sperm is spurted into the female via the penis and has travelled through the cervix into the womb, the thousands of sperm surround the 'waiting' egg and when one sperm is successful in piercing the egg, the egg, which is hundreds of times larger than the sperm, then prevents further sperm from doing so. The egg is then "fertilized" and eventually grows into a new being of the same species.

The testicles also produce a hormone called testosterone; this hormone in large doses is what makes a being grow into a male. Thus testicles are what makes a male a male!

Unfortunately for mammals, the testicles have to be on the outside of the body so that they do not get too warm. They are composed of tiny tubes or sperm ducts where the sperm are produced; these tubes are coiled up like very thin coils of spaghetti and are contained within an outer cover attached to the body by a thicker tube (the testicle or sperm chord). This chord has a thin walled swelling at the testicle end called the “Epididymis” and this is protected by being at the back of the testicle. This swelling is very important because it is where the sperm is stored and reaches full maturity after being produced in the sperm ducts or tubes. Both the testicles are contained in a special skin bag called the scrotum that adjusts to keep the testicles at the right temperature; closer to the body in cold external temperatures and further from the body in warm external temperatures.

Because they are delicate, testicles have many nerve endings and these are made to cause pain if struck or put under pressure so that the owner will take care not to damage them. This pain is extreme and is not solely confined to the testicles and even a fairly moderate blow can cause debilitation by causing the owner to go into shock; a very hard blow can not only rupture the testicle, but can cause so much shock that the owner dies.

Human nature being what it is, testicles are very often the subject of torture to force a man to tell all he knows as in almost all cases, no man can withstand the pain caused.

Women also find testicles a welcome vulnerability in an otherwise much stronger assailant in self-defence; the famous kick in the balls is a great equalizer.

Additionally, because testicles, along with the penis, are an observable difference in the sexes and because they are what make a man a man, they are often the target (both mental and real!) of female hate (and revenge!) for making men “the way they are”!The Fountains of Cum. Where all the [cum] cums from. Ladies: love'em, tickle'em, lick'em but just don't squeeze'em!A greek philosopher from 348 BCE, worked along Socrates.
His name is pronounced (pronounced Test-uh-cleez)The symbol of manhood. They are what makes a man a man.you gotta be fucking kidding me... looking up testicles in the urban dictionary??1. What no one would be here without.
2. Source of extra muscle, adrenaline, and power.
3. What makes feminists hypocritical.The two [round[ [balls] in the sack under the mans '[shaft]'.a streatchy strapless top for woman that is one of the hottest, sexyest most gorgious femane articles of clothing ever invented. they look amazing on the right girls but when worn by the rong girl it's just plain creepy!a person who is consistently a bad time; a bummera strapless, cylindrical top.Euphemism for someone who drops a huge, usually long, piece of shit. As a lumberjack lays logs, this person laid their log into the toilet.The lumberjack is an exciting sexual maneuver which should be only attempted by professionals.  

In this case, the woman is on all fours and the man enters her from behind (see "doggie style").  Hole choice is completely up to the lumberjack himself.  When he is ready to cum, he yells "TIMmmBERRRrrrr" and takes out the woman's arms with a svelte swooping motion.  The woman then, like a tree, falls to the bed.  During the fall, the woman experiences excitement as well as fear during her zero gravity experience as she realizes impact is imminent.  This leads to the tightening of her vaginal and anal cavities, yielding an astonishing feeling and hence orgasm for the lumberjack.

Extra points can be scored on this maneuver by the close and careful placement of the woman in relation to the headboard.  When the woman's arms are taken out, her head slams into the headboard.  Very fun!The man who singsA girl that is so disgusting, that she makes you lose a boner. she "cuts down your wood".Lumberjacks are the second most awesome people group, after [Pirates], and before [Ninjas].  

Real Lumberjacks have an ax and existed long ago and wear flannel, suspenders, and pants.  They have hairy faces and kick ass.  They will cut down any forest easy, because they are awesome.  

Fake Lumberjacks are the modern day lumberjacks who wear bright orange and they use chainsaws because they are too weak to use an ax.  They also eat lots of flapjacks.  Sing and breakdance.

The most awesome lumberjack ever was Paul Bunyan, he was kickass.  
A lumberjack's ax is NOT spelled with an e like "axe".  Only norsemen had axes.A gentleman who earns his living by felling trees. We all owe him a debt of gratitude for providing the material for our homes and furniture. This gentleman is soundly hated by the [environmentalist] who lives in a timber house.A red and black flanel jacket, coat, or shirt popular in the 80s and 90s.  Actual lumberjacks wear these often.To fuck over an entire fanbase by writing, producing, and airing a television series finale episode so poor that even a union of hookers think it sucks more than they do. Named after the surprise regarding protagonist Dexter Morgan's fate at the end of the series finale of television show [Dexter].Term used to describe a chick that gives a lot of handjobs...(hand ho). One who "jacks lumber" (Gives hand jobs)A sexual act involving 2 men and 1 woman with large, floppy breasts. The woman lays on her back, while each man slides his penis under a breast from each side. To avoid touching each other in the middle, the men coordinate going back and forth, like 2 lumberjacks sawing down a tree.

May also be referred to as a "See-saw"Someone who will tell you that religion is science and science is a religion.Polite way of saying "dumbass".A person who believes that the biblical account of Genesis is a literal, scientific document, and that all scientific knowledge of evolution and geology are mistaken and/or misrepresented by biased scientists. According to Creationists, the world was created in 6 days some 4 to 6 thousand years ago, God placed fossils into various depths of the Earth for no apparent reason (or that, since fossils are so rare, not all co-existing animals were fossilized together) all species where created individually (with allowance for individual variation and common design themes, but no common anscestry), that all life was harmonious before the fall of man (hence carnivores ate grass), that dinosaurs (which are said to be referred to in the bible as "leviathan" and "behemoth" and are supposedly represented in ancient art) lived at the same time as humans, and that they were whiped out in the biblical flood because they couldn't fit into Noah's Ark (or that he only fit the small ones, in which case some dinosaurs might be alive today). 

To promote these views, creationists often misrepresent the data themselves, in an effort to discredit science and abuse it to validate their own beliefs. Hence, they are extremely critical of any and all (overwhelming) evidence that does not support their views while using bogus or equivocal data to prove theirs. 

This doesn't work. 

Any close, unbiased examination of the evidence reveals that nearly all of the creationist's claims are found wanting. I will not list those reasons here but will instead include a few links below.

Creatonists aim to keep the American public ignorant of evolution and science (which they have done a pretty good job of doing, as recent polls suggest) and desire that creation be taught in public schools along with evolution. 

This would be about as ridiculous as teaching two different versions of the Holocaust in history classes (as some people claim that it never happened, and can back up this claim with phony evidence) or teaching an alternate flat earth theory (which another society can find "evidence" for) in geography. 

That is not to say that there isn't a place for Genesis in the sphere of public education, but that would most likely be in courses involving theology, religion, culture, anthropology, and philosophy. 

The moral here, of course, is that one shouldn't look to science to back up theology and vice versa.

Here are some links to learn the truth and why "creation scientists" are wrong (the links themselves can't be included because this site can't have words with more than 50 characters--wtf??). Go to a search engine and type in:

www.talkorigins.org

And perhaps Karl Thornley's page on Theistic Evolution for a few more good links.Mindless cretin who thinks that "Goddidit!"a person who believes, despite overwhelming evidence to the contrary, that every single word in the good book is 100 percent factual.  They tend to exhibit outward signs of basic intelligence and know a lot of big words, occasionally even well educated, but have the general intelligence of a shoe.  See also : brainwashed.One that thinks that hundreds of different scientist who all came to the same conclusionregarding the creation of the human species must be wrong because the Bible says so.  They tend to try and have scientific truth banned from their childrens' schools.An ignorant person who feels that the bible must be taken litteraly and any science that contradics what their book says (despite the fact there are different translations of the bible pointing to different things) is wrong. That would be all of science by the way. There is no science at all to suport their ignorant and idiotic claims.
 A creationist will not accept the theory of evolution, despite it being fundemental to modern biology & genetics, and do not understand what theory means in scientific literature. They realy dont like this theory at all. 
 They normaly try to discrace 'evolutionists' and often attempt to imply that science can only be science if it is looked at from a religious perspective when quite the opposite is true. They accept a point and then ty and prove it, the opposite of the scientific method.
 Finaly most know nothing about science and simply follow their faith. Many creationist leaders give themselves the title of Dr. Nearly all of these 'doctors' aquired their degrees from uncredited degree mills.

See www.talkorigins.com for a refutal of creationist claims.A person who thinks he/she knows more about science than an actual scientist.Synonymous with [idiot]often used to describe something stupid or unfortunate; can replace the common slang word "gay"Hatred of women. Often rewarded by a slap in the face.In reference to the city, let's just say that you know you're from there if any of the following apply to you:Power that comes form diversity.... Pride that comes from making it to the top....The greatest Fucking city in the world.Where my heart will always be no matter where I go.  

New York = Home1. The 11th state to join the union.
2. Also refers to NYC, or as most ignorant people think- Manhattan. (Oh, yeah, there's also The Bronx, Brooklyn, Queens and Staten Island)The Empire State where the greatest city and the capital of the world dwells. NYC or the five boroughs of south NY. The 1st capital of the country from 1785-1790. Home of Broadway theatre, home of the best pizza(NY style) in the world, home of the best franks(Nathans and Papiaya)in the world, also the place where the term 'Hot Dog' was coined, birth place of the potato chip(Saratoga ,NY),the media capital of the world, business capital of the world, largest department store in the world(Macy's 34th st.),Birth place of Hip Hop culture, one of the fashion capital of the world, home of the largest and greatest subway system in the world along with the 1st in the country. And home of the greatest and most successful team in sports(NY Yankees).best bagels, best pizza, best italian food period, best places to shop, its awesome.. u can go out east on LI or manhattan or upstate NY. new york is a great place to live. 

oh yeah and upstate is part of new york u idiot. if u wanna talk about the city say NYC. i'm sure upstate NY people write NY on their mail. you can't argue that or you're just dumb.I am from New York. I curse a lot. I say mad instead of wicked. I like the YANKEES. I know what REAL pizza tastes like, and I know that a bagel is much more than a roll with a hole in the middle. They're sprinkles...not jimmies. I play BEER PONG not beirut. I judge people by what exit they get off the highway. It's not called the shore, it's the BEACH. Its a wedge or a sub NOT a hoagie! It's not New York City or Manhattan, it's 'THE' CITY. Two words...MOTHER FUCKER. I know that 55 mph really means 85. When someone cuts me off, they get the horn AND the finger."Basically the greatest state in the entire country...better yet, the world.  New Yorkers are also the best people around.  Sure, we can be arrogant and yes, from time to time we're prissy bitches.  But NOTHING is finer than a New York girl...or the taste of REAL pizza and bagels.  We're the only state that you can say "The City" and know you're referring to NYC.  We have the best shopping, the best Christmas Tree, the best Parades...oh right and the best baseball team that ever existed and I'm NOT talking about the Mets.  All in all, New York rapes your state by being better in EVERY way imaginable.  I <3 NY.To the general public:
A large city on the United State's east coast

To the people who live there:
The center of the universeYour current boss.someone being arrogant, rude, obnoxious, or just a total dickhead....Your [butt] hole. Were your [shit] comes out.A person in another car who cuts you off to get to the next lane, almost hits you while talking on the phone.An obnoxious, arrogant, self-centered male who women can't seem to get enough of.Anyone who doesn't do exactly what you think they ought to do, exactly when you think they ought to do it.The worst kind of person.  You cannot fully construct a meaning that fully encompasses what this vicious insult means.  If you're an asshole, you are disgusting, loathesome, vile, distasteful, wrathful, belligerent, agoraphobic, and more.  Assholes are human fecal matter.  They are the lowest of the low.  They transcend all forms of immorality.  It is the very worst of insults; to be called an asshole is to have your very soul ripped apart and shat on.  I say that the word "asshole" is the worst cussword of the english language, worst than fuck, shit, and cunt combined.A grave in which to place a Donkey.An alternate word for aviator-style sunglasses with very dark or mirrored lenses.

While assholes are worn by people from all walks of life, these are the primary wearers: [pigs], pretty much everyone in the movie [Top Gun] (chicks included), obese motorcyclists, [rent-a-cop]s, yacht owners, hipsters, construction workers, and aging retirees who like to fish and drink watery American piss-beer.

Assholes may also worn by non-assholes for the ironic effect.1. A person who you feel needs to have the fuck beaten out of him
2. This dipshit I know named AlbertAn exceedingly large penis belonging to an opinionated man.A natural leader of men. Women want him and men want to be him. He drives a tank with three wind shield wipers. He commands an army of troops and often takes them on field trips for r. and r. He receives many perks from the civilian population such as a third free entree from applebees when he purchases the 2 for $20 meal deal. He is currently training troops in Orlando Florida.A Military rank for an Officer usualy below general and above Lieutenant Colonel, Major, Captain, and Lieutenant.Kentucky Fried Chicken or KFC [fast food] joint; after its deceased [mascot], Col. Harlan SandersAn [idiot] who lives for [slow pitch] [softball]. Plays [catcher]. Thinks he's [Batman]. Likes to give shit, doesn't like to get shit. Has an excuse for anything that doesn't go his way, yet will give you reasons why you can't do the same thing. Picks fights and then resorts to "I'll sue your ass" if you call him on it. Basically a 5 year old [spoiled child].1.Military rank

2.A characters from the video game Mega Man X4.
  Has a sister called Iris. He is working with Repliforce
  and later dies during the rebellion.
  Some people believe Iris and Colonel were the same person    
and got split into 2 : THIS IS NONSENSE AND BS.A shitty baseball teamname of the un popped pieces of corn at the bottom of a pop corn bowl.a short stalky man that is balding with comb over, stutters and says um constantly, very strict and continues to create problems with the cadets.  talks for hours on end and bores the students to sleep, treats the kids like they have not a clue in the world about whats going on and how they could do anything in the world to change a thing...A stocky man of medium height, very solid build, tends to draw himself up to full height when excited, or early in the mornings. Very poor sense of balance, becomes ill and vomits easily, especially when being talked to. Very popular, especially among ladies, talks to anyone. Enjoys the occasional flap in the wind. Cousin to [Princess Sophie].Believing that the group one belongs to, be it of sex, creed, or color, is automatically superior to another's.One who believes that their gender, group, or kind is superior to others.1. A British [chav] - a white urban Brit who enjoys picking fights with strangers and acting tough. Chav is a shortened version of the term and is used much more often.

2. A [jingoist] - a person who is fiercely nationalistic and will side with their country no matter what - right or wrong - and call anyone who disagrees with them a traitor. Common in parts of the UK and in the Southern and Midwestern US.

3. A [male chauvinist] - a man who treats women as inferior or considers men better than women. A [sexist]. Common in fundamentalist [Christian] and [Islamic] cultures.A usually male jerk who feel he is superior because he has a penis. Although many of us know that it is just them compensating because they have no penis, they may also compensate with a car their parents bought them. Typically, they have no standards, will have sex with just about anyone, and they are also CHEATERS.someone who tends to stay up late into the nightSomeone who stays up late and sleeps in the day.A girl you sleep with that you don't want your friends to know about. Typically some easy girl you meet at a bar or party that is willing to sleep with you A.S.A.P.A meth user that stays on the pourch all night at a the meth house, watching everything, usually a paranoid tweaker.Suffix added to any noun to describe the biggest/baddest/meanest/nastiest of its type. Dervied from Godzilla, Japan's national hero, 60's movie star, and general all around badass.A person (or gaming nerd) who has a complex about his/her status and image when playing Computer Games.

He / She doesn't like losing and will come up with all sorts of excuses.

It's what defines the person's life as he/she doesn't really have one and therefore they will vigorously defend their status so they are not seen as a 'noob' online.adj.; when used as a suffix for a proper name or specific entity, becomes part of that noun.

Derived from [Godzilla], the gargantuan reptilian star of Japanese "B" horror [movie] genre. Introduced in 1954 as "Gojira", Godzilla is the embodiment of all that is massive, destructive, and extremely difficult to defeat. Ergo, "'zilla" in both the stand-alone adjective and suffix forms represents those same charecteristics. Linguistically, the "z-l" [combo] has stronger audiological [punch] than "j-r", thus giving "'zilla" more connotative [power] than "'jira".Derived from Godzilla, it could be another word for "monster", or just the meanest, baddest thing of any type of person or animalreal biganother term of monster, basically, it come from godzilla, but now, zilla it self trend to means any type of monster, like kingkong, godzilla,dinosaur,Jaws..etca suffix which can be used on pretty much any word.  

(1) a suffix personifying the root word

(2) just a suffix used to make a word more intense (read: retarded)The ultimate compliment known to man and the highest achievement the common man can achieve. Closely followed by a Nobel Prize.1. a type of vann
2. a sooners fan
3. a chokeran individual who displays many animilastic qualities; stems from the species velocirapter, which was known for its rather savage dispositionA girl who gets around the block mostly from drunk hook ups and one night stands and has a ton miles. Pretty much the last resort for a dude just lookin for a nut. Also known as a one hitter quitter.something that is radical, cool, or otherwise awesome. something that is snow is generally the shit, being top score, bitchin, etc. the word is derived from the fact that snow is generally off the hook in its beauty, power, and pimperyCoke, cocaine. Used primarily by huffing through the nostrils snow can also be freebased and inhaled.1.  Frozen [precipitation] that is white, powdered and falls to the ground in winter.

2.  [Static] on the TV.

3.  [Coke] or [cocaine].

4.  A white Canadian rapper who had a hit in 1992 with the reggae influenced [Informer].  

5.  White girls.A frozen white fluffy form of rain that will keep you out of school for a day. Usually seen in the winter season.stuff that falls from the sky at christmas and it tastes nicefinely powdered cocainea white precipitate that turns every driver within a 75 mile radius of Chicago completely retarded.1 - White, cold, soft, slightly frozen water that falls from the sky in winter. Also tastes nice. Beware of yellow snow.
2 - Cocaine or crack. A white powder powder narcotic. Also called blow, charlie, snowflake.1. mislead, especially by overwhelming with (mis)information
2. deceive
3. hoodwink
4. bamboozleIt is the process of adding lots of small hole-punched papers into a [nugget]ed back pack.1. To whine
2. To Bitch
3. Also see "protesting" -A debate strategy commonly used by Ridgeview and Bakersfield High schools
4. The only lesson jv members at the aforementioned schools learn about
5. Protesting Manuals are equivalent to evidence at these schools.A temporary gathering of people designed to speak out against a cause or political event.  Rarely works because the politicians who are being protested against usually send the [riot police] to "calm down" the protesters.A [mosh pit] for [people] who [care] about [important issues].The act of a diabetic urinating in their partners mouth. Basically a stronger, more pungent lemonade mouth.Made from Orange Pekoe Tea leaves this non-alcoholic beverage, served cold and moslty below the [Mason Dixon line] is a Southerners favorite treat on a hot day (or with pork [BBQ]).  Sugar is added at the time just after brewing "while the tea is still hot".  This allows the sugar to disolve more evenly and produces a fine treat.  Can be garnished with a Lemon.   (See also [Ice Tea])Liquid amazing.A sweet drink said to extend the average human's life by 10-15 years.A reference to males that are sexually interested in minors (both male and female). Said males cannot refuse sweet tea and it is often used to lure them into police traps.

It is believed that pedophiles are fueled on the stuff. McDonalds has recently attempted to capitalize on this fact.

See: [To Catch a Predator]The act of dipping ones testicles in sugar, and smearing them across your opponents face.Semen, jizz, baby gravy. Usually spilled by the half gallon, sprayed all around a room, sometimes on electronic equipment for maximum effect.A female person who believes themself to be  amazing, astonishing , aweinspiring , impressive , intimidating, magnificent, majestic, mind-blowing,The One and Only.

Can also mean crazy woman.southern drink....specially in the area of Tennesse...where the hot bitches are...it is known that by drinking this beverage it will give an avarage girl the power of being hot...also gives you an awesome souther accent...but the word can be used as "cool" or "sweet" on any ocation..The drink of choice for the low class. Extremely low quality tea with a pound of sugar per cup. Also known as, rot your teeth out tea, and we wonder why southerners have such nasty teeth.Generally the acronym used for barbecue, it has evolved into a piece of the internet vernacular. 

Used to poke fun by attaching it to common acronyms such as [wtf], [omg] and [hax].an acronym used for barbecue but sometimes used to point out the absurdity of using acronyms online.Often used to parody online acronyms, this originally stood for "better be quick," usually used in online games.Short for "bitches be queefing". Queefing is the discharge of air from the vaginal tract, known as vaginal flatulence.Originally started on irc channels and then used in instant messengers meaning "be back quick". More recently used as a leet speak variant meaning "barbecue" in conjunction with phrases and other acronyms mainly meant to tease the lesser experienced.Melbourne Australian slang for sexual encounterCommonly used abbreviation meaning "Bitch Be Quiet". Other meanings have also been assigned to the same letter combination, however, these are of course wrong, as this usage is clearly the best and only possibly meaning for BBQ. (Not...)Big Bad Queer

A person who is trying to act all cool and badass ended up looking and sounding all gay,stupid,and hated by others.1. A shortened version of the word "barbecue"

2. An Internet slang term for things such as Be Back, Queers, Better be Quick, and Bitch Be Quiet, among other terms.bitch be quiet. linked with wtf bbqFoolish, destructive, evil sect.

I was happily married and had two wonderful little boys.
The mother of my first wife "got religion" with the JWs and then brainwashed her daughter to become one.
As an atheist I accept other's ideas, so I went along with the idea and accepted her going to the JW meetings where she was indocrinated into their ideas. However, at the insistence of her local JWs she started to try and convince me to go and become one if them.
I said that I was happily an atheist and that the bible was written by men not God.
From then on things went from bad to worse and I was officially and publicly declared to be The Devil.

We divorced and I am now happily remarried with two lovely girls.

Jehova's Witnesses directly caused the breakup of my marriage and caused two innocent young boys to be subjected to the pain and loss which now, after 30 years still affects my oldest boy.

Jehova's Witneses are evil fools.They are not lazy at all because they do all the normal stuff like raise a family, work, go to school and they still manage to get god's word out regurly. AND, it's spelled Jehovah's WitnessesFor the correct spelling and grammar, see [Jehovah's Witnesses].a group of annoying [pricks] who believe in some [shit] about this [god] or something.they go around "spreading gods message" if you ever see one pray to god that a double decker bus falls on them from the sky before they start [preaching] there shit to youUsually spelled Jehovah's Witness.  A strict religious group in which members cannot celebrate holidays or birthdays, but rather spend their time going door to door annoying people with their views and beliefs.A splinter movement of the Jehovah's Witnesses that considers excess of 'H's to be an abomination before the Lord. Jehovah's Witnesses believe their group to be founded on a spelling error, but Jehova's Witnesses know that is just the sort of blasphemy those H-lovers would resort to.annoyingAlso known as J DUB. A religion which grants its members a reason to be lazy and do nothing with their lives nor get involved in anything important as they are serving God, not man.A well-worn, unglamorous bar, often serving a cheap, simple selection of drinks to a regular clientele.  

The term can describe anything from a comfortable-but-basic neighborhood pub to the nastiest swill-slinging hole.Home.This place is going to be stinky and lame. You don't come here for the drinks, you come here to eliminate sobriety. All of the regulars there have a smoker's voice and a hard look to them. If you try to go there dressed nicely, you will get stared at and singled out. Wear shoes that you wouldn't mind squashing some roaches in.A scummy bar whose patrons are primarily on the prowl for a one night standA [bar] that is sleazy, poorly maintained and in overall bad shapeAt one time a deep, earthy, and universally respected genre of folk music embraced by people from all walks of life, and performed by heartland poets who wrote touching melodies and thought-provoking but subtle messages about life, love, and loss, country music has now grown into a dim shadow of its former greatness.  

Record companies have appropriated it for their own profit as they will with any great artistic movement.  Insipid, voiceless dandies with the depth of wading pools have been propped up as the new "idols."  Irresponsible and uninformed political rhetoric has usurped the lyrical foreground, alienating many fans and completely betraying the music's original status as art for the everyman, while mediocrity and uniformity sum up the musical direction.  

If we can ever be blessed again by another visionary, a Williams Sr., a Cash, a Cline, or a Miller, maybe things will change.  But for now, country music remains a brutally raped and distorted picture of art stolen from the artists.A form of music in which the words can be understood, any instrument is game, writing talent is critical, and every song doesn't have to be about horny depressed teenagers singing one or two lines over and over.A music style that used to be about "Cowboys" and "Tractors" and shit. The music was almost always made by a fiddle, acoustic guitar, harmonica, and/or a chello. 

Now, country music is basicly just badly done rock-guitar pop-ballads (or repitive piano pop-ballads) with such themes as "My Wife Left Me", "Im Leaving my Husband", "my Spouse is Dead or a thousnad miles away and i am lonley", and "Drinking Songs", sung by untalented Males who all try to sound the same, and females who either sing like a hurt timid female, or a Strong Independent Woman Who is Leaving Her Boyfriend For Some Unknown Reason. 

Hell, modern country wouldnt even be considered country music if it didnt include that stupid highpitched country noise (i cant describe it. If you have heard country music, you know what im talking about) made by some unknown instrument.a once-vital form of rustic music derived from European styles of folk and dance music made by European immigrants to [America]. It's generally played with instruments like the mandolin, acoustic and steel guitars, fiddle and so on. It used to be about observations of the world, life and love in its complexities. Now it's all cliched, with imagery of cowboys, macho bragadoccio, Southern pride, small town life, "she done him wrong", "tears in my beer", "redneck" living, sentimental tripe like the trend-chasing "Angels Among Us", and "[family values]". Oh yes, and "[God bless the U.S.A.]" [jingoism]. Ever since [Garth Brooks] (who is a watered down [Bob Seger]) hit it big in the [fucking PC 90s], country has been "yuppified" and formulaic. Now there boring piano ballads with cliched lyrics galore sung by lousy [Richard Marx] clones with cowboy hats, the generic [hat acts], pretty ladies singing tunes fit only for shopping mall opening-dedications, sexy ladies who sing corporate pop (no, it don't impress me much) and preachy, jingoistic sentimental crap in the aftermath of all this [9/11] business like the aw-shucks "Where Were You When the World Stopped Turning". This trash is pushed on the [sheep] public by corporate execs in suits.an unbearably irritating form of music that uses the same twangy gee-tar and awful wavering voice to sing about a very short list of topics such as: cheating spouse, alcoholics drinking to excess, pickup trucks, bein' a good-ol-boy, not havin' any a them-thar teeth and screwin' horses. this form of music is generally played at hoot n' annies, box socials, barn dances and every store north of georgia that douche bags go to buy cowboy hats even though they have no legitimate need for them. in order for a person to get any kind of enjoyment out of country music, however minimal, one must fall under one or more of the following categories: white women, having unnatural love for cheap beer, owning a yard full of garbage, 3 or more missing teeth, having a lip full of chewing tobacco, attenders of singles' mingles/family reunions, anyone that owns a tractor and thinks that it automatically makes them a cowboy. the more of these criteria met, the bigger the country music fan you are.example songs: 

"she thinks my trackers sexy"  
"i love this bar" 

enough saidCountry music evolved from folk ballads brought to America by immigrants.It was decent music until asshole record company execs and producers in Nashville, Tennessee (wanting all the money without having to have talent)started pushing the"Nashville sound"aka[Nashville Clowns] in the late 50s and continuing till today.Now all country songs are written by a formula.Whats selling,What topic is hot at the moment etc.. Country acts of today are told how to dress,act ,talk,what their background is ,if they are gonna be outlaws or good guys(stolen from wrestling promotors.also see:[Retards])and what companies products to be seen wearing,eating,drinking and wiping their ass with.Most country stars of today are gleened from Kareoke bars and lounges.Most are from the midwest or east coast but company excecs change their point of origin to Oklahoma,[Texas] or Tennessee.Most "Stars" of today do not write their own material,they purchase the rights to say they have written it.(Travis Tritt)Pose with Harleys and try to act like outlaws(Toby Keith.Although he had to be pulled on a trailer sitting on a bike for his vid after dropping the bike several times and having to receive medical attention to get his head removed from his ass).Most acts of today are a sad lot of record company flunkies listened to by plastic people who buy into their bullshit swaggering and studio player albums(watch their road bands who are paid next to nothing screw up every lick out live)(I dont blame them).The modern day fanbase for these "Stars" of today are a fickle bunch(fame IS fleeting)and the commercial lifespan for these people is short indeed.Most end up broke,without their songs or right to even sing them in public anymore within a year or less.But dont feel sorry for them.They sold out and perpetuated the machine.If they hadnt sold out and wouldve told the record execs to write their own songs, modern country may have stood a chance.Listen to Old(late 60s-late 70s) Waylon,Willie,David Allan Coe,Billy Joe Shaver for a taste of country music unspoiled by the "[Nashville Clowns]"A genre of music that used to be good until it all started sounding the same. After Garth Brooks came into the fold, there were really obcessed country fans and the selling out in country became more common. Nowadays country music is full of acts trying to sound a lot like each other and many artists do not have their individuality, but many did not have that from the start of the genre. Once Waylon Jennings demanded that he would play his own songs like it or not, individual began to increase in the genre. The creativity of the country singer or band is denied when they are not allowed to be creative. Ever since maybe ten years ago or even earlier many acts have been copying each other. Individuality has been more seen in some Alan Jackson, Willie Nelson, Johnny Cash, Waylon Jennings, Bocephus, Eric Church, Brad Paisley, and in the songs of a few other country acts. However Rock, Alternative, Punk, and Metal, and Metalcore ( the one with probably the most freedom of expression and by far the most lyrically deep the majority of the time are the best). However the legacy of country music is being ruined by an attempt to commercialize like pop artists is hurting the genre of country music when they try to be all hip hop and sing about a woman's booty or follow the same formula of every other band in country or rock music. These rock bands they seek to sometimes emulate are southern rock bands, Nickelback, 3 Dooors Down, and Hinder. Honestly, country music is so far on the decline that it has to the potential to turn worse than the pop/dance and techno genres.a type of music where you lose everything you own and takes no talent whatsoever to write lyrics for. Type of music listened to by people who have nothin better in life to do than complain about everything.A genre of music popular among white-trashy inbreeds.  Just listening to it has been proven to lower your IQ.  All the singers sound exactly the same, as if they were purposely trying to sound like hicks.  Someone who listens to country music is usually from a rural, white, bigoted community.A disease that started in Tokyo.  It first infected Gameboys in Japan in 1995.  Then in 1998 the disease infected Gameboys in America.  Soon channel WB11 was infected too, and now Cartoon Network.  The ever-so-popular "Gameboy Advance" systems got infected in 2002, and still is.  In 1999 the disease started spreading via cardboard aka "Pokemon Trading Card Game".  "Nintendo 64" and "Nintendo Gamecube" are infected too.  The disease is also spreading via plastic and metal in the toy isles at Wal-Mart, K-mart, toys-r-us, and every other toy store.  It is now July 2004, almost 10 years after the start of this addicting, argument instigating disease and it is still out there, but not as bad as its most powerful years(1999-2001).Say what you will folks, but Pokemon is one of the greatest games ever released for the Gameboy. Period. 

The problem is that Nintendo, through their misguided policy of inundating the market with a whole wack of crappy, kitschy merchandise, not to mention a t.v show and movies galore, alienated their older players. My theory is that most people who complain about how Pokemon is stupid, are actually disenfranchised former Pokemon players. Cause let's face it, back in the day, everybody, and I mean everybody, played it.

And all that is a real shame, because from a strictly gameplay point of view, Pokemon kicks ass. It should have gone down in history as one of the better video game franchises. But thanks to Nintendo's decision to sell the game to eight year olds, that won't happen.An anime, manga, and nintendo game created in Japan.  Pokemon are creatures that children and teenagers (as well as adults) can capture and train.  The trading card game was one of the first major trading card games that alowed players to not onle trade, but battle as well.  In the anime we follow the story of a young trainer, Ash, and his two friends, Misty and Brock, as they travel togeather on their pokemon journey.  The mange series revolves around rivils Red and Blue as they collect badges and compete in various compititions.no kids, not the garbage pokemon that they made. i mean, THE ORIGINAL. this goes back about 10 years. you guys remember when pokemon blue first came out? i know you all got it for christmas that year! cos i know i did. and i played it all night haha. and pokemon cards were the coolest thing ever. and EVERYONE had them in school, even the real popular kids. if you had a charizard, you were pretty much awesome. you sat for hours arranging your cards in a binder, just staring/reading each and every card. you pretty much had every fact about every pokemon memorized. YOU HAD LIKE 500 SLOWPOKES AND YOU HATED SLOWPOKE BECAUSE OF IT. you woke up at 5 am on school days to watch pokemon. you had a bunch of pokemon toys/stuffed animals. on christmas, if there werent 5 packs of pokemon cards in your stocking, you basically hated everything. when you found a "shiny" card you went completely insane. the number of holographic cards a person had defined how cool they were. you brought your gameboy color everywhere so you could level up your pikachu. you always wanted to evolve pikachu with a thunder stone, but dam game wouldnt let you! you snuck your gameboy into school to play, and the teacher never caught you. YOU SECRETLY STILL PLAY GAMEBOY COLOR SOMETIMES (i know i do). you could bust out your gameboy right now and play for 5 hours with no problem. im 17 now, and i can look back on this and it was such a fun time of my life. hah. so all you older people, do you remember these good old days?Something that you've pretended not to like since you turned 11, yet can't deny how sick it would be if they really existed.There are three destinct parts to Pokemon

anime:Responsible for giving Pokemon its "kiddie" reputation.

TCG:I must agree with people about this one, it was pretty horible.

GameBoy game:Aguably a great game. It is much more complex then it seems. Unfurtunatly, most people who bash pokemon because it is "kiddie" would most likely not have the intellegence to fully understand the game at all.

Why people that bashes pokemon always say something about gay sex or masturbating, I'll never know. That South Park episode don't help much either. I just pray that these people asociating the SP episode with the game are being sarcastic. After reading some of these definitions, I wouldn't suprised.a very fun rpg video game that i at 18 still injoy about capurturing and figting with kick ass monsters sounds like fun   to bad they went ruined in 97 98 by making a baby show about it ruing the 1995 video game(N.) A Game and an Anime that has been made popular by millions of kids. The Game itself, isn't too bad since they're so many Pokemon and so many different combinations of raising them and using them, whether it be the six Pokemon lineup or Moves they they have. 
The Show however, is the reason it has a kiddie reputation and is hated by most people. I don't blame most people when they say they hate Pokemon, cause the show makes them say all of that. If they tried the game, they might've thought otherwise. 
Still though, the many different games that come out aren't that nessacary. If you played one, you've played them all. I used to be really into Pokemon in middle school, and played it all the time, but knew better than to buy EVERY single different version and waste my money like that. Also avoided the Card Game.If you can ignore all the shitty spin-off games and marketing behind the series, it's still one of the best RPGs around.Once a very popular TV Show, Card game and video game which I myself was quite a fan of at the time. The TV Show and Card game sort of fizzled out after Poke'mon had had its time but the games were very good and they still exist to day. Of course I'm always seeing new card series's being brought out and am occasionally mildy interested because the artwork on some of the cards was rather good. In fact the card game was very popular and a lot of fights broke out about people not trading fairly and people even resorted to stealing others cards but I knew it had all gotten out of hand when at my first school they had people to watch over the swapping of Poke'mon cards and advising people on good swaps. Eventually most schools banned Poke'mon cards (and any others for that matter). So, when they began bringing out all those new Poke'mon and card sets it got a bit boring. So all in all the original Poke'mon cards, games and possibly the TV series was a rather good achievement but it never managed to keep a lot of fans after a few years, but, of course there are still dedicated Poke'mon fans all over the world.STD - stands for Sexualy Transmited Disease. The most commonly known is HIV/AIDS. To say the least you don't want an STD.Somewhat Tasty DonutsSexually Transmitted Disease. Anyone can get one, even virgins. Most common STDs are passed through skin contact, saliva, breast milk, & bodily fluids. You don't have to be a "nasty slut" to get an STD. It only takes 1 sexual experience...or with Herpes, alls you have to do is touch someone who has the virus on their skin  at that point and area.Sexually Transmitted Disease

See burned.Acronym meaning: Socially Transmitted Decepticons

Professional or professionally-organized social media users who use one or more online personas to launch political or personal attacks on opponents or their issues. Often, so called "persona software" is used to manage many such deceptive identities simultaneously in order to create the impression that multitudes hold similar points of view.

Sometimes called [Sock Puppets], STDs can infect multiple social media streams at one time, creating the illusion of mass interest or agreement sufficient to influence an issue or debate.Basically like a computer virus, but for people. You want the free Prada bag, you have to risk the attack on your computer, and possibility of it never working again.

You want the sex, you have to risk the attack on your 'down there' region, with the possibility of it never working again.Something you get from putting your dick in shit because you're too fucking poor to afford a single condom.STD stands for Snooki Transmitted Dumbness. Are girls in your school wearing super slutty clothes? Tanning their skin 24/7? Putting their hair in poofs the size of the Popes hat? Then they have the STD. After watching Jersey Shore for too long, some girls have acquired the STD. Signs include but are not limited to...
-drinking vodka for breakfast
-drinking vodka for lunch
-drinking vodka for dinner
-drinking vodka for dessert
-skin that is so tan, she is invisible in a dimly lit room
-causes public disturbances 24/7
-eats pickles... by sucking on them
-when asked why she does something, she replies with "I'm at the Jersey Shore... BITCH!"

-everywhere is the Jersey Shore for her
-a sudden interest for meat-heads and gorillas
-when someone calls her phone, and is looking a girl named Angelina, she replies with "No, she died"
-she is as smart as a...SnookiSpontaneous Torrential Diarrhea

Whenever you are normal one second, then randomly you get the urge to have explosive diarrhea and then, when you sit down, it just explodes out of your ass like a torrential rain...simultaneous text discussion.
When you are texting someone, and they send another text before you respond to the previous one. This is giving someone an STDCompany bitch.Free slaves in the workplace.poor innocent individual starting out with a whole set of impossible goals and naive ambitions that end up crushed under the path of some self-righteous menapausal bitch that is dissatisfied with her own life and for getting an office ass and taking it out on cute young girls that might actually make something of their lives and live their dreams...and work off the constantly invading office ass(1) A temporary worker who is employed to gain experiance/education rather than money. 
(2) Bill's gal.A Democratic Semen Recepticle.People who are hired to do menial monotonous work that you couldn't pay people people to do long term because they would quit or eat a .45 caliber.  So they hire some naive [college] or [high school] grad to do it until they give up , quit, or eat a .45 caliber.a person who willingly becomes a slave to the corporate world because they enjoy getting abused and whipped by supervisors.

interns do not get paid but they do enjoy the occasional snacks brought to work by the other rich employees. (usually interns steal those snacks, therefore get whipped).

also see "office puppy"an aspiring employee with whom you abstain from sexual relations.a noun referring to a person who is reduced to slave labor.

An intern works for no pay, and their main job is to get coffee and obey each demand by their employer.Homeless kids that you take in and support in exchange for ridiculous favors.  They can be summoned with a conch shell.What Kid Rock drives after being arrested for beating up Tommy Lee.Someone who doesn't have the skills or talent to hold down a permanent job. They are inherently lazy and sneaky.Faggy asian kids who believe they have the ability to kill someone without guilt.n. Mystery Science Theater 3000: A television show in which humorous comments are adlibbed during the viewing of a low quality B-movie.

v. To make a Mystery Science Theater 3000 episode that focuses on a specific film.

adj. The Mystery Science Theater 3000 version of a film.n. abbreviation for the cult hit television series "Mystery Science Theater 3000", in which 'B' movies are made fun of by the the show's three central characters.
Started on local access by creator Joel Hodgson, later moved on to Comedy Central through season seven, then the Sci-Fi Channel until its tenth and final season.
Also included a feature film, "Mystery Science Theater 3000: The Movie" with a limited theatrical release.The most awesome television show invented by the human race. Short for "Mystery Science Theater 3000" Originated in the late 80's and featured a man named Joel (Later to be replaced by Mike Nelson), Crow T. Robot, and Tom Servo.  This trio would make fun of ,while watching, terrible movies. Was featured mostly on Comedy Central and the Sci-Fi Channel. Aired for 11 seasons. In 1996 the MST3K movie was released into theaters.v. To make fun of a really pathetic  movie.An abbreviation for "pure comical genius". I reccomend Hobgoblins, Manos, and Godzilla vs Megalon.I've only seen the movie, but from that, I can tell that it is fucking hilarious.The only show that has EVER made me laugh outloud. I think it was funnier with TV's Frank and Joel, but still funnier in the later episodes, but hey, I love Tom Servo's Irish Tenor, too...The only show ever created that actually has something to tell you. Provided you come equipped with a great sense of humour. And good abs.Making fun of a particular video/scene/footage especially music videos.

Abbreviation of Mystery Science Theater 3000National Republican Bullshit Network. Watched by ignorant, gun-toting, flag-waving ultra-nationalistic right-wing Christian fundamentalists who think George Bush is the new fucking Messiah or something; basically, the scum of American society who, if they had their way, would turn America in a fascistic police state in order to feel safe from the "terrorists" (aka: "brown people").A pseudo-news channel catering to the bottom of the American right-wing extremist barrel - people who are deathly afraid of anyone and anything that's even the slightest bit different from them.  About as "fair and balanced" as the Iranian government, which it closely resembles.Sensationlist trash channel.  State media dumbed down so even Dubya can understand it.Funniest Tv station ever. Good source of entertainment. But seriously, I trust the Daily Show more.news for red neck ass republicansA far right neo-con "talk show" that presents itself as news. In fact if the news does not favor their distorted view they focus on sensational tabloid stories of rape and murder to titillate the religious right that pretends morality. This show is so hilarious that I might even rate it as a comedy if it werent for the fact that some ignorant americans really believe it is fair and balanced. It is a show for lower IQ people who want to be reassured their small minds are correct and that everyone in the world who isnt white,right wing extremists re evil. Fox news hates you if you are Democrat, moderate thinking republican. Catholic, Lutheran,asian,black,hispanic, and the list goes on. They have a narrow box of extreme radical fundalmentalist with a corporate agenda and if you look closely rather perverted. The owner (Rupert Murdich" specializes in tabloids that exploit crimes against women and children then report every delicious sexual detail so the "moral" religious right" can get their jollies while exclaing how hrrible everyone else is. It really promotes rich big corporations and Republicans like George W. and use their guise as a "conservative" station to manipulate the average, easily manipulated person who wants to think of themselves as moral citizens while their mind is being filled with anything but factual news reporting. Wake up america and start watching C-span and see what is really happening.Completely and utterly without merit. A news station that not only presents the most wildly conservative of biases with the slogan "Fair and Balanced," but also presents worse television than Jerry Springer. I am NOT watching the news to see Sean Hannity and Bill O'Reilly scream "SHUT UP!" at every single guest they have.Total BullshitThe most pathetic excuse for a television news channel that I've ever seen.  I could personally shit in a bucket and then write a report saying that I did not take a shit in the bucket and be more accurate than Fox News.  These people fucking disgust me.  I can't believe there are idiots this fucking stupid.  See [republican] for more examples of idiocy.Real news put through a conservative Republican filter and then dumbed down.The world's second-largest ocean, separating the eastern Americas and western Europe and Africa, extending from the Artic in the North and the Antartic in the South.1. A man-made body of water usually found in gardens and parks.

2. A website based around weird animations, usually crap) flash games and a weird (really weird) storys.

3. Home of the Billy ChroniclesTo pond - to have sexual intercourse with someone affectionately.cool water where people go to cool off - located on a farm. a place for sexual explorations. 

it is also a secret meeting place on hot summer nights, for college homosexuals.A body of water similar in size to a pool. Larger than a puddle but smaller than a lake, ponds usually have some time of small lifeforms living within.What the boyfriend of a duck lover calls his girlfriend's vagina.To Brutally own someone. In the use of ownage.
Formed from the words Pwned, Pwnt, Owned, and Ownt.A place where you go pick up dogs.  (dog pound)the past tense of "pwned" which is technically already past tense but who cares(Always all caps)
A replacement for the words [PWN], [PWND], and all derivatives.A term formerly useful for describing websites consisting entirely of intentionally fabricated news stories, but now used to describe virtually anything that does not mesh with one's own views.Any news reported by mainstream media which is deemed unflattering, incriminating or otherwise hitting too close to home for Donald Trump and/or his cabinet of lap dog Republicans, regardless of it's actual factualness or validity.Fake news is produced by web sites or tabloids for the purpose of attracting viewers to ads. Fake news are sensational false (fiction) news-like stories created purely to attract readers.

Comedy shows, like the Daily Show, commonly mix real news with humor, including fictitious humor. But the news part of it is real. True, people who fall for fake news sites are very gullible, and perhaps can't tell which parts of the Daily Show are fiction, but those people aren't the Daily Show's target audience. Fake news has come to mean fiction for fiction's sake.

Fake news should also be distinguished from false news, also called dishonest news or lies that are told for political purposes. Many of the anti-Hillary stories were created by fake news sites, but then posted as lies on sites like Fox and Breitbart.Used to defend an illogical position, or a way to avoid using critical thinking skills when a news source does not match a personal or ideological bias.Any statement or report that truthfully exposes the lies, ignorance, conflicts of interest, erroneous statements, megalomania, and racist, misogynistic, illegal, traitorous and tyrannical activities of the so-called President Trump and his administration. Syn. Newspeak., Ant. propaganda1) False or otherwise extremely exaggerated news stories used to generate money from ad revenue by using [clickbait] titles or used to sell tabloids in the grocery check-out line.

2) A term for a news article that doesn't validate one's political opinion.Typical coverage from Fox News.  Their reporting contains so many exagerations, falsities, and interjected opinions, that it can in no way be considered proper and informative.Normally typed in ALL CAPS, It is the only type of news that Mr. Trump loves.Print or online information that make [President Trump], his advisors, and his administration look like dishonest or incompetent policymakers or office-bearers.Fake News is a term for news organizations that constantly put out fake or modified stories to control their viewers and readers perceptions. Fake News intentionally manipulates and controls the main stream narrative with misinformation and censorship to serve the agenda of promoting a progressive new world order. This is the primary reason we have liberal bias among all major news organizations. The following list is FAKE NEWS.

ABC,AP, AURN, BLOOMBERG,BUZZFEED,CBS,CNBC,CNN,HUFF POST,LA TIMES, MSNBC,NBC, NEW YORK TIMES,NPR, POLITICO,REUTERS, THE HILL,WALL STREET JOURNAL,WASHINGTON POST, MEDIA MATTERS,SNOPES.a dirty pirate hookerA voluptuous female pirate type woman, usally with a firey attitude, and usually seen around taverns and bars, seaside fishing towns, and wherever pirates roam.a beautiful women who engages particularly in duties concerning domestic affairs, kitchen cleaning, or ale serving

the object of a pirate's affection

usually found in sea faring ports, in the back of the kitchen scrubbing pots, passed out under a pirate ship's deck, or tending to the wash.A [stout], [voluptuous] [maiden]. Usually associated with the [Rennaissance] and [tavern]s, where the wench is pictured as a bar-maid, boldly flirting with the [swashbuckler]s and [pirate]s.

Is a softer, less-[offend]ing version of [bitch]. 

A [mispronunciation] of "wrench".historically a non-derrogatory word for a woman who was not a lady. thus a waitress in times of yore was a "serving wench." more modernly synonimous with bitch or slut but slightly less ofencivePeasant girl. Can also be used as a slightly and less aggresive version of bitch.An admired woman in your crew, a talented warrior seductress, that can inspire adventure or take a bland situation and make it rife with excitement.a slightly less offensive term similar in meaning to "bitch"Local term for women or girlsA Wench is a loose (not necessarily literally) yet powerful woman. The Wench is part of a growing sisterhood devoted to torturing men in the nicest of ways.

1. If men require an "adjustment" after kissing you? 
2. If your tongue can be registered as a precision surgical instrument? 
3. If you have you been accused of smuggling melons across state lines?
4. If you really know what a sponge is for?
5. If "Soak a Bloke" is considered your time off?
6. If you think it's wise to use ice cubes and menthol together?
7. If you know that whipped cream is more than just a dessert topping?
8. If men lose the power of speech when you adjust your bodice or breath deeply?
9. If you are vertically challenged but horizontally gifted?
10.If you like to play with your food? 
11.If when removing your bra on Monday, you find enough loose change to buy breakfast? 

If you answered any 3 of the questions above with an "oh yeah," then you are obviously a woman of distinction, a product of excellent breeding, possessed of stunning (if not vaguely dubious) talents and appetitesA tattoo above a woman's ass crack.“Tramp Stamp” is a derogatory term referring to a tattoo which a women places on her lower back.  It is especially popular among women born in the late 70’s, 80‘s, and even early 90’s.  Fair or unfair, these tattoos have a socially constructed connotation associated with them.  These women are labeled as tramps, whores, or other derogatory sexually promiscuous terms.  Although these are often bias generalized claims, there have been sociological studies done by the American Psychological Association, Federal Bureau of Prisons, and other demographic researchers showing strong correlative evidence associating tattoos with high risk behavior, illegal substance abuse and sexual promiscuity.  These risk factors are greatest in the age range which these types of tattoos are gaining main stream popularity.  Some have also jokingly stated that by 2050, the “tramp stamp” will be renamed the “gramp stamp”.1. a tattoo located above a womans ass.
2. a girl who has been certified by your neighborhood, frat or group of friends as a slut.A tattoo on the small of a woman's back... a good clue if you should wrap it up or not.a horribly cliche, or common tattoo that makes girls look like dumb bitches.  Found on the lower back, and usually a butterfly...sometimes a happy flower of some sort.A tattoo on the lower back of a female. Denotes the perceived correlation between having a tattoo in this location and being sexually promiscuous. The larger the tramp stamp, the more promiscuous the female, goes the common lore. Popular designs include butterflies, flowers, vines, tribal designs, wings....A tattoo on a woman's lower back.  Just think of it as a target.Tattoo usually positioned on the lower back of a exotic dancer and or a female. Usually accompanied with low rising pants with a "Thong" underwear exposed.The Tattoo found on the lower region of a womans back. Often a tribal symbol or artwork that is wider than tall, such as angel wings, vines, and butterflies. It origins are believed to have started with early indian tribe(s) when a male would place his 'brand' on his female partners lower back to discourage other males, where the strategically placed brand would be seen during sexual acts, such as the 'doggie style' position. 

Ironically, today it is usually understood by society as associated with sexual promiscuity and commonly reffered to using derogatory terms. Popular with women in their 20's, and frowned upon in their later years.A lower back tattoo on any female.A kick ass 24 hour place to get waffles.  Popular in the [dirty south][sketchy] sketchy restuarant that is defined by it's sketchiness.  has a certain culture about it: "great" coffee, hasbrowns scattered and smothered, and the classic waffle.  frequently visited in the middle of the night by drunk and/or high college students.1. a 24-hour dive with underpaid waitresses, classically bad juke box music, bathrooms a la truckstop, and food that no respectable arteries woulc bear.
2. the only place to go-- besides [Wal-Mart]-- after 11pm in Arkadelphia, Arkansas and similiar ends of the worldThe only reason to go to disney world. An exact opposite of the magic kingdom and a lot more enjoyable.to be left in bed with covers that equal the size of a waffle house napkin.The poor man's IHOP. An interesting place for a first date. The only place you could imagine going if your drunk/high and it's 2 a.m. You almost ALWAYS see someone you know at the Waffle House (three of the last four times I went I saw people I knew). The waitresses at Waffle House are way better than the ones at Hooters.A crappy diner where you can buy food or meth at 3 a.m.A slang term meaning "female prison."the greatest fucking breakfast place ever, open 24-7, breakfast all day, good shitThe place to go when you want some good waffles at an economical price. Also a good late-night place.Zord is like the empasis of making something more elite than it is. It is similar to the word "zors" also. It is actually a suffix such as zors. The meaning is very similar except zord is a unique word because it is like the show power rangers.

The way this came out is that one's user name named PandaBoyx kept saying Zors while his friend started saying "WOW its like zord from power rangers!" ever since, they all started saying zord. Similar as "z0rs", you may also use the suffix "z0rd".A colossal assault vehicle used by the Power Rangers.  

See also [Megazord].Childhood game of fashioning the largest clunkiest legos into crude spacecraft. To play the game, two children slam their "zords" into each other and whoever's breaks first loses.A word... or half a word... that you add on the end of words... to make them more wordy... and generally more... [AWESOME]!!! ...in every way...Also an expression requently used by stoners and hippies for something of high quality.sticky, hairy, stinky, and highly potent marijuana.really potent weed, produced by proper slow drying of harvested plant material, usually requiring curing (putting plant material in paper bag, folding over top, placing that bag in another bag. Thus reducing air and light contact on said plant materials, so when you go to retrieve some of said plant materials, it is still moist, green and sticky because the resin glands are still intact and 'sweating'.1. Potent weed.
i.e. [Krippy], [KindBud], [Bomb Nugget]
2.Adjective meaning good.Formerly used to denote really potent weed, it now means really or awesomeHigh quality weed (chronic).high quality, really strong weedDank, is an adjective which is over-used by people in general and mostly by people trying to appear cool to their stoner friends. Dank means dark, sticky, gooey, and potent. It was originally a common word to describe disgusting basements and caves ect. Then the world of pot took it over and was using it very correctly to describe very potent strains of marijuana, seeing as the definition of dank meets all the qualities you find in good marijuana. Then "squares" and people who wanted to look cool to stoners started using it to describe anything they think is "cool" which in turns makes them believe they themselves are "cool" as well. In reality it makes them seem as illiterate as an ape. M&M's are not dank, chips are not dank, and your clothes are definitely not dank, you need to stop overusing and killing the word.a word used to describe good weedThe word dank can be:

An adjective describing unpleasant dampness or humidity. 

a word used to describe high potency [cannabis] that is still moist. 

An adjective describing something as positive or awesome.A state of mind which occurs after smoking enough marijuana to the point where the user stares blankly into whatever catches his/her attentionThe ultimate state of mind.To be under the influence of [marijuana]. Usually associated with bloodshot eyes, the [munchies], and unexplained laughter.the greatest feeling in the world. it is the state you are in after hitting a nice big bowl of marijuanna or hash. I personally prefer pipes, but you can  smoke out of anything, i.e. a bong, spliff, joint, vaporizer, popcan, pop bottle, parachute, hotboxing is always fun. im quite high right now. 1.sometimes you laught alot, 2.other times you stare at absolutley nothing, 3.other times you get into indepth discussions about aliens and the CIA,4. or you think youre capable of things like backflips.

all of the above i have experienced and so much more, so todays lesson kids, is smoke as much marijuanna as you damn well please. goodday younglings.a time when you come up with the funniest quotes in the world and your a fucking genious but dont remember any of it in the morning...when you smoke so much marijuana that you are unmotivated to even move-  and every muscle in your body feels like it's being weighed down by a huge weight like a stone  (hence the word STONED) you feel really heavy and have intense, very enjoyable tactile hallucinations and usually feel complete euphoria so you just stare off blankly and enjoy it.The greatest feeling in the world followed by engulfing a bag of doritos and reeses pieces.when you're so high that you almost feel unable to move your muscles.  everything feels weird and you kind of just sit back with your mouth agape staring off into space and enjoying it.  contrary to popular belief, "stoned" and "high" are different in that, the word "stoned" originated from the idea that you feel like you're being weighed down by big heavy stones.The art of dying by geology.The very slow, yet rapid course of time in which you may find yourself reading and creating these definitions for words that quite simply seem to be the most hilarious thing you've seen in a recent while. (The word "egg" for example, let it sink in if you are high at the moment)

Contrary to popular belief, you will not be "raiding" the kitchen, and refrigerator, rather, you will likely see a Quiznos commercial which will either A) Remind you of the cold cuts you have in your refrigerator and proceed to make yourself 5 sandwiches, as you will not be able to tell when you're "full", or B) you will immediately rush to the nearest Taco Bell, because at one point you will forget why you got in the car, at which point a Taco Bell will present itself along any major highway.

You will be less likely to go to the movie theater, as instead your first person experiences will be as if you are viewing yourself through a television set, so watching movies will only cause you to lose control of yourself, as you will be uncertain of whether you're watching a movie, or whether you're watching a movie of a person watching a movie. (That person, being you)

You will giggle when I remind you of the word "egg", and that will cause you to go onto some intellectual brainstorm about things completely unrelated to eggs, such as poison dart frogs, discovery channel's Deadliest Catch, or how you managed to read all of this definition.1. A psychopathological condition characterized by delusional fantasies of wealth, power, or omnipotence. 
2. An obsession with grandiose or extravagant things or actions.1)Someone obsessed with power

2)A kick ass song by incubus1)A person obsessed with greed and/or power.
2)A great song from one of the greatest bands in the world; Incubusan insane person who is obsessed with power, one who thinks they are beyond greatnessA megalomaniac is a self-centered, power-crazed egomaniac that is obsessed with their goals for conquering cities and countries and world domination, they're rather over-obsessed with power rather than actual conquest. They also often fantasize of greatness, fame, wealth, grandeur, omnipotence predominate and servitude. Because of all the power driving them to becoming critically insane their minds are separated from reality since they also don't care what happens to anything at all as they care about themselves.

Despite having the word maniac in the name of them being a megalomaniac, it does not mean they are always clinically insane.My Definition is a belief is so strong that I am so powerful even more powerful than god  
I am paronaid of all things and make sure all my phones are not tapped
I say bring it on to take over the world
Any one standing in my way is un patroticone who has dillusions of granduer, such as one who thinks they are jesus or that they are the air to the seceret leader of the illuminati.A symptom of mental illness marked by delusions of greatness, wealth, etc. See also, Glenn BeckA bad-ass song by the founders of industrial rock, [KMFDM].Megalomaniac = George DubyaA girl who gives really good head, but her very annoying personality slowly sucks away your soul.They guard the prison of Azkaban. They suck all the happiness out of people and you'll feel like you'd never be happy again when a dementor comes near you.The worst part of prison, according to Prison Mike.dementors,scary creatures who gaurd azakaban.they attacked harry mostly in the third movie because of his tragic past.1. n. A fictional creature from the Harry Potter series. Dementors guard the wizard prison Azkaban and suck all of the happiness from anything in their presence. Their worst weapon is called the dementor's kiss, which is when a dementor sucks a person's soul out through their mouth.

2. n. A person who kills a good moment or sucks all of the fun out of a situation.Creatures of everlasting darkness. These creatures are the only things born evil.

Just being in proximity with a dementor drains all happy thoughts away from. They make you relive your worst memory.
They also take away anything warm, whether they be thoughts or the accual tempature.
They are also some of the only creature that do not sleep, they also never walk. They are the only known creature that can suck the very soul from a living thing.
Because of these special abilities they are used as gaurds to the wizard prizion of [Azkaban].

The only know way of fighting a dementor is to use a petronus charm.Someone who is in the fringe of your group of friends who is tolerated because it would be a shame to tell them to Fuck off!
They also have some strange ability to turn even the funniest momements into akward ones and sap all happiness from those around.Woman's [menstrual period]. Goes along with Blast-ended Skrewts (cramps) and Azkaban (uterus).
It sucks.1. A really really hot chick. She's so hot she's scary. It can also be a really really hot guy, but it mostly for women. This dementor makes something silvery come out of your wand.The most Ballin Drink you can make, Brass Monkey a 40 of Old English with Purple Drink, called the Dementor because it resembles "Dementor Piss" according to Jonny Haworth. WARNING: you will feel like you just got the kiss of death from a Dementor if you can conquer this beast.(1) slang: to disrespect someone (to [diss]); to make fun of someone; used by a third party after a first party makes fun of a second party. Brought back to life by the ever-popular [That 70's Show].

(2) slang: to smoke [marijuana] or any other [drug] used with fire, to get [high]. see [burn out]

(3) verb: to char or scorch something using fireAn exclamatory response, generally used by a third party after someone has just received an insult.To be thoroughly humiliated or insulted to the point where you cannot return with a comeback.smoke weedAn exclamation used to imply that one has just been insulted with no chance of rebuttal.slang for a serious insult; verbal ownage1. v. to infect someone with veneral disease.
2. to add data or music to a blank [CDR]
3. to set something on fireslang: to disrespect someone (to diss); to make fun of someone; used by a third party after a first party makes fun of a second party. Brought back to life by the ever-popular That 70's Show.to lie or make up an entire story involving something that never happened.

Noun- a lie or totally made up story.The [Bard] surname of the worlds greatest bard [Rabbie Burns] or [Robert Burns] [Scotland]s Finest.1. (verb)  To engulf a piece of property into flames, with the intent of destruction.A good hobby to take up.some thing evilWhat Korean people do on impulse when they feel agitatedAdjective describing an extremely intense mosh pit.to destroy someone's reputation. to sell goods or merchandise at a lower price of a competitor without the competitor's knowledge. to take, steal, or destroy.The cool thing for hot guys to do (Ian).When someone is out to seek revenge on everyone due to some past experience.(n) (1) A person who doubts the sincerity of motives.
(2) A word commonly misdefined by pessimists who think they are cynics.Someone who genuinely doubts a persons true motives.
-If a hobo asks a cynic for money, the cynic would just ignore him, convinced that the hobo doesnt really want money to get back on his feet, but to get some drugs which were the reason for him being homeless in the first place.

-A cynic is the guy who never had a girlfriend until he was in college, because it didnt take long for him to realize that High School relationships never last the better part of two weeks. He also sometimes feels like the only person in his school to notice this, and probably is.

-If you read a romantic poem to a cynic about the beauty of trees, the cynic would just stare at you and say something to the effect of "Birds and Squirrels fuck in them, and they make big noises when cut down to build yet another highway. Otherwise nice poem (b-_-)b".

-A Cynic is usually someone with above-average awareness, especially if they develop such views at an early age. Being a Cynic through Junior High and High School can save you a LOT of hurt, since you will definetly be able to talk your way out of anything. No arguement can beat cold hard facts, which are what cynics thrive for.

-Cynics are not neccesarily pessimists, and while they do generally have low expectations, they dont blow minor problems out of proportion, since they really dont care in the first place.One who doesn't believe in innate human virtue. Cynicism, contrary to popular belief, does not entail being an offensive and ignorant idiot. Only the offensive part, because most people don't like how cynics criticise them and would rather live happily ever after in the magical world of pixies and gumdrops and rainbows and unicorns. Sadly, that view on cynicism has caused a lot of people to regard the philosophy in a negative way.A person who boldly tells it like it is.  A person who sees the world without a blindfold covering the eyes.An idealist whose rose-colored glasses have been removed, snapped in two and stomped into the ground, immediately improving his vision.A cynic is a typically jaundiced person who has the rare ability to be able to see through common belief and see the truth and faults in today's society. Cynics are non-believers and do not conform, and have no interest whatsoever, in conforming to everyday society. 
Cynics are usually disliked for their jaded and negative views on the way the world runs, and often beleive that the world runs according to selfishness and is driven my greed and money.(1) An [idealist] robbed by the experience of the realities of life.
(2) A person who has adopted a functional attitude that allows for survival in the postmodern world of late capitalism.a cynic is someone that understands people only give a shit about things they benefit from. life is all about self-preservation and nothing else.Inside Every Cynic is a disappointed [idealist]
~George CarlinSomeone who looks at the world without the blindfold of modern day society. Cynics look at the world like a critic, always judging it. They aren't afraid to speak their minds and give the facts without embelishing them.[Hell]. as simple as that, No more no lessa forced labor camp in which poor people are forced to complete useless tasks at the beckoning of five bazillion bosses each having they're own stupid idosynchrocies.Commonly mistakened for the concentration camps where Hitler would persecuit jews. Instead of killing people at kroger though, they force them to do mind numbing work, such as pushing large metal objects, many at a time. This is forced upon the victim until death ensues or genocide of the supervisors.Kroger is a grocery chain headquartered in Cincinnati Ohio. There are stores throughout the southeast and [Upper South].A code name for strip club. Effectively lets you and your friends talk freely about the titty bar without turning any heads.a grocery store in the southeast. also a euphemism for taking a shit, or the product of one, usually taken in a krogerarium (bathroom).An extremely financially selfish grocery store known for overcharging customers who don't have their "plus" card, paying their employees as low as the law allows them to, and providing the lowest quality food/drink products out there.Describes poor quality. The word is derived from Kroger Stores. The motto is "Quality Garanteed". It is a sarcasim.(noun) One who [kroge]s.  Krogers can often be identified by their long, curved nails, which they grow and trim specifically to make their kroging more productive. 

It is not known what, if any relationship exists between kroging and Kroger (the supermarket), but showing up to an interview with a nice set of kroging nails probably wouldn't hurt your chances of employment with the company.(Noun) A quantity or amount of goods, irregardless of weight, that may be contained in a plastic grocery sack. Heard in the [Upper South] in [Dayton], Ohio when a person is recycling the grocery bag to use for another purpose. These bags may or not come from an actual [Kroger] store. 

This term may be used in other areas such as [Cincinnati], [Lexington], [Louisville] and [Bowling Green] Kentucky where the [Kroger] supermarket chain prevails.A store where you can buy a shot gun, ammunition, a ski mask, a baseball bat, a meat cleaver and a chainsaw, but you can't buy a CD that has a "Parental Advisory" sticker.A chain of oversized superstores mostly found in the Southern USA, known for driving local stores out of businesses, selling poorly-made goods (especially clothing) made by third-world slave labor, using a gawdy image of shallow, phony patriotism and flag-waving, and contributing to urban sprawl. A major competitor to [golf course]s in wasting valuable land which could be used for farming and housing.A super market that everyone complains about but, secretly, any human living in the US has gone there for something.the store where I get 100% off on everything that fits under my shirta corparation that uses its buying power to bully smaller stores out of existance.  also hires illegal immigrants to clean their stores.1. Hell
2. A bad place to work
3. A bad place to shop
4. See number 1who to blame when your job has been sent to AsiaA fucking chainstore that's taking over every business.A large, parasitic corporation who moves like a plague, eating up all business in it's wake, and leaving a large, gray store with cheap, plastic crap.

They take jobs, and then screw over their employees by destroying any union they come up with, or fireing them, or making them work in the childrens section.

They close down all little shoppes in the area, and then sponsor people to start up new businesses, with advance revinue going back to Wal-Mart (*This is just a conspiracy theory, but I'm sure it is real*)a corporation soon to rule the world with the help of McDonalds.1. the substitution of a milder, vaguer word or expression for one considered to be offensive or unpleasant. 
2. the word or expression so substituted.trying to make the mean things you say sound nicer by using different wordsA word people use because they like deceiving themselves to believe we live in a Utopia.

Mostly they're used by organizations and "considerate" people who don't want to offend the "situationally disturbed" citizens.

George Carlin, a comedian, did a great schpiel about euphemisms once.  (A few of the following examples are in his speech.)

You should read it.  It may not "open your eyes," but you'll realize how much we like to disguise our speech and blind ourselves.  Disguising a condition with nicer, longer words doesn't change the fact that you still have the condition.  Sorry.

(Note: Not all examples {e.g. black/white} are "conditions" or negative at all}A word used in place of another to make the listener feel more comfortable, and to make the user more socially acceptable.trying to make the mean things you say sound nicer by using different wordsThe act or an example of substituting a mild, indirect, or vague term for one considered harsh, blunt, or offensive: 

Euphemism is an expression intended by the speaker to be less offensive, disturbing, or troubling to the listener than the word or phrase it replaces, or in the case of doublespeak to make it less troublesome for the speaker.

When a phrase is used as a euphemism, it often becomes a metaphor whose literal meaning is dropped. Euphemisms are often used to hide unpleasant or disturbing ideas, even when the literal term for them is not necessarily offensive. This type of euphemism is used in public relations and politics, where it is sometimes disparagingly called doublespeak. There are also superstitious euphemisms, based (consciously or subconsciously) on the idea that words have the power to bring bad fortune (for example, not speaking the word "cancer"; see Etymology and Common examples below) and religious euphemisms, based on the idea that some words are sacred, or that some words are spiritually imperiling (taboo; see Etymology and Religious euphemisms below).A way to make a word or sentence sound nicer than how it really is, used commonly to make the other person seem more comfortable around you.Sometimes spelled with an f, as in eufemism.

Trying to make the mean things you say sound nicer (example 2) or making a mild comment you make sound even worse by adding you were just using an euphemism (example 1).Substitution of a harsher expression like European Union with a kindlier one like EUphemism.You would be a redneck if:

You need one more hole punched in your card to get a freebie at the House of Tattoos.

You need an estimate from your barber before you get a haircut.

The biggest fashion risk you take is which plaid you'll wear to the 4-H Fair.

You have flowers planted in a bathroom appliance in your front yard.

Your wife weighs more then your refrigerator.

You move your refrigerator and the grass underneath it has turned yellow.

You mow your lawn and find a car.

You can spit without opening your mouth.

Going to the bathroom in the middle of the night involves putting on shoes and a jacket and grabbing a flashlight.

You go Christmas shopping for your mom, sister, and girlfriend, and you only need to buy one gift.

Taking a dip has nothing to do with water.

There are more than ten lawsuits currently pending against your dog.

You take a fishing pole to Sea World.

The hood and one door are a different color from the rest of your car.

You've ever filled your deer tag on the golf course.

You've ever shot somebody over a mall parking space.

Santa Claus refuses to let your kids sit in his lap.

Your toilet paper has page numbers on it.

You think mud rasslin' should be an Olympic sport.

The receptionist checks the rat traps at your place of business.

More than one living relative is named after a Southern Civil War general.

You think the stock market has a fence around it.

You think the O.J. trial was the big Sunkist and Minutemaid taste test.

You've ever lost a loved one to kudzu.

Your boat has not left the driveway in 15 years.

Your front porch collapses and kills more than three dogs.

Your coffee table used to be a telephone cable spool.

You keep a can of Raid on the kitchen table.

You've ever used a toilet seat as a picture frame.

Your home has more miles on it than your car.
Your Christmas tree is still up in February.

You've ever been arrested for loitering.

You think that potted meat on a saltine is an hors d'ouvre.

There is a stuffed possum anywhere in your house.

You hammer bottle caps into the frame of your front door to make it look nice.

You've ever shot anyone for looking at you.

You own a homemade fur coat.

Your wife can climb a tree faster than your cat.

Your momma has "ammo" on her Christmas list.

You've totaled every car you've ever owned.Mildly offensive term for a lower class white person from the southeastern states of the USA. Derives from someone who spent a lot of time on manual labour outside and so received a "red neck" from the sun."The glorious absence of sophistication"
-Jeff FoxworthyRednecks live in the Southeastern United States.  While they do not comprise the entire population in this region they do make up the vast majority of the people here.  

Typically, rednecks live in rural settings.  They avoid urban settings.  They are proud of their pick-up trucks or older cars and stick with them despite rising gas prices.  

They typically work industrial or manual labor jobs. The majority do not have anything beyond a high school education.  They depend on the "Good 'Ol Boy" system of advancement.  They are extremely weary of those who do possess the desire to act educated -- these people are perceived as sell-outs.  

You can often see rednecks hauling lawn equipment or hunting (dog) equipment even if they do not plan on using these items in the near future. It is a proud symbol of their social class. 

Rednecks often are seen about in hunting attire even though they do not plan to hunt anything.  Dressing up comprises of dockers and a tucked in polo shirt.  Baseball hats on men are a must regardless of the occasion or whether indoors or not.

Most rednecks do not live in mobile homes anymore.  Most have modest homes.  Typically they decorate in Native American or hunting themes.  Most devote much more money into their vehicles then their homes.

Rednecks speak with a Southern accent and avoid using big words.  They may know big words but it is not socially acceptable to use them. People who do are identified as outsiders.

Rednecks support major brands such as Coca-Cola and Nascar.  Their major past times are watching television, hunting, fishing, and shooting. They detest reading (other than romance novels or the newspaper).   

Rednecks tend to be socially conservative.  They are extremely defensive against outsiders and anyone different from them.  They have learned to avoid those who do not adopt their culture.  Many rednecks may also be Evangelical Christians.  They will not hesitate upon meeting you to tell you that you "are going to hell" if you are not also Baptist or a similar denomination.

Overall, rednecks are extremely friendly people but they are very reluctant to accept those different from them so it is hard for others to mingle with them or understand them.

Many do not ever travel outside of this region.  Places such as the Blue Ridge Mountains, Pigeon Forge, and Myrtle Beach are considered to be the ultimate vacation spots. 

They are very stubborn about their conservative beliefs.  They believe that all liberals have lesser moral values.  This is often hypocritical -- for example, the Southeast has a much higher divorce rate then the rest of the nation.  Part of this stubbornness also stems from their idea that their culture is under attack since they tend to associate morality with social conservativeness.  This stubbornness can have many negative effects -- it can contribute to false knowledge of the world and the culture within and outside of the Southeast.  For this reason, most rednecks will to this day deny that the Civil War was about slavery.  

Finally, most rednecks are closet racists.  They will vehemently deny this but racist remarks are often made among white groups.  They are outwardly friendly towards minorities but they certainly have very large reservations about hiring or becoming close friends with them. This is done almost as a quest for assurance amongst each other that no one in their presence is a cultural sellout.One who arranges to have their daughter baptized at Daytona Motor Speedway(true story).only require a shotgun, rifle, and 4 wheel driveAfter reading most of these i realize that people have no idea what Rednecks are. We are called racist but most people posting are more racist towards us than we are towards any minority. You say we are sister bangers, nascar lovers, toothless, imbred, ignorant and broke. Those are white trash people. Some Rednecks love nascar and thats fine but that doesnt mean we all do. We are hard workers that love our family, friends and country. You say we drive rusted old trucks and cars and live in mobile homes and shacks. Truth is most of us have better vehicles and houses than the average person because we arent lazy and we work hard for the things we have. We hunt, fish and spend time outdoors but we obey the law doing these things because we want everybody to be able to enjoy these things. So think next time before you point fingers and say we are just ignorant and useless. I would like to see you try to fix your own vehicle.a glorious lack of sophisticationA redneck is simply a caucasian southerner. I will agree, not all rednecks are educated, but some of us are. The fact that a person enjoys outdoor activities does not make them a redneck. You have your redneck, and then you have your WHITE TRASH, or caucasian waste, rather. Rednecks tend to be classier, more intellectual southerners, while white trash folks are described as...well....just read most of the above definitions. Rednecks are not the racists, white trash folks are. You people are getting it all mixed up. 

Redneck = polite, friendly southerner who might happen to enjoy chewing tobacco

White Trash = dumb-ass backwater hicks who make southerners look bad.A mentally challenged white male, usually from the South with an IQ of a beaver.  They are characterized by: ignorant, intolerant of others, isolated in their own little world, uneducated, marry their own sisters, live in a run down trailer, claim to love america, but carries a confederate flag, vote against their own interest, and politically inept.  

synonym: hick, hillbilly, intolerant

antonym: gentleman, worldly, tolerantGreatest
Of
All
Time

(like tight, the best)anacronym for G.reatest O.f A.ll T.imeGreatest Of All TimeOne of the Highly intellegant animals that lives in rocky mountains.  These creatures actually seem to be smarter than the average human being, however they don't have all the technology because of a lack of opposable thumbs.Tucking back your balls and dick, then bending over thus resembling the back of a goat...according to the rules of the game, the person who looks gets 4 kicks in the ass.  For more info. on the game, watch the movie "Waiting...".Greatest Of All Time. Not a title that should be easily given out.An 'elite' promo group on tumblr who think they fucking own tumblr. It's main admin or 'mother' is Rebecca aka t-i-g-e-r-p-r-i-n-c-e-s-s. They are all cunts and no one actually like their blogs, they just follow for promised yet never fulfilled promos. They have retarded inside jokes and they think they are the shit. Even though they are shit, just not THE shit. They have many people that kiss their ass daily and thats where they get their energy from. They are in many promo groups but only do promos with other goats members. They also made a bullshit bullying video yet everyone in there has bullied someone on tumblr and irl at least once. They think they are funny but they're actually retarded and have the mental cababilities of less than an infant. They are annoying as fuck and need to be stopped. To sum it up, no one likes them yet practically everyone wants to be them. I hope they all have painful explosive diarrhea that causes their downfall. The bitchiest members include but are not limited to, jeff, meg, gen, manduh, alyssa, soph, ryan, sen, katy, and etc.an animal that will climb nearly vertical mountains to lick salt off the tops of mountains because they crave that mineral[Webcomic] drawn by Jonathan Rosenberg.  Contains only one actual goat, though other characters are aliens, a space mummy, a satanic chicken, and a fish that lives in a glass of beer.  Located at www.goats.com.1. the most attractive type girls on the face of the earth.
2. the best animal ever alive.
3. goats, sheep, lambs, and ramz rule the earth.Sandals that are made out of old Vans shoes.A name coming from anti-roman occupation tribe [vandals]. They lived in Northern Europe, and, along with the [visgoths] were feared by Roman armies. Although feared, they were not respected. They were seen as little more than disorganised barbarians. Since they were wreckless and authority-resistant, the name was given to anyone displaying traits of vandalism.A west-coast (USA) term for black man or negro or anyone of Sub-Saharan African blood or of African descentOne who willfully or maliciously defaces or destroys public or private property.

A [graffiti] [writer] may have similarities to a [vandal] but they are considered [vandalists] since most of there message is displayed through ART.when a jiggabooh  steals white mans property.Someone who rolls especially hard with the late nights and the drinking and the shambles etc.See [wikipedidiot]goonie, bestfriend, friends, folks you chill with1) Deriving from the latin word Vandalous is uberous 1447tous. It was a mythical creature who would break things that was not his and had fun in doing so. 
    2)In the late 90's one man took upon himself the name VandaL and came to world unlike the earth called the MSN gaming zone a n00b3d all that he could see. VandaL today is a feirce beast and has the engergy of an 8 year old with 3 red bulls to drink.Name of a top contributor and Xbox moderator at [Neoseeker].Someone who likes the darker side of things. They usually listen to death metal and goth music, such as Dismember and Bauhaus. Marilyn Manson is NOT goth. He's just...weird. Real goths are not depressing and suicidal like the posers you see at Hot Topic. Goths are fun to be around and aren't afraid to laugh at themselves every so often. They don't worship Satan and aren't evil despite what some ignorant people might say. Goths don't all dress alike either. They like to create their own unique style. Goths are also very intelligent and creative. A lot of them are writers and artists. Goths DON'T envy the popular people. They are what they are because it makes them happy. Goths would rather stay who they are and be among the so called "freaks" than be like everyone else and be popular. They understand that there are more important things in life than popularity, and usually succeed in life while the popular ones don't become much of anything. 

If someone becomes "goth" because they couldn't get any friends or are depressed and angry all the time, they are most likely a poser.The goth, that thing that lies at the opposite end of the spectrum of society to the chav.
A goth will walk alone where a chav will hide inside his herd and though the goth may take a beating at least that goth was never a coward.
A goth will insult only those who have earnt it whereas a chav will insult people for things as shallow as the clothes they are wearing.
A goths insult will be witty and cutting, a chavs insult more often than not will consist of the chav making a repulsive noise.
A goth will enrich their mind, a chav will watch soaps.
In the morning, a goth will ask themselves “what do I want to wear?” whilst a chav will ask themselves “what in this selection of clothes is the most acceptable thing to wear?”
A goth will have a friend because they are good for someone, a chav will have a friend because that someone is good for them.
A goth approaches new situations with a willingness to think and find the best way forward, a chav will react with aggression to that which it does not already know.
A goth will listen to music that is meaningful to their life and thought provoking, a chav will listen to music which will tell him how to behave.

Goths have no interest in popularity whatsoever. They think outside the box. People aspire to be popular and dress in certain ways that are ‘in’ with everyone else simply because it has never occurred to them how pointless societies values really are. In truth, there was never any point to any one of us being born. We’re doomed to struggle onwards in our skins, attached to life only by mechanisms put in our minds by evolution never to find any relief and never to find any meaning. We’re just all stuck with it now, together (and yuk to the simply stunning amount of ignorance I have to put up with). Conformity assumes that what another has thought of is better than what you can think of on your own but why is one mind better than another? (the conformist who argues that their own opinion is truth is a hipocrite, a really ridiculous laughable hipocrite) Its not is the truth. I am a goth and I aspire to value my own intuitions as much as I would value anyone elses (as much, not more you fools!) therefore I don’t care if you don’t like me because I DO.

I look strikingly different to everybody else, you chavwits think I am attention seeking when in fact I look different because of my total lack of interest in you lot, you lot and that vile sort of dress code that is ‘the norm’. Its not that I want you to notice me, its just that I haven’t bothered to noticed you!

I do as I please! But then again, so say the chavs.
The difference in effect is that I have a brain.
I realise that randomness of behaviour (as in anarchy) is a force of pure destruction without the input of thought. I know what I want for myself, plenty of cash, love, freedom, peace and I know that that’s pretty much what everybody else wants too. Therefore, I treat others as I wish to be treated myself. I would never stand in the way of anothers achievement because if I did how would I deserve to achieve anything of my own? Goths, in my experience (others as well as myself) are thoughtful, intelligent, hard working, kind, honest, well mannered. I have an education and I like when it shows!
As a goth, all you various ‘rude’ forms of life make me sick. Goth is what the individuals do- and as for the idea of the wannabe goth these either revert to conformity or evolve.(I mean slipknot/korn fans, as for manson fans I think those who say he isn’t gothic just don’t know enough about him- sure listening to manson WILL NOT make you gothic, but give that poor dark philisophical soul some credit! He’s certainly not gonna un-goth you!)  Wannabes are a transitional category but if they are to be acknowledged at all, they are not goths.
Goths make the greatest friends. Goths have the unusual ideas. Goths just don’t suffer from the same afflictions of ‘normality’ as you self-mirroring lot- change for once. down with mediocrity.There are two definitions

1) a person who likes to dress and act differently to the other people in society, normally in black but some like much brighter colours. They tend to be thinkers and more often than not quite creative. They have a satyrical sense of humour, and are able to laugh at both themselves and other people. This type of goth originated in the late 80's with the "death" of punk; goths back then liked the style and the "protection" it offered and so emulated it in their own style. They listen to and appreciate all sorts of good music. They can be gay/depressed/weird/mentally disturbed, but more often than not they are just normal people.

2) an offshoot of the nu-metal clique who think that to *really* piss off their parents they'll dress all in black and talk about death and suicide whilst listening to Limp Bizkit, Linkin Park and Slipknot because it's "cool". They tend to have very little idea of the other type of goths (or anything else other than themselves for that matter) and will probably change their fashion once it becomes "uncool" again. Thank god.1) A germanic tribe who invaded the late roman empire along with the vandals, visi goths etc and actually became more civilized afterwards.

2) An building style used in medieval times and later in victorian times.

2) A literature style of which Dracula and ther supernateral horrors were written in. 

3) A music genre that came about in the 80's as an of shoot of punk.

4) A subculture of people who originally listened to Goth music.  Now has increased to fit Industrial and Black/Death metal followers. Goths are typically seen as morbid, wearing black clothes almost all of the time, and wearing make up regardless of sex. Also seen to be more open minded to other cultures, sexualities etc.

5) Prententious people who listen to Nu metal who think they are goths but really teenagers who know nothing of music.To a Scally:  Someone wearing black clothes, and make up.

To a 12 year old Linkin Park fan: Someone who likes Korn.

To a goth: I'm not a goth!

Really: A tribe of eastern european barbarians that sacked rome in the 4th century.  The name of an artistic style, associated with clothing, and architectureOk,since this subject seems to be VERY controversal,I'll go through some things you may think and what you don't know,you see,I've actully MET some people who follow the Goth culture(labels suck)

Here we go...

1.Goths are suicidal
-Ok,let me begin by saying anyone can be suicidal,Goths,Preps,Jocks,Nerds,ANYONE.Just because someone dresses in black or listens to Rock music and stuff doesn't make them suicidal.
2.All goths are gay or lesbian
-Once again,this is a topic that anyone may be,not just these guys.
3.Goths are evil/worship satan
-This is what those damn Catholic Fanatics made everyone believe,ok,so they may seem dark or even...scary,but that doesn't make them satanic.Satanism is a RELIGION,not a trend.
4.All goths should die
-I am against the killing of anyone because of their likes/dislikes/looks/tastes.

Hopefully,this guide has given you insite that no matter how different people seem,we all are capable of the same shit.

But,here's one that may save you

If you don't like someone,leave them the fuck alone!Don't waste your life making their's hell because they don't look or act like you.Goth was originally a term used to describe people with a taste for certain bands eg: Bauhaus, Sisters of Mercy, The Cure, etc. in the '80s when punk started to fade out, and with wardrobes predominantly black.
In the 90s and early 2000s the goth subculture seemed to change to include bands such as Nirvana, Linkin Park, Slipknot, Cradle of Filth, etc.

Many goths have a cynical outlook on society and have an evolved sense of humor which has gone beyond the "Ya ma" as an insult and will laugh at others, and at themselves in a healthy way. Goths don't usually care what other people think of them, and don't care if they don't fit in. Goths don't care, either what sexuality, religion, etc. other goths are, and we don't take the piss out of gays because we aren't homophobes. 

If you shout insults after a bunch of goths, alot of the time, they might not be offended, but take pride that people are realising that they're individuals.Just another person in this world....
Lives, Breathes, Dies.

THE ENDA "Goth" is, loosely speaking, one who decides to separate from the mainstream culture for varying reasons (such as dissatisfaction with modern society, a will to be different, or just a liking to the styles whether it be music or visual or social).

Goths are not defined as someone who slashes their own wrists or sets fires to schools, that is what is called a [masochist], [vandal] or [sadist]. A Goth, in modern society, is merely a lifestyle. 

Although their image and demeanor consistently appears cold and reclusive, this is but a shell and Goths are more commonly found to be nicer than the 'average' stranger, due to their tendency to have intellectual/educated backgrounds, and artistic divulgences including the visual arts and musical talents. 

A 'pure' Goth epitomizes [beauty] not in the way that you would say "wowzers she is A BEAUTY", but in the way that the ideal Goth strives for clear skin and pure complexion; the dark hair and garb serves to enhance the fair complexion of pure skin. 

People carrying "Gothic" qualities does not relate whatsoever to their personality and/or attitudes towards other people, rather, their attitudes towards the many forms of art, community, and individuality.

---

As you can probably tell by now, I myself am a Goth. And a Christian (strange combination you say? *shrugs*). I don't cut myself, I don't swear, I don't think offensively of other people of all shapes and sizes (and colours et cetera) but I strive to be Me in a world where everyone and everything is just a copy of a copy of a copy..

There is freedom of speech, there is freedom of personality, and a natural Goth embraces the freedom of image.Goths do not and have NEVER liked metal of any kind. Metal fans who call themselves Goth are wannabes. Perioid. Goth generally ONLY listen to Gothic music which sounds NOTHING like metal. Goths hate metalheads and Goths hate emo kids. 96% of the people who use the word Goth have NO IDEA what it means.A potent bourbon flavored liqour.  Limited distribution.  Has established a cult following among airforce fighter pilots.N. When a girl swallows a males reproductive juice.  This makes her a canibal because she is eating babies.Some crazy muther fucka who sucks cock. (see homosexual)The point of this entry should really be this:  That the word "Cannabis" is not slang at all.  Instead it is the accepted botanical Genus name for the plant we know by so many other slang and colloquial terms: Hemp, Pot, Marijuana, Ganja, Weed, etc. etc.  (Cannabis sps. sativa, indica, and ruderalis.)  
Let the word Cannabis remind us that this indigenous herb, which the self-destructive dominator culture feels it needs to persecute so much, is in fact one of the many gifts from the abundant Earth... as natural as the clouds, the rain, the corn in the fields and all the many fruits of our gracious intelligent, and loving planet, Gaia.
Show your support:  Give a thumbs up and let the readers know that you feel the same way.  Let's make this entry a social and political statement.   =)Cannabis is a leafy plant which grows wild in many of the tropic and temperate areas of the world. It is cultivated both indoors and out for the production of its flowering tops. The most commonly used form of cannabis are the leaves and flowering tops (buds) which may be either smoked or eaten; It also comes in a more concentrated resinous form called hashish, and as a sticky black liquid called hash oil. There are three distinct species of cannabis: Cannabis sativa, Cannabis indica, and Cannabis ruderalis, though there is some argument as to whether these should be considered varieties rather than species. Most recreationally used cannabis is the result of interbreeding between these three types. The term 'hemp' is generally used to describe low-thc varieties of cannabis which are grown for industrial uses.n. A word used by a more intellectual species of the Homo-sapian to describe "weed" or "marijuana". These people are not "potheads" or "stoners", they are "tokers".the actual name of a marijuana plantA Plant that has been banned for nearly a century even though mankind and cannabis co-evolved. Other names include Pot, Weed, Ganja, Hash, Etc.
The Legalise Cannabis Alliance are trying to rectify this situation.
Cannabis Sativa (Hemp) has an estimated 25,000 uses other than it's most well known drug status.The one plant that could cure all of our economical, agricultural, social, and FUTURE problems.  If only the big corporations would worry about their children's children instead of their bank account.An herb which is usually smoked to get high. Symptoms include: short-term memory loss, hightened senses, creativity, hunger, general well-being, and in some cases, hallucinations.

Cannabis has basically no negative side-effects except mental addiction in few cases. Unlike what someone else said, YOU CANNOT DIE FROM SMOKING CANNABIS. There have been absolutely no deaths from only cannabis. I know someone who smoked 12 bowls of it in one night and just passed out drooling on the floor.

Better than alcohol because you don't get a hangover, and plenty of people can drive very well when stoned.The best dam thing since sliced bread
no flaws, no hangovers, natural sourced

follows the same rules as jesus:
its as good as gold but is classed as a criminal.

only substance on drug lists that is actually a herb not a manufactured drug.

usually smoked by people unwilling to be unrulely to society or by people who wish to experience the funnier side of more serious events

Unfortunately given wrong impressions by shows such as 'hollyoaks' and 'skins' which gives the impression smoking will ruin your life.the english name for marijuana. Why do they call it marijuana? because they wanted to associate it with mexicans as well when they were trying to outlaw it, using racist ploys.1)the plant growing in my buddies closet
2)the theme of the website www.cafepress.com/theleafThe perfect meal--an open-faced pie using tomato sauce, cheese, and any manner of meat toppings. In addition to the standard, medium-thick-crust pizza, there are two major American varieties: New York style, also called thin crust; and Chicago style, also called 'deep-dish' or (more accurately) 'stuffed' pizza.A delicious, round piece of dough that comes in square boxes for some strange reason.Greatest food ever. Otherwise known as the 7th food group and the most needed.Hands down the best tasting, most versatile and convenient food in the world.

Pizza.. might aswell be my religionHeavenly good stuff, extra cheese, extra sauce, some make it good, some don't.fucking tasty!The food of the gods(n) Open face pie, often utilizing a tomato based sauce and cheese, and baked.  Many variations apply.

(n) The fifth food groupA rather delicious substance brought to us by the hard labour of cows, farmers, dairymen, tomato growers, and Italian men alikepizza = awesome
awesome = pizza

use it just like the word "awesome"(noun and verb) polite euphemism for corn-hole or corn-holing.Give it a few years, and it will lead to chaos.(O) <--- That right there.The act of gently inserting your well lubed erect cock into your womans well rimmed and squeeky clean anus. Making sure plenty of lube has also been applied to her sphincter as well. With a gentle push, once the crown of your cock has stretched her sphincter, you allow her bung muscle to relax and then start a gradual entering of her turdcutter. Once fully in her turdcutter, you begin a slow, short pumping motion until you build up to a full length cock stabbing penetration of her dumphole. Stroking as fast as possible, while holding on to her hips until you reach the point of no return. You finish off, balls deep in her rectum. Pumping your gooey man juice deep in her crapper, coating the walls of her colon.1) to anally fuck someone
2) the assholeanus, ass pipe, chocolate factory, exit, turd squirter, shit hole, butthole, you get the pictureCorn Hole is a serious toss game played in leauges on the West Side of Cincinnati Ohio. The game and targets are very similar to Bag'O, a commercial game frome the East Coast U.S..anal sexJust another word for ass hole.To stick your wang in her assAmerican Slang for the anus. Originated from the use of corn husks as primitive toilet paper in Colonial days. Mainly used in the South and Midwest.A game played by throwing a beanbag into a hole on a tilted board. Seen on Univ. of KY campus.Foot-sucking, rubber wearing, pee on me, fruit-fuckin', candlewax drippin', long fingernail scrapin', tossed salad eatin',multiple partner havin', she-male, oil-drenched, chocolate sauce, whipped cream covered,vibrator usin',dress-up,banned in 30 states type of sex.adj. Engaging in some form of BDSM or enjoying nonstandard sexual or sensual stimulation. The opposite of vanilla.a tendency to like things, sexually or not, that may not apeal to a majority; open to experimentation.Sexual practices that many people view as wild, unusual, or extreme.  Definitions of this word vary from person to person; someone might think wearing a red bra is kinky, or having sex with the lights on, but someone else will classify kinky as being suspended from the ceiling, whipped, and gagged.  

Guys are often surprised to discover that quiet girls are the kinkiest.  But they're only quiet because they're imagining having lots of kinky sex.1. weird, bizzare  

2. sexually deviant

3. a sexually deviant personnot just whipped cream and cherries, although food fetishists will disagree! red bras have almost no part to play, unless it's ordered that you wear one. anything that goes against the norm of sex - so oral, anal, masturbation and titwanks aren't kinky.
think handcuffs, blindfolds, rope, leather, chains, spreader bars and anything that would shock the vicar and go from there, right on up to forced feminisation, scat (shit play), needles and knives. anything involving dead people [necrophilia], animals [bestiality] and children [paedophilia] ISN'T kinky. not only are those acts illegal - they're also sick.Fun, fun, fun!whips
gag balls
bend over bitch
whip cream
choclate syrup 
hand cuffs
black or red nightys
paddles
PAIN!noun. sex on an exercise ball.It's doing extreme or out of the ordinary things for sexual pleasureActual: An economic system in between capitalism and communism, advocating collective ownership of the means of production and distribution of goods.

Slang: Anything that a [right winger] doesn't like.1.  An economic system where the means of production, distribution and exchange is determined by the state/public sector in some form.  Can be centralised, decentralised, democratic or undemocratic.

2.  Description of a left-wing political position between social democracy (general acceptance of the market economy but thinks the public sector has a vital role in proividing some goods and services) and communism (marxism).  Agrees in the state determining the means of production, distribution and exchange but wants to bring that about peacefully and democratically.

3.  General description of the left: the belief that individuals should be judged on how they treat other people rather than on their job/race/sexuality, that people should have equality of opportunity, that in principle wealth should be distributed fairly to everyone who works rather than the minority who own most of the economy and most of the wealth and that an economy owned by a few individuals without a strong public sector to balance that is undemocratic and unjust.

4.  A stage in history defined by Marx's theories as coming after capitlalism and before communism where the means of production is owned by the state and run in the interests of the proletariat.

5.  A label used by various Marxist-Leninist dictatorships with state-run economies in the 20th Century to justify their totalitarianism.confused with communism, which doesn't work, this however can work very well with a mix of capitalism and democracy, it is a more equal economic system where the poor can become rich, whenever this comes up in a conversation someone eventually says it didn't work in russiaA socio-economic system where every worker-citizen is "equal." A decent theory on paper, but difficult to implement in the "real world."Term invented by the affluent to convince the average that the remote possibility of great wealth is worth sacrificing health care, [education], and a decent life for seniors. In other words as long as you too can be a [Bilderberg], even if the chance is as remote as yogic flying, then the 98% of the population who cannot afford extensive health care, post-secondary education, or [retirement] savings can all suffer.My take: all approaches to governing people lay on a spectrum and each is  interdependent with the economics of that society.  Because the terms cover widths on that spectrum, and are not able to be pigeon-holed, no one conveneient definition of a term such as socialism, and, hence, no one convenient dismissal, is acceptable to a thinking person.
  
Socialism has many current forms, some more invested in governmental "control" and involvement (western European govenrments) ostensibly stemming from the belief that people will not pay for that from which they do not receive immediate benefit; i.e., roads, health care, the military (need taxes to pay for these things).  Yes, the US is a socialist state as well, as it governs some aspects of production, some aspects of capital disbursement (in the form of the Fed, quasi-governenmental instititutions such as Fannie Mae, Freddie Mac, special US-backed corporate loans [ala Chrysler in the 80s]),  health care and wealth distribution (taxes).  We just do it to less of an extent that some claimed "socialist" states.  

If there is anything I would like people to undersdtand, it would be that socialism is not a bad word, no more so tham "dog", and that your unbiased assessment, as opposed to your knee-jerk dismissal, is warranted to truly understand and judge this concept.From abortion to genocide socialism is an ideology responsible for more deaths to humanity than any other ideology in the history of mankind.A word many would do well to look up in an actual FUCKING dictionary.

NOT Communism.

Socialism can be seen in many Western European countries working very well.

It involves being taxed proportionally to how much you earn, a free, or semi-subsidised health service, a minimum wage, decent social security and many many other benefits to society.first off lets get this straight, socialism is NOT facism, or communism.  anyone who says that is just ignorant.  Nazis were facists and pretended to be socialists in order to get more support, same with the Soviets and communism.  thats the only connection they have.  dont critisize something you know nothing about.

now the real definition: socialism supports economic controls but allows for some accumulation of wealth.  social restrictions are signifigantly weaker, hence the name socialism.
facism is completely the opposite, with lax economic controls, and strict social rules including that all residents must be completely loyal to the ruling party, and must never speak out.The political system that centers on the needs of the society as a whole. Sometimes used as an alternative name for [communism] or as a derogatory term for opponents of [capitalism]. In fact it is a very wide term that can accomodate quite diverse ideologies.National Republican Bullshit Network. Watched by ignorant, gun-toting, flag-waving ultra-nationalistic right-wing Christian fundamentalists who think George Bush is the new fucking Messiah or something; basically, the scum of American society who, if they had their way, would turn America in a fascistic police state in order to feel safe from the "terrorists" (aka: "brown people").A pseudo-news channel catering to the bottom of the American right-wing extremist barrel - people who are deathly afraid of anyone and anything that's even the slightest bit different from them.  About as "fair and balanced" as the Iranian government, which it closely resembles.Sensationlist trash channel.  State media dumbed down so even Dubya can understand it.Funniest Tv station ever. Good source of entertainment. But seriously, I trust the Daily Show more.news for red neck ass republicansA far right neo-con "talk show" that presents itself as news. In fact if the news does not favor their distorted view they focus on sensational tabloid stories of rape and murder to titillate the religious right that pretends morality. This show is so hilarious that I might even rate it as a comedy if it werent for the fact that some ignorant americans really believe it is fair and balanced. It is a show for lower IQ people who want to be reassured their small minds are correct and that everyone in the world who isnt white,right wing extremists re evil. Fox news hates you if you are Democrat, moderate thinking republican. Catholic, Lutheran,asian,black,hispanic, and the list goes on. They have a narrow box of extreme radical fundalmentalist with a corporate agenda and if you look closely rather perverted. The owner (Rupert Murdich" specializes in tabloids that exploit crimes against women and children then report every delicious sexual detail so the "moral" religious right" can get their jollies while exclaing how hrrible everyone else is. It really promotes rich big corporations and Republicans like George W. and use their guise as a "conservative" station to manipulate the average, easily manipulated person who wants to think of themselves as moral citizens while their mind is being filled with anything but factual news reporting. Wake up america and start watching C-span and see what is really happening.Completely and utterly without merit. A news station that not only presents the most wildly conservative of biases with the slogan "Fair and Balanced," but also presents worse television than Jerry Springer. I am NOT watching the news to see Sean Hannity and Bill O'Reilly scream "SHUT UP!" at every single guest they have.Total BullshitThe most pathetic excuse for a television news channel that I've ever seen.  I could personally shit in a bucket and then write a report saying that I did not take a shit in the bucket and be more accurate than Fox News.  These people fucking disgust me.  I can't believe there are idiots this fucking stupid.  See [republican] for more examples of idiocy.Real news put through a conservative Republican filter and then dumbed down.97% of the people in Utah.

.003% of the people anywhere else.

These really really nice, clean-living people who believe some pretty weird stuff.1. 99% live in Utah.
2. Napoleon Dynamite is their hero.
3. believe green jello is a sacred food.
4. have 28045345.5 kids.
5. use slang curse words: oh my ____ (heck, gosh, fetch...)
6. pretty much have the hottest girls around...People who believe in The Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-Day Saints; also (less accurately) known as the Mormon religion. Being Christian, (for they believe in and accept Christ as their Savior, and also strive to live a Christ-centered and Christ-like life), they also believe that Jesus Christ is what the Bible says He is:  the son of God the Father. They do not believe in the Trinity, but rather the Godhead: that God the Father, God the Son, and God the Holy Spirit are physically seperate but one in purpose. Many Mormons live in Utah, but the religion is practiced throughout the world. They believe in the Bible and also the Book of Mormon. They believe that the church of Jesus Christ (the same church/religion that Christ established when He came to this world) was restored to its fullness by Joseph Smith through the power of God for the preparation of the Second Coming of Christ.The slang term used to refer to members of the [LDS] religion.Apparently a very misunderstood religion.  Lets get the easy stuff out of the way first: "Mormon" becasuse they have ANOTHER TESTAMENT of JC titled "The Book of Mormon"; they only people practicing polygamy are "fundementalist Mormons" who are not associated with the Mormon Religion at all (Mormons are not polygamists); Actual name of the Church is The Church of Jesus Christ of Latter day Saints, LDS for short; and last of all not all of them wear name tags or ride bikes.

Now Joseph Smith (founder) is believed to be a prophet, like moses or ezikiel.  He is not worshiped only respected. They still have a prophet to day, who serves until he dies and then the next in line is chosen. He is believed to have been guided by a prophet from the past to a set of golden plates hidden in the woods of new york 100s of years ago.  He excavated them, translated them and found them to COMPLIMENT the Bible not contridict it.  And through many periods of Divine instruction formed what him and his followers belived to be the closest religion to what JC had when he was in Israel.  The BoM does not contridict the bible except to those who interpret it to do so.

Church.  They only go for Three hours each sunday, where they recieve instruction from each other not one assigned preacher. As well as partake of the sacrament, very similar to many other christian religions.  During the week each age group has and Activity. (i.e. youth, adults, children) designed to enhance brotherhood and faith. Thats it.

Missions.  A mission is a religous assignment from the chuch to spread their beliefs. Like many religions do conicidently.  All are volutary.  The missionary (can be man, women, elderly couple) chooses to go, pays for the whole she-bang and serves his/her time "tracting".  They knock on your door and ask you if you want to hear about their church.  99% of all doors knocked on are by referal. (Actually is church policy now I think). So instead of taking it out on these youngmen and women take it out on your friends that probably gave them your name and address. A mission does not have to be served to go to heaven.

Heaven.  They believe in three main divisions of heaven: telestial, terestial, and celestial. The equivelant of hell is "outer darkness" the only people who go there are those who know about god and jc and completely reject them as false.  ALL others, really all of them (murders, war lords, hate mongers) have a place in one of the levels of heaven.  All are paradisical in nature (except outer darkness which is exactly what it sounds like). In the lowest level you will find you hitlers, mureders and such.  The second "good" people thats most of us. And last of all the top Celestial, where god himself resides.  Those former mortals that live here are god like in all aspects. Advancement is possible, but you can only go up not down.

Big families. Can't really explain this one, they just like to fuck i guess.  After marriage ofcourse.

Fact more mormons live in california than in utah. Another fact some world headquarter buildings are in las vegas.  Although a high percentage of the population in Utah is mormon it is increasingly smaller every year.

Temples. They are not churches for regular worship.  A certain degree of worhtiness must be established before entering. ( a simple interview with a leader about their lifestyle all taken on their word) The reason being is it is a model of heaven as they believe it. Also mormon sealings, not weddings, ocur here.  Meaning the family is sealed together for all time and eternity so as to guaruntee there being together in heaven.  And yes by proxy dead people can be sealed to living families. Oh and you have to be atleast 18 to enter unless you are a child being sealed to a parnet or a youth (12-17) that are performing proxt baptisms for the dead.

Baptism. Pretty much your run of the mill submersion into water. John the Baptist type of deal.  Usually done at eight which is the age determined for a child to make his/her own informed decision ( as biased as it may be).

Over all beliefs> Treat others how you want to be treated, the heaven thing, THE BIBLE ( yes the no shit king james version bible), and any other testiment of JC (including but not limited to the BoM), Families are forever, all basic christian belief. And yes they are christian.

Sorry to burst all of those ignorant bubbles out there but Mormons are no more a cult that the baptists, presbytirian, methodist, Catholics, etc etc.  just a normal christian faith with a less than normal beginning.

Don't get me wrong there are a few really pushy mormon assholes out there but there are a lot of pushy assholes from every religious sect out there.A very nice, generous, misunderstood group of non-gay, mostly white people. They don't practice polygamy or have multiple wives except after death where men can have as many wives as they want. They try to do the best they can in life. They're not perfect and don't think they're perfect unless but they do think they are better than non-Mormons. They strive to work hard and get through life without much trouble. They don't put down other religions, at least not to your face. They don't think you'll go to hell unless you're gay or you're in a different religion. They believe everyone has a chance to have eternal salvation, except the gays, and that Heavenly Father and Jesus Christ are two separate beings, and that Christ created the Earth for straight Mormons only. They think they're Christian. They don't think Joseph Smith (the translator of the book of Mormon) is a god, just equal with Jesus. They also believe he is a prophet of God. They aren't here to overtake the world, even though their doctrine says they are. They try to allow everyone who would like to hear about their church to hear about it. And they also try to allow everyone who would NOT like to hear about it, hear about it as well. They understand that it's your choice to join or not and they don't force it upon you. However, they'll force you to join once you're dead so why fight it now? I know these things are true and I say them in the name of Jesus Christ, Amen.People who won't stop coming to my doorstep to tell me the good news.A member of the Church of Jesus Christ and the Latter Day Saints...who subscribe to the teachings of the Bible and to the Book of Mormon.

Extremely cheerie and outgoing, very very adament about converting people, but generally kind and nice people.A guy in a suit and tie on a bicycle usually accompanied by another guy in a suit and tie on a bicycle both wearing yellow backpacks filled with root beer and green jello.A religion that, if you tell a Jehovah's Witness you're a part of, they will instantly leave. The opposite is true for born agains.See [sham], [fraud], [fake], or any word adjacent to those.

Basically its a falsetto 'religion' in which eternal happiness is attained by donating all of your money to the leaders.

Founded by L. Ron Hubbard as a way to scheme money and make a fast buck off his books. One of the 'holiest' days in this religion is Hubbard's birthday.

Because most celebrites such as Tom Cruise and John Travolta are too stupid to realize it, they belong to this group.A cult founded by science fiction writer L. Ron Hubbard. There core beliefs are as follows:

This area of the galaxy was once ruled by an alien warlord named Xenu. 65 million years ago his empire was overpopulated horribly, so to combat the overpopulation he had trillions of citizens called in for psychiatric evalutations and tax audits, where they were given paralytic drugs, loaded onto space planes, and flown to Planet Teegeeack. Once on this planet, their bodies were stacked in huge piles around volcanoes, while atom bombs were dropped into these volcanos, instantly killing trillions of galactic citizens.

To keep these people from reincarnating in the rest of the galaxy, Xenu set up a special trap. Powerful force-fields kept their souls (called "Thetans" in Scientology jargon) from escaping, and these thetans were then shown special holographic movies about the various lies they are supposed to believe, with characters like Jesus, Mohammed and Buddha. Over time, these thetans began to believe Xenu's lies about false gods, and began to reincarnate on Teegeeack (but the thetans called this world "Earth"). When intelligent life appeared on Teegeeack, thousands or millions of "Thetans" cling to every native soul (er, "thetan") and fill it's head with nonsensical thoughs and irrational beliefs.

The key idea of Scientology is to avoid tax officials and psychiatrists at all costs, while paying the church a large amount of money for special "counseling" (called "auditing" in their jargon) to help you reach a special enlightened state called "Clear" where you telepathically communicate with these "thetans" clinging to you and force them out of your body, and rid yourself of evil Xenu's influence.

(By the way, most Scientologists don't know this, like the Mystery Cults of the Greco-Roman world, Scientology doles it's doctrine out in tiny doses to it's new recruits, and tells the public next to nothing about what it believes. You don't hear that whole story until you reach a special rank in their group called "OT3" for "Operating Thetan 3". Their doctrine holds that if this got out, the Thetans in people would revolt at hearing the truth and people would get sick and die possibly just by hearing this story, which of course leads people who aren't Scientologists who hear this story to tell it to others and watch them not die or get ill from it.)A new-age religion thought up by ex-sci-fi writer L. Ron Hubbard. They try to recruit new members by offering them 'personality tests' to determine the 'root cause' of the person's unhappiness. Interestingly, the solution to this 'root cause' is usually paying lots of money to the Church of Scientology. Scientologists have been rightly satirised in several TV programmes, films and computer games, for example the movementarian cult in The Simpsons or the hubologists in Fallout 2, but despite this Scientology is still attracting a steady stream of new converts. The main reason for this is that people are idiots.The science of making money. A pseudo-religion set up by a money grabbing black magician/adulterer/corrupt bastard called L. Ron Hubbard.A religous cult who's beliefs revolve around an intergalactic warlord named "Xenu" who nuked a bunch of aliens here on Earth billion of years ago.  The souls of these aliens, called "Thetans", now inhabit our bodies and make us unhappy.  The only way to get rid of these "Thetans" is to pay a bunch of money to these con men for the rest of your life.Scientologists give a lot more than their money. Scientology is a living hell once you reach the stage "Clear". You are then informed about "Operating Thetan III" whereupon you are asked to join "The Sea Organisation" or "Sea Org". Since they have you brainwashed by now, you eagerly except. The Sea Org is like a concentration camp on a boat. You are forced to undergo intense physical labor. If you displease the slave masters, or "Captains" in anyway, you are punished in a manner called "Ethics". You are subject to phsyical torture, sleep deprivation, things like running from 7AM to 9PM, or mopping the deck all day in the sun in a black jumpsuit. They put you in a "recovery group" if you are being punished, and they try to brainwash you further so that you won't act out again. In this group, there's no telling if or when you might eat, or how much food you get, and living quarters are dark, hellish, roach infested, and damp. If you act out again, you are either put in a second level of "Recovery", where most people perish from exhaustion. If you have done anything seirous, (Most reasons were as minor as improperly addressing a Captain), but if you have done anything that they consider serious (plans to leave, treason, mutiny), there is a book that shows level of ways to execute. The most common way is blindfolding the prisoner, tying the hands and feet together, and dropping them off the edge of the boat into the ocean.

Scientology is like some creepy science fiction movie, but it's all really happening. They have "Churches of $cientology" set up everywhere, they have an army, and endorsements from celebrities like Tom Cruise, Nancy Cartwright, Chick Corea, and John Travolta. It's a seriously dangerous thing to get involved in, and I reccomend this website to anyone considering joining: www.xenu.netThe religion created by the minor Science Fiction writer, L. Ron Hubbard in 1952. Scientology teaches that you are an immortal "thetan" that is entrapped in the physical universe and your own problems by your thoughts (considerations and postulates). In practice, Scientology is the exact opposite of what it teaches. It claims to free you, but most people would say that Scientologists are brainwashed and enslaved. It claims to promote freedom of speech, but Scientology sues anyone who says anything bad about Scientology. It claims to want to improve the earth, but sues anyone who tries to use it's books and techniques without paying a license. It is a very schizophrenic and dangerous organization whose members actually infiltrated and spied on the U.S. government in the biggest ever case of its type in U.S. history.One word. BullshitFake ass religion that suckers people into giving money to cheapo bastards. What they tell you about it is that if you believe in Scientology you will be forever happy, however, this is just an excuse to get your money.The science of making money that answers the eternal unanswered questions such as "I wonder just how gullible and stoooopid i am". It has been crapped onto the world since the early 1950s by one of the world's greatest con-artists/[dipshit]s, L Ron Hubbard. 

Unfortunately the gullible Earth natives to whom this was presented to, they turned out to be so desperate to [get a life] and to believe this trash which may appear to be handed to them on a silver platter, where infact it was a permanent $100/week subscription to utter [bullshit].

The wisdom (ironically, [stupidity] is much more suitable) of the scientology subject will probably be realized by the current primitives who would be stupid enough to belive they are the hosts of alien souls as a result of an alien warlord who went bonkers with nukes, instead of being pawns in a money making scheme.

Hopefully in a few generations, humankind, if it survives the [bullshit] of scientology, will evolve from its brainwashed and cash-strapped stage and the generations living then will realize how fucked in the head were people to believe in a cult started out by a small-time sci-fi writer. Hence most of the work of current officers of Scientology is concerned with making money off desperate losers and stoned celebrities.comes from the 19th-century American practice of selling cure-all elixirs in traveling medicine shows. Snake oil salesmen would falsely claim that the potions would cure any ailments. now-a-days it refers to fake products.Medicine or therapy that doesn't work.any dubious or fraudulent remedy or cure (The route of the fraud the word is derived from resulted from a misunderstanding of a traditional Chinese joint and muscle painkiller derived from the skin of the Chinese water snake)[bullshit]An item for sale which does not produce the advertised effects.A woman that likes to cause mischief and sexual deviancea hobo is an itinerant worker, a career which sprang up during the depression. A hobo, unlike a bum or a tramp, is more than willing to work, but mostly for a short duration, as their main impetus is travel, the love of the journey above the actual destination. A bum is stationary, feeding off of those unfortunate enough to cross his path; a hobo merely travels from town to town, finding work when he can, but only for the sake of financing his next adventure. NEVER call a hobo a bum...they'll kick your sorry no-bo ass!Hobos are a peaceful people.Being homeless and pennyless, similar to MC Hammer. They go place to place taking money from people for doing odd jobs, whether it be pulling weeds, kiiling roaches, cleaning roach poop, or eating roaches.

They're like uh...drifters. Telling stories to whoever they canA free man/woman who is no longer trapped in the society of capitalism and time. He/she can go to sleep whenever he/she wants to, and do anything.
Hobos are good at recycling dumpstered food that huge coporations throws out.the most kickass people in the world, also the coolest job in the world. 

someone who could do something with their lives but don't want to.1. Originally referred to poor, homeless itinerant workers in the USA. These original hobos travelled from town to town seeking temporary employment, usually along the lines of physical labour. They are traditionally associated with freighthopping (illegally riding in the carriages of freight trains). See also [drifter], [vagabond] and [okie].

2. Nowadays commonly used throughout the English-speaking world to refer to any homeless person. See also [bum], [tramp] and [beggar].ho·bo
noun
One who wanders from place to place without a permanent home or a means of livelihood. 

adjective
Hip n groovy

verb
To do as a hobo does; the act of sitting in random areas for no good reason.A tight ass clothing line originated in Washington D.C

named H.O.B.O meaning Help Our Brothers Out.

Only worn by blacks and fake white people.

Thats why its help our BROTHERS outa hobo spends their time riding the rails and is happy with a bottle of beer a gutair and some friends. hobos are not at all to be confused with bumbs and tramps because they are unhappy and bitter about their homeless state and hobos are happy and they make the best of their situationhobo = Home Owner Bought Out

it is the acronym for people from 'the Great Depression' who lost their homes when the banks called their loans due (as per the terms of the loan).

All legal, but totally sucks.

Has come to mean many things, mainly derogatory.A hobo is someone without a house or a job. They will work, though. You most commonly hear of hobos living in boxes, but some hobos live in homeless shelters. in the old days, you hear of hobos hiding on trains. that doesn't happen very often anymore. hobos often stand outside with signs that say "need food" or "homeless anything will help".What we all are, but are too afraid to admit.An immature loser who can take any sentence and somehow make it about sex.1. someone who thinks or acts like you wish you had the balls too
2. A person whos sexual ideas kicks your little morals in the teethsee [bayat]

A person whose behavior deviates from what is acceptable especially in sexual behavior.still unknown because so many of your definitions are fucked upSomeone who's idea of normal sexual interaction just happens to be kinkier than yours.An individual who's actions or behaviours deviate from what is normal, moral or tastefull. A matter of opinion or fact.

Usually applied when describing someones sexual desires or actions, can also apply to law.Someone who's constantly got sex on the brain, and usually loves to share it with others.Practically everyone on this website. I think that 98% of this websites definitions include porn. Why are you so obsessed with "jizz" and "fucking girls" is it because you know every sex move but your a 56 year old virgin and when the time comes, you dont have a clue what to do so you kick the 96 year old woman out and just cry.  

P.S: whoever thumbs this down is the word im describing and you know it.Anyone who gets sexual satisfaction from doing something unusual. Definitions of "perverted" behavior vary depending on who's using the word. To a ninety-six-old-old grandma, tongue kissing may be see as perverted. To a twenty-one-year-old guy, smearing chocolate sauce all over his girlfriend's body and licking it off while she's tied up isn't.A member of [deviantart].A superior thinker than a majority of the community. An individual who posseses the intellect to have other beliefs than social programming teaches us. Most deviants make a positive footprint on society, rather than the misconceived negative version. Deviants are simply individuals who differ in many aspects to the larger flock of society.someone who ideas both sexually and socially are greatly different from the 'moral' majority and they act upon their desires to satisfy only theirselves
2. more twisted than a standard [pervert]To stray from a standared, a principle, and to leave from an established course.An individual whos behaviour and attitudes stray from normal or accepted standards in society.Somebody with a particularly disturbing sexual preference or straying abnormally far from the norm.A Kitten Stealer who adores his pet potatoes (also stolen)the devil in human form

lord of all evilThis can range from anything from a simple roadside diner to a mega-gas station. Usually located in rural areas and referred to by locals as the best place to get a decent cup of coffee, breakfast, lunch or dinner. A good truck stop not only offers coffee or meals, but also a great place that sells souvenirs and trinkets of the local area. Some even offer internet access and showers. Seedier truck stops offer lot lizards (prostitutes) as well.a)A little roadside hole in the wall where the strangling odor of trucker poop mingles with cigarette smoke. The rest rooms are right at the entrance so you get a good whiff and lose your appetite.

b) Having to take a crap "I gotta go to the truck stop."Basically, to use the trucks of your skateboard to hit someone.The act of taping a toy truck to the end of your penis and anally entering a dirty lady.A huge hole in your nose from doing too much coke.a place where dudes blow other dudes1. A row of blue portable toilets.

2. Expensive escorts bought by rich Arab and European men to go on "yacht parties" for $30,000+ a piece. In reality these women are brought onto these boats to get shit and pissed on, hence the name Porta Potties.

Its easy to identify one of these women by the pictures they post on Facebook. If a friend of the female kind is always posting pictures of shopping sprees in Dubai and has a folder with nothing but pictures of her and friends on a yacht drinking champagne in any UAE or St. Tropez area she is a Porta Potty.

Fun Fact!: Some well known Porta Potties work at the Spearmint Rhino in Las Vegas.[noun] The correct spelling for that portable plastic toilet you see outdoors at sporting events, the park, construction sites, the sn00p dogg concert, etc.Dirty slunt that travels the world and gets shit and pissed on by terrorists. Typically on a yacht.

Originally coined by Nik Richie of thedirty.com its been widely used to label even lesser scunts mostly previously known as cum dumpsters.A Disgusting Shitter That Is Used By Homeless People, FisherMen, Mexicans And Construction Workers1. A portable bathroom

2. Place where two people can have a lot of fun but be careful because it often tips over (historically with PHD)1. Portable toilets used by Americans and other nations to remove one's wastes
2. Secret government time-machines disguised as porta-pottiesThis really gross green box that is filled with old shit, and is usually found in the very back of anything. Similar to an outhouse, although it's portable.A exciting dinner theater show located in 7 locations throughout the U.S. You are seated in a various section, and your section has a certain knight they root for in the tourneyment, and jousting. The show is a great thing to do for special occasions and is fun for the whole family!a place in Buena Park Ca, on Beach Blvd where you pay a whole bunch of money to eat shitty food, drink expenisve, shitty mixed drinks, and watch a bunch of fake ass knights, on small ass horses, compete in tournament games, in hopes of winning the princesses heart.  Oh yeah, and dont cheer for the red knight, he always loses.

Nah, just kidding, its fun, and if you go, make sure you call your server "farm boy"A burning, unquenchable desire to have sex with a black person. Similar to [Yellow Fever] in that it is a racial sexual affinity.The Rebecca Black epidemic that has infected most of today's youth.

Black's new single, "Friday", went viral 5 days after being posted on a comedian's blog. The song itself is horribly written, composed and produced. Rebecca now has millions of views on youtube and has been twittered as much as Japan's crisis of 2011.

Wikipedia claims that her video is referred to as, "a youtube laughingstock" and there is not one critic that favors the song. Bottom line: she is famous for being shit at what she does.trying to be black.  also, trying to adapt to the black culture by
1. eating chicken
2. wearing fubu 
3. working at McDonalds.
4. wathcing black women in pornThe black plague or black death was a disease epidemic that spread throughout Europe in the mid 14th century. This was mostly due to the bubonic plague. The disease traveled through rat flea bites. Symptoms such as headache, fever, and swelling of lymph nodes were common and sometimes bloody sputum. When the plague was over, 1/3 to 1/2 of the European population was killed. Deaths caused riots, harsher persecution of Jews, and religious fanatics that would go about punishing themselves. The result was a major factor in the beginning of the renaissance.A disease that affects the mind, caused by listening to Rebecca Black too much and becoming a fan of her. Similar to Bieber Fever and usually fatal.When a sudden sick feeling inhibits ones body, immediately after hearing a song by Rebecca Black.Sucked into the Rebecca Black craze, singing "Friday" on everyday of the week and going super crazy on Friday.A phenomena that has infected much of today's youth and other innocents into acting like the typical [nigger]. Symptoms include: Listening to rap, wearing pants that show underwear, obsessing over pricey sneakers, playing basketball, stealing items from stores or homes, dancing like a [retard], using the nigger's dialect, misusing the word [nigger] (heard as "[nigga]") as a "friendly" term among peers, graffiti, gay bashing, disloyalty to cops, and [misogyny]. This is a very lethal infestation, known causes of death being drug overdose, gunshot wounds, and high blood pressure (from eating all that chicken and waffles). This plague is not limited to blacks, one famous example being Eminem, a very dangerous white infectee or[wigger]. The Black Plague is typically distributed by rap and peer influence. The infectees have distinct appearances that separate them from model citizens: "[chains]," cornrows, hoodies, pricey sneakers, drooping pants, and a monkey-like walk. Redzones for most of those with the plague are Georgia, D.C., New York, Alabama, Louisiana, and the west coast of the U.S., but in reality, the infestation is not limited to one specific place. Known ways of repelling the Black Plague carriers are donning police uniforms, carrying around job applications, avoiding conversation with the infectees, and being within bounds of police stations, colleges, and courthouses. There is no way to rid of the Black Plague, but all we can do is hope that the plague dies over time.Not to be confused with the [Bieber Fever], having the Black Plague is one's way of supporting the teen-singer Rebecca Black, and her viral hit single "Friday."
Despite the song's negative reviews, supporters with the Black Plague still exist to this very minute.The sickness provoked by a startling, unprepared for viral attack by the name of "Rebecca Black." Symptoms include beign followed by 30-year old black men while sitting in your school bus and having to make the unorthodox decision of trying to decide which seat to sit in.Nausea and headaches often caused by way too much fucking alcohol.
Can be identified by the ashtray in ones mouth,the vomit on last nights clothes,the want to never drink or eat again,the great dislike of sunlight, the undesirealbe urge to apologise to all the people you spent the night with, the stranger in your bed and need for a glass of water and many many asprinThe result of heavy drinking of which results in an alcohol blood content that still exists long after drinking because your liver is still trying to cope with the detox.

As a result the liver uses water to metabolize the alcohol, this water is obtained from the body and often the brain which has a high concentration of water, this lack of water that is a result of metabolism causes the membranes in the brain to tighten thus causing the headaches and body aches often are another result

puking can also occur when the bodyThat annoying period between inebriation. Can also be avoided by continuously consuming alcohol until dead.the effects of going to collegethe body ache which you experience in the morning after a night of drinking. Most commonly accompanied by vomiting, quivering, head ache, short term amnesia, and (depending on your drink)diarehea.A condition in which the body is trying to cope with the mass quantities of alcohol consumed roughly 8 hours earlier. the liver needs to detoxify the bloodstream so it uses water from other parts of the body including the brain to do it. This causes body cramps, uncomfortableness, headaches, and other shit.

Pretty much, its god's way of saying "k lets sit down and figure out what we did last night" this often results int he realization of new girlfriends, unwanted hook ups, the discovery that you will soon be a parent, and other horrible issues.A chemical imbalance in the brain which produces notable physical discomfort. Can be caused either by too much alcoholic consumption, or too much sex. 

Some people prefer water, tea, black coffee (ok, ok, _espresso_), Peptol Bismol, "hangover helper" pills, and the like, but the only real cure for a hangover is time.

Symptoms: headache, physical weakness, extremely upset stomach, and vomit all over the new carpet in your bathroom.The wrath of grapes.what you get after a night of too much [bacardi 151] 
when your brain is starved of water as the water is used for your liver as the [alcohol] is dehydrating you.
feels great while drinking but then again  "good things dont last long" 
where theres good theres bad!When you drink more then you should of an alcoholic beverage and you wake up the next morning with a terrible head ache,achy body, and you puke ur ass off."Covert" means hidden, not discussed, kept under wraps.

.One is who annoying. This person tells you a story but needs to go into specific lengthy backgrounds on each person involved in the story and by the end you don't even know how the story started.

As blood alcohol level increases, annoyance level decreases.1.  To sneak in to a conversation uninvited and to distort and repeat innocent statements for perversion and pleasure - also know as Noncing.  Can be erradicated with the use of a good quality Nonce-Trap(TM)1.  The current occupant of the White House.
2.  See also [Bush, George W.]one who [steal]s

A thief is anyone who has unrightfully taken what doesnt belong to him/her. 

Stealing is done usually in an act of greed and self gain.A person that claims the belongings of others as his or her own.

The Ideal thief practices Theft as an art form, not as a way of survival. The Ideal Thief does not apply force to any person or object: Assassinations can be quick and simple, Locks can be picked with swift fluid motions, no force should be used. The Ideal Thief knows that trickery, deception, and intelligence will always triumph over physical strength.to steal something while being incredibly stealthyThe act of stealing someones belonging/sAn individual who uses stealth and concealment to his advantage. A well educated thief can use these tactics to gain entry to nearly anything with the help of a collection of specific tools designed for the art of theft. There happen to be many forms of thievry which include brute strength and an example of this is a thief bashing a careless bystander in the head, rendering him unconcious. Another form requires tactics and intelligence, the professional thief. The professional thief is hard to come by since most do not make it to this stage. Alot of thieves end up being caught in the act, arrested and fined or imprisioned. Sometimes though, a thief excels in the art, using a combination of many forms of tactical stealth, becoming a skilled artisan of the art.Someone who uses other people's private property without their permission or them knowing it.A person that pwnz you.Someone who steals from K-MartOne who steals co-workers sales in a supposed "friendly" work environmentIts a fucking fruit for god sake. Who the fuck DOESN'T know what a banana is?! FUCK! A STARVING KID IN AFRICA KNOWS WHAT A BANANA IS! HE FUCKING FANTASIZES ABOUT ONE EVERY DAY!An asian person who acts like they are white. Yellow on the outside, white on the inside.A yellow fruit that is known to dance and sing about peanutbutter and jelly.According to Gwen Stefani, bananas is what "this shit" is. Soon thereafter she informs us how to spell bananas. 

Addicting? Yes.
Retarted? Perhaps.
Genius? Absolutely.1. A big curved fruit that is yellow. 
2. Can be used as a dildo for a girl who is too cheap or shy to buy a REAL dildo. A banana works just as well.it's a fuckin' FRUIT1. a slang word derived from the old saying "bananas" used to describe someone that was crazy. Used now to describe anything in style or cool.One of the only words in the english language with the ability to make you feel stupid every time you try to write or type it.Banana, a subscriber of Onision who watches his videos so obsessively they begin to peel their own skin off while cannibalizing themselves to the point of death. Most bananas, aka onision subscribers Wind up dead or in the hospital due to the cancerous effectiveness videos. Onision must be stopped.A high potassium snack food(1) Punishment or reward for one's actions; (2) getting what you have coming to you; (3) getting what you deserve; (4) karma.

Commonly mispelled as comeuppins.More accurately described as a colloquial phrase, it means
"your deserved reward or just due" for an action taken or statement you have made. It always conveys that to be of a negative nature. It should be hyphenated as neither word, of it's own definition, conveys close to the meaning of the combination of the two; therefore the linkage of the hyphen is needed.A "reward" i.e. well deserved and long awaited revenge for past misbehavior. The "reward" should be administered by those previously wronged and in a public or humiliating way.A punishment you deserve for doing a bad thingTHE ACT OF HAVING A PREMATURE EJACULATION IN YOUR DUNGAREES.Tiny rubber super balls, such as the kind bought in supermarket vending machines.peasant, hick, hayseedA hick, redneck, etc. Commonly referred to Niko by Vlad in GTA4.A general term given to any inbred, red-necked hick.A bucktoothed,hillbilly, river rat, (slack jawwed yokel)Some1 who was born in tha country and isnt street smart. talks with a goofy southern accent.eats squirell. usually named Cletis(tha slack jawwed yokel) Can be a diss for somebody living in the country.a rural person = [country bumpkin]A hillbilly being who roast goats and sodomises or auctions of their children to more desperate yokels.Incest a game the whole family can play is enjoyed by the majority of yokels (the other minority dont have kids).a farmer type bum.. often called "Cletus" (Character from The Simpsons)Yokel is a term derived from the Hebrew meaning of the word toilet.

Yokel is a derogative term used to describe how unsatisfactory and dam right gross something or someone is.the guy from CCC called ryanA "yokel" is a hybrid of man and hairy beast (much like that of an ape or Big Foot).  The yokel's diet consists of nothing more than Camel Wides, and the occasional glass of water.

Main hobbies of the yokel include ranting about vairous computer/technical issues ,ghetto rigging jeeps to be lifted to heights that could be considered unsafe or stable, and assembling various firearms in his basement.

Increasingly the yokel has been sighted crusing around on his motorcycle in his all leather attire braging about how cheap the cycle is to operate and own.

Any differance of opinion from the yokel's has been known to send him into intense rants about how he/it is right, so use caution when expressing your ideas.Pronounced: "Huylo" [xʊj'lo]

Sitting Russian Tsar.An asshole, bigot, homophobe, tyrant, first-class prick, dick-tator, prone to invade nearby defenceless democracies and jailing female rock bands. Can be seen hanging out with other weirdo leaders such as Berlusconi and faking wild animal encounters. Semi-delusional, self-justifying and deceptive.a current president of russia. many russians like him, cause they can't understand his real policies! his kinda mean coward! also he says that russia is a great empire, but russia sucks nowadays and that's the true! also he is a racist, because during his governing the level of racism in russia is growing rapidly, but putin says he doesn't comsider it to be racism! he wants to rule till his death, despite of the fact it's his second and the last term of governing judging by the russian constitution, but please do not vote for him! even G.W. Bush is better!1.) An ex-[KGB].

2.) The current "president" of Russia.

3.) The most powerful mob boss in the world.The current president of Russia.  Resembles a giant albino bat, with his pointy ears, palid complexion, angular features and balding pate.

Former KGB man who is edging the country very slowly towards dictatorship.  Shows the tendancy to repeat history (killing Chechens, desiring more government control.)Synonym for bullshit.Something vile that won't go away, like dog shit on your shoe, or the stench of a decaying body.Derivative of the Spanish "puto." Putin means "little faggot." It is not necessarily an insult, although it can be used that way.Putin is any leftover biological material stuck to a sex toy; usually fecal matter. Putin is differentiated from Santorum in that Putin is on the device, or dildo, (usually a phallus like object made of plastic, latex, glass or wood) specifically.Has bromance with Donald trumpAnother [mediocre] somewhat popular nu-metal band, this time, from Canada, which isn't a surprise considering their musical track record (Avril, Celine Dion, Barenaked Ladies, etc). Lead singer Chad is an extremely nasal "Marlboro Man" type vocalist who sounds constipated on a permenant basis. Guitar consists mostly of easy-to-play power chords that give the band a "tough" sound to the untrained ear, but a closer look reveals a band that has nothing to offer creatively. They were recently exposed recycling their music in their two hit singles, "How You Remind Me" and "Someday", which sound nearly identical when played simultaneously.the act of willfully allowing one's ears to bleed.Horrible band.  Plain and simple.  Most of their songs sound nearly identical, because they have no musical talent or creativity.  Just because you can play some power chords does not make you a good guitar player. Just because you can write sappy love songs with almost the same melody for every song does not make you a good songwriter.  This band is like cyanide for my ears, and it is very hard for me to understand what people hear in their music.  Maybe they had one or two catchy little hits, but next time really listen to what they are playing and compare it to a band such as, The Strokes.  Tell me what sounds better and more creative. If you say Nickelback, then you are entitled to your opinion of course, but I feel very sorry for you, because you will never learn to appreciate actual talented musical expression.  I'm not saying stop listening to Nickelback if you really like them, im simply saying expand your musical horizon.  There is better, more thought provoking stuff out there.a shitty band, the lead singer seriously needs a cough drop and is the ugliest fucker i have ever seenSee [overrated], [fraud], [untalented]. A fake ass excuse for a so called "Post Grunge" band. But in reality they're not grunge. They're a subgenre of rock known as "Nu-Metal".  Usually Loved by pre-teens, they are easily called the "greatest rock band ever", but anyone with a brain and passion for music will know that it's crap. If anyone has actually gone through every song that Nickelback has produced, you'd notice that most of the song melodies in Nickelback's songs sound exactly identical to one another. This PROVES that Nickelback obviously have no talent. And are frauds.probably the worst band in the world right now. They use the same 3 power chords for every song which attributes to them all sounding the same.The singer (i dont care to remember his name) tries so hard to be eddie vetter but just sucks.the rhythem section is tottaly uninspired and the solos which are rarely heard due to the guitar player sucking are so easy and bland a 3 year old could play them easily. also they often try to appear like rock n roll "bad boys" by :o drinking alchohol. wow slash died for like half an hour when he o.d thats bad. being 25 and in Nickelback and drinkin half a corona thats weak.If anyone actually bothered to play a guitar or any insturment they would realize this band is totally gayWhy do I hate Nickelback so much? They perpetuate the sadness of honoring mediocre and un-original non-creative music. Because of their unwillingness to actually think, the mindless masses are not forced to actually use their minds and demand better. Nickelback is a clear-cut example of why our art is in a state of stale, regurgitated darkness, and the true artists are forced to remain on the underground circuit. The longer this goes on, the worse our kids will have it.A band whose music is the auditory form of swallowing Satan's semen. Calling this band's music bland and completely mindless  would be a compliment. They are consumer artists who lack creativity, but appeal to a shallow vapid audience with lyrics that make them sound "tough" and "racy". Just another neutered  capitalist scumbag band. They are the antithesis of alternative music because nothing is alternative about them; they are mainstream garbage and should have choked on their umbilical cordswhen someone shits directly into your ear. Named after one of the world's worst bands, as anyone with good taste in music would have concludedA mediocre, and undeservedly popular "post-grunge" band from Alberta. Their dull, uninteresting, dull-as-dishwater, profanity-free music can be heard on pretty much every single radio station in the country, and is the kind of the music I like to call "Soccer Mom Rock." Like I've said before, their songs are boring, lifeless, and all sound incredibly similar to each other(listen to their dreadfully boring "hit" How You Remind Me and the equally dull Someday together and you'll know what I mean), and the Jesus-resembling singer, Chad Kroeger, has an annoying singing voice, and tries too hard to capture the powerful, growling vocals of Eddie Vedder. Listen to Pearl Jam or Soundgarden instead.a person, who after hearing a story, responds with one of their own which is intended to belittle or "top" the previous one. usually, toppper's stories are complete and utter fabrications of their limited immaginations. extreme toppers actually believe their own impossible lies, and fantasize about their mothers.An annoying person who responds to hearing someone else’s experience or problem by immediately telling a similar story about themselves with a much more fantastic outcome. They've done everything you have, only more often... and better than you.Derived from the popular Toppers Pizza franchise, it is used to describe anything mediocre like Topper's pizza itself.the ultimate one-upper. the person who is on top of everyone else regarding anything. and i mean anything.Abbreviation of Topshop.A female who specifically is skilled at most and/or all sexual positions in which she is on top of her significant other.A poo that is so large in the toilet it breaks the top of the water surface.Noun. The last toke you take before you stop smoking weed because you are as high as you want to be.The sexual act of exposing or allowing the fondling of the top half of a female, ie breasts.toon out of pocket player

anyone who buys a maxed out character for a game with there own money just so they can say they have a level capped toon but they dont know how to use it.One who mongs in shit, who is surrounded by shit, and possibly they are shit too.someone who enjoys "mongering" shit. They enjoy hoarding it and/or eatting the shit.

A Diss
the act of calling someone a shit monger.Someone who enjoys creating shit (problems). Someone who enjoys creating trouble for other people. Someone who enjoys watching other people fight.A person who mongs shit.ShitMonger is a independent record label and production company out of Minneapolis, MN.  It has been in operation since 1996.  It has put out releases official, DIY CD-rs, and internet releases for off kilter hip-hop, rock, blues, bluegrass and metal bands in Minnesota and California.

[G-Biz]
P?M: Bluegrass Madness
First Communion Afterparty
Mattastic
Karellen
Ape Lust
Cock Plyers
8=D
Sexicution1. Someone who obsseses over shit. 

2. A fun curse used when in doubt.A shitmonger is a small hairless cat that keeps it's mouth open and forms the shape of a toilet.

Similar to a venus flytrap, however instead waits for a human to sit down to take a shit.A senior at NRHS who thinks he is the shit. Also named as [Grant]

Can also be used as monger of shitpissed, upsetA word originating in Philadelphia generally meaning that you just got played, or are looking stupid, either because of something you did, or something that was done to you.Being angry, agitated, upset.The act of being upset, angry, or bitter as result of being made fun of or embarassed. Also a characteristic of a person who feels out of place or is feeling attackedMad or agitatedTo be mad, angry, agitated, upset.Somebody who contains large quantities of sodium chloride,thus causing them to be upset.[USMC] slang meaning old, faded, or well-used; it has a positive connotation.Slang; A word used in the FGC (Fighting Game Community) to describe someone who is upset. (mainly because of their loss to someone.) Though the word's primary use lies in the FGC, it can also be used in any other context to describe being upset.Angry, agitated, annoyed, upset.the worst talk-show host out there.a)The keeper of all that is evil and wrong in the world of music. 
b)The pathetic poster boy of MTV ignorance
c)the reason for the mute buttonAn annoying jackass That no one is sure why he still has a talk show on the air. He thinks that he is funnier then hell, but he isnt, so he would blame the audience for his crappy jokes, saying that they are infact good, and they just suck.

Even though the audience sounds like theres laughing, and cheering coming from it, its actually just the fake sound, like what they use on crappy sitcoms, that they record of the good talkshows, like The Tonight Show and Late Night.

He is a bragger, that cannot help to not talk about himself. His jokes are fucking stale like shit.

He trys to use current popular things in culture to try to get ratings, but the only people he gets ratings are from people that fell asleep from the commercial bridge from Conans show to his, and left the tv on.

I hate him, you should hate him too.See [Douchebag]That gay ass nose ring he so proudly sportsa super freeeek dudea delicious frozen treat that comes from cows. Ice cream comes in many different flavours and can often be found at your local grociery store.A relitively new shoe on the market. Created by Pharell Williams from the Neptunes (N.E.R.D) and Nigo, the creator of the Bathing Apes clothing and shoe line. They are marketed by Reebok. Only 3000 are currently in the market, ranging from around $300-$500 dollars.crack. hell even Master P calls it ice cream, and no one is more right them him.• The flavored cream of ice
• A common cure for broken hearted females
• A cold and delicious treat, perfect on hot summer daysflavored frozen cream that comes in different flavors.Release 4.0 of Google's [Android].

Although [Gingerbread] and [Honeycomb] are not yet available, Google is said to be already working on Android 4.0.

No idea what it will look like, but it will be greater than great!!

[Froyo] and [Gingerbread] are said to perform great with a 1 Ghz processor, [Honeycomb] and Ice Cream for sure will have a big impact on hardware.

Apple and Microsoft: be afraid, very afraid.code word for sexual pleasures when you are not behind closed doors and need to talk about the type of ice cream you had whether it be chocolate vanilla or better yet mocha.crack dope powder candyThe plural of [Ice Cream]The stuff that makes my head hurt when i eat too much of it... stupid fuckerA person that simply cannot be happy for another person's success.  So rather than be happy they make a point of exposing a flaw in that person.

Hating, the result of being a hater, is not exactly jealousy.  The hater doesnt really want to be the person he or she hates, rather the hater wants to knock somelse down a notch.Overused word that people like to use just because someone else expresses a dislike for a certain individual.most of the people in this siteA term used by others, usually being suburban "gangsters", whose lives are absolutely and undeniably defined by what others think.  These people "rumble" often and think  of themselves as original and/or indestructable.  People that use the term "haters" are the lowest stage of the evolutionary scale.  They bleed the fastest and have thought processes similar to that of a mentally underdeveloped cat.to be a hater is to descriminate or hate something, someone, or a certain type of something. 

If the world didn't have haters then it would be a better place. a much better place.

I mean not that there aren't assholes in the world. to hate somethings is good. i hate poverty, war, and bad shit like that. just try to have some morals, people.A person that develops a strong dislike for another, solely basing their own opinion on personal judgment rather than objective merit. The formation of a hater's contempt commonly arises from jealously and/or resentment. Individuals that make fun of, or "hate," others for justified reasons cannot be legitimately classified as "haters;" although many faggots attempt to rationalize their own situations by doing so. Additionally, the word "hater" is frequently overused, mainly by members of the rap and hip-hop communities.A person who feels anger and/or jealousy for someone who has succeeded in something they have worked hard for.
  A being who speaks badly,and/or takes negative actions in attempt to create problems for a successful person.Anyone with a opinion.The most non-insulting "insult" in existence. It's a waste of breath to say it and a waste of energy to type it. This term is often used by pre-teen girls whenever someone insults their favorite teeny bopper singers. If you ever call somene a hater, find the nearest knife and use it pierce your lungs for polluting our air with that fucking stupid word.People that make up reasons to hate certain people just because they aren't as wealthy or successfull as them. People are often hating:

1. [Bill Gates]
2. [Blink 182]
3. [George W. Bush]
4. [Halle Barry]
5. [Ben Affleck]P-Person
I-Into
M-Marketing
P-ProstitutesA man who beats up women and owns over a thousand sex slaves.one who brokers the sexual favors of women for profits1. Protection, Instruction, & Management of Prostitutes
2. Protectional Instructor Managing Professional
3. Prostitute's Instructional Management Professional
4. Professional In Management of Prostitutes 
5. Prostitute's Infamous Management Professional
6. Professionally Instructing Many Prostitutes
7. Professional Illegally Managing Prostitutes

Optional, but not recommended:
*Professional- replaced by Pro, Player, or Playa
*Into        - replaced by Intwined or Into
*Managing    - replaced by Marketing

Slang: noun or verb
1. Player(s/z)/Playa(s/z) Interested in(to) Making Progress/Prostitutes
2. (Put/Place It) or (Paper) in My/Men's Pants/Pocket(s)/Places
3. Party In My/Men's Pants/Panties
4. Pissin(g)/Peein(g) In(to) My Pants/Place/Partner/Potty 
5. Pissin(g)/Peein(g) In(to) Mouths of People/Prostitutes/Potty
6. People/Prostituts In Many/Money-filled Places/People
7. Perfect Independent Marvelous Playa(s/z) or Player(s/z)
8. Pooping In(to) My Place/Pants/Partner/Potty
9. Pennys In My Pocket/Place/Palace/Prostitutes
10. Put/Place It in My Pussy/Prostitute
11. Pussy Is My/Mens Prerogative/Purpose/PlaymateThe people wearing the purple suits on street corners who use dirt poor women to get money.  And later blowing it all on spinner's and gold lining for their three wheeled cycles.To make better, to fix up,some dumass middle school teenager who is as rich as hell and wear clothes like he's from the ghetto.Thinks he has he has hoes but the only one who he would lose his virginity to is his mom. Thinks rock is "for losers". Listens to too much 50 cent and tells everyone he used to live in "the projects". friends consist of a bunch of airheads who say LOL!! the whole time and his own dim-witted speciesPride Intelligence Money Power1. someone who profits off the money prostitutes make from selling their bodies
2. to seek out hookers to make a profit off of them selling their bodies.
3. to hit on several different girls
4. a guy who has alot of girlfriends or has been with alot women.
5. something that is really cool.v. Live off the earnings of a prostitutea machine for downloading pornWhat you are on nowThe most useful and most frustrating thing any human being will ever work with.If you're looking up this word, kill yourself.a very, very expensive punching bagA tool that is supposed to save time but intead wastes time.The most boring and frustrating thing in the world-however, I keep coming back.the thing people use to:
1. Go on MySpace or any other blog-related sites
2. download porn
3. illegally download music
4. play games
5. and use to look up the word "computer" on Urbandictionary.comThe answer to every single question.A $1000 facebook machineOne whose IQ exceeds his weight.An individual persecuted for his superior skills or intellect, most often by people who fear and envy him.An 'individual', i.e. a person who does not conform to society's beliefs that all people should follow trends and do what their peers do. Often highly intelligent but socially rejected because of their obesssion with a given subject, usually computers. Unfortunately, nerds seem to have problems breeding, to the detriment of mankind as a whole.Never
Ending
Radical
Dude.A stereotypical label used to describe a person that is socially inadequate.  A four letter word, but a six figure income.A person who gains pleasure from amassing large quantities of knowledge about subjects often too detailed or complicated for most other people to be bothered with.

Often mistaken for Geeks, who aspire to become nerds, yet lack the intelligence, and end up giving nerds a bad name due to their poor social skills.

Non-nerds are often scared of nerds, due to their detailed knowledge, and therefore seemingly high levels of intelligence - and subsequently denegrate them as much as possible as often as possible.

Nerds exist covertly within the fabric of society, often choosing to 'nerd it up' in private or in the company of fellow nerds.  It is for this reason they are feared the most - unlike geeks, who are easily identified, nerds can only be found out when casual conversation reaches a subject that they like nerding.the group of people who will most likely make a life changing invention that will radically change the world. the computer was invented by a nerd. the macintosh/apple and windows were invetned by nerds. jocks and normal people have no claim to civilization except for being the hard labor. nerds actually do the thinking. so jocks, fuck you, and go eat your steroidsThe person you will one day call "Boss"Guys with IQ higher than your weight. You made fun of them when you were at school but you would be lucky if you get employed as janitors in their businesses.A delicious candy made by Wonka.  They are pretty much crystalized sugar in a color coating that people love to give out on halloween.An individual who deals with the complex systems of todays military/civilian aircraft. Their entire mission is to make bricks "fly", and fix leaking electrons from parts, and they do it damn well. Usually pissed off individuals who are the be all end all of the sortie cock, they take and stride. Because one day, their enlistment will come to an end.Stands for AVIation electrONICSNot the best state in the country, but very far from the worst.  Home to three million people, some really sweet cities, three great univerties, a whole bunch of stellar small private colleges and a ton of true natural beauty in its lush northeast bluff country and statewide river valleys, lakes, and yes, rolling fields.  Iowa is a national leader in education (students in many other states including Texas take the Iowa Test of Basic Skills, and everyone's heard of the ACT, based in Iowa City) and is leading the way in biofuels to reduce the nation's dependence on oil.  To dispel the ignorance displayed elsewhere on this post, here's a state breakdown of cities and topography.  If seventy synonyms for boobs is alright to post, so is this.

Central Iowa:  [Des Moines], located at the intersection of I-80 and I-35, is the largest city with a metro of a half million and is the state capital, second only to London for the title of insurance capital of the world.  [Ames] (80,000 metro) is about a half hour north of Des Moines and is home to [Iowa State University], a land grant school of 30,000 respected around the world for its engineering and agricultural programs.  Central Iowa is, outside of river vallies, very flat, and outside of the Des Moines area and Ames is very sparsely populated.

Eastern Iowa:  The most densely populated area of the state.  Ethnically diverse [Iowa City] (115,000 metro) was Iowa's first state capital, was the first city in the world to elect a female mayor, has been named the most cultured city per capita in the nation, is always in the top five cities in the country for education, and is home to the [University of Iowa], 30,000, nationally renowned for its Carver College of Medicine and Iowa Hawkeye athletics.  The music departments of Iowa City's two large public high schools have won a total of five Grammy awards.  [Cedar Rapids], (200,000 metro) just twenty minutes north of Iowa City in the beautiful Cedar River valley, is the second largest single city, is the economic hub of eastern Iowa, has two private colleges, and is best known for being the place you get any of your Quaker Oats brand ceral from.  [Waterloo/Cedar Falls], two conjoined cities (130,000 metro) is where the [Unviersity of Northern Iowa], 18,000, is located.  The [Quad Cities], (375,000 metro) two in Iowa and two in Illinois, straddle the Mississippi and form the largest metro between Des Moines and Chicago.  The largest of the four cities is [Davenport], IA, home to the Bix 7 foot race whose hilly course and large prize attract runners from every part of the globe.  [Dubuque], (90,000 metro) on the Mississippi where Iowa meets Illinois and Wisconsin, is Iowa's oldest city. It is home to a ton of beautiful architecture, four private colleges, a far-reaching ELCA Lutheran seminary, and the Smithsonion affiliated National Mississippi River Musem and Aquarium.  Eastern Iowa's topography is for the most part very rolling farmland, with the exception of the hillier Iowa river valley, Cedar river valley, and the bluffs and hills skirting the whole eastern border along the Mississippi.  The northeast corner of the state is all bluffland, home to small town Decorah and reputed Luther College.

Western Iowa:  The vast majority of Iowa west of I-35 is flat farmland with the exception of the very westernmost strip.  [Sioux City] on the Missouri river (the western border) is a good sized city with nice amenities and lots of historyt.  [Council Bluffs] is the largest suburb of Omaha, just across the river in Nebraska.  The Iowa Great Lakes region contains many large lakes, most notably lake Okoboji, one of only three blue water lakes in the world.  The Loess Hills state park runs along the whole westernmost strip of the state, and offers lots of hilly hiking and some of the state's largest forests.

Iowa's motto should be "Iowa: Not as bad as you picture it."Pretty much the shit.  Make sure you're clear on the fact that the word "the" is in there, or else you'll get the meaning all wrong.  Iowa is home to the three million nicest people in the United States, probably in the world.  A leader in education, and home to some of the most beautiful scenery into the world.  It's a traquil beauty, and if you're into that, you'll love Iowa.  And if you're not into that, you can go take California or wherever you're from and fuck it.a farming state that isnt a bunch of dumb farmers thats [montana]A state that quietly grows corn and takes care of its own affairs. Residents think Des Moines compares to New York.People who dont live in Iowa refer to Iowa is full of corn and farmers. Its full of things pretty much from other states. 3 million awesome people live there. And its probably 3 million people you would never forget because they are so nice. Iowa is also one of the most beautiful places to live and only cool people can live in Iowa. Because Iowa is THE SHITT. Also home to the best college football team the IOWA HAWKEYES!The greatest state in the Union with education, and the ability to function with agriculture and good morals,When western civilization comes crashing down around you other 49 inferior states (Illinois is ok).BEST State in the entire united states of america!

Most, cocky dumbasses hate on iowa, and say that all there is is corn.. Thats completley wrong! EVERY state has agriculture and just about every state grows corn and has corn fields.
So what if iowa has corn, that dosnt mean thats the only thing to do!

Iowa is the best! Our hot chicks and all of our sports teams..

Iowa will fuck up anyone who tries to talk shit on us! were no pussys, we will fight any mother fucker who tries to hate on us!

Iowa has the best state fair too! The IOWA State Fair is possibly the best state fair in all of the US.

We have everything, Demo Derbys, Mudding, So much shit, youd just have to come here and check it out!State in the midwest, mostly farmland, but has a fantastic balance of rural, suberban, and highly populated areas. It is named after the Soux indian name meaning land between 2 rivers(missouri, Mississippi). Produces more corn and pork than any other state, and is not home to a bunch of hicks. in fact Iowa has the highest % of leteracy in the United states. statisticly its largest city, Des Moines, is in a perfect location for trade because it lies on interstate 35 and interstate 80, 2 of the buisiest highways in the US. however, because of Chicago's close proximity there isnt quite as many large factorys as there should be. Iowa is a beautiful state with hilly reigons in the east and hundreds of rivers and streams. The people are known for being friendly, usually hard working, and down to earth.

***to readers in the Northeast and california specificly***
No, just because someone lives in Iowa does not mean that they live on a farm. enough said. and another thing, stop mistaking Iowa for Idaho and Ohio. yes, they do sound the same but seriously, get it right its not that hardWhat the hell is this
I - Idiots

O - Out

W - Wondering

A - Around
shit?
We're the smartest state in the U.S!
For Christ's sake, stop your bitching about our "terrible driving" and go to New York, give me a review about their shitty driving.

God damn, Iowa has some of the nicest people, and there isn't corn EVERY WHERE.
To be honest, there isn't even as much corn as you think there would be, there are more cities than corn.

Plus, if you hate Iowa then promise me you'll never eat corn and or barilla noodles again.
So, all you more suberban suburban states can suck it because Iowa is the shit!A state full of beauty and 3 million of the nicest people in the universe. Also a pioneer in education, with the Iowa Test of Basic Skills and ACT being based in Iowa City. Is home to a ton of natural beauty: Ledgers State Park near Boone, the Des Moines, Missouri, and Mississippi Rivers, as well as numerous forests and woods. Tends to be judged by people who have never visited it.Place of extreme weather.A state of the south-central United States. It was admitted as the 28th state in 1845. Explored by the Spanish in the 16th and 17th centuries, the region became a province of Mexico in the early 19th century. Texans won their independence in 1836 after a gallant but losing stand at the Alamo in February and a defeat of Santa Anna's forces at the Battle of San Jacinto (April 21). Denied admission as a state by antislavery forces in the U.S. Congress, the leaders of Texas formed an independent republic that lasted until 1845. Austin is the capital and Houston the largest city. Population: 17,059,805. 

The Lonestar State, The State that still believes that criminals should be punished, Home of the Wataburger, home of Southern Hospitality, HTown, And Everythang thats bigger and better.

AND NO!! We Dont all walk around with cowboy hats and boots, and we're all not rednecks....for that...see oklahoma.The best Mexican food. Dr. Pepper on tap. Beautiful ladies. Awesomeness everywhere you turn. The best fucking place on earth. Move there now!the only state in the union that can fly its flag at the same height as the american flag.....
and the only reason texas doesnt fall into the gulf of mexico... is because oklahoma sucksHome to Dr. Pepper, several modern and well respected singers, activists, and the like, Sam Houston, and other great men and women before him, numerous plantlife and animals, and a few horrid idiots who give the rest of us a bad name-ie: George Bush.The biggest and baddest state of them all(15 states can be put into Texas and we'd still have 1000 miles left) where everything is bigger and much better than places such as California. Home of a Ranch bigger than Rhode Island,the home of trunk poppin, Dr.Pepper,home of the first word spoken from the moon which was Houston,home of swangin on 84's and vogues, chopped and screwed music, SA Town, D Town, and H Town which are all 3 in the top 10 most populated cities in the U.S.
The Lone Star State was the only state that was its own country, and the only state worthy of even making a definition of. 


If you aint a Texan, you wish you were.The greatest state everOkay.
I was born and raised in Houston.
So lets tell the truth.
-The weather in Texas changes very rapidly, and we get a bit of everything, except snow. That doesn't come around very often.
-We don't get married to our sisters or even distant cousins. A shock. I know. If you want to see some of that go to Oklahoma.
-Not everyone here talks with a distinct country accent.
You have to go to the smaller towns for that. Lufkin, Etoile, Waco, etc. It all depends on what area of Texas you were born in. People move here from New York and California all the time, and we don't sound any diffrent.
Our slang is the only true thing that seperates us.
-Yes, we have racism here. Just like any other state, but it's not as bad as people make it sound. The Africans, Mexicans, and Orientals, etc. out number us by more the 50%.
-Taking hits to our pride by informing us we cuss to much (yes, 'cuss') is low. We cuss just as much as anyone in California, or Florida would.
-No one walks around here in in full cowboy uniform. So if you think we do, maybe you should visit before opening your mouth.A state in the southern USA. Its in the south. There are billboards about Jesus. One can buy [waffles] there.The best damn state in the country!  That's all you need to know.The greatest and most popular sport in history with more than 5 times the TV audience of the next most popular (cricket - every radio and TV in the sub-continent is permanently tuned to Pakistan/India cricket matches - that's a big audience).

Only Americans call it 'soccer' owing to their vast ignorance of what goes on outside their national boundaries and the misnomer which has them thinking than a corruption of rugby, with all the danger and most of the skill removed can also be called 'football'. 

'The Beautiful Game' can be played anywhere, on almost any surface, by any number of players, for almost any length of time. And is. There is no country on earth that doesn't play. It has inspired more passion, more courage and more excitement than any other sport in history and dwarfs everything else.When a girl is playing footsie with you, and her foot travels up to your crotch.A name given to two different sports in which America and the rest of the world use to waste their lives away constantly arguing over which is better. Honestly, I'm an American. And I love the game of American football. But notice how I haven't said that I hate football (aka soccer). In fact, I love that sport, too. I just totally suck at it. Haha. C'mon, be real ya'll. Both games are cool. Even rugby too. It's cool. I have no idea how to play it, but I enjoy trying. It's all preference. For all ya'll that say football is whack cause we wear padding, go ahead and say whatever the fuck you want to say. That padding protects us so we can stay a little safer to enjoy the game a little longer. I don't care if I don't use it, I've tackled mofos twice my size without any padding on. The point I'm trying to make; All three games are great. They all require stratedgy, strength, speed, and endurance. So just shut the fuck up, grab the ball that suits you, and play your damn game already. You got that? Kay, just helping out. I'm just a 15yr old from a small town. Yeah, yeah... What do I know? Honestly? I know it's fucking pointless for ya'll to fight over sports. So just save your shit for someone who's still too much of a punk to simply enjoy a game of American football, football, or rugby. Peace people! Damn. Haha.Football - Only the best damn sport ever. Played with a round ball and feet. However, Americans tend to mistake it for American Football (which should truthfully be called tackleball for all that matters).Also Known As the BEAUTIFUL GAME. A real sport played with your FEET and an actual round BALL, hence the name FOOTBALL. This term should never be used to refer to our silly american game of putting on 30 pounds of armor and carrying a cone shaped piece of rubber while trying not to be touched by other guys. You'll note the lack of definitions calling this silly game football. And there is a reason for that. Some silly americans give us a bad name by not noticing what is going on in the rest of the world and don't realize that there was already a real sport called football when we made up our game, but everyone else in the world knows whats up.
P.S. Please, if you are American please stop saying the S word (s****r)and saying that our american game is better than real football. If you are not american just know that not all of us are confused faggots.A lovely game that alot of people play.
Also the most importmant sport in the world.
Very famous, but also fun for people who like football.
If you dont play football yet, i would say:
Give it a try!

Ofcourse if you start at older age, you wont get as good as Ronaldo, Messi, ...
But doesnt matter, its just for fun! ( Mostly )A variety of games that which Europeans and Americans tend to argue over pointlessly till the end of time as to which version is "right" never minding the fact that due to Cultural Mutation different words can mean different things in other places
Typically Americans profess love for the version that involves padding and an ovoid ball in which the point of the game is to move the ball ten yards down the field at a time through either rushing or passing before passing into the plain of the "End Zone" placed at either ends of a 100 Yard Field to score points
Europeans tend to extol the virtues of a much simpler sport that only requires a pair of goals placed at either end of a field and is played with a checkered Spherical BallOK, here goes... slowly:
The word describes a very populare game, which is played all over the world.
The word consists of two parts, which quite accurately descibes the game:
1) Foot
2) Ball

Part 1) Foot. This means that the foot is the main body part involved when playing this game.
Part 2) Ball. This means that the game is played with a spheric (globe-shaped) object.

This definition seems to be understood all over the world, except in the US, where they have misunderstood both parts of the word. Instead of using their feet, they mainly use their hands. And, instead of using a ball, they use an egg-shaped object.The round form of the drug Zanax that also comes in another form called [sticks] this form is in the shape of a football.A place on urbandictionary.com where obnoxious [eurofags] bitch about how Americans call football soccer and vice versa.A tongue of which the user speaks of something the complete opposite of what the user means. It often has the best comedic value.the bastard stepchild of ironyYour body's natural defense against stupid.A word that gives you the possibility to play with your imagination when asked stupid questions.Something that nobody on the internet can ever recognize.God's gift to man.
Incredibly humourous if used correctly.Noun.  A very British form of humour which derives laughs from saying something while really meaning something else.  Often (though not always, contrary to popular belief) used in scathing remarks.

The word 'Sarcasm' is derived from a Greek word meaning 'tearing flesh', which is why sarcastic vegetarians are so ironic.

See also [irony].The ability to insult idiots without them realizing it.A verbal reflex against stupidity. In my opinion one of the best types of humour.When one says something, but usually means the opposite.
Used sometimes in order to belittle someone and make them seem retarded... or equally to amuse and impress them with your mind. Indeed.Humorous name for oral sex.To drink an entire beverage in one goplace where brain livesOral sex, head.The nickname for members of the Phi Kappa Sigma fraternity.Another word for a female sucking cock. " Oh baby, give me some skull!!" It's the same thing as saying give me some head, or give me some brain. Cock-sucking words are great!!what the hardcore kids give instead of head.

see [skull fuck].to give or recieve oral sexTo bash another in the head,Created in an attempt to imagine what in the world someone could have going on in their head when they say or do something absolutely ridiculous/ illogical/ or straight up retarded. This person must be lacking a brain in their head i.e having nothing more than a flesh covered skull resting on their neck. Skull.A coat that makes you invisibleOne who lacks the skill to contribute balanced team work in an MMO. Also known as train mobber, skill-less peon and fearless noob.Cloak is another way of leaving without anyone else knowing.to smoke marijuana.To have sex, or to [fuck]. In the context of the vagina's ability to envelope, engulf or cover the penis like a piece of clothing. Perhaps a term originating from Canada.an extremely beautiful women/girl who everyone loves and will never forget. she has many friends and people feel they can always go to her for help, no matter what the situation is. cloaks is a great listener and speaker, she is also very creative and imaginative. She tends to be very artistic and athletic. Cloaks enjoys acting, dancing and singing, she is also very good at them. Cloaks is also a great lover in the bedroom, Every man thinks she is irresistible and falls in lover with her at first sight.a super gay homofag queer fairy buttpiratea friend or aqauntancethe result unprotected [sex] of a male and a female of the same species; also can be known as [offspring] and [brats]things that interupt you while your banging you wife.Anyone below the age of 18 (or 21, in some circles.) Don't listen to the idiotic fools who hate on little kids because they think it's "hip and cool".The stuff that gets shot all over the place during sex.the worst STD you can get.1.Something REALLY old people desire to be when their backs start breaking and their hearing and eyesight get poor.Krazy Individuals Destroying Societywhat teenagers claim they are notA baby goatThe word people use when you've done something that isn't technically "bad" or "wrong" but they still don't like it anyway and expect you to conform to their personal tastes.What your mom says when she catches you masturbating.The current euphemism for "wrong" or "bad." It is supposed to sound more objective than "wrong" and "bad," but it is not.putting it simply, not [appropriate]the [definition] of [urban dictionary]not suitable or proper in the circumstances. Action could be used in a talking, visual, or sexual manner.In high school settings, short skirts, low cut tops, see through clothing and skin tight jeans.  The student handbook says not to wear this, but many girls still wear it anyway to look skanky.The act of saying something irrelevant to the topic or becoming mad feisty with another person without an apparent reason. Usually accompanied with the action of standing up and pointing your hand down to the person it pertains to.The word that used to actually mean something, but doesn't mean anything anymore.To [curse] or '[cuss]'. Swears are considered inappropriate to use in public places, but are less offensive than other profanities. These '[bad word]s' are often referenced by pre-adolescents by their first letter (the 'f' word, the 's' word, even 'h-e-double-hockey-sticks').Any word that a person says when they can't think of anything intelligent to sayTo verbally abuse, or to rape an object with hatred wordsWords that people get offended by for some unexplained reason.when something is weird or funny and you sont have anything to say, you just point and say swear! swear this, omg swear that.

or it can be used like the world "seriously"Swear is used often for cursing someone, often with any consequences.

Perfect swearing language: Russian language is also the 5th officially used language over the world, aside English or Spanish. Russian language has more swear words in them, than any other language.

According to the infamous Taboo vocabulary, you can literally talk and swear in Russian and make lines, that make sense.Word that makes your sentence mean something, and actually prove a point.cannot really be defined but in terms to understand it can be understood as being dumb, stupid, retarded, saying something that is absurd.(verb) when someone thinks they're SO much better than others; someone who is conceited and vain, and definately wants others to notice.[fuck]
[ass]
[damn]
[hell]
[shit]
[bastard]
[bitch]
[crap]
All [racist] words.When someone else gets hurt.1. Something that causes you to laugh
2. A person who isn't quite rightA way of describing the girl you really like, either to said girl or your friends, without hinting too much. Either used by shy men who have a hard time admitting they really like someone or describing the girl you like to your friend that proclaims himself the matchmaker or love finder (yes, this is a stereotyped friend that every bro has, you may even be this person - if so, you have learned the secret code of bro hinting (ha, and you only thought girls spoke in hint))When someone else gets hurt.The only part of a newspaper worth looking at.  Located beside or near the crossword puzzles and cryptoquote.  Famous funnies include Garfield, Family Circus, Andy Capp, and Peanuts.Makes you laugh, oddA plural exclamation of extreme humourosity.  

OR

When followed by a question mark, a needy request to find out whether a joke has been accepted or not.The fact that you're wasting time looking up "funny".Definitions on urbandictionary tagged with 'funny', usually aren't.If you have to look up funny your probably a fag.Big
Gigantic
HugeA compliment- referring to either muscles or more commonly, the mail genitalia. Also associated with terms such as "biggie" or "bigs". Add "particularly", "fairly", or "rather" for added enjoyment.Something of excessive size.  Normally associated with [heavy] as well.the state of the penis when arousedone thousand United States dollarsa thousand dollars - they say it all the time in the Sopranosaka, huge, masssiv, ownageIn sarcasm, to refer to something as unworthwhile, lacking merit or otherwise derogatory.

Can be used with prefixes "fairly" and "particulary" for added effect.

See also: [small]Really good, excellent. Used by DJs and dance music fans to describe a track.When you are 'avin' it in a collosal fashion. One size fits all. It is possible to say "how are you avin' it?" as this means the same thing due to the fact that there is only one size to 'ave' itA good fun alternative to life.crack, in CD-ROM form.The most highly addictive game ever played. It will consume your soul and poison your water supply.A highly entertaining mmorpg that is played by a wide variety of people. some get addicted to it like its crack cocaine, and some only play it a few times a month. The level of addiction all depends on the person playing it.The world's most effective form of birth control.A computer game whose participants apparently don't know how to correctly make words plural.

Hint for WoW players: it doesn't involve an apostrophe.Taken mistakenly as a peer to EverQuest or EverQuest II, it is an entertaining game in which a player learns how to cooperate as a team, and harnesses competition, unlike EverQuest II. The irony behind half of the definitions under this category is this: If you'd read the back of the box, you would realize that it states "even if you only have a couple of minutes, World of Warcraft's superior quest system offers quick gameplay." The sad truth is that people don't want to accept the fact that many of the players on this game have lives, jobs, spouses, ect. They see that it is an MMORPG, and automatically assume that it's a parallel to EQ and EQ2.A game were nobody but the company taking your money wins. Often replaces one's social life.A game that manages by some divine power to completely waste your life and lets you have fun while doing so.World of Warcraft- WoW is kind of like smoking. You don't see what all the fuss is about in the beginning, until one of your friends gives you a free taste. Still, you can't see how addicting it is until you have tried it a few times. Then you start buying it, and using it by the bundle, and you can't seem to stop. You'll do anything just to get a few good hours in with your favorite pasttime. You slowly start to lose touch with former friends and family, and meet lots of strange new people with a similar addiction. Prolonged use can lead to death. It's very difficult to get out of your system, you must rely on the strangth of others, for your willpower has ben sapped.
General Surgeons Warning- Not intended for oral or anal use. WoW shouldn't be used if you suffer from seizures or are an expectant mother. Side effects include obsession, nausea, vomiting, and pink eye. Ask you doctor before using.Somebody who finds great pleasure in the art of Computer Programming.

Synonymous with: Hacker, ProgrammerThe low end of the scale as far as [software engineers] go.Slang word, used by idiots, for the term 'programmer'. Often used by communities for Private Servers. There are related words such as 'Code' or 'Coding'.a bitchy old, pregnant man with a beer belly. not just old but he ancient, he was in the same class as jesus when they were kids.short for code infraction, used at [Delbarton], get three and you're strongly encouraged to leave the school.Fake Fag Slang for ProgrammerJail guard, cop, security guard, etc.
Someone with power over you in a controlled surroundingswhen you lose your virginity or just has sex and you can't say it out loud you say you wore a "blue shirt"an extremely hot guy with a nice bodyA huge spokkerjones that will never know the embrace of a womanThe opposite of a Red Shirt. A character in a fictional series that will simply not die, regardless of fans hating them or the amount of injuries they sustain. Some true Blue Shirts even die and are resurrected through some means, just to spite the viewers.The opposite of a Red Shirt. A character in a fictional series that will simply not die, regardless of fans hating them or the amount of injuries they sustain. Some true Blue Shirts even die and are resurrected through some means, just to spite the viewers.The opposite of a Red Shirt. A character in a fictional series that will simply not die, regardless of fans hating them or the amount of injuries they sustain. Some true Blue Shirts even die and are resurrected through some means, just to spite the viewers.Someone under the 25th percentile for stature for their age, sex, and country.
(5'7" and under for men and 5'2" and under for women in the US)what i am.1.) noun, A cigarrette, having been previously smoked, but not completely, suggesting the later use and finish of said cigarette.The small coffee size at Starbuck's; the only size on the menu there that makes any sense (et al [Tall], [Grande], [Vente]).Comfy and easy to wear.Military and prison adjective for describing someone nearing the end of their tour of duty, enlistment or incarceration.  A [short-timer] is someone who has less then 90 days to serve.  A Korean War veteran told me these terms were in wide use in the late 1940s; they have been in continuous wide use in the military since then.outta luckto be not tall. under 5" tallsnoun; used by a third party person to express when somebody has insulted or humiliated another personShort was used long before there were compact cars.  It goes back to at least the Forties on the Southside of Chicago.  It means ANY car.  It was from the vernacular of hotrodders and black gangsters. It probably derives from "hot short", which evolved to "hotwire" ... a car.1. The Good Part - The woman you marry and live with for the rest of your life.

2. The Bad Part - The woman you marry and live with for the rest of your life.extreme hardcore version of a girlfriendThe beautiful, inteligent, classy and fulfilling companion of a man that is wise enough to notice such qualities. Usually despised and hated on by the [baby momma].A prostitute with a life-long contract to a single client.A woman that a man is married to.The person that is there for you whenever you need them, the person that makes you want to be better, the person that you love and cherish forever.

(Hint: getting married to a woman you don't love isn't a good idea, don't do it.)w.i.f.e.
wash, iron, fuck, ect.The reason I drink so much.The name of someone that is on a vendetta to make you regret ever choosing her as a partner.term used in reference to the woman in which a man is the most emotionally involved with & who he feels the most obligation toward. she typically has characteristics which would make her a desirable long-term partner.The cause of, and solution to all life's problems.Any of a class of chemical compounds having the general formula ROH, where R represents an alkyl group and -OH a hydroxyl group. Most commonly refers to ethanol, which you can drink to forget how much your life sucks, and methanol, which you can drink when you remember.Liquid Panty RemoverA substance found in beer (except American beer) and several other beverages that makes you excessively happy, sad, belligerent or horny.  It allows white men to dance and ugly men to get laid (when given to their victim).Alcohol. What most of your university/college life will revolve around.The buffer between reality and a good night. Has been known to make people seem more attractive and make obviously stupid idea's seem like good sense.The antidote to reality.The answer to the question "What made you move to North Dakota?"1) The active ingredient in alcohol is ethyl alcohol, which is produced by yeast. Working much like [ether], alcohol puts the brain to sleep. Alcohol functions as a depressant to the central nervous system and slows down body functions. In large amounts, alcohol causes sedation, intoxication, unconsciousness, and possible death. Aside from significant negative physical consequences, chronic use of alcohol can lead to physical and psychological addiction. 

2) Colorless, volatile liquid obtained by distillation and fermentation of carbohydrates (grain, molasses, potatoes [irish]). Alcohol is antiseptic and cooling but is also very drying to the hair and skin; care should thus be taken not to use too much. 

3) This constituent of wine is a natural by-product of fermentation. It is one of the main pillars of perceived flavor, the others being "Acid", "residual Sugar" (and/or "Glycerin") and "Tannin". The presence of these components define a wine that has "good balance". For tablewines the wine label must, by law, state the alcohol content of the wine within the bottle, usually expressed as a percentage of the volume. Table wines do not usually exceed 14% alcohol content - (11% to 12.5% is generally considered the optimum amount) - although a few, such as Zinfandel, can go up to a 17% level. Sweet dessert wines fall in the same range. Fortified wines - (eg: Sherry, Port etc) - range from 17% to 21% alcohol content. 

4) Ethanol or ethyl alcohol (C2H5OH), the liquid produced from sugar by fermentation that can make you drunk 

5) A chemical compound formed by the action of yeast on the sugar content of grapes during fermentation. Most wines have between 7 and 25 percent alcohol, which gives wine is vinosity. If wine has too much alcohol for its body weight, it is unbalanced, and will taste uncharacteristically heavy or hot. The quality will be noticeable in aroma and aftertaste. 

6) A general class of hydrocarbons that contain a hydroxyl group (OH). The term "alcohol" is often used interchangeably with the term "ethanol," even though there are many types of alcohol. (See Butanol, Ethanol, Methanol.)liquid stamina in a bottleA holiday that no Black people I know celebrate.
Well , one year my Uncle tried to , but we all laughed at him.A holiday developed by a Dr. Maulana "Ron" Karenga, a black militant, Marxist, and convicted felon.
Just five years after this, he was convicted of torturing two black women to death. 

Observed from December 26 to January 1, Kwanzaa is based on a mixture of East African harvest rituals, called "first fruits" by Karenga and 1960's radicalism. This is in spite of the fact most slaves came from West Africa.

Viewed as an "alternative" to Christmas, it, nonetheless, is based on race, and not in faith.1)A made up piece of shit holiday steeped in all the deepest traditions of Sweetest Day  or Secretary's Day. 

2)A holiday for African Americans that no African American observes or understands.It's the right-on power handshake of the 1990s.  Yet another politically correct tactic to get whites to pay attention to non-whites, primarily blacks.  It's a fabricated holiday based on race, invented by a convicted felon, which is too third world for most black Americans, too jewish for black muslims, and too stupid for everyone else.  Now that's a fine example for the ghetto children of the world!Kwanzaa is a Counterfeit made up, holiday started by a black convicted kidnaper, rapist, Karenga, whose criminal record includes having been convicted and jailed on charges of assault and false imprisonment for the torture of two black women.

There is no nothing ethnically African about it, it is all fake andObviously a manufactured holiday created by African Americans in the late 1980s/early 1990s, when the fad of that time was to be "African", which is why Eddie Murphy's "Coming to America" was a blockbuster hit in 1988, when in reality it was a [racist] shit movie that made fun of people from Africa.A fake and gay holiday made up by some random black guy in the 60's.A popular file sharing program for African-Americans.An African-American holiday that celebrates the deeds of a brave little boy who saved his village from man-eating tigers by having them follow each others tails until they turned into butter.
Flapjacks with loads of butter are served at the holiday meal.The black [Hanukkah]God's gift to the world.  Brings peace when used wisely.An ancient plant, refrenced biblically {the Holy Herb}.

Gets you rocked, and has been proven to be less harmful then alcohol or cigarettes. It has never been conclusively proven to have caused a single death in the entire world, ever.

Easily avalible in most forign countries, and Alaska, where everybody grows it anyway.

Can be purchased by the (if you're lucky) gram, or (not so lucky) by standard measurements. (1/8th of an ounce, 1/4er, 1/2, ect. An eigth usually weighs 3.75, depending on the weight of the baggie and weather or not you're buying from an asshole. There are dealers, and then there are professionals.) usual prices for the sticky-icky-icky (Not that cheap mexican shite, but tanqueray-and-chronic-chronic) can run from $30 to $50 and even $60 an eigth. I even heard it ran eighty an eigth out on Kodiack Island, but you gotta look at the market from a local poiont of view.

It's easier to get then liquor if you're under 21. 

It will not cause you to shoot your friend with the gun you found in your parent's bedroom while they weren't home. (That's shitty parenting, folks, not the pot!)

It's healthier then Xanax if you're just looking to ignore your troules for a few hours.

A biennial Youth Risk Behavior Survey, released May 21 by the U.S. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention stated that more of america's youth smoke pot then cigarettes.

It's a step in the right direction, folks!the answer to all in this horrible world of oursmarijuanaweed not a drug!the dried leaves and flowering tops of pistillate hemp plant that yeild cannabin and are sometimes smoked in cigarette form for its intoxicating effect   

aka

fucking awesomeweed is marijuana, stupid. here's some names i've collected
weed
chron or chronic
dro (hydroponics)
sticks and stems (shitty weed)
sticky-icky (dripping with THC)
mauie wowie
jamaican red hair
blueberry
strawberry
AK-47
kind bud
snowflake
skunk and super skunk
mary jane
MJ
grass (no one calls it that anymore)
ganga (pronounced GAHN-JAH)
herb or herbal
dank
trees
mids or middies (average weed)
damn, there's a ton more, i just can't remember from smoking all of the above.a beautiful thing if used properly. all it does is make you happy.an essential substance in most people's lives.A green plant god put on the earth for me and you.Type of [Christianity] that places authority in the Bible as the infallible word of God. This does not necessarily mean a literal interpretation of everything in the Bible (cf. [creationism]). Not to be confused with [evangelism], which means something entirely different.A generalization of multiple groups of Protestant Christianity. It's not actually a denomination, but a category that churches of many denominations fall under, ranging from some baptist churches in the south to non-denominational churches in the north and along the coastline. Using that criteria, the majority of protestant Christians in the US probably fall under the "Evangelical" category. Despite popular belief, they are real, tangible people, who are just as capable of being discriminated against as the people who they are frequently (and usually, falsely) accused of being discriminated against. An Evangelical Christian is best characterized as someone who wants to spread the Gospel of Christ by being living examples to the people around them. Real Evangelicals do not believe in forcing people who are not Christians to act like Christians, because they believe that Christ his followers to only come of their own free will.

Evangelical Christians should NOT be confused with "fundamentalists," a term that has come to mean someone who is far more mental than fun. Evangelicals tend to believe in more literal interpretations of the bible, but that does not mean that they are against scientific study or using critical thinking (after all, how can you understand how the Bible applies to your life without critical thinking?). Also, they do not want religion to control the government, because as [Martin Luther] figured out during the dark ages, religion controlling government is actually a cheap disguise for the government controlling religion. True Evangelicals want freedom of religion, and that includes the freedom to share the gospel with others.

Evangelical Christians are a large, and unfortunately, misunderstood part of the global population. They are constantly stereotyped as being hateful, bigoted people, even though many of them have done many great works for bringing rights to people and sending help to places. Evangelicals want to change their communities for the better by changing the people, one person at a time. Maybe if people came to realize that the large majority of Evangelical Christians are actually legitimately nice people who enjoy life and are happy to share their happiness with others, they'd realize that the mainstream perception of "evangelical" is merely an aggressively propagated stereotype that aims to strip Christians of their legitimacy as human beings.Comes from the word 'evangelism', which means spreading the good news about jesus christ.

So inturn evangelical is living your life in the way that god wants you to, so that others may see you and see how god has worked in your life. It is not a way of forcing a religion on someone.

It can also mean to speak to people about jesus.A sect of christianity that is full of mindless, brainwashed followers who spend their entire life in misery when they aren't spreading the gospel. The whole sect is full of middle class/rich white folks who want to go to church to be entertained by crying, hysterical preachers and find new prejudices to be in support of. They believe that their religion is the only way of life and refuse to accept any other ways.  There is no 'conversation' with evangelicals...they only convert. BEWARE.According to society, the only demographic that should feel ashamed of themselves when campaigning or when casting a vote.The Andromeda Strain of Christianity. Often called "conservative Christianity", when in reality it is a very modern radical version. Evangelicalism has no true theology, substituting apologetics for theology, and far more concerned with what will draw in people than in actual beliefs.

Evangelicals are often mistaken for Protestants, however the two groups a quite different. Protestantism is based on the idea that people can read and understand the Bible for themselves, without need of a mediator. In Evangelicalism, your minister is the final authority of what the Bible means.

Evangelicals gather to worship in thousands or tens of thousands in the belief that their minister is an intermediary to God, and that it is very important to get their religion directly from him.Describes Christians who try to uphold the tenants of the Protestant Reformation, but without all that courage, conviction, and critical-thinking baggage that got their 16th and 17th century forefathers burned at the stake.  Also known as "Evan-jelly-fish" due to apparent lack of brain and spine.christians who like to argue and force their ideas of religion on others. sometimes resulting in violence and always voice raising.Modern day nazi's. They brainwash there followers using group hysteria, which Hitler used. They try to convert everything that moves by forcing people to beleive what they think. They consider themselves an army of god, ready to fight for his bidding.

They are also hypocrite's. E.G. Ted haggard , who is one of the pastor's at a mega church i colorado, paid a male prostitute to butt fuck him after condeming gays and homosexual activity. He asked forgiveness and was forgiven and "cured", but if any one else who wasnt evangelical did that they would not be forgiven ( like Bill Clinton).1. an adjective synonymous with "mindless."

2. a noun synonymous with "fucking idiot."a broke ass mutha fucka who relies on crack to sustain daily life.  Often seen running at full speed for a multitude of reasons.People of any race that live to hit that nasty-ass rock. Usually real thin, dirty and smell like warm trash and/or spoiled milk, fecal matter, rotting corpses etc. Frequently bobbing, weaving, twitching and glitching. Large periodic spurts of energy. Always got something for sale or knows somebody that has just what you need. The most severe crackheads can be viewed in the wild missing standard items such as shoes, socks and teeth. If you come into contact with a crackhead it is suggested to secure all valuables and avoid any physical contact or direct contact with their breath (could cause dizzyness and/or vomitting).  If you lose property to a crackhead, accept the loss. If you find yourself chasing a crackhead, accept the loss .. crackheads are fast, they be gittin somewheres.. You ain't catching no crackhead...1.a person on crack
2.a moron1. one who does excessive amounts of crack.

2. one who acts as though they do excessive amounts of crack.Someone who smokes crack and will lie cheat and steal from anyone to get a hit1.one who is highly addicted to the euphoria brought on by crack cocaine.
2. one who does stupid things.1. one who partakes in smoking crack cocaine.
2. One who can run like the wind when s/he believes that quazimotto is chasing him/her.
3. one who will try to sell thier dog on e-bay.
4. If you live in a hotel, have no food, are pregnant, and your only worry is when/how to score...you are a crackhead.
5. one who acts "crackish"
6. A Jarrod or an Izatt.
7. A "parent" of a Crack baby.
8. The person who robbed you.A crackhead is the lowest form of a drug user. They abuse the drug crack cocaine. They are often liars, traitors, and thiefs. 

Crackheads are often paranoid and fidgety. 

Crackheads can be anyone, any race, any gender.

Crackheads will sell everything and anything to fuel their addiction. 

Crackheads cannot be trusted. If you ever find yourself to a person who is a known crackhead, try to get away as fast as possible, otherwise you may lose valauble jewerly, wallet, etc. 

Unless you don't mind having any of your prized possessions disappear, it is not wise to let a crackhead into your home. Never leave a crackhead unnattended to, or you will find things mysteriously go missing. 

It is important to never let a crackhead get to you, don't ever let them get under your skin. You are the stronger person in the situation, unless you too are a crackhead.

Crackheads are pathetic.Somebody who does [crack] regulary and gets addicted. Thus becoming a crackhead.The lowest form of a drug-user.The infamous act of a girl getting fucked by a donkey cock, whilst paying gentlemen gather around and watch.as stated above, refers to a woman getting fucked by a donkey, often performed for the pleasure of refined gentleman.  

one variation (specifically found in tijuana) is a competition in which different whores fuck the donkey.  the depth to which they are penetrated is marked by tying a red ribbon (a la tony orlando and dawn) 'round the donkey's cock.  the girl who takes it the deepest wins (i guess?).A sex act involving a woman and a donkey in which the woman fornicates with said donkey, typically performed in rural Mexican cities.An act where a horny woman gets corn-holed by a raging horny assa show where a woman has sex with a jackass1. A form of entertainment most commonly associated with being presented in Tijuana, in which (usually) men pay to observe a male donkey have sex with a female human.

2. A popular Oregon radio show, broadcast from Eugene with a transmitter powerful enough to be heard even outside the state depending on how good the receiving radio is (Vancouver, WA is an example). Syndicated in Medford (south of Eugene) at night time, though the hours the show is actually done is 2-6 PM. Broadcast on 101.5 KFLY FM, the show plays little music compared to most FM radio, and is mainly composed of the two co-hosts Tanner and Drew sharing their often humorous opinions and satires of current events and people currently in the news; as well as other commonly done humor-based radio bits. They refer to their listeners as throbbits (from a pornographic parody of Lord of the Rings).a live show in which a woman has sex (oral, anal, vaginal) with a mule or donkey. they are usually found in seedy areas of border towns in Mexico.  yes they really do exist and aren't terribly hard to findSomething you really don't want to be a part of or see.Donkey shows usually take place in TJ.  It is when a donkey's penis penetrates a (sometimes kidnapped) women.an obscene performance in which a woman copulates with a [literal] jackassthe police (see also [fuzz station])Comes from the fact that a lot of police back in the 60's joined straight of the military and they brought with them the very short military haircut that gave them the appearance of fuzz on their heads. When they took their hats off, your first comment might be, hey look, it's the fuzz. It's a style of haircut that made wearing a police hat more comfortable and cooler to wear......still in vogue today and used by many police officers around the world.A slang word for the police used by poor greasers.the fuzz refers to the polices like [the heat] i think the word is derived from the police always being on your ass or in you face like [peach fuzz]The fuzz is a word used when your so frikkin high that when the cops come to bust your ass that u call them the fuzz because the crack and chron are blurring your vision.Means "son of" (hence all the English surnames like Fitzpatrick, Fitzhenry) but can also refer to an illegitimate child, a bastard, someone born out of wedlock etc.A nick name for someone with the last name Fitzpatrick or Fitzgerald.1. noun- full retard

2. verb- to instantaneously lose control of your bowels in an unannounced fashion. Usually resulting in going commando for the remainder of the day.

3. adj.- awesomer than everybody and everything around you.

4. adj- The inability to come up with a response to an insult, usually resulting in threats of sodomy.1.  A suitable name to dipsnap to.
2.  A kid who is popular because his name sounds cool if you say it loud enough.A boy who used to be hot, but glowed down a lot!When someone agrees to do something and changes their mind five seconds laterthe art of coordinating clothing and accessories with name brand shoesTo take your workload and pass it on to an unsuspecting co-worker.a cut on your thumb or a cut on any finger(V) Otherwise known as pulling a Terry Tate, to tackle a coworker in a surprising manner across a row of cubicles. The tackle might be as aggressive as a flying pile-driver or as subtle as kicking another's leg out from underneath him.Analagous to their malevolent movie counterparts, the modern-day Gremlin is most often found on weekends in between the hours of 1800 and 0400. When in its passive form, the Gremlin is most often a well-intentioned and meaningful contributor to society. However, when provoked (usually by means of an ex-girlfriend or obnoxious fool at the bar), the Gremlin first becomes forlorn and introspective, then mischevious, and in some cases violent.

If you encounter a fully manifested Gremlin, you are advised to stay clear (especially when the Gremlin is in a doorway). If you feel the need to intervene, it has been said a trip to Burger King can passify the creature.

The Gremlin will return to its natural state by morning, usually feeling embarassed and apologetic.1.) Little meshevious devils that cause problems with everything around you.
2.) Little red men with horns you see when you are stoned.
3.) Imaginary little devils you can blame shit on.A Gremlin is a woman who a man likes to fuck but doesn't want to go out past dark to eat with......because shes a beast to look at or emotionally unstable.The gremlin is a furry critter that will use her petit stature and nubile appearance to gain the trust of others. Upon making the mistake of trusting a gremlin, she will then lurk in dark corners and attack at any given moment. This evil hobbit will engage in acts of deceit and general tomfoolery as a means of social interaction. Characteristics of the gremlin will include:
-Rage blackouts
-Violent attacks from behind, especially on the knees
-Full speed bodychecks
-Stealing food from gardens
-The belief that she is average height, when she is in fact, gremlin height
-The use of such phrases as "frig-a-mug" and "go S a D"A drunk friend after midnight. You don't feed them.Girl doesn't get wet for you.Making weird or distractive noices revolving around food.
Being generally weird and always hungry and wanting foods such as chocolate or spaghetti bolognese!A small ginger creature, usually found in a darkened room eating ham sandwiches. She sleeps for most of her life and only wakes to scuttle to the kitchen to make a sandwich. Gremlins can be located in the London area and on a quiet night you can here the high pitch cackle when she is amused. By all means stay out of Gremlins way in the mornings.Your girls fucking clingy ass best friend. Have you ever wanted to do something with your girl but her clingy ass best friend is just jealous of you, and doesn't want your girl whom is her best friend doing something because she can't so she tells her not to and your girl listens to her? That right there is being a fucking GREMLIN! GREMLINS are needy as hell and their jealousy of you grows exponentially. You're basically fucked when it comes to gremlins...there's no cure to this shit.The small pieces of [weed] that sometimes don't get smoked because they got stuck to the top inside edges of your [bowl].What this fucking definition is, asshole.1. [n]  the action of attacking the enemy

2. [adj]  of an offensive substitute for inoffensive terminology; "`nigger' is a dysphemistic term for `African-American'"

3. [adj]  unpleasant or disgusting especially to the senses; "offensive odors"

4. [adj]  morally offensive; "an unsavory reputation"; "an unsavory scandal"

5. [adj]  causing anger or annoyance; "offensive remarks"

6. [adj]  for the purpose of attack rather than defense; "offensive weapons"
   
7. [adj]  violating or tending to violate or offend against; "violative of the principles of liberty"; "considered such depravity offensive against all laws of humanity"
   
8. [adj]  causing or able to cause nausea; "a nauseating smell"; "nauseous offal"; "a sickening stench"

 
 	Synonyms:	 	abhorrent, abusive, antipersonnel, assault(a), assaultive, attack(a), attacking(a), charnel, creepy, detestable, disgustful, disgusting, distasteful, dysphemistic, foul, ghastly, ghoulish, hideous, hit-and-run, horrid, horrific, incursive, insulting, invading, invasive, loathly, loathsome, marauding, morbid, nauseating, nauseous, noisome, objectionable, obnoxious, obscene, odoriferous, offence, offending, offense, on the offensive(p), opprobrious, outrageous, predatory, raiding, rank, repellant, repellent, repelling, repugnant, repulsive, revolting, scornful, scrimy, scurrilous, sepulchral, sickening, skanky, tip-and-run, unpleasant, unsavory, unsavoury, unwholesome, verminous, vile, violative, wicked, yucky
 
 	Antonyms:	 	defensive, euphemistic, inoffensive, savory, savoury, unoffending, ylbissopA highly subjective interpretation of something real, imagined, or interpreted as being demeaning; very often the use of complaint to attack someone while paradoxically assuming both authority and victimhood; the use of complaint as a sociopolitical weapon or vehicle to often unmerited benefit, privilege, or compensation.Describes a statement politically or ideologically inconvenient, esp. in the judgment of one having no knowledge of the matter at hand.  Often used to stifle further discussion or pander to the lowest common denominator.  Cf: [fair and balanced].What you see that you don't like when you look in the mirror.The act of attacking & destroying an enemy's self esteem; utilizing unconventional remarks, stirring the enemy's emotions making them unable to network an insult measuring to your ego. If done correctly, the enemy will leave in anger to cry or to write about it in their diary, resulting in a successful response: rage quitting.1. merely mentioning anything about your "lifestyle and/or preference to women"
2. reading a book for class that has the word gay on the cover(that in no way to sexuality)
3. watching a movie where a girl says she loves another girl in a friend way
4.anything having to do with gay rights1. To take a stance or position against a percieved [assault].

2. The quality of an [attack] used against an [opponent] or [enemy] during [battle].

3. To find an [opinion], [act], [object] or [situation] to be [detestable].ANYTHING. LITERALLY ANYTHING THESE DAYS. ANGSTY TEENS GET OFFENDED BY EVERYTHING. IT'S ANNOYING. TAKE A JOKE.a person on social media-especially ifunny-who hates on and/or reports fandoms, furries, bronies, emos, porn, lgbtq, and anything else they don't like. also known as a hater.having no shame.A person who has no shame in getting what they want...often on there knees for best resultswhen someone makes a really stupid mistake, normaly blondes (like me n terri)1) Short for the drug, Cocaine.
2) Short for the beverage, Coca Cola.An addictive soda.

An addictive drug.1. A popular short term for the popular soft drink Coca Cola.

2. A popular short term for the popular, a illegal, drug Cocaine.Any drink served in the SouthWhat I would live the rest of my life on if I had enough money1* soda
2* short for coca cola
3* cocaineA highly addicted substance that ravages both mind and body!

....also the name of a powdered narcotic.1. Hard arse stimulant.  White powder derived from the Coca plant, native of Sth. America.  Very expensive but in small quantities is a fine buzz...

2. Short for Coca Cola - essence of American capitalist pigdog.  Made from [bumsweat] and sugar.1.What kept Tony Montana standing in the last 10 minutes of "Scarface."

2.Warm, its the best rust remover on the planet. (Put a little Coke in a cup and put a nail or small piece of sandwich meat on top. In the morning, meat is gone, wipe off rust.)

3. More popular than you think. I mean cocaine.Always available at bars, both over the counter as a soft drink or mixer and everywhere from the guest lounge to the toilets.

Often the word media or media bar means coke freindly, due to the common opinion that any person working in the media profession is a coke user.One of the smartest medical dramas to ever have aired, House, M.D. features the maverick, anti-social doctor Gregory House (Hugh Laurie) who specializes in infectious diseases and does whatever it takes to solve the puzzling cases that come his way.  

A show that should rob this year's Emmys if not for its sheer quality then for Laurie's brilliant acting.n. a style of electronic music originating in the late 80's in the USA characterized by four-on-the-floor bpms between 110-140, synthesized melodies and bass lines.A slang word with a hundred different definitions, 90% that were made up on the fly here at urbandictionary.com, to the point where it could be substituted for so many words you have no idea what the f**k someone would be talking about if he/she used each and every one.probably one of the best medical dramas ever to hit television, features Hugh Laurie, who plays the anti-social, sarcastic, pain in the ass doctor, who specializes in recognizing infectious diseases. He and his team of doctors take on extremely hard cases, House usually ends being right about the disease at the end of the day.

This show is truly great and it murders Scrubs.Nothing more or less than the best TV show that ever was or ever will be. HOUSE FTW!!the MOST awesome show on television! (well, next to Scrubs) which stars the wonderful British actor, Hugh Lauire, as the genius, pain in the ass, Gregory House.1. (v) to consume a substantial quantity quickly, completely, and with purpose.
2. (v) to beat in competition.
3. (v) to dominate.Pronunciation  (hous)

House Music: The original electronic incarnation from disco. House typically runs around 120 beats per minute (BPM) and uses a 4/4 time sequence and an eight bar repeating cycle. The beat is maintained by a heavy kick drum that alternates in a 1-3 pattern with a high hat accent. Like its disco roots, house often features vocal choruses, real instrumentation, and a more traditional song structure.A fucking wooden or brick fucking place where you live eat and sleep in.A bigger older woman with sexual desires towards younger men. (Usually a housewife.)To run over on a football fieldA vehicle of a redneck, which he drives to a date with his girlfriend instead of carring grass for cows.another four-wheeled vehicle with a flat bed in the back used for storage of equipment, groceries, small recreational vehicles, tools, or extra people. The pickup truck (as previously described) is the most popular automobile among men.A large vechile presumably with a bed for hauling, moving, towing, or even storing what needs be.

The absolute worst thing a person could do to a truck would include the following (these are all sins of god, and you will be punished accordingly):
-lowering it 'til it's an inch or less from the ground
-adding neon lights
-adding a fuckin ricer exhaust system... which most of time would just include tips or some other retarded peice of chrome
-PUTTIN A FUCKIN SPOILER ON IT
-adding giant ass rims to it, then stretching these tiny ass treads over'em that look like they'll pop any second


A real fuckin truck would include the following:
-A "body-on-frame"
-A real fuckin engine, varies from size of the truck (ex. an S10 with a small block, a brand new giant Ram 2500 with a Cummins Diesel)
-Four wheel drive... because some of us have the balls to get off the blacktop, just for fun or required for certain jobs, which most of you BMW pricks would be afraid of, don't wanna raw up them soft hands
-bedliner

optional:
-a nice leveling kit and/or lift kit
-some differential lockers with some beefy axles
-winch
-good ol' 15"/16"/17" wrapped with some treads depending on what terrian you work/play in (crawlers, boggers, LT's, swampers, AT's, 32"-40", etc.)
-sway bars, roll bars
-engine upgrades

Trucks are great vehicles. They are designed to do things cars can't, and most of them are built solid like a rock. Last long. Work hard and play hard. Besides the MPG... why wouldn't you want a truck?The metal part underneath a skateboard that holds the wheels in place (kind of like an axle on a car).  Used for grinding (riding on rails or waxed services).They are the device that attaches the wheels to the [skateboard].When a person does something that you didn't expect or you are so amazed at what happend your speechless.Someone who draws negative attention by not having their shit together. Most commonly used in jail.a word to describe someone/things extreme greatness. it is also a multi use term and can mean anything. it also can be used as an action word.Connection, association, or interaction with a person/place/thing; usually used in a negative sense.The hair on the back of you neck that is nappy, un-tameableA woman's natural habitat.The room where grandma hides her shotgun shells.A mysterious place full of sharp, pointed objects, deadly gas-operated incinerators, things that go 'ping' and a big, cold wardrobe full of beer which is the only true incentive for entering the room in the first placeA nickname for the holdem hand ten three (T-3) offsuit, a term used by many prominent online poker players, and coined by the professional online poker player Jamie Armstrong, aka pokerjamersa word used to describe nappy-naps in the back of a females head...On the sitcom "Martin" he often uses this word to insult the character "Pam"...because her back edges are apparently nappy and rough...Where the goods are cooked, things are shipped/delivered, people get swerved, and basically all the dope shit happens. Sometimes referred to as the bakery.a sammich factorythe back of the nape. (usually used in the phrase nape of the neck).Afro-amerain women or southen women call it"The Kitchen"(Traditional) The place in a home where a woman belongssomething that happens when the condom breaks on prom nightThe worst STD ever.  Causes pain, poverty, and eighteen year of torture.Carrying developing offspring within the body.your end of life...

you are totally fucked.

OWNEDSupposed to be the happiest moment in a couples lives but the dumb asses who conceived by accident just ruin the definition.

Don't have sex until your ready for the consequences.The condition of being able to make twice as much money in the porn industry due to supply and demand.The blossoming of a new life...in your life.When are girl has a baby growing inside her! After she has had unprotected sex!This is what happens when a male and a female have sexual intercourse and the sperm fertilises one of the woman's eggs after ovulation.

Contrary to popular (male) belief, pregnancy is not the woman's fault, it takes 2 to tango if you know what I mean...

Women also do not get pregnant to 'trap' a man. Because if he was indeed worth holding onto, she would not need to get pregnant to keep him, nor would a rubbish guy stick around if he got a woman pregnant either. (See scum or coward)

Pregnancy is the aprox 40 weeks of gestation in which it takes a human being to develop and grow inside his or her mothers body before birth.

It is in 3 stages (known as trimesters)
Pregnancy is divided into three stages called trimesters, each of which lasts three months. The first trimester covers the first 12 weeks of your pregnancy. This stage is often the worst with morning sickness and fatigue as common symptoms.

The baby grows inside the uterus, gaining it's nutrition from the placenta and kept safe and protected by the amniotic sack.

The woman's body goes through serious changes both physical and mental.

The mental changes include, hormonal, she may feel depressed,anxious,happy and angry, her mood changes often, she is not going mad, she is just pregnant!

the physical changes include: her tummy growing (obviously)
her breasts growing and producing milk ready for the babies arrival, usually in later stages of pregnancy she may leak milk.
Her nipples will also swell and darken, her breasts will grow larger, she may also get other skin conditions depending on hormone levels.
Aside from good changes to her body she may also find her immune system is weak, leaving her susceptible to colds,flu and other virus' and infections. When a woman is pregnant, her immune system is in over drive to stop her body from rejecting the unborn baby.

Pregnancy can be both a wonderful and horrible experience for someone. (including the babies daddy who has to put up with a very hormonal pregnant lady)

And before any man can insult a pregnant woman let me just say, if you get a girl pregnant and blame her for it, she is not going to want or need you anyway, so don't think your so great :)
A baby growing up with one parent is better than a baby growing up with an asshole for a father.

Not all pregnancies end with a baby though.
Some women for what ever reason choose to terminate the pregnancy, this does not make a woman a bad person, If she is not ready or in a good position to have a child, or say she became pregnant after rape, then she may choose to abort. No one has the right to judge someone for terminating pregnancy. Abortion is neither right or wrong.
Some pregnancies also end in miscarriage, and some pregnancies are ectopic.

Pregnancy is a natural thing and without it the life of all species would cease to exist.1. A state a woman may find herself in after having unprotected sex with a man.  Involves a child growing within her body and can be discovered by the absence of menstruation.  May cause illness.

2. Bloated, held out, prolonged.

I'd also like to say something to all the men out there who think that getting a girl pregnant is a death sentence!
Being pregnant is a wonderful and painful experience that you'll never have, so just shut the hell up about your selfish views.  Women don't trap men by getting pregnant.  It's not their choice!The act of receiving a serious butt whoopin at the hands of a person or group of persons.A severe beating delivered with the hands and feet; a pummeling so bad, the recipient needs to use his health insurance; see [open a can of whup ass]A good, old-fashioned ass kickin',Assault by the police after being arrested1. To beat someone up very badly, to the point of them being on the ground. This can happen with a combination of the following:

* Punching
* Kicking
* Kicking [Balls]
* [Curbstomping]
* [Fist Fight]ing

After the victim is on the ground, various forms of abuse may happen. Beatdown is then concurred, and a broken limb is required before it's real beatdown.

2. Another way of expressing utter defeat of someone. Can be used in celebration or defeat.v. (1) to verbally berate into submission (publicly) (2) to physically rough up or convincingly administer authority over another person or thing (3) the exercise of legitimate authority, rules, or known customs which leaves a person or persons in a poor position and often disappointed.
n. the act of beating down (2) a disappointing and unexpected result to an attempted action1. A fistfight where the odds are stacked highly in one of the two participants favours, commonly resulting in broken bones and softening of the face.

2. The climax of a hardcore song, usually a down-tempo combination of palm muted open strings/extensive pinch harmonics and low end chords, where crowd participant's can quite simply unleash the beast on one another.

3. fucking awesome.To receive a BEAT DOWN would be equivalent to getting your ass seriously beaten by another person or persons; to have one's ass handed to them; to be "pounded into the ground" by someone who doesn't like you.the dance of the hardcore kid.... it is when the guitarist simply stums the D or C string open.....The act of pumbling, destroying, and smashing a disgusting creature, especially ostriches, salamanders, junebugs, armadillos, and orangutang. Beat downs are given if and only if the act of being crusty or ugly is committed. They are given very often and involve fists and feet, or anything wet.Yellow bread made from cornmeal ubiquitous in Southern cuisine; it is slightly sweet, and usually served with butter.A baked foodstuff for which the primary ingredient is maize, which many people call corn, a grain.  Tradition holds that the Pilgrims ate corn bread because it was a plentiful grain - and the only grain - readily available where they settled in Massachusetts.1. A food commonly eaten by big booty black bitches.

2. Ur ass cherry(virginity),A girl with an extremely large ass, this refers to the fact that she must "eat her cornbread" in order to obtain such a fine ass.Money a prostitute makes from performing anal sex acts, as in getting [cornholed].a staple in African-American cuisine, often served with greens, coated with yam juice.The most delicious bread on the planet that was invented by Indians and is made out of corn.A name that no one will take seriouslyReference to the song "No sex in the champagne room" by Chris Rock. In it he says "Cornbread. Ain't nothin' wrong with that." So this word means that someone is perfect and you can't find anything wrong with her, just like cornbread.An affirmative statement.  A word mumbled when in acquiescence with another.  Used in place of the words: agreed or indeed.

It can also be used in random outbursts when feeling elated or quirky.Where you sleep when you get your girlfriend mad; but not mad enough to be kicked out of the house.when a girl sits on your lap and subtly grinds your cock with her ass in public, pretending that shes not (like a couch dance)the second best thing to use next to the bed ;)One's system of morals or beliefsA piece of furniture more diverse than a coffee table.A word used to replace words such as "fuck", or "shit", and has multiple uses as saying "back off". Or it is a piece of furniture that is ussually sat on.referrers  to the "sit-able" [plateau] of an excessively [fat] [booty]couch - an offensive term used to diminish someones social standing. Inferring that the person in question enjoys anus on his/her face.

A amicable term in some social spheres.The place where young children get ston'd in the morning.A lazy person.The reproductive system (gender neutral).Bhe act of saving a life when a person is drowning or choking by repetitively thrusting one's penis in and out of the person's throat. The thrusting creates a plumbing effect that forces the obstruction to move up the throat. This action is in no way sexual; it should only be used during times of grave danger.The act of purposefully stopping up your toilet so that the plumber will come to your house and unclog it.Wearing one's pants so low as to display one's asscrack. Derived from the state of many a fat plumber's pants.(verb) Very deep anal penetration
Deep-sea plumbing: Anal penetration over 10 inchesGeneric term for the bars of a jail cellTo forcefully insert a hollow metal pipe into the rectum of a woman and suck out all of faecal matter. It is similar to a [filthy fiddler].Plumbing is a sexual act involving a man and a female. The aforementioned male pops his penis in the girl's vagina, lubricating her ring, tickling and widening the said orifice. When that there hole is at maximum size, the man pops the scrotum and both balls in that bottomless pit of love.Any brass wind instrument, because of the appearance of the tubing.A Farm-veihicle that can pull farm-implements.  Tractors are usually used to pull items, and often have a [Front-end Loader] attacthed.Something you like, alot, think is attractive.A really, really fat girl that you bang because your stupid/high/desperate.A Techie, and a Actor; this person does both on stage and behind stage work, for theater.  This term was invented by WMHS Techie/Actors who needed a name in MoCoSomething really good. Mostly used in Kansas but also widely used throughout the midwest.An insult describing, someone who is slow and annoying.Big ass black bitch screwing a little white man while intoxicated.One who has ways from the rural Southern U.S., particularly Texas and most particularly, the town of Thorton, TX.word for female genitals.
aka. twat lol.(TRAK-tor) Used with [trash] to create [tractor trash]. Describes [white trash] from predominantly farming communities.Any opposite sex escort taken to an event in an effort to give a homosexaul person the apperance of being out on a date with a person of the opposite sex.a man or woman used as a cover for a gay partnerA female or male(though,mainly female) who is used as a cover-up for a homosexual.The single most manly, and great thing a man can do. To have a beard is to be a true man. If you have a beard, show it off proudly, and enjoy the satisfaction of the envy in the eyes of people around you who don't have beards. If you don't have a beard, grow one. If you cant grow one and your not past puberty yet, hold out my young friend, your time will come. If you don't have a beard and your past puberty, go get that sex change you know you need.The best solution to any problem. A sort of spiritual band-aid that's only effective when used by men.A common word used to address a homosexual's female friend who he takes around town; he normally calls this companion his "girlfriend" to prove to the world that he is a masculine, football watching, titty grabbing heterosexual male. Although, he may think that this so called 'image' is working, he's actually fooling himself. It's completely obvious to on-lookers that he is a flamboyant homo. Gayer than a chihuahua in pink shades. 

Here are some warning signs that you may be a beard...

1. He wears more makeup than you.
2. He looks fucking FIERCE in pictures 'cause he smiles wit' his eyes.
3. Uses bronzer as blush
4. Plucks his own eyebrows and his eyebrows look more groomed than yours.
5. Stands with hands on his hips.A condition that causes hair to grow from the chin and lower face. Symptoms include itching, divinity and gratuitous awesomeness.

Synonyms include: Jesus.The term 'Beard' is used to describe a person who is being used by another person to cover something up. This can range from gay men using a girlfriend as a beard to make people think he is straight, or someone using a friend to make people think they are hanging out with them when really they are with someone else.1. A boy or girl hired as a celebritys boyfriend/girlfriend by that celebritys management, usually for publicity.when a gay man and a gay woman date each other to hide that fact that they're gaya woman's hair arranged at the back of her head, held together with a band and to be used by a man as a handle while receiving oral sex from a willing female.

A straight ponytail is grasped near the base in a male's fist, medium grip. This allows nice control of the female's head, but is limiting due to awkward bending of the male's wrist. It is a carpal tunnel syndrome hazard for men who receive a high volume of blowjobs. The height of the ponytail on the back of the woman's head can be adjusted for better torque.

Another type of ponytail is the balled ponytail. The straight ponytail is simply folded under itself and tucked back into the band, resembling a ball of hair. Grasped with an open palm, the fingers should meet at the band, thus the "ball" is contained in the man's hand. Called the "palm sander" grip, it allows full control of the woman's head with no wrist strain.

A third type of ponytail is the double ponytail. Two tails are formed toward the rear left and right sides of the female's head. A favorite among bikers as each tail can be grasped by a separate hand. The willing lady's head is steered like a motorcycle.

Caution: though clearly sexual stimuli for men, it is important for men to remember women do not always view it in the same context. Women often use ponytails just to keep hair out of their faces. The confused male should never just assume when a woman's hair is in a ponytail her head is ready for mounting. He should always ask first.Ponytail; verb.  To grab a girl by her ponytail and remove her from whatever current situation she is in.1) the thing that's on a ponies butt

2) when a person with long hair puts it in a singular hair elasticA meme that took the Bioware Social Network by storm in anticipation for Dragon Age 2.

The second day of live feed from gamescom in Germany proved to be nothing but slow, dull hours of people standing by the DA2 booth and taking pictures in front of its poster.

Bored, the online viewers took note of one booth workers' Godly hairstyle of a long, blonde ponytail-braid. So enthralled were they that within just a couple hours; a Facebook page, several threads, a Chant of Ponytail (parody of DA:O's Chant of Light) and a social group on the Bioware forums had been created in honor of her.

Bioware remarked on it via Twitter, and Ponytail occasionally waved at the camera and appeared generally entertained by her sudden popularity from her self-titled army.Where a girl puts her hair up in a single rubber band.
why:
So she can smack a bitch
So she can smack someone in the face with her hair
To try and impress someone
To give head

It also the most impossible thing to do when you have messy, snarled hair i do not reccomend it you will look terrible unless you have bobby pins to fix that shitGetting alot of head.Basically it is a term used for people whose skin color is darker than most. Normally referred to as "nigger", "negro", "knee's grow", or "samo-niggaz". They are typically found wandering around in Compton shooting down samo-niggaz, also if you are trying to find them in the dark, say a funny joke it will make them laugh and you will see their teeth. For example: "What do you get when you cross a samoan and a negro?" -pause- and then say "SAMO-NIGGGGAAZZ!!!!!" in a very niggerish accent. When you come across a ponytail you have to holler at them for example...When someone has a cock stuck on the back of their head that resembles a cleft of hair being draped down the back of their neck.(from a hairstyle popular with the people described, usage invented by Kaecyy in 2005)

A generally amiable but hopelessly nerdy person-- not necessarily possessing an actual ponytail or even long hair-- who is usually immersed in a combination of science fiction and fantasy literature (and their derivatives), roleplaying games (often in their live action varieties), the gothic-industrial subculture, and/or the historical reenactment of pre-industrial periods of European history (often at what are called "Renaissance fairs")-- among other influences-- to or nearly to the point of lifestyle.Ponytail is when a gay or bi guy gets mad at his balding lover for not satisfying him sexually. When his lover falls asleep, he jacks off on the guy's bald spot and then  affixes a tube sock to it. The guy wakes up with a "ponytail". A variation of the [superman].A man who is fascinated with large breasted women, who as a child was deprived of his mother's breast milk and was a bottle fed baby.Heroin supplier; a penny balloon that contains narcoticsa heroin dealerslang for [condom]; slang for protection during sex.A woman's breasts, AKA [boobs], [tits], [jugs], [hooters], [knockers].Elegant strip club located at 233 Porno Ave in Providence, RI. Famous for allowing men (and women) of all ages, including those 15-17.  Home of the infamous "referee" (bouncer) who also offers lap dances for a discounted price.A fool; a person who has just made a pretty obvious mistakeBalloons are used to hold heroin (usually low grade H). A dealer will use un-filled balloons (the multi-colored, water balloons, most of the time) to place a small, universal weight, amount of heroin into. The weight of the heroin inside each balloon can vary depending on who packaged or "tied" them. The amount is usually about .1grams per balloon. People buy them in packs of 10 or more, and rarely buy/sell a single "balloon." Rumor has it, the reason heroin was originally put into these balloons, was so you could swallow them if need be, and not need medical attention.Another name for [breasts].A very weird thing that is basically a colored plastic sack of your breath to give your friend on their birthday.1. A source of information.

2. A source of entertainment.

3. A tool barely used by todays societies, because it is not 'cool' to read a book.verb meaning to run or to leave in a hurryan object used as a coaster, increase the hight of small children, or increase the stability of poorly built furniture.What people don't read enough today.cool: the first option given when trying to type 'cool' in a text message using t9Did you know there HAVE been books printed since the fifties and the new ones are cool?  They have them so anyone can understand them.  Books can be about video games, sex, drugs, sports, people, pretty much everything.  They come with cuss words, funny characters and you might understand some more of you those weird things...that's right. Words.Something we stopped caring about after the [internet] came along.Portable sanctuaries.Words assembled on pages. They usually tell stories of things the reader is interested in. That is, unless you're reading in [school]. Then, you have to read books nobody cares about or even likes. Maybe more people would like reading if they weren't forced to read books that they didn't like. I know I would.cool.

In the T9 predictive text on cell phones, the numbers 2665 spell both "book" and "cool," but "book" is the first word to display. To save time, it is left and understood to mean "cool."The best thing in the worldthe reason you need a new hard drive.The traditional way for young female Americans to afford university education (those not from wealthy families).A great American pastime.something that both sexes can enjoy.Arousing materials usually employed for masturbatory purposes.

It's often said that the most senstive part of your body during a porn session is your ears - no one likes getting busted with their undies around their ankles.

But, the use of porn doesn't need to be such an ugly experience.  'The Big Wank' (see below) is an example of how you can add more mystique and romance to your evening at home alone.peas and corn mixed together in a bowln. Reading and viewing material, otherwise known as 'cliterature'.Will never die, as long as there are folks willing to strip for the camera, the people who wish to browse it, and the assholes who wish to destroy it.something that the user loses interest in after masturbation has occurredhairy mofo.Heartless, 
Having no emotions,v. used to describe something awesome or nice ; something worthy of hatinBetter than [cool]
To be cooler than cool
The coolest level of coolwhat a girl says she is when she wants to snuggle :]plain, obviously, flat out, straight upan annoying and contagious illness that causes sniffling, sneezing, coughing, and other symptomsharsh, mean, icyCold was a rock band that started in 1986. They released 4 cd's: Cold, 13 ways to bleed on stage, year of the spider, and a different kind of pain. They also released an ep called Oddity. The band consisted of lead singer Scooter Ward, Matt Louhgran, Zachary Gilbert, both guitarists, Jeremy Marshall on bass, and Sam McCandless on drums. Former members included Mike Booth, Sean Lay, Terry Balsamo, Kelly Hayes and Eddie Rendini.
On February 27, 2006, Ward left a message on their official website saying they had disbanded. However, he said he and Sam will continue writing music.An infectious disease that usually spreads like wildfire around people, because people don't give a shit worth about others. They would yawn cough and not wash their hands properly to prevent others from catching the cold. If you catch a fucking cold, don't cough, cover your fucking mouth, and if you go to either 1-12 grades, go to the back of the class, and don't spread your fucking cold.Pretty, beautiful, hot1- *FRIDGE; - ph-ry-dJG ; verb- the action of destroying or assassinating a persons anus with a penis of considerable magnitude often resembling a 57 bus. The action, ususally performed in a violatory sense, produces the aftermath of either one of the following symptoms; laseration and/or complete tearing of the anal orifice, the dissemination of part or the entirety of the subjects' internal organs where the giant girder cock forced its entry, and/or the complete annihliation of the victims existance to the extent where it would be more appropriate to use the remains to bury the compost that would have been used to otherwise bury the remains.

2- As above but via a huge hit during a Football game.

3- Literally a Football player of such magnitude that he resembles a walking samsung fridge/freezer combo.someone who has never french kissedshort version of refridgeratorAn extremely cool person, the phrase was coined by BriBry (A YouTuber with 21,000+ subscribers) on a blogTV show in April 2011.A girl who is frigid and only hangs out with girls. Perhaps the date, but they are too scared to do anything.

They also are overly sacarstic.someone who hasn't got on (french kissed) anyone yet.place to store cold drinks and food

since when do u keep ice-cream in da fridge-noun, /frɪdʒ/: A common kitchen appliance used to store and preserve dead human bodies and body parts for consumption.Anyone from Shenendehowa HS knows that the fridge is 'a place to go sit and chill'A very appealing being full of human desires. When the fridge is full, it can make anyone very happy. But when not full, it has the potential to kill.A maker of [trouble] is not one who "causes" trouble, but who achieves a level of trouble by being [Mischievous], [Stunning]!, [Sensational]! and [Smart]...1. When knowingly, and consciously getting into trouble with no regard or care for the potential repercussions.

2. When one said person has one or more warrants for their arrest at one time.
3. If your name is Brittany Rivera.(n). 1. A poo that is very stubborn, requires a lot of force to eject., 2. Hardened feces which is lodged at the anus, preventing soft feces behind it to pass.

Example. "Where's a magazine? I've got a trouble-maker to work out."A troublemaker is someone who expresses a view on a forum that differs from those of the Administrator and/or, as is more common, a moderator of a forum. The person deemed to be a troublemaker will usually be 100% correct in their statements, but the moderator will object, making statements that could be classified as being a [bigland].

As a result the troublemaker will then be told to go and form their own forum, even though everything they said was both reasonable and correct.When you pair a shot of tequila with a Guinness.[Spike],the troublemaker. Generally considered out to [lunch]. Known for wildly outlandish behavior. Highly unstable antisocial personality however incredibly sexy.a person who escalates a situation.Someone who brings about or initiates something.A person who starts fights or arguments.A blow up alligator; short for instant gator.A person who instigates.  To instigate is to conspire, plan and prank the local populationtype of person that gets information from people by overhearin wat they say ...and then tell their bestfriend <3Bunty, officially known as the instigator.1. (before 1997) Something really bad; a failure

2. (after 1997) Something considered excellent and/or the best (uses modifier "the")something very cool/ goodA graffitti slang wordrefers to a person male/female who's attractive , on they steez and or carries themselves well .Fast Graffiti Pieces, more than two colors, uses all of your letters. not much details just enough to look good and be on your way.(verb) the act of writing a grafitti tag in a highly visible public place.To fail spectacularly.Something you never say on air airplane.Slang for Ecstasy pillscool, awesome. Also see shita baby cat! sometimes they can't meow properly yet and they are sooo cute!An baby [cat]. Also known as a [kitty]. They have sharp little claws and teeth and can be nasty sometimes, but they are soft, cute, and totally lovable. Their meow is just precious to hear. Be gentle; kittens are delicate.1.  An immature cat.
2.  An adorable ball of fur with big eyes that uses its powers of cuteness to manipulate human beings into submission and slavery.
3.  An adorable, yet insane, tiny monster with teeth and claws.Cute little fluffballskitten (kit'en) n. 

 A small, sometimes domesticated animal; usually a pet; a member of the cat family, wants to grow up to be a lion, tiger, leopard, etc; thinks the world revolves around her; is probably right.little fluffy bastardsa woman who likes to date men older than her, usually by about 10 years, or more depending on the woman. Also the opposite of a cougar.The casualties of masturbation.(n) Term of coolness for a female from the 1950's and still used in [rockabilly] circles.Small balls of fluff that people perceive as being "cute". Everytime you do something naughty, they die.random weather patterns. makeing meteorology nearly imposibleThe 17th state of the United States -- in 1803. Contains 13,000,000 people and its chief cities are Cleveland, Cincinnati, and the capital of Columbus. Ohio is known for being the home of the Wright Brothers, the first man in space, more presidents than any other state, and Generals William T. Sherman and U.S. Grant. Also home of the champion OSU Buckeyes. Unlike what others may tell you, there are larger hellholes in the universe. Ohio has a lot to offer and is a decent place full of decent people.A land of shifting mists, Ohio is the most mysterious state in America.  There are some who claim that it does not exist at all, but is merely a hoax perpetrated by a strong core of dedicated jokesters in the "neighboring" states of Michigan, Pennsylvania, Indiana, and West Virginia (we're pretty sure no one tells Kentucky anything).  

Most people believe, however, that Ohio DOES in fact exists, and that its mystery is due solely to the mysterious mists that seem to enshroud the entirety of the state in...well...mystery, deterring all but the most stalwart of travelers.  Constituents to this belief also hold that Ohio is, in fact, the last home of the dinosaurs, and that Ohioan economy is based almost solely on quarrying and agricultural works using highly-trained dinosaurs as the primary (and literal) beasts of burden.The Buckeye State. One of the best states to live in, and all around best in the Union. We have 3 major cities: our Capital; [Columbus] (aka C-Bus, Bus Town), [Cincinnati] (aka the dirty/nasty Nati) and [Cleveland] (the Mistake by the Lake). Home to smaller cities such as; Dayton, Toledo and Akron. 1 NBA team, 1 NHL team, 1 MLS team, 2 NFL teams, 2 MLB teams. We are also home to THE Ohio State University Buckeyes, one of the largest/best universities in the country. Also home to Ohio University, which is filled with raging alcoholics that refer to themselves as "students". Most of us in Ohio, (especially us in Columbus) were born and raised with the Bucks. We bleed Scarlett & Grey. We say things like "you guys" and a drive-thru liquor store is not strange to us. It's the beach, not the shore, and pop, not soda. We are the Eastern most state in the MidWest, and have some of the friendliest people around. Ohio girls are some of the coolest/nicest you will ever meet. We are a big football state, but Lacrosse is another sport everyone plays. We play a little game called [Cornhole] anywhere we can. We love our corn & we love our beer. We are Ohio. The Heart of it All, and you'd be nothing without us.The only place in the world where you can experience all four seasons in one week.A chant that occurs in Columbus, Ohio between 2 individuals or 2 groups of people who are too stupid to get that not everyone they see gives a rat's ass about sports and can't spell the name of the four letter state they live in without help from other idiots. Proof that OSU students don't learn anything but how to get arrested, drink, fight, watch football and date rape each other. Anyone who yells "O-H" at you in Columbus is a complete waste of flesh and deserves to get their ass kicked.1) One of the states of the United States of America.
Home to a bunch of formerly bad but now improving pro sports teams, a ton of colleges, the OSU Buckeyes, actual buckeyes, part of the Rust Belt, Cedar Point and a lot of soybeans, cows, and corn.
Ohio contains a little bit of all the typical Midwestern environments- college towns, suburbs, cities, urban areas trying to reinvent themseles, farmlands, etc.  It also contains part of Appalachia, and a large number of "swing voters".  It has quite a few ardent liberals and conservatives, and has been the home and/or birthplace of eight presidents.  The weather, it being part of the Midwest region, is often "crazy" and swings between hot, mild, cold, and freezing.  The four seasons are widely known to be "winter, still winter, almost winter, and construction" or something to that effect (believed to be taken from a Jeff Foxworthy chain email).
There's definitely a lot more there than bad drivers, "hicks", and cows, and just driving through the state does not really do it justice.  You've got to experience it to really understand it, and then you can pass judgement.
2) A song written by Neil Young (while he was working with Crosby, Stills, Nash, and Young) in response to the [Kent State Massacre], which occured at Kent State University in Ohio on May 4, 1970 when National Guardsmen opened fire on student protesters on the KSU campus.I used to think that this state was propably the most suckish, boring state EVER.
I think a lot differently now.
Here are a few things about this Awesome state.

HISTORRRYYY
This was one of the first states of the Northeast, Established in 1803. The three main cities are Columbus, the capitol, Cleveland, and Cinncinati.
The Wright Brothers were raised in Ohio.
So were eight of America's presidents.
Aaand the first man to walk on the moon.
Akron was the first town to use police cars.
Cleveland was the first fully electric powered city.
Also the first state to use traffic lights.
And many many other things that I can't remember.

TIPS, HINT, AND INFO FOR ANY TOURIST...

1; STAY. AWAY. FROM. SPRINGFEILD. TOWNSHIP. This is basically the cespoo of Ohio. Unless you are crazy, like everyone else that lives in that weird place :D

2; ..I suggest dont go to Toledo.

3; If you have the courage to yell, 'I LOVE MICHIGAN' in a public area...You. Will. Be. Eaten. Alive. Unless you're in Toledo.

4; When you hear someone yell, 'O-H', you yell 'I-O'. Dont ask questions. Just do it. 

5; Don't. Diss. OSU. You will also be eaten alive for that also. Again, unless you're in Toledo

6; In response to number one, stay away from Ellet too.

7; Our weather is crap and very unpredictable. Deal with it. I suggest bringing snowboots in the middle of summer and shorts in the dead of winter.

8; Only we can diss our state. If you diss it, we'll agree with you for that second, then again, eat you alive.

9; There's a 3/4 chance you will be eaten alive.

So, that's only 1/4 of the stuff in Ohio. Come here to figure out the rest for yourself :D
But...Try not to be eaten alive...America is the melting pot of the world; Ohio is the melting pot of America.  There will never be a pot more melting than Ohio.  Some say this makes Ohio a blurry combination of everything, and that it is not very distinct among the states, but this is cantrary to the truth.  No other state is like Ohio, in that it is a melting pot.  Also, Ohio's flag is one of only three non-rectangular significant world flags, and the only non-rectangular flag of the states.  Ohio's also cool cuz I live there.Ohio is the heart of America and is well known for it's amusement park in Sandusky Ohio called Cedar Point, which has over fourteen rides and loads of tourists come summer.

Ohio also has a huge historical background which can be seen almost everywhere you go.

Ohio is one of the states with the most American accent.

It's pronounced, OH-HIGH-OH, not OH-HAI-UH. If you go to any person who was raised in Ohio they will laugh at you for pronouncing it differently than 99% of America.

Ohio rivals with Michigan about sports, and they don't like each other because Michigan thinks Ohioan's drive slow -- while Ohioans think they drive like bats out of hell. (Which they do.)

Most of Ohio is taken up by farms and fields, but don't judge it by the land, for there is many neat things you can discover in Ohio.The religious belief that every word of the sacred texts is literally true; stereotypically in Christianity and taken to such extremes. See also: [fundamentalist].A group of people comprising 0.002% of the world's population yet drawing unproportional amount of media coverage (especially Israeli Jews).1. Someone who practices Judaism.

2. Derogatory term for someone tight with their money or someone not very generous.The only people in the world that are simultaneously hated by both the extreme Left and the extreme Right.

Synonym: [scapegoat]A person of the jewish faith.Let's Clear up some of the Misconceptions in these postings.

A Jew is a person who's mother is Jewish. (Some streams of Judaism argue that Jewish patrimony can be acquired through the father as well). 
Jews are not a race but an eclectic mix of different races, nationalities, and cultures; they are a truly multi-cultural and multi-ethnic people. However, within this mix, there are distinct ethnic groups such as the Ashkenazic and Sephardic Jews that make up the overwhelming majority of the Jewish People. 
Most American Jews are of Ashkenazic origin -- usually originating from Eastern Europe or the former Soviet Union. Therefore, American Jews could largely be classified as an ethnic group, hence the characteristic stereotypes, although there are exceptions.
 A Jew is not a person who practices Judaism, although most Jews do adhere to some form of Jewish practice or cultural tradition.
 A Jew is not an Israeli and an Israeli is not a Jew. An Israeli is a citizen of the state of Israel. While most Israeli's are Jewish, there are also non-Jewish citizens of Israel. 
A Jew is not automatically a citizen of the state of Israel. A Jew must apply for and be granted citizenship to the state just like everyone else, although most are awarded citizenship rather easily.1) someone who practises judaism

2) is also a culture/ethnicity, that is to say it has a certain sense of humour, certain type of food and music etc.

3) A person who Mel Gibson talks smack about after he has had too much to drink.A southern bastardization and contraction of the two words "did you".Something you blame something.Like Christians, but without all that Jesus stuffone who practices the world's oldest monotheistic religionLacking any class. Dumb and unartful, like most of the words in this dictionary.
[fool]the classy way of saying awkward. use it.Adjective

gauche (comparative more gauche, superlative most gauche)

Positive
gauche
		

Comparative
more gauche
		

Superlative
most gauche

   1. Awkward or lacking in social graces; bumbling.

          Quotations:
              * "Seeking by vulgar pomp and gauche display" — Samuel Griswold (1793-1860)nuveau riche, "cursi", expensive but tackySocially ackward and lacking Social experienceThe hair on a dogs cock after the lipstick has been withdrawn.Male genitalia. Pronounced "gooch".A girl's boyfriend/crusha classy, sophisticated manner, much like audrey hepburn. it is classy, glamorous, without being a pushover, and without being flashy. its an element of class.Glam without being trampy - attention grabbing class! It is sophisticated, intelligent, and gorgeous.Chic is an elegant fashion sense, that is also very glamorous, and does NOT mean a girl, thats CHICK!Hard to define, a certain eliment of style and sophistication in your fashion sense. Almost artisticly stylish (don't ask).An abbreviation for Cherry Coke. Commonly herd in the hood.It's simply just another word for stylish.

FACTVery attractive lady with an air of elegance flowing around her but at the same time she is very friendly and approachable.

She is a very genuine character and there's nothing pretentious about her.

Very sexy but not slutty, not a skank. She dresses herself decently, and appropriately.To be super stylish. One of the cool people. Effortlessly awesome.An abbreviation of the word chica that close girlfriends or besties say to one another. Usually girls who are called this are hot, sassy and feisty!One of the tightest disco-funk band of all time.to groom a man.  Shaving, waxing, cleaning up the superfluous fur.A term used to define male grooming below the belt. A male can use both an electric razor or a regular razor. A Mach 3 is preferable with the ladies on the testicular area. No female likes to deal with hairy balls, so men must education themselves on proper manscaping and maintenance techniquesWhen men shave or trim their cock and ballsA mans grooming of his body hair.  Like landscaping, but for the body."I have no idea what this is."

- Jonathan GoldsmithA fine artform exclusive to men;  the continued upkeep of exceptional hygeine and strategic hair removal as they pertain to the male body.For a guy to trim his pubic hair or to style it fashionably.To trim male pubes back to a reasonable bush."I have no idea what this is"
- Jonathan GoldsmithA word used to discribe the shaving of a Males pubic /chest/ and back hairs.

-Its pronounced like Landscaping but with a (man) instead of (land).Describes the complicated love and affection shared by two straight males.-noun
1. A [non-sexual] [relationship] between two men that are unusually close.

-verb  -mans-ing
1. The act of wooing a fellow male friend for the purpose of becoming closer.
2. Going to unusual lengths in an attempt to become closer with another male friend.

also: "Bromancing the Stone"
1. The act of truly and thoroughly  enjoying the process of getting and/or being high/stoned. 

Provenance/Origin: "Bromance" is a [portmanteau] of the two words "brother" and "romance". Originally coined by author/editor Dave Carnie in "Big Brother Magazine." [Big Brother] was a sort of R rated [skateboarding]/skate culture magazine that was eventually purchased by [Larry Flynt]'s [Hustler] [conglomerate] and consequently taken out of [circulation] due to unsatisfactory sales [performance]. Carnie used the word on several occasions to describe relationships between [skate-buddies] who spent a lot of time together and/or shared hotel rooms on every tour/skate [road trip].A close relationship between two bros to such a point where they start to seem like a couple.The relationship between two straight guys. They enjoy each others company and even though they may constantly joke about being gay they are not.a highly formed friendship between male friends, or "bro's".(N) The intense complicated love shared between two heterosexual males that consists of but not limited to wrestling, numerous man-dates, and tons of other stories that will only remain between the two.

Also a form of male bonding to such a point where they start to seem like a couple.

This bond is normally only shared between two males that have a deeper understanding of each other, in a way no woman could ever realize.Bromance

-noun

A strictly non-sexual relationship between two completely heterosexual men that are close and enjoy eachothers company but still enjoy the company of women.What House and Wilson or George Clooney and Brad Pitt have.

Dating back to Plato and Socrates, a close but non-sexual relationship between two men. The whole is greater than the sum of the individual parts.

To girls this means, George Clooney + Brad Pitt>George Clooney or Brad Pittwhen two guys have a very close bond, to the point where they act like a couple, except that they are both straight. Signs of a bromance include, but are not limited to: knowing what the other is thinking, hanging out 27/7, hugging, extensive high-fiving, and sharing clothes. Some famous examples include Sherlock Holmes and Watson, and Captain Kirk and Spock.Noun- An intense and extreme non-sexual bond between two straight males. Said to be a “deep emotional bond” that no woman could satisfy.As a rule of thumb, it is profoundly unwise to take crack-cocaine. The brain has evolved a truly vicious set of negative feedback mechanisms. Their functional effect is to stop us from being truly happy for long. Nature is cruelly parsimonious with pleasure. The initial short-lived euphoria of a reinforcer as powerful as crack will be followed by a "crash". This involves anxiety, depression, irritability, extreme fatigue and possibly paranoia. Physical health may deteriorate. An intense craving for more cocaine develops. In heavy users, stereotyped compulsive and repetitive patterns of behaviour may occur. So may tactile hallucinations of insects crawling underneath the skin ("formication"). Severe depressive conditions may follow; agitated delirium; and also a syndrome sometimes known as toxic paranoid psychosis. The neural aftereffects of chronic cocaine use include changes in monoamine metabolites and uptake transporters. There is down-regulation of dopamine D2 receptors to compensate for their drug-induced overstimulation. Thus the brain's capacity to experience pleasure is diminished.Crack is something that is sold by both drug dealers and prostitutes. The only difference is that a prostitute can wash her crack and sell it again.Another form of cocaine:  2 parts cocaine to one part baking soda, with a little water, heat gently until a precipitate forms: this is your crack1. Smokeable cocain 
2. A program to unlock trial versions of programs 
3. "[butt cleavage]"Otherwise known as crack-cocaine, this illegal drug is a mixture of two parts cocaine and one part baking soda. This chemical process reverts the powder-cocaine mkaing process by one step, producing a smokable form of the naturally found alkaloid cocaine. Because of its nature as an inhalable substance, the high is quicker and more intense, leading to a larger number of addicts. In present society, it is considered to be much more distasteful to use crack-cocaine then powder-cocaine as crack is mainly viewed as a drug for poor people whereas powder cocaine is used by a richer constituancy. Contrary to popular belief, crack-cocaine is not freebase cocaine. Freebase cocaine is a mixture of cocaine, ether, and other dangerous and combustable materials. Baking soda was replaced as the ingredient in the 1980's to make production easier and less dangerous. Either way, crack and freebase cocaine produce the same smokable form of the drug.A small, illegal program who's sole purpose is to trick another program (by editting, imputting a registration key, or some other method) into thinking it has been registered.The area between the ass cheeks and, in females, including the crevices of the genitalia.Basically, crack is silly, intentionally non-serious, and has a high tendency to be extremely crazy and unfounded, such as purposeful [OOC]-ness or playing on cliches, inside jokes, and/or [fanon].
  
The term crack probably stems from crack as in crack cocaine, as opposed to a crack in a wall. As in, so horrendously unfounded/silly that only one could have come up with it while under the influence of crack.Something that is great, awesome, good.NOUN:
1. The solid form of the illicit, recreational drug, cocaine.
2. A small gap on the surface of an object.
3. An illegally obtained password or file to a copyrighted computer program.

ADJECTIVE:
1. The quality or state of excellence. (often used to describe music)
2. Having a small gap on the surface of an object. [-ed]

VERB:
1. To make a small gap on the surface of an object.
2. To illegally pass through some form of passive security (often used with computer programs, see NOUN-3).
3. To punch someone in an altercation.
4. To start. [-ing]
5. To be occurring. (often used in the greeting, "What's crackin'?!")An abbreviation for methamphetamine, a drug that stimulates the central nervous system by causing it to release more dopamine, a neurotransmitter that gives someone a feeling of satisfaction.a horrible drug that ruins lives, breaks up families, and does considerable damage to one's looks (its true, look at the before and after pictures). All the people who write definitions promoting it have no idea, and will be o-so-happy when all of their teeth fall out :)the stupidest shit EVERAn abbreviation for [methamphetamine], a drug that stimulates the central nervous system by causing it to release more dopamine, a neurotransmitter that gives someone a feeling of satisfaction.A stupid drug made used and made by [white trash] that's made out of cold medicine and other easily obtained chemicals.The lonely situation you find yourself in, after using methamphetamine. Typically, broke, with no job, falling apart, stuttering, wondering why you pulled into this parking lot "What the hell was I doing just now?" when all your "new best friends" have left you for better and you feel like it's the end of the world.A drug for fuckups.. Invented by some japenese guy approx. 80 years ago.. The hippie version is speed...Will fuck up ones life and their love ones; HIGHLY addictive, probably the most addictive drug; not only popular with so called "white trash" but very big in the Filipino community all across USA. (esp. cali, vegas, NY & JERSEY). Most users/dealers/runners and THE SOURCE know or have "heard" of one another.

They say, "don't knock it, until you TRY it" or "Try anything once", etc. etc. CRYSTAL METH does NOT apply to these sayings! DO NOT TRY IT!1. The reason why it is so hard to get decent over the counter meds for your freaking hayfever. 2. [Crack] for [rural] and [suburban] white people.Short for methamphetamines. The most highly addictive illicit narcotic made from all sorts of deadly toxins: metals, cold medicines, rat poison, chlorine, bleach, etc. The drug is so dangerous and deadly, that it can explode when being produced incorrectly. Unfortunately, the drug has a strangle hold on America and destroys cities, families, and eventually the addict themself. It makes the addict lose their looks, teeth, health, personality, etc. On the streets its known as ICE, SPEED and CRYSTAL METH. The drug turns you into a loser and eventually a criminal and convict. It is highly addictive because it stimulates the central nervous system, giving a feeling of euphoria and relaxation. Meth is the fastest-growing illegal drug in the United States, and is actually growing the fastest among caucasians in upper middle-class suburbs and rural areas.Gin is an unaged [liquor] made by [distill]ing [grain]s such as [barley], [corn] or [rye]. Its [bouquet] comes from [juniper] berries, [coriander], [herb]s and [spice]s, usually added to the grain mash during [distillation]. The gin is stored in [glass], [earthenware] or [stainless steel] containers, but does not mature in these. The storage time serves only to harmonize the product.

Someone once said that "A [bar] without gin is like an Italian kitchen without pasta". No other [liquor] provides for the creation of so many classic [cocktail]s. Gin is in fact a liquor that is harmonious with almost anything.

Without gin the king of [cocktail]s, the dry [Martini], would not exist.An often strong liquor, usually clear but with a strong smell, much like rubbing alcohol. Sold under brands like Gordon's 'London Dry Gin' and Bombay 'Sapphire'. Often used to escape life temporarily or make high skool more interesting.An archaeic word for Aboriginal Females
considered offensive but curiosly still allowed to be used to name Australian places. Gin-Gin Falls for example(n) An individual of aboriginal origin. (Offensive)(n) in poker, drawing/flopping/turning the best card or combination of cards (typically it gives one a very strong hand and one's opponent a strong but second-best hand); frequently used with the verb 'to hit' and occasionally followed by 'card(s)'

etymology: probably originating from the card game of the same namePronounced "gĭn" not "jĭn" -Bahamian slang meaning "going to".A grain liquor that smells and tastes like pine needles.Slang for the female genitalia.In hold 'em poker: Describes a hand's relationship to a flop when conditions exist where not only is the hand likely the strongest, but can also easily improve to the [nuts] (aka best hand possible).a girl who is ready to suck any nigga up just for popularity or cause they happen to be real thirsty.The surest way of getting nothing from something.when your not sure if you have to fart or shit and you take the chance any way thats what gambling is all aboutGiving money to native americans.1. An improvident activity in which winning gleefully proceeds losing. 2. The saddled process of chasing one's loses or blowing one's winnings. 3. Chinese finger cuffs. 4. An insatiable itch erroneously believed to be satisfied by scratching. 5. The willingness to ask Chance for Certainty.just a way to get ahead.v., intransitive

A quick way to riches and power.

It's a sure thing.the act of masturbating. the reference is to the hand gesture made to imply masturbation, which greatly resembles the shaking of dice.custom-made; looking like it cost a million bucksOne of the powerful masculin [trends] for 2008 in fashion. Bespoke [tailoring] reffers to a particularity of british fashion, but the term 'bespoke' is now extended to all life's domains, as a powerful mark of [luxury], an anti-brand/ anti-globalisation reaction.The act of shoving a bicycle pump up a woman's rectum while going down on her.(1)A drink that often burns when consumed by itself, but goes good mixed with various sodas (see: [pepsi], [coke], [7-up]) and sometimes even water. Straight shots are smoother if chilled, and some whiskeys such as Seagram's Seven can be consumed straight by even those with the weakest stomachs.

(2)A drink which makes old men's I.Q.s increase exponentially after every shot, eventually leading to a bar full of omniscient men who can't even begin to consider that for once they might just be wrong.

(3)Something good to come out of Canada.The life giving substance that has intoxicated many a man. (better than eve and that god damn apple)Part of the military phonetic alphabet. As one might expect, Whiskey = W.An alcoholic beverage made from ingredients similar to beer, but intended for grown ups. Suitable for use as an aftershave, by men who consider that perfumed stuff too girly.The best fucking drink in the world. Not too mention the manliest. Mixed with [weed], it can cause one to become fucking [crunk]. Puts hair on your chest.1. The oil of conversation, the philosophic wine, the ale that is consumed when good fellows get together, that puts a song in their hearts and laughter on their lips, and the warm glow of contentment in their eyes;

2. Christmas cheer;

3. The stimulating drink that puts the spring in the old gentleman’s step on a frosty, crispy morning;

4. The drink which enables a man to magnify his joy, and his happiness, and to forget, if only for a little while, life’s great tragedies, and heartaches, and sorrows;The reason I get up in the morning and the reason I pass out at night.Proof that God loves us and wants us to be happy.The cause of and solution to all life's problems!Its the fifth element after water, fire, earth and wind... Nothing exists without it!A magic potion used to make people of the opposite look bettera liquid form of carbohydrates that should be drank as a replacement for all other liquids, especially waterwhat men need to function dailyThe piss of angels.- After Bacon. it's the way of life
- The saver of old lonely men
- It even sounds cool..heh..heh.. Beer.a substance imbibed by males which, in time improves the appearance of ugly women and should be purchased more than makeup cuz it does a whole hell of a lot more for ya if yer really ugly than any makeup ever willA drink which makes you strong and clever.What you put in water bottles and bring to school.Vodka is a clear, colorless, unaged [liquor] "made from [ethyl alcohol] from agricultural origin". It was originally made in [Russia] from [potato]es, but today's vodka, which is almost odorless and tasteless, is usually made from [grain], primarily [barley] and [wheat], and occationally from [rye].

Vodka is integral to many [cocktail]s such as the [Screwdriver], [Bloody Mary] and Vodka [Martini]. If served straight, it should always be icy-cold.

Flavored vodkas have become popular in the [United States] and may be flavored with anything from [fruit]s to hot [pepper]s. Some flavored vodkas are even sweetened slightly.As a Russian who is experienced in the art of vodka consumption i feel obligated to provide the following information about vodka drinking.
A) Vodka should never ever under any circumstances be bought in a plastic bottle
B) Vodka should never be served ice-cold or even moderately could when straight. BUT!!!!! the shoot glass should be ice cold.
C) Just because you have a carton of Tropicana and a bottle of Smirnoff doesn't mean you can make a screwdriver. Screwdrivers never have any plump in them
D) When drinking vodka never sip it, or drink it slowly! This way of drinking vodka leads to loss of taste buds and a reeking smell.
E) Before taking a shot of vodka cheers must be said, then let out all the air you have in your lungs, drink and inhale at the same time.
F) NEVER EVER CHASE VODKA WTH BEAR
G) A good tactic for not getting sick while drinking vodka, is to supplement it with soda and some snacks.
H) Drinking vodka together with bear and champagne leads to short term memory loss.

facts
Vodka a 40% alcoholic drink. In theory it can be made out of anything, even wood or marijuana. The solution to this magnificent drink is extremely simple: a 2/5 ratio of alcohol and water. Non-mass produced vodka, which is available in most of Europe and Russia, is an expensive high quality drink, which went through as many as 8 stages of filtration and sold for more that 100$ a bottle.
Rarely it is mixed in to cocktails, such as vodka martini and the screw driver.
In the United States only commercial, mass produced vodka is available and has a number of flaws. A) it is not made in Russia, even if it is called Smirnoff of Stolichnaya, but New Jersey or in the best case scenario Sweden.
Best brand of Vodka are: VEDA and BELUGA BLACK, these two brands made Stoli and Absolute look like absolute shit!
Please drink responsibly and enjoy.Low cost and effective engine fuel, industrial solvent and poison. Some people also like to drink the stuff.quite strong alocolic liquid (40-60%).
not brewed, like wine, so it doesn`t taste like yeast. what most people will use to get [shitfaced]. To avoid death, it is adviced to mix the vodka with a non-alcohol liquid.Unfortunately it has become a pop culture joke. Most popular vodkas (smirnoff, absolut) are absolut shit and made in Sweden or Finland or something. Real and good vodka must be made in a slavic country. There is an ongoing argument with Poland and Russia over who created the drink. There is more evidence that says Poland coined the term vodka(wódka) for it and first started mass consumption of it. However, it was most likely created by persians or arabs. Slavic and also celtic people have the highest alcohol tolerances.A drink that can be either complete shit or damn fine. Has one of the most delicate tastes if properly filtered. Quartz filtered vodka recomended over a charcoal filterBasically, alcohol mixed with water. An alternative to just plain raw alcohol, invented by people who did not die like 4 seconds after drinking it (and apparently wanted more). Go to any spot in Russia you can buy it for like 50 kopeiks (2 cents) a bottle

Comes from the Russian word "water" (meaning that the Russians practically drink it as if it was water)Has 3 meanings:

1. Clear alcoholic beverage made from fermented grain or potatoes

2. Water in Russia, since most water found in russia that is not frozen is hazordous to your health and may be fatal

3. God in Russia, the Russian God, or, the God of the Russian people, or perhaps just the poor bums on the streets of RussiaWhen you have to hold on to the grass to keep from falling off the earth.A word defining a person who has had too much alcohol.  See also:  hammered, sloshed, shit-faced, tanked, blitzed, bombed, wrecked, three sheets to the wind, drunkened, loose, tipsy, defcon 1, well-done, trashed, jagged up, Irish, canned, smashed, fucked-up, intoxicated, inebriated, aniahalated, laced, (etc.)Chemically incovienencedA sublime way of existing in a world full of idiots.One's alter ego who is blamed for all things of a regrettable nature.The state you're in when you won't give two shits about what you say. You will be fucking uninhibited and won't give a shit what anyone thinks. You will be happy and motherfucking confident. You will be sippin dranks and feeling like a baller. Euphoria on a scale of 1 to 10: a motherfuckign 10................
So give it up to alcohol, bitches. this shit is legit, and deserves fucking respect, (that bottle of sailor jerrys was fucking good by the way)
Nigger. if you dont like alcohol, you can just kill yourself cause your iq is in the negatives!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!1. Past tense of "drink".
2. Your girlfriend's dad.
3. Spinning without moving.when you have to close one eye to keep people from splitting in two.Intoxicated with alcoholic liquor to the point of impairment of physical and mental faculties. 
Caused or influenced by intoxication.a state of being that one can only hope to constantly attainThe magic wand that can make a man dissappearaccident indicatorThe alternative to the orange.THE MOST BADASS FUCKING FRUIT ON THE FUCKING PLANET. SERIOUSLY, THIS MOTHERFUCKER KICKS THE SHIT OUT OF THE PUSSY ORANGE OR BANANA. THIS JUICY, RED MOTHERFUCKER IS THE BEST FUCKING THING THAT GOD HAS EVER CREATED. EAT AN A APPLE AND YOUR DICK WILL GROW 3 INCHES. FUCK.A horrendous company that has somehow managed to stay afloat for years and appeal to a mass of misguided people.  They specialize in taking existing technology, making it all shiny and fancy looking, and re-selling it for double the price.  Ironically, their slogan is "Think Different".

Their latest and greatest gadget that's getting all the attention is, of course, the iPhone, which is basically comparable to any high-quality $150 phone, except it has "innovative" touch screen technology, and it sells for $600.

Apple couldn't quite figure out how to make an operating system, so they just stole the freeBSD kernel and repackaged a bastardized version of it as Mac OS X.  It's funny that Apple brags that it's "Unix-based", since no one with experience in Unix would ever use a Mac.

Apple frequently runs "clever" ads.  Although they've made a ton of them, all the ads boil down to how Windows has viruses and crashes all the time.  Apple also have an enormous, cult-like fanbase that like to remind us of these things every five seconds.  Apple fanboys are generally smug, annoying, and arrogant, despite the fact that most of them don't know jack shit about computers.what the fuck are you looking at the definition of apples for you stupid fuck?The truly heinous name of Chris Martin and Gwenyth Paltrow's lovechild.The result of a mindblowing or humiliating situation in which the victim is posed one question:A greedy-ass company that makes a shit tone of money and over-prices their productsA manufacturer of computers, peripherials, and software with around a 3% share of the pc market. 
Most well-known products include:
imac
ipod
itunes
OS X
final cut pro
ibook

While their operating system's market share may be significantly below that of Microsoft's windows, many still prefer to use Apple's computers and software, especially for graphical design and audio work. 

Many people like to debate over the superiority of macs over pcs and visa versa, such people have no lives.A shortened version of [apples and pears], which is cockneyrhyming slang for stairs.Australian Slang for goodThe kind of guy most girls ACTUALLY want when they say they want a [Nice Guy].

Jerks are selfish, manipulative bastards who see women as little more then sexual conquests to brag about to their buddies or mere objects that are there for their personal pleasure. As to ensure the post-sex breakup will be in their favor, Jerks often play the "sensative guy" early on so the girl will make most of the moves on HIM, and after he's done with her and dumps her for some other girl just like her, he can make it look like she's at fault for coming on too strong, and consequently she'll take him back if he chooses to return for seconds.

Typically are/were [Frat Boy]s, [Jock]s, and [Prep]s in school.Noun. An [idiot] or stupid person. An insensitive, selfish, ignorant, cocky person who is inconsiderate and does stupid things.1.  Final stage of evolution of any male who spent at least one year dating in America, no matter his origin
2.  Mandatory mindset for self-survival within corporate America
3.  At this point of no return, group synonym for an elusive + cocky + self-confident + self-centered + loud + crazy male
4.  A guy that doesn’t give a flyin’ fuck about anything else but his handsome allure and annoying success.
5.  THE abusive attitude that will surely attract any girl’s love in America. For life
6.  A guy that enhances any girl’s low self-esteem and insecurity without meaning it. Then gets blamed for it.
7.  A guy that does not return any “I love you” s but keeps smiling at his girl’s face until she melts down and asks for more of that shit :)
8.  Every bitches’ openly discussed concern. Yet every bitches’ secret love.
9.  A challenge  aka any girl’s biggest turn-on.
10.  A bitch with a dick.1. A mean/heartless person.

2. More common: A guy who perfectly fits the gender stereotype, and is insensitive, controlling, and will treat women like sex objects. Though many women constantly complain about guys like that, most end up with one, because they didn't dig deeper and didn't try to see through the jerk's crap. Instead of going for a [nice guy] who will obviously be there for a girl, most girls choose what's right in front of them, a cold-hearted bastard who happens to look "macho", who is a big-time flirt and wears his penis on his sleeve.An alternative to dating.A very powerful word to call someone... Unlike the f-word, "jerk" doesn't lose it's power the more you say it.A person you really love that just doesn't see how much you care for them, and yet, every so often actually treats you good, only to then act completely different from who they were when you first met them.In medival Europe,masturbation was considered to be on the brink of insanity. So as an insult, people would call each other "jerk-offs", and soon, jerk was enough to get the point across.The man all girls are attracted to.A person who does not use their turn signal.(uh-nak-ruh-niz-uhm)

From Middle Greek anachronismo, the word Anachronism refers to an event, person, object or custom that is chronologically out of place. It can also be an error in chronology, in which a person, object, event, etc., is assigned a date or period other than the correct one.out of place or at the wrong timeAn object or event that is seemingly out of place in time.out of the proper time.A hospital you never ever want to be admitted to. We all have that one wacko job for a relative or friend. Multiply that by like 300 and stick them all in a tiny room painted baby blue and make them talk about the issues they have and watch them go. It's like playing a game of stick the yellow shapes in the right spots and wait for the red box to explode and blow pieces everywhere. If you live near one I suggest you move because the crazy ass-holes break out the glass and run free. Then it is like playing a game of "Where's Weirdo". I worked at one and I will say that I could not wait to get to work. There was never a dull moment. If you love caos and mayhem you really should consider a career at the nut house.1. Sci-fi movie/book about a retro-ish gang leader who after beating people up, raping, stealing, etc, is taken to prison where he later is chosen to participate in a "special treatment" program to "cure" him.

2. Also, a term used in the CWO book to describe a person who is perfectly moral, nonviolent, etc; but has no free will.A object (or person in the case of the movie) which appears normal on the outside but is completely artificial on the inside.someone who appears normal to the eye and holds the colors of life (orange), but is really a tool for someone or something else (clockwork)A clockwork orange comes from an old London saying "queer as a clockwork orange". A clockwork orange is actually a wind up doll that is controlled by both god and the devil. Anthony Burgess uses this for his book to symbolize the government almost brainwashing Alex in order to control his bad behavior.A novel which came out BEFORE the movie, commonly fooling idiots. Learn to read.Oddest, most kickass movie. 
Alex is a stud.one of the best damn movies everThe orbital subway around Glasgow. So named due to it's circular route and orange subway trains. Also famous for it's central role in The [Glasgow Subcrawl].Person who has no free will, is a victim of a cruel psyhological therapy (A Clockwork Orange), or a person who is unable to make it's own choices between good and bad1.Original a from slang (from a part of London) that means a homosexual.
2.A novel by Anthony Brugess.  The novel was based somewhat on his life, such as one of the rape scenes.  The novel was about  totalirism and the good and evil of humans.
3.An amazing movie based on Anthony Burgess' Novel.  The director banned the film himself due to it's 'ultra violent' nature.Judgment (American English); judgement (British English)1. Judgement occurs when the judgee is struck with; either "the stick of judgement" (1 - 4) or with "the ball of judgement", both currently in use in Devon, UK.

2.  The act of vigilante violence.The collective term for a group of [hipsters].What is considered justA clan of fags lead by 2 old people who no one like except for the fags who join it.The Pirate is an oft misunderstood individual who can be seen absolutely pwning everyone around him/her. Well versed in the arts of cheekiness, deceit, extortion(sp), theft, blackmail, smarmery, and crazy acrobatic sword and or knife fighting. The  pirate always lands on his feet, and always wins, even when you think not. naturally hates the ninja, as ninjas are overated far too serious for their own good. 
the most 31337 p1r4735 sometimes join the ranks of the mysterious Shadow Pirates.1. One who drinks rum, get angry, and stab things.
2. A sailing criminal who, sails on a ship, steals from other ships, lives without any law:only a set of morals, survives on goods stolen from other ships/ports.When a woman is giving you head pull out before ejaculation and blow your load in her eye. Then kick her in the shin. After completing those 2 tasks you have gave a women the pirate.Pirates are a sea fearing folk, oft to be seen pilaging, raping, murdering, or commiting other acts of piracy. They usually own a monkey, parrot, or sexy wench.The coolest motherfucking people to ever exist.1. n. Arch rival of the [ninja].
2. n. Devotee of the [Flying Spaghetti Monster].1. Always land on their feet
2. have cool eye patches ... even if they have both eyes
3. have dice
4. have guns
5. pirates are not ordinary humans so they can kill ninjas!
6. have cool ships
7. have better swords then ninjas
8. are all around better then ninjas
9. have a lot of movies about them (way more then ninjas)
10. wear red on thursdays
11. have graduated from Pyro Pirate Academy of One-Eyed Peter!
12. polish their peg legs
13. say thinds like scally-wagger and scurvy-chap
14. Arrrrr! need i say more
15. pack a mean punch
16. always have the best snacks
17. will make you walk the plank if your not as cool as them
18. start all the major fashion trends
19. don't go crying to their mommies ... like ninjas
20. know how to handle a lady
21. knows how to DAG people better then ninjas
22. have pretty cool boots
23. get all the tasty rum
24. have pretty good cursive
25. have more extended vocabualary then ninjas
26. are absolutley amazing!!!
ARRRR!The name given to the coolest dudes to ever sail the seven seas. They have cool boats, cool planks and cool wooden legs. Parrots are also optional. Their main duties include searching far and wide for, "pluder," or, "bling," as it would now be known.The holy being in the religion of Pastafarianism. Often prayed to by followers of the Flying Spaghetti Monster. R'amen.Better than ninjasa small sexy piece of underwear that girls wear and it attracts men. When a girl bends over, it tends to show out from under her jeans or hipsters. Men love them.By far one of the best forms of underwear.  It is small, with strings going around the hips, a small piece of cloth in the back, and cloth in the front.  Many girls wear them, useful in preventing "Panty Lines" from coming through when they wear tight pants.  Also, a huge turnon for guys when girls bend over, and they pop up about the pants.What comes out when someone with a lisp tries to say the word "song"1.underwear that makes guys horny when they see the strings pulled up and the cheeks of an ass when a girl wheres a dress on a windy day
2. Panties that girls where so that they leave a less distinct pantyline so they dont look like there wearing grandma panties in booty shorts1). A peice of lingerie that goes up your ass. Comfortable. Most would disagree, but some say it is comfy, like me.

2). A sandle or flip flop worn in Summer.Retro Definition: Rubber, slip-on sandals (a.k.a. 'flip-flops' or 'jap-flaps'), usually worn for water activities. This definition has been provided as a Public Service Announcement.Thongs are a type of footwear, also known as 'Flip-Flops'. Not to be mistaken with the sexy [thong] garment of underwear.Australian for cheap rubber footwear, known as [flip flops]or [jandles] in New zealand, dunno what yanks call them.A perpetual wedgie.the word used in Australia, to define flip flops.an occupation that involves taking (stripping) one's clothes off for the sexual stimulation of others. most strippers are female.A girl that guys are dumb enough pay $20 for a 5 minute dry hump.  She swoons at his ridiculous pickup lines and laughs at his stupid jokes to make him think he's getting somewhere with her, so he continues to fork out the money in hopes of impressing her to the point that he'll get more than just a case of blue balls and an experience to jack off to before going to bed that night.  But after giving her the last of his money, she tells him she'll be right back.  After several minutes he realizes she isn't coming back, so he leaves the club disappointed and flat broke, and as he's leaving, he sees her grindin her ass into some other dumb bastard's lap.A stupid bitch who got pregnant when she was a teenager by a losser and now gets naked for dollars to support her bastard childSomebody (usually a woman) who uses provocative dance whilst dis-robing to extract money from sad, sex-starves letches.A woman who seeks to relive her chaotic childhood experience by disrobing and rubbing her snatch on a brass pole in front of men that care for her like her father did.woman with a hot body that is really dead inside. they give u pleasure without sex and take all ur cash. if u make a move on her, her big black bitches will beat the shit out of you and take all ur moneyThe official occupation of a  [single mother],  or any struggling woman trying to make  [ends]  meet1.  A person who takes off their clothes and dances around to make money.
2.  A peeler or ripperFlashy, showy. An item or person who, superficially, appears better than they actually are.
Deliberately trying to look good but lacking substance(unlike [spongey]) 
In the case of people, usually accompanied by an arrogant or over-confident sense of self-absorbtion.An individual; male or female, with the athletic prowess of a jungle cat and the tits (or balls) enough to take off their clothes and dance around butt naked in front of a crowd of people for tips. These people are adept in the art of flirting, fantasy creation and erotic dance. Not a profession for the weak willed or faint of heart, it is an art not understood by many and thus often disrespected.prostitute. started in the civil war When Gen.Hooker of the Union Army (the first [pimp]) tried to protect his troops from VD by buying the best chicks and pimping them to his corps of 20,000 men. orginally hooker's girls.A not-so-rare breed of female that is overtly loose between the legs.  Much like dinosaurs, these creatures cannot see anything unless it moves.

Sometimes called "street t-rex"1. A source of pleasure, mainly sex, bt only if payed.
2. Target practice.The "new" cool. Sort of like kool, kewl, wet, or badass. This word can be used to replace cool to make your sentences all the better!Term used to describe a type of female that is:

- Easy to [bang]
- Takes money for sex
- Disappointed male does not get anyA woman who is wise above others in the art of sexual satisfaction and [love].  In ancient times, these women were considered to be priestesses and were given their own temples where they could teach their art to others for a large sum of money.   These women were highly respected and cherished for their extensive knowledge of lovemaking/giving, and their spiritual understanding.  

Later, the christian religion would have a great negative effect on these women's lives, mostly because the spiritual beliefs of these cunt-lovin' cultures were pagan (a big no-no to chiristianity).   as christianity spread, people started to see sex as a sin, and the priestesses were slowly blacklisted.  today, this christian idea of sex as a sin still stands, and hookers are now considered criminals.A woman (usu) who receives money for chugging the snotty end of a piss pump until the "john's" fuck stick blows a bileous ball bilge bolis of throat yogurt down the back of her crack smoking gullet.A [prostitute]. Usually, prostitutes are females, but plenty of prositutes are males.

Hookers sell their bodies to a variety of people, from unassuming men to really freaky characters. Just imagine having sex with half a dozen strange men each day for money: it's not a pleasant thought.

And prostitutes don't have sex for money because they like it; it's about the money. They might often hate their line of work, but they have no other way out.

Hookers range from the [chic] [call girl], who is higher class and has control over the situation, to the lowly [streetwalker], who is vulnerable to attack or police entrapment.

And remember: use a [condom] if you're with a prostitute, unless you want [clamydia], [gonorrhea], [herpes], [AIDS], [hepatitis], [syphilis], or other *charming* diseases.A sexy woman who fucks men who need to be fucked. A woman who gives pleasure to desperate males like me when In need of pussy.Slang,What you might call a close friend. used like the word buddy or pal.not the traditional definition. OR, a reference to girls or women that might, or might not be actual women for hire.What i always call my friend Bill X when i see him, and he responds in the same fashion.1.Actual bowling, with 10 pins and 1 ball.
2. Masturbating, with 2 balls and 1 pin.Simply a codeword for smoking Cannabis to be used around non-users1. Noun; The sport in which you throw a bowling ball at pins.
2. Verb; usually means to smoke weed (hints the word "bowl"ing)When engaging in sexual intercourse, in the doggy style position, place your middle finger and ring finger in the females anal sphincter and your thumb in her vagina and grip vigorously like it's a bowling ball while you pump and thrust.Same rules as bowling except instead of knocking down pins each player must cash a bowl.
Strike = One hit to cash the bowl
Spare = Two hits to cash the bowl
Gutter Ball = A person Volcano's or drops the pins (danks)When a female rubs her breast against another females vagina in an up and down motion which can lead to orgasm.Filling all three of a woman's holes during the act of sexual intercourse, as if she was a bowling ball.  This can be done by three men, or by one man using the penis and hands (a modified [shocker]) or by one man taking turns at each hole.throwing an oversized, [extremely] heavy, painted coconut at pinsThe act of sticking you thumb in a womans ass while hitting it from the back, holding her ass such as a bowling ball.The act of transferring a joint roach into a bowl to finish it off.Someone who frequently dates girls that other guys have thrown out like trash.  Usually goes for girls that are getting over a bad breakup.bench player, who has the primary quality of burning minutes and chipping in the occassional goal.

Term mostly used in hockey, but can also be used in basketball or baseball.individual(s) who pick up your trash.  If left out on a certain day each week.1) someone who picks up girls who have recently split from their partners. Regarded as a [twat] by all those around him.
2) Someone who picks up a lot of points from rebounds in American Sports.A guy who constantly picks up, or takes out, horrifically trashy women."Who can take the trash and the twisty things too? 

--- The garbage man can, the garbage man can!"The process of which a man shits inside a girls vagina then fucks her. This could be used instead of lube.When you see someone hitting on a person and it falls through so that person continues to hit on someone else until they succeed. It can also be a person that is a last resort.A garbageman is a man with a massive package, and he flaunts it, by wearing tight shorts, undies, kilts, etc.
He WILL place his 'junk' on you, if he feels aroused and/or threatened.  Typically used in homosexual/incestual type situationsA sex move during which a man penetrates a woman who is in the process of vomiting.  Ideally, pelvic thrusts will coincide with gastric contractions.The black man's 747.A special mode of transportation of asorted goods and persons. Involving large vehicles claimed to be 'busses' which are secretly cheaply created allein space-crafts bringing the opeouts to the masses.Very short skirt, only an inch from the *hare*.Best pets every! there lazy and dont move most of the time... but will get up every one and awhile to greet you1. A large bus, derived from the company greyhound. Commonly used to transport those who cannot afford faster, more efficient or more luxurious transportation.

2. An alcoholic beverage mixing gin, and grapefruit juice.Racing dog.

A bus that goes state to state.The Runaway's method of running awayTo fatally injure by decapitation with a hunting knife.For people unable to afford quicker and more efficient methods of transportation.

A wonderful way to see the worst parts of many cities across the country.1. A hot, older man aged 56 yo and up a dilf. 2. The final step in the dilf/hound dog continuum.Short for [Warped Tour]. A punk rock concert tour that occurs every summer. It usualy has around 6 stages and near or more than 50 bands. The Warped Tour is sponsered by Vans and has been running for just over 10 years.To be convoluted, twisted, rippled or distorted.when a person gets so crazy high that they begin to see things with a distorted appearance, as if they are warped.

usually affective after smoking very chronic weed or getting hella fucked up from anything else.Cool or funny in a weird way.1. something that is so insanely cool
2. unbelieveableAfter you have smoked a lot of marajuana, u feel in the zone, (the place where you want to be)and altered

(another meaning for stoned,baked,blazed)1)getting high.2)severly underrated red hot chili peppers songAnother way of saying WTFOne sexy biatch, Constantly harrased by Flea, Moxin and Subotai for sexual favors but they're below Warped and not in his his league.When a person gets so [seshed] they start to lose touch with reality.  Almost a high sensation.

See [sesh].The act of vomiting, hurling, barfing, losing lunch, tossing cookies, ralfing, throwing up, yacking, retching, technicolour yawning, spewing, blowing chunks, and/or other forms of physical illness.What happened that time in seventh grade when you walked in on your parents.Slang meaning to vomit.  The word 'puke' is sometimes considered offensive.1. the act of vomiting
2. vomit itself

See also [word]mag[/word]to pour acidic vomit from you stomach out your face.to vomitFilipino term for vagina or pussy; the hole between the legs of a woman where the penis goes in and out until ejaculation occurs; (pronounced as "pooh - key")Tagalog for female genitalsExtremely annoyingThe act of or the action of relieving your stomach contents in a matter of bile, food, or other stomach contents is projected from the stomach to the esophagus out of the mouth. Also known as throwing up.Indifference; to be used when one simply does not care."The verbal equivalent of a shrug of the shoulders." -quoth meused in the greatest tv show of all time [The Simpsons]. in the episode Hungry, Hungry Homer, bart and lisa respond to a homer inquiry with "meh". mystery solvedMeh is used to describe any and every word possible, including:
Yes
No
maybe
kind of
never
always
ok
alright
no thankyou
yes please
look bitch i really dont care so just shut the fuck up
if you want
whatever
If you wnat
i dont want to really
well
shut up
i dont really care
no honestly, i dont care...

...and is never explained on which is actually used...An interjection used to imply indifference towards a subject; "a verbal shrug".  This particular interjection has somehow become quite popular among teens, the reason for this popularity is a mystery.  Other popular interjections are "bleh", "dah", and "mih".  Usu. pronounced shortly, without eye contact or body movement.This is a universal, non-commital answer to every question ever posed. Its the answer that deosn't actually give any answer.A random word when people either don't know what to say, don't care, can't answer a question or are too drunk to form a coherent english phrase.Indifference, or I do not care, also whateverAn expression of [apathy].Meh is used to say whatever, I don't care, I don't have an answer, I have nothing else to say, I'm frustrated, not interested or your joke isn't funny.The only thing that's fun to do anymore.An escape from life, like (see [weed]).  When you get back, the problems of life hit you in the face like a brick.The only thing that brings me joy.computerized games involving many gernes of typesa form of entertainment that is composed of any type of game put into a digital image on a screen and is operated by the player through means of a control connected to a form of a console 

commonly a scapegoat for politicians and crappy parents 

my hobbyThe target of every [Soccer mom], [politician], and [feminist] who (1) has never played a videogame in her life, (2) doesn't know how to discipline her kid, thanks to all the time she spent marrying and divorcing 4 or 5 times, and (3) is looking for an easy [scapegoat] for her incompetence.3D or 2D virtual games that can waste your time for good and fun.One of the best forms of entertainment.a true test of skill, unless you have it on fuckin easy you nerd!A program that is more than a form of entertainment. It offers us an escape from the dullness of reality, a place where we can do things we actually can't.passing a homeless person on your way to a [coin star] machine.a word used by prude or unattractive girls in situation in which they feel weirded out by the presence of a confident young guy trying to make conversationhaving your flat mate walk in on you while you are making out with yourself in the mirror, moaning, and saying in a deep, sexy, voice: "oh, baby".1. Ungraceful; ungainly.
2. Clumsily or unskillfully performed.
3. Marked by or causing embarrassment or discomfort.When two pedophiles meet up after chatting as 15 year olds online.A common word overused by kids in junior high, almost in the same group with "LOL" and "random!". Used to try and impress your preteen friends after or during a long pause between conversations. Also used by idiots whenever there is a pause in speech. Sometimes accompanied by a hand motion resembling a turtle or a turkey.Interjection used in a situation that is slightly uncomfortable, often accompanied by a gesture where the lower arm is thrust out parallel to the ground with the hand open and fingers together with thumb on top.Interjection used in a situation that is slightly uncomfortable, often accompanied by a virety of gestures: 1. Pulling the collar with one finger (this represents the sweat collecting under the collar from the AWKWARD situation) 2. Arms form a triangle over the head (such as the A in YMCA) 3. One finger pointing at the back of the other hands wrist 4. Pointing at the back of the neckA comment made by a third party in response to someone saying something inappropriate or embarrasing themselves in some way, thus causing an awkward silence for several seconds.

Saying "awkard" is often a remark deliberately aimed at stating the obvious to make the situation just that little bit more cringe-worthy.

for related topic please see [ground swallow me up], [dig a hole] and [keep digging]A situation which is of a significant amount of discomfort, and a subject of hilarity and confusion for those not involved.Round objects dangling in a scrotum. Only men have testicles. Women love to kick, knee, squeeze, or otherwise abuse them. When struck, testicles cause extreme pain.A word you say when there is awkward silence in a room with three or more people.1. Two walnut-sized coils of tubing inside the [scrotum] containing the reproductive fluid of a male, [semen]. 

2. An ancient greek hero.Testicles or testes are the pair of male glands that produce sperm fluid; the tiny sperm in the fluid each contain half the 'information' required to produce another being of the same species. The other half is provided by the egg that is produced in the female equivalent glands called ovaries. When sperm is spurted into the female via the penis and has travelled through the cervix into the womb, the thousands of sperm surround the 'waiting' egg and when one sperm is successful in piercing the egg, the egg, which is hundreds of times larger than the sperm, then prevents further sperm from doing so. The egg is then "fertilized" and eventually grows into a new being of the same species.

The testicles also produce a hormone called testosterone; this hormone in large doses is what makes a being grow into a male. Thus testicles are what makes a male a male!

Unfortunately for mammals, the testicles have to be on the outside of the body so that they do not get too warm. They are composed of tiny tubes or sperm ducts where the sperm are produced; these tubes are coiled up like very thin coils of spaghetti and are contained within an outer cover attached to the body by a thicker tube (the testicle or sperm chord). This chord has a thin walled swelling at the testicle end called the “Epididymis” and this is protected by being at the back of the testicle. This swelling is very important because it is where the sperm is stored and reaches full maturity after being produced in the sperm ducts or tubes. Both the testicles are contained in a special skin bag called the scrotum that adjusts to keep the testicles at the right temperature; closer to the body in cold external temperatures and further from the body in warm external temperatures.

Because they are delicate, testicles have many nerve endings and these are made to cause pain if struck or put under pressure so that the owner will take care not to damage them. This pain is extreme and is not solely confined to the testicles and even a fairly moderate blow can cause debilitation by causing the owner to go into shock; a very hard blow can not only rupture the testicle, but can cause so much shock that the owner dies.

Human nature being what it is, testicles are very often the subject of torture to force a man to tell all he knows as in almost all cases, no man can withstand the pain caused.

Women also find testicles a welcome vulnerability in an otherwise much stronger assailant in self-defence; the famous kick in the balls is a great equalizer.

Additionally, because testicles, along with the penis, are an observable difference in the sexes and because they are what make a man a man, they are often the target (both mental and real!) of female hate (and revenge!) for making men “the way they are”!The Fountains of Cum. Where all the [cum] cums from. Ladies: love'em, tickle'em, lick'em but just don't squeeze'em!A greek philosopher from 348 BCE, worked along Socrates.
His name is pronounced (pronounced Test-uh-cleez)The symbol of manhood. They are what makes a man a man.you gotta be fucking kidding me... looking up testicles in the urban dictionary??1. What no one would be here without.
2. Source of extra muscle, adrenaline, and power.
3. What makes feminists hypocritical.The two [round[ [balls] in the sack under the mans '[shaft]'.a streatchy strapless top for woman that is one of the hottest, sexyest most gorgious femane articles of clothing ever invented. they look amazing on the right girls but when worn by the rong girl it's just plain creepy!a person who is consistently a bad time; a bummera strapless, cylindrical top.Euphemism for someone who drops a huge, usually long, piece of shit. As a lumberjack lays logs, this person laid their log into the toilet.The lumberjack is an exciting sexual maneuver which should be only attempted by professionals.  

In this case, the woman is on all fours and the man enters her from behind (see "doggie style").  Hole choice is completely up to the lumberjack himself.  When he is ready to cum, he yells "TIMmmBERRRrrrr" and takes out the woman's arms with a svelte swooping motion.  The woman then, like a tree, falls to the bed.  During the fall, the woman experiences excitement as well as fear during her zero gravity experience as she realizes impact is imminent.  This leads to the tightening of her vaginal and anal cavities, yielding an astonishing feeling and hence orgasm for the lumberjack.

Extra points can be scored on this maneuver by the close and careful placement of the woman in relation to the headboard.  When the woman's arms are taken out, her head slams into the headboard.  Very fun!The man who singsA girl that is so disgusting, that she makes you lose a boner. she "cuts down your wood".Lumberjacks are the second most awesome people group, after [Pirates], and before [Ninjas].  

Real Lumberjacks have an ax and existed long ago and wear flannel, suspenders, and pants.  They have hairy faces and kick ass.  They will cut down any forest easy, because they are awesome.  

Fake Lumberjacks are the modern day lumberjacks who wear bright orange and they use chainsaws because they are too weak to use an ax.  They also eat lots of flapjacks.  Sing and breakdance.

The most awesome lumberjack ever was Paul Bunyan, he was kickass.  
A lumberjack's ax is NOT spelled with an e like "axe".  Only norsemen had axes.A gentleman who earns his living by felling trees. We all owe him a debt of gratitude for providing the material for our homes and furniture. This gentleman is soundly hated by the [environmentalist] who lives in a timber house.A red and black flanel jacket, coat, or shirt popular in the 80s and 90s.  Actual lumberjacks wear these often.To fuck over an entire fanbase by writing, producing, and airing a television series finale episode so poor that even a union of hookers think it sucks more than they do. Named after the surprise regarding protagonist Dexter Morgan's fate at the end of the series finale of television show [Dexter].Term used to describe a chick that gives a lot of handjobs...(hand ho). One who "jacks lumber" (Gives hand jobs)A sexual act involving 2 men and 1 woman with large, floppy breasts. The woman lays on her back, while each man slides his penis under a breast from each side. To avoid touching each other in the middle, the men coordinate going back and forth, like 2 lumberjacks sawing down a tree.

May also be referred to as a "See-saw"Someone who will tell you that religion is science and science is a religion.Polite way of saying "dumbass".A person who believes that the biblical account of Genesis is a literal, scientific document, and that all scientific knowledge of evolution and geology are mistaken and/or misrepresented by biased scientists. According to Creationists, the world was created in 6 days some 4 to 6 thousand years ago, God placed fossils into various depths of the Earth for no apparent reason (or that, since fossils are so rare, not all co-existing animals were fossilized together) all species where created individually (with allowance for individual variation and common design themes, but no common anscestry), that all life was harmonious before the fall of man (hence carnivores ate grass), that dinosaurs (which are said to be referred to in the bible as "leviathan" and "behemoth" and are supposedly represented in ancient art) lived at the same time as humans, and that they were whiped out in the biblical flood because they couldn't fit into Noah's Ark (or that he only fit the small ones, in which case some dinosaurs might be alive today). 

To promote these views, creationists often misrepresent the data themselves, in an effort to discredit science and abuse it to validate their own beliefs. Hence, they are extremely critical of any and all (overwhelming) evidence that does not support their views while using bogus or equivocal data to prove theirs. 

This doesn't work. 

Any close, unbiased examination of the evidence reveals that nearly all of the creationist's claims are found wanting. I will not list those reasons here but will instead include a few links below.

Creatonists aim to keep the American public ignorant of evolution and science (which they have done a pretty good job of doing, as recent polls suggest) and desire that creation be taught in public schools along with evolution. 

This would be about as ridiculous as teaching two different versions of the Holocaust in history classes (as some people claim that it never happened, and can back up this claim with phony evidence) or teaching an alternate flat earth theory (which another society can find "evidence" for) in geography. 

That is not to say that there isn't a place for Genesis in the sphere of public education, but that would most likely be in courses involving theology, religion, culture, anthropology, and philosophy. 

The moral here, of course, is that one shouldn't look to science to back up theology and vice versa.

Here are some links to learn the truth and why "creation scientists" are wrong (the links themselves can't be included because this site can't have words with more than 50 characters--wtf??). Go to a search engine and type in:

www.talkorigins.org

And perhaps Karl Thornley's page on Theistic Evolution for a few more good links.Mindless cretin who thinks that "Goddidit!"a person who believes, despite overwhelming evidence to the contrary, that every single word in the good book is 100 percent factual.  They tend to exhibit outward signs of basic intelligence and know a lot of big words, occasionally even well educated, but have the general intelligence of a shoe.  See also : brainwashed.One that thinks that hundreds of different scientist who all came to the same conclusionregarding the creation of the human species must be wrong because the Bible says so.  They tend to try and have scientific truth banned from their childrens' schools.An ignorant person who feels that the bible must be taken litteraly and any science that contradics what their book says (despite the fact there are different translations of the bible pointing to different things) is wrong. That would be all of science by the way. There is no science at all to suport their ignorant and idiotic claims.
 A creationist will not accept the theory of evolution, despite it being fundemental to modern biology & genetics, and do not understand what theory means in scientific literature. They realy dont like this theory at all. 
 They normaly try to discrace 'evolutionists' and often attempt to imply that science can only be science if it is looked at from a religious perspective when quite the opposite is true. They accept a point and then ty and prove it, the opposite of the scientific method.
 Finaly most know nothing about science and simply follow their faith. Many creationist leaders give themselves the title of Dr. Nearly all of these 'doctors' aquired their degrees from uncredited degree mills.

See www.talkorigins.com for a refutal of creationist claims.A person who thinks he/she knows more about science than an actual scientist.Synonymous with [idiot]often used to describe something stupid or unfortunate; can replace the common slang word "gay"Hatred of women. Often rewarded by a slap in the face.In reference to the city, let's just say that you know you're from there if any of the following apply to you:Power that comes form diversity.... Pride that comes from making it to the top....The greatest Fucking city in the world.Where my heart will always be no matter where I go.  

New York = Home1. The 11th state to join the union.
2. Also refers to NYC, or as most ignorant people think- Manhattan. (Oh, yeah, there's also The Bronx, Brooklyn, Queens and Staten Island)The Empire State where the greatest city and the capital of the world dwells. NYC or the five boroughs of south NY. The 1st capital of the country from 1785-1790. Home of Broadway theatre, home of the best pizza(NY style) in the world, home of the best franks(Nathans and Papiaya)in the world, also the place where the term 'Hot Dog' was coined, birth place of the potato chip(Saratoga ,NY),the media capital of the world, business capital of the world, largest department store in the world(Macy's 34th st.),Birth place of Hip Hop culture, one of the fashion capital of the world, home of the largest and greatest subway system in the world along with the 1st in the country. And home of the greatest and most successful team in sports(NY Yankees).best bagels, best pizza, best italian food period, best places to shop, its awesome.. u can go out east on LI or manhattan or upstate NY. new york is a great place to live. 

oh yeah and upstate is part of new york u idiot. if u wanna talk about the city say NYC. i'm sure upstate NY people write NY on their mail. you can't argue that or you're just dumb.I am from New York. I curse a lot. I say mad instead of wicked. I like the YANKEES. I know what REAL pizza tastes like, and I know that a bagel is much more than a roll with a hole in the middle. They're sprinkles...not jimmies. I play BEER PONG not beirut. I judge people by what exit they get off the highway. It's not called the shore, it's the BEACH. Its a wedge or a sub NOT a hoagie! It's not New York City or Manhattan, it's 'THE' CITY. Two words...MOTHER FUCKER. I know that 55 mph really means 85. When someone cuts me off, they get the horn AND the finger."Basically the greatest state in the entire country...better yet, the world.  New Yorkers are also the best people around.  Sure, we can be arrogant and yes, from time to time we're prissy bitches.  But NOTHING is finer than a New York girl...or the taste of REAL pizza and bagels.  We're the only state that you can say "The City" and know you're referring to NYC.  We have the best shopping, the best Christmas Tree, the best Parades...oh right and the best baseball team that ever existed and I'm NOT talking about the Mets.  All in all, New York rapes your state by being better in EVERY way imaginable.  I <3 NY.To the general public:
A large city on the United State's east coast

To the people who live there:
The center of the universeYour current boss.someone being arrogant, rude, obnoxious, or just a total dickhead....Your [butt] hole. Were your [shit] comes out.A person in another car who cuts you off to get to the next lane, almost hits you while talking on the phone.An obnoxious, arrogant, self-centered male who women can't seem to get enough of.Anyone who doesn't do exactly what you think they ought to do, exactly when you think they ought to do it.The worst kind of person.  You cannot fully construct a meaning that fully encompasses what this vicious insult means.  If you're an asshole, you are disgusting, loathesome, vile, distasteful, wrathful, belligerent, agoraphobic, and more.  Assholes are human fecal matter.  They are the lowest of the low.  They transcend all forms of immorality.  It is the very worst of insults; to be called an asshole is to have your very soul ripped apart and shat on.  I say that the word "asshole" is the worst cussword of the english language, worst than fuck, shit, and cunt combined.A grave in which to place a Donkey.An alternate word for aviator-style sunglasses with very dark or mirrored lenses.

While assholes are worn by people from all walks of life, these are the primary wearers: [pigs], pretty much everyone in the movie [Top Gun] (chicks included), obese motorcyclists, [rent-a-cop]s, yacht owners, hipsters, construction workers, and aging retirees who like to fish and drink watery American piss-beer.

Assholes may also worn by non-assholes for the ironic effect.1. A person who you feel needs to have the fuck beaten out of him
2. This dipshit I know named AlbertAn exceedingly large penis belonging to an opinionated man.A natural leader of men. Women want him and men want to be him. He drives a tank with three wind shield wipers. He commands an army of troops and often takes them on field trips for r. and r. He receives many perks from the civilian population such as a third free entree from applebees when he purchases the 2 for $20 meal deal. He is currently training troops in Orlando Florida.A Military rank for an Officer usualy below general and above Lieutenant Colonel, Major, Captain, and Lieutenant.Kentucky Fried Chicken or KFC [fast food] joint; after its deceased [mascot], Col. Harlan SandersAn [idiot] who lives for [slow pitch] [softball]. Plays [catcher]. Thinks he's [Batman]. Likes to give shit, doesn't like to get shit. Has an excuse for anything that doesn't go his way, yet will give you reasons why you can't do the same thing. Picks fights and then resorts to "I'll sue your ass" if you call him on it. Basically a 5 year old [spoiled child].1.Military rank

2.A characters from the video game Mega Man X4.
  Has a sister called Iris. He is working with Repliforce
  and later dies during the rebellion.
  Some people believe Iris and Colonel were the same person    
and got split into 2 : THIS IS NONSENSE AND BS.A shitty baseball teamname of the un popped pieces of corn at the bottom of a pop corn bowl.a short stalky man that is balding with comb over, stutters and says um constantly, very strict and continues to create problems with the cadets.  talks for hours on end and bores the students to sleep, treats the kids like they have not a clue in the world about whats going on and how they could do anything in the world to change a thing...A stocky man of medium height, very solid build, tends to draw himself up to full height when excited, or early in the mornings. Very poor sense of balance, becomes ill and vomits easily, especially when being talked to. Very popular, especially among ladies, talks to anyone. Enjoys the occasional flap in the wind. Cousin to [Princess Sophie].Believing that the group one belongs to, be it of sex, creed, or color, is automatically superior to another's.One who believes that their gender, group, or kind is superior to others.1. A British [chav] - a white urban Brit who enjoys picking fights with strangers and acting tough. Chav is a shortened version of the term and is used much more often.

2. A [jingoist] - a person who is fiercely nationalistic and will side with their country no matter what - right or wrong - and call anyone who disagrees with them a traitor. Common in parts of the UK and in the Southern and Midwestern US.

3. A [male chauvinist] - a man who treats women as inferior or considers men better than women. A [sexist]. Common in fundamentalist [Christian] and [Islamic] cultures.A usually male jerk who feel he is superior because he has a penis. Although many of us know that it is just them compensating because they have no penis, they may also compensate with a car their parents bought them. Typically, they have no standards, will have sex with just about anyone, and they are also CHEATERS.someone who tends to stay up late into the nightSomeone who stays up late and sleeps in the day.A girl you sleep with that you don't want your friends to know about. Typically some easy girl you meet at a bar or party that is willing to sleep with you A.S.A.P.A meth user that stays on the pourch all night at a the meth house, watching everything, usually a paranoid tweaker.Suffix added to any noun to describe the biggest/baddest/meanest/nastiest of its type. Dervied from Godzilla, Japan's national hero, 60's movie star, and general all around badass.A person (or gaming nerd) who has a complex about his/her status and image when playing Computer Games.

He / She doesn't like losing and will come up with all sorts of excuses.

It's what defines the person's life as he/she doesn't really have one and therefore they will vigorously defend their status so they are not seen as a 'noob' online.adj.; when used as a suffix for a proper name or specific entity, becomes part of that noun.

Derived from [Godzilla], the gargantuan reptilian star of Japanese "B" horror [movie] genre. Introduced in 1954 as "Gojira", Godzilla is the embodiment of all that is massive, destructive, and extremely difficult to defeat. Ergo, "'zilla" in both the stand-alone adjective and suffix forms represents those same charecteristics. Linguistically, the "z-l" [combo] has stronger audiological [punch] than "j-r", thus giving "'zilla" more connotative [power] than "'jira".Derived from Godzilla, it could be another word for "monster", or just the meanest, baddest thing of any type of person or animalreal biganother term of monster, basically, it come from godzilla, but now, zilla it self trend to means any type of monster, like kingkong, godzilla,dinosaur,Jaws..etca suffix which can be used on pretty much any word.  

(1) a suffix personifying the root word

(2) just a suffix used to make a word more intense (read: retarded)The ultimate compliment known to man and the highest achievement the common man can achieve. Closely followed by a Nobel Prize.1. a type of vann
2. a sooners fan
3. a chokeran individual who displays many animilastic qualities; stems from the species velocirapter, which was known for its rather savage dispositionA girl who gets around the block mostly from drunk hook ups and one night stands and has a ton miles. Pretty much the last resort for a dude just lookin for a nut. Also known as a one hitter quitter.something that is radical, cool, or otherwise awesome. something that is snow is generally the shit, being top score, bitchin, etc. the word is derived from the fact that snow is generally off the hook in its beauty, power, and pimperyCoke, cocaine. Used primarily by huffing through the nostrils snow can also be freebased and inhaled.1.  Frozen [precipitation] that is white, powdered and falls to the ground in winter.

2.  [Static] on the TV.

3.  [Coke] or [cocaine].

4.  A white Canadian rapper who had a hit in 1992 with the reggae influenced [Informer].  

5.  White girls.A frozen white fluffy form of rain that will keep you out of school for a day. Usually seen in the winter season.stuff that falls from the sky at christmas and it tastes nicefinely powdered cocainea white precipitate that turns every driver within a 75 mile radius of Chicago completely retarded.1 - White, cold, soft, slightly frozen water that falls from the sky in winter. Also tastes nice. Beware of yellow snow.
2 - Cocaine or crack. A white powder powder narcotic. Also called blow, charlie, snowflake.1. mislead, especially by overwhelming with (mis)information
2. deceive
3. hoodwink
4. bamboozleIt is the process of adding lots of small hole-punched papers into a [nugget]ed back pack.1. To whine
2. To Bitch
3. Also see "protesting" -A debate strategy commonly used by Ridgeview and Bakersfield High schools
4. The only lesson jv members at the aforementioned schools learn about
5. Protesting Manuals are equivalent to evidence at these schools.A temporary gathering of people designed to speak out against a cause or political event.  Rarely works because the politicians who are being protested against usually send the [riot police] to "calm down" the protesters.A [mosh pit] for [people] who [care] about [important issues].The act of a diabetic urinating in their partners mouth. Basically a stronger, more pungent lemonade mouth.Made from Orange Pekoe Tea leaves this non-alcoholic beverage, served cold and moslty below the [Mason Dixon line] is a Southerners favorite treat on a hot day (or with pork [BBQ]).  Sugar is added at the time just after brewing "while the tea is still hot".  This allows the sugar to disolve more evenly and produces a fine treat.  Can be garnished with a Lemon.   (See also [Ice Tea])Liquid amazing.A sweet drink said to extend the average human's life by 10-15 years.A reference to males that are sexually interested in minors (both male and female). Said males cannot refuse sweet tea and it is often used to lure them into police traps.

It is believed that pedophiles are fueled on the stuff. McDonalds has recently attempted to capitalize on this fact.

See: [To Catch a Predator]The act of dipping ones testicles in sugar, and smearing them across your opponents face.Semen, jizz, baby gravy. Usually spilled by the half gallon, sprayed all around a room, sometimes on electronic equipment for maximum effect.A female person who believes themself to be  amazing, astonishing , aweinspiring , impressive , intimidating, magnificent, majestic, mind-blowing,The One and Only.

Can also mean crazy woman.southern drink....specially in the area of Tennesse...where the hot bitches are...it is known that by drinking this beverage it will give an avarage girl the power of being hot...also gives you an awesome souther accent...but the word can be used as "cool" or "sweet" on any ocation..The drink of choice for the low class. Extremely low quality tea with a pound of sugar per cup. Also known as, rot your teeth out tea, and we wonder why southerners have such nasty teeth.Generally the acronym used for barbecue, it has evolved into a piece of the internet vernacular. 

Used to poke fun by attaching it to common acronyms such as [wtf], [omg] and [hax].an acronym used for barbecue but sometimes used to point out the absurdity of using acronyms online.Often used to parody online acronyms, this originally stood for "better be quick," usually used in online games.Short for "bitches be queefing". Queefing is the discharge of air from the vaginal tract, known as vaginal flatulence.Originally started on irc channels and then used in instant messengers meaning "be back quick". More recently used as a leet speak variant meaning "barbecue" in conjunction with phrases and other acronyms mainly meant to tease the lesser experienced.Melbourne Australian slang for sexual encounterCommonly used abbreviation meaning "Bitch Be Quiet". Other meanings have also been assigned to the same letter combination, however, these are of course wrong, as this usage is clearly the best and only possibly meaning for BBQ. (Not...)Big Bad Queer

A person who is trying to act all cool and badass ended up looking and sounding all gay,stupid,and hated by others.1. A shortened version of the word "barbecue"

2. An Internet slang term for things such as Be Back, Queers, Better be Quick, and Bitch Be Quiet, among other terms.bitch be quiet. linked with wtf bbqFoolish, destructive, evil sect.

I was happily married and had two wonderful little boys.
The mother of my first wife "got religion" with the JWs and then brainwashed her daughter to become one.
As an atheist I accept other's ideas, so I went along with the idea and accepted her going to the JW meetings where she was indocrinated into their ideas. However, at the insistence of her local JWs she started to try and convince me to go and become one if them.
I said that I was happily an atheist and that the bible was written by men not God.
From then on things went from bad to worse and I was officially and publicly declared to be The Devil.

We divorced and I am now happily remarried with two lovely girls.

Jehova's Witnesses directly caused the breakup of my marriage and caused two innocent young boys to be subjected to the pain and loss which now, after 30 years still affects my oldest boy.

Jehova's Witneses are evil fools.They are not lazy at all because they do all the normal stuff like raise a family, work, go to school and they still manage to get god's word out regurly. AND, it's spelled Jehovah's WitnessesFor the correct spelling and grammar, see [Jehovah's Witnesses].a group of annoying [pricks] who believe in some [shit] about this [god] or something.they go around "spreading gods message" if you ever see one pray to god that a double decker bus falls on them from the sky before they start [preaching] there shit to youUsually spelled Jehovah's Witness.  A strict religious group in which members cannot celebrate holidays or birthdays, but rather spend their time going door to door annoying people with their views and beliefs.A splinter movement of the Jehovah's Witnesses that considers excess of 'H's to be an abomination before the Lord. Jehovah's Witnesses believe their group to be founded on a spelling error, but Jehova's Witnesses know that is just the sort of blasphemy those H-lovers would resort to.annoyingAlso known as J DUB. A religion which grants its members a reason to be lazy and do nothing with their lives nor get involved in anything important as they are serving God, not man.A well-worn, unglamorous bar, often serving a cheap, simple selection of drinks to a regular clientele.  

The term can describe anything from a comfortable-but-basic neighborhood pub to the nastiest swill-slinging hole.Home.This place is going to be stinky and lame. You don't come here for the drinks, you come here to eliminate sobriety. All of the regulars there have a smoker's voice and a hard look to them. If you try to go there dressed nicely, you will get stared at and singled out. Wear shoes that you wouldn't mind squashing some roaches in.A scummy bar whose patrons are primarily on the prowl for a one night standA [bar] that is sleazy, poorly maintained and in overall bad shapeAt one time a deep, earthy, and universally respected genre of folk music embraced by people from all walks of life, and performed by heartland poets who wrote touching melodies and thought-provoking but subtle messages about life, love, and loss, country music has now grown into a dim shadow of its former greatness.  

Record companies have appropriated it for their own profit as they will with any great artistic movement.  Insipid, voiceless dandies with the depth of wading pools have been propped up as the new "idols."  Irresponsible and uninformed political rhetoric has usurped the lyrical foreground, alienating many fans and completely betraying the music's original status as art for the everyman, while mediocrity and uniformity sum up the musical direction.  

If we can ever be blessed again by another visionary, a Williams Sr., a Cash, a Cline, or a Miller, maybe things will change.  But for now, country music remains a brutally raped and distorted picture of art stolen from the artists.A form of music in which the words can be understood, any instrument is game, writing talent is critical, and every song doesn't have to be about horny depressed teenagers singing one or two lines over and over.A music style that used to be about "Cowboys" and "Tractors" and shit. The music was almost always made by a fiddle, acoustic guitar, harmonica, and/or a chello. 

Now, country music is basicly just badly done rock-guitar pop-ballads (or repitive piano pop-ballads) with such themes as "My Wife Left Me", "Im Leaving my Husband", "my Spouse is Dead or a thousnad miles away and i am lonley", and "Drinking Songs", sung by untalented Males who all try to sound the same, and females who either sing like a hurt timid female, or a Strong Independent Woman Who is Leaving Her Boyfriend For Some Unknown Reason. 

Hell, modern country wouldnt even be considered country music if it didnt include that stupid highpitched country noise (i cant describe it. If you have heard country music, you know what im talking about) made by some unknown instrument.a once-vital form of rustic music derived from European styles of folk and dance music made by European immigrants to [America]. It's generally played with instruments like the mandolin, acoustic and steel guitars, fiddle and so on. It used to be about observations of the world, life and love in its complexities. Now it's all cliched, with imagery of cowboys, macho bragadoccio, Southern pride, small town life, "she done him wrong", "tears in my beer", "redneck" living, sentimental tripe like the trend-chasing "Angels Among Us", and "[family values]". Oh yes, and "[God bless the U.S.A.]" [jingoism]. Ever since [Garth Brooks] (who is a watered down [Bob Seger]) hit it big in the [fucking PC 90s], country has been "yuppified" and formulaic. Now there boring piano ballads with cliched lyrics galore sung by lousy [Richard Marx] clones with cowboy hats, the generic [hat acts], pretty ladies singing tunes fit only for shopping mall opening-dedications, sexy ladies who sing corporate pop (no, it don't impress me much) and preachy, jingoistic sentimental crap in the aftermath of all this [9/11] business like the aw-shucks "Where Were You When the World Stopped Turning". This trash is pushed on the [sheep] public by corporate execs in suits.an unbearably irritating form of music that uses the same twangy gee-tar and awful wavering voice to sing about a very short list of topics such as: cheating spouse, alcoholics drinking to excess, pickup trucks, bein' a good-ol-boy, not havin' any a them-thar teeth and screwin' horses. this form of music is generally played at hoot n' annies, box socials, barn dances and every store north of georgia that douche bags go to buy cowboy hats even though they have no legitimate need for them. in order for a person to get any kind of enjoyment out of country music, however minimal, one must fall under one or more of the following categories: white women, having unnatural love for cheap beer, owning a yard full of garbage, 3 or more missing teeth, having a lip full of chewing tobacco, attenders of singles' mingles/family reunions, anyone that owns a tractor and thinks that it automatically makes them a cowboy. the more of these criteria met, the bigger the country music fan you are.example songs: 

"she thinks my trackers sexy"  
"i love this bar" 

enough saidCountry music evolved from folk ballads brought to America by immigrants.It was decent music until asshole record company execs and producers in Nashville, Tennessee (wanting all the money without having to have talent)started pushing the"Nashville sound"aka[Nashville Clowns] in the late 50s and continuing till today.Now all country songs are written by a formula.Whats selling,What topic is hot at the moment etc.. Country acts of today are told how to dress,act ,talk,what their background is ,if they are gonna be outlaws or good guys(stolen from wrestling promotors.also see:[Retards])and what companies products to be seen wearing,eating,drinking and wiping their ass with.Most country stars of today are gleened from Kareoke bars and lounges.Most are from the midwest or east coast but company excecs change their point of origin to Oklahoma,[Texas] or Tennessee.Most "Stars" of today do not write their own material,they purchase the rights to say they have written it.(Travis Tritt)Pose with Harleys and try to act like outlaws(Toby Keith.Although he had to be pulled on a trailer sitting on a bike for his vid after dropping the bike several times and having to receive medical attention to get his head removed from his ass).Most acts of today are a sad lot of record company flunkies listened to by plastic people who buy into their bullshit swaggering and studio player albums(watch their road bands who are paid next to nothing screw up every lick out live)(I dont blame them).The modern day fanbase for these "Stars" of today are a fickle bunch(fame IS fleeting)and the commercial lifespan for these people is short indeed.Most end up broke,without their songs or right to even sing them in public anymore within a year or less.But dont feel sorry for them.They sold out and perpetuated the machine.If they hadnt sold out and wouldve told the record execs to write their own songs, modern country may have stood a chance.Listen to Old(late 60s-late 70s) Waylon,Willie,David Allan Coe,Billy Joe Shaver for a taste of country music unspoiled by the "[Nashville Clowns]"A genre of music that used to be good until it all started sounding the same. After Garth Brooks came into the fold, there were really obcessed country fans and the selling out in country became more common. Nowadays country music is full of acts trying to sound a lot like each other and many artists do not have their individuality, but many did not have that from the start of the genre. Once Waylon Jennings demanded that he would play his own songs like it or not, individual began to increase in the genre. The creativity of the country singer or band is denied when they are not allowed to be creative. Ever since maybe ten years ago or even earlier many acts have been copying each other. Individuality has been more seen in some Alan Jackson, Willie Nelson, Johnny Cash, Waylon Jennings, Bocephus, Eric Church, Brad Paisley, and in the songs of a few other country acts. However Rock, Alternative, Punk, and Metal, and Metalcore ( the one with probably the most freedom of expression and by far the most lyrically deep the majority of the time are the best). However the legacy of country music is being ruined by an attempt to commercialize like pop artists is hurting the genre of country music when they try to be all hip hop and sing about a woman's booty or follow the same formula of every other band in country or rock music. These rock bands they seek to sometimes emulate are southern rock bands, Nickelback, 3 Dooors Down, and Hinder. Honestly, country music is so far on the decline that it has to the potential to turn worse than the pop/dance and techno genres.a type of music where you lose everything you own and takes no talent whatsoever to write lyrics for. Type of music listened to by people who have nothin better in life to do than complain about everything.A genre of music popular among white-trashy inbreeds.  Just listening to it has been proven to lower your IQ.  All the singers sound exactly the same, as if they were purposely trying to sound like hicks.  Someone who listens to country music is usually from a rural, white, bigoted community.A disease that started in Tokyo.  It first infected Gameboys in Japan in 1995.  Then in 1998 the disease infected Gameboys in America.  Soon channel WB11 was infected too, and now Cartoon Network.  The ever-so-popular "Gameboy Advance" systems got infected in 2002, and still is.  In 1999 the disease started spreading via cardboard aka "Pokemon Trading Card Game".  "Nintendo 64" and "Nintendo Gamecube" are infected too.  The disease is also spreading via plastic and metal in the toy isles at Wal-Mart, K-mart, toys-r-us, and every other toy store.  It is now July 2004, almost 10 years after the start of this addicting, argument instigating disease and it is still out there, but not as bad as its most powerful years(1999-2001).Say what you will folks, but Pokemon is one of the greatest games ever released for the Gameboy. Period. 

The problem is that Nintendo, through their misguided policy of inundating the market with a whole wack of crappy, kitschy merchandise, not to mention a t.v show and movies galore, alienated their older players. My theory is that most people who complain about how Pokemon is stupid, are actually disenfranchised former Pokemon players. Cause let's face it, back in the day, everybody, and I mean everybody, played it.

And all that is a real shame, because from a strictly gameplay point of view, Pokemon kicks ass. It should have gone down in history as one of the better video game franchises. But thanks to Nintendo's decision to sell the game to eight year olds, that won't happen.An anime, manga, and nintendo game created in Japan.  Pokemon are creatures that children and teenagers (as well as adults) can capture and train.  The trading card game was one of the first major trading card games that alowed players to not onle trade, but battle as well.  In the anime we follow the story of a young trainer, Ash, and his two friends, Misty and Brock, as they travel togeather on their pokemon journey.  The mange series revolves around rivils Red and Blue as they collect badges and compete in various compititions.no kids, not the garbage pokemon that they made. i mean, THE ORIGINAL. this goes back about 10 years. you guys remember when pokemon blue first came out? i know you all got it for christmas that year! cos i know i did. and i played it all night haha. and pokemon cards were the coolest thing ever. and EVERYONE had them in school, even the real popular kids. if you had a charizard, you were pretty much awesome. you sat for hours arranging your cards in a binder, just staring/reading each and every card. you pretty much had every fact about every pokemon memorized. YOU HAD LIKE 500 SLOWPOKES AND YOU HATED SLOWPOKE BECAUSE OF IT. you woke up at 5 am on school days to watch pokemon. you had a bunch of pokemon toys/stuffed animals. on christmas, if there werent 5 packs of pokemon cards in your stocking, you basically hated everything. when you found a "shiny" card you went completely insane. the number of holographic cards a person had defined how cool they were. you brought your gameboy color everywhere so you could level up your pikachu. you always wanted to evolve pikachu with a thunder stone, but dam game wouldnt let you! you snuck your gameboy into school to play, and the teacher never caught you. YOU SECRETLY STILL PLAY GAMEBOY COLOR SOMETIMES (i know i do). you could bust out your gameboy right now and play for 5 hours with no problem. im 17 now, and i can look back on this and it was such a fun time of my life. hah. so all you older people, do you remember these good old days?Something that you've pretended not to like since you turned 11, yet can't deny how sick it would be if they really existed.There are three destinct parts to Pokemon

anime:Responsible for giving Pokemon its "kiddie" reputation.

TCG:I must agree with people about this one, it was pretty horible.

GameBoy game:Aguably a great game. It is much more complex then it seems. Unfurtunatly, most people who bash pokemon because it is "kiddie" would most likely not have the intellegence to fully understand the game at all.

Why people that bashes pokemon always say something about gay sex or masturbating, I'll never know. That South Park episode don't help much either. I just pray that these people asociating the SP episode with the game are being sarcastic. After reading some of these definitions, I wouldn't suprised.a very fun rpg video game that i at 18 still injoy about capurturing and figting with kick ass monsters sounds like fun   to bad they went ruined in 97 98 by making a baby show about it ruing the 1995 video game(N.) A Game and an Anime that has been made popular by millions of kids. The Game itself, isn't too bad since they're so many Pokemon and so many different combinations of raising them and using them, whether it be the six Pokemon lineup or Moves they they have. 
The Show however, is the reason it has a kiddie reputation and is hated by most people. I don't blame most people when they say they hate Pokemon, cause the show makes them say all of that. If they tried the game, they might've thought otherwise. 
Still though, the many different games that come out aren't that nessacary. If you played one, you've played them all. I used to be really into Pokemon in middle school, and played it all the time, but knew better than to buy EVERY single different version and waste my money like that. Also avoided the Card Game.If you can ignore all the shitty spin-off games and marketing behind the series, it's still one of the best RPGs around.Once a very popular TV Show, Card game and video game which I myself was quite a fan of at the time. The TV Show and Card game sort of fizzled out after Poke'mon had had its time but the games were very good and they still exist to day. Of course I'm always seeing new card series's being brought out and am occasionally mildy interested because the artwork on some of the cards was rather good. In fact the card game was very popular and a lot of fights broke out about people not trading fairly and people even resorted to stealing others cards but I knew it had all gotten out of hand when at my first school they had people to watch over the swapping of Poke'mon cards and advising people on good swaps. Eventually most schools banned Poke'mon cards (and any others for that matter). So, when they began bringing out all those new Poke'mon and card sets it got a bit boring. So all in all the original Poke'mon cards, games and possibly the TV series was a rather good achievement but it never managed to keep a lot of fans after a few years, but, of course there are still dedicated Poke'mon fans all over the world.STD - stands for Sexualy Transmited Disease. The most commonly known is HIV/AIDS. To say the least you don't want an STD.Somewhat Tasty DonutsSexually Transmitted Disease. Anyone can get one, even virgins. Most common STDs are passed through skin contact, saliva, breast milk, & bodily fluids. You don't have to be a "nasty slut" to get an STD. It only takes 1 sexual experience...or with Herpes, alls you have to do is touch someone who has the virus on their skin  at that point and area.Sexually Transmitted Disease

See burned.Acronym meaning: Socially Transmitted Decepticons

Professional or professionally-organized social media users who use one or more online personas to launch political or personal attacks on opponents or their issues. Often, so called "persona software" is used to manage many such deceptive identities simultaneously in order to create the impression that multitudes hold similar points of view.

Sometimes called [Sock Puppets], STDs can infect multiple social media streams at one time, creating the illusion of mass interest or agreement sufficient to influence an issue or debate.Basically like a computer virus, but for people. You want the free Prada bag, you have to risk the attack on your computer, and possibility of it never working again.

You want the sex, you have to risk the attack on your 'down there' region, with the possibility of it never working again.Something you get from putting your dick in shit because you're too fucking poor to afford a single condom.STD stands for Snooki Transmitted Dumbness. Are girls in your school wearing super slutty clothes? Tanning their skin 24/7? Putting their hair in poofs the size of the Popes hat? Then they have the STD. After watching Jersey Shore for too long, some girls have acquired the STD. Signs include but are not limited to...
-drinking vodka for breakfast
-drinking vodka for lunch
-drinking vodka for dinner
-drinking vodka for dessert
-skin that is so tan, she is invisible in a dimly lit room
-causes public disturbances 24/7
-eats pickles... by sucking on them
-when asked why she does something, she replies with "I'm at the Jersey Shore... BITCH!"

-everywhere is the Jersey Shore for her
-a sudden interest for meat-heads and gorillas
-when someone calls her phone, and is looking a girl named Angelina, she replies with "No, she died"
-she is as smart as a...SnookiSpontaneous Torrential Diarrhea

Whenever you are normal one second, then randomly you get the urge to have explosive diarrhea and then, when you sit down, it just explodes out of your ass like a torrential rain...simultaneous text discussion.
When you are texting someone, and they send another text before you respond to the previous one. This is giving someone an STDCompany bitch.Free slaves in the workplace.poor innocent individual starting out with a whole set of impossible goals and naive ambitions that end up crushed under the path of some self-righteous menapausal bitch that is dissatisfied with her own life and for getting an office ass and taking it out on cute young girls that might actually make something of their lives and live their dreams...and work off the constantly invading office ass(1) A temporary worker who is employed to gain experiance/education rather than money. 
(2) Bill's gal.A Democratic Semen Recepticle.People who are hired to do menial monotonous work that you couldn't pay people people to do long term because they would quit or eat a .45 caliber.  So they hire some naive [college] or [high school] grad to do it until they give up , quit, or eat a .45 caliber.a person who willingly becomes a slave to the corporate world because they enjoy getting abused and whipped by supervisors.

interns do not get paid but they do enjoy the occasional snacks brought to work by the other rich employees. (usually interns steal those snacks, therefore get whipped).

also see "office puppy"an aspiring employee with whom you abstain from sexual relations.a noun referring to a person who is reduced to slave labor.

An intern works for no pay, and their main job is to get coffee and obey each demand by their employer.Homeless kids that you take in and support in exchange for ridiculous favors.  They can be summoned with a conch shell.What Kid Rock drives after being arrested for beating up Tommy Lee.Someone who doesn't have the skills or talent to hold down a permanent job. They are inherently lazy and sneaky.Faggy asian kids who believe they have the ability to kill someone without guilt.n. Mystery Science Theater 3000: A television show in which humorous comments are adlibbed during the viewing of a low quality B-movie.

v. To make a Mystery Science Theater 3000 episode that focuses on a specific film.

adj. The Mystery Science Theater 3000 version of a film.n. abbreviation for the cult hit television series "Mystery Science Theater 3000", in which 'B' movies are made fun of by the the show's three central characters.
Started on local access by creator Joel Hodgson, later moved on to Comedy Central through season seven, then the Sci-Fi Channel until its tenth and final season.
Also included a feature film, "Mystery Science Theater 3000: The Movie" with a limited theatrical release.The most awesome television show invented by the human race. Short for "Mystery Science Theater 3000" Originated in the late 80's and featured a man named Joel (Later to be replaced by Mike Nelson), Crow T. Robot, and Tom Servo.  This trio would make fun of ,while watching, terrible movies. Was featured mostly on Comedy Central and the Sci-Fi Channel. Aired for 11 seasons. In 1996 the MST3K movie was released into theaters.v. To make fun of a really pathetic  movie.An abbreviation for "pure comical genius". I reccomend Hobgoblins, Manos, and Godzilla vs Megalon.I've only seen the movie, but from that, I can tell that it is fucking hilarious.The only show that has EVER made me laugh outloud. I think it was funnier with TV's Frank and Joel, but still funnier in the later episodes, but hey, I love Tom Servo's Irish Tenor, too...The only show ever created that actually has something to tell you. Provided you come equipped with a great sense of humour. And good abs.Making fun of a particular video/scene/footage especially music videos.

Abbreviation of Mystery Science Theater 3000National Republican Bullshit Network. Watched by ignorant, gun-toting, flag-waving ultra-nationalistic right-wing Christian fundamentalists who think George Bush is the new fucking Messiah or something; basically, the scum of American society who, if they had their way, would turn America in a fascistic police state in order to feel safe from the "terrorists" (aka: "brown people").A pseudo-news channel catering to the bottom of the American right-wing extremist barrel - people who are deathly afraid of anyone and anything that's even the slightest bit different from them.  About as "fair and balanced" as the Iranian government, which it closely resembles.Sensationlist trash channel.  State media dumbed down so even Dubya can understand it.Funniest Tv station ever. Good source of entertainment. But seriously, I trust the Daily Show more.news for red neck ass republicansA far right neo-con "talk show" that presents itself as news. In fact if the news does not favor their distorted view they focus on sensational tabloid stories of rape and murder to titillate the religious right that pretends morality. This show is so hilarious that I might even rate it as a comedy if it werent for the fact that some ignorant americans really believe it is fair and balanced. It is a show for lower IQ people who want to be reassured their small minds are correct and that everyone in the world who isnt white,right wing extremists re evil. Fox news hates you if you are Democrat, moderate thinking republican. Catholic, Lutheran,asian,black,hispanic, and the list goes on. They have a narrow box of extreme radical fundalmentalist with a corporate agenda and if you look closely rather perverted. The owner (Rupert Murdich" specializes in tabloids that exploit crimes against women and children then report every delicious sexual detail so the "moral" religious right" can get their jollies while exclaing how hrrible everyone else is. It really promotes rich big corporations and Republicans like George W. and use their guise as a "conservative" station to manipulate the average, easily manipulated person who wants to think of themselves as moral citizens while their mind is being filled with anything but factual news reporting. Wake up america and start watching C-span and see what is really happening.Completely and utterly without merit. A news station that not only presents the most wildly conservative of biases with the slogan "Fair and Balanced," but also presents worse television than Jerry Springer. I am NOT watching the news to see Sean Hannity and Bill O'Reilly scream "SHUT UP!" at every single guest they have.Total BullshitThe most pathetic excuse for a television news channel that I've ever seen.  I could personally shit in a bucket and then write a report saying that I did not take a shit in the bucket and be more accurate than Fox News.  These people fucking disgust me.  I can't believe there are idiots this fucking stupid.  See [republican] for more examples of idiocy.Real news put through a conservative Republican filter and then dumbed down.The world's second-largest ocean, separating the eastern Americas and western Europe and Africa, extending from the Artic in the North and the Antartic in the South.1. A man-made body of water usually found in gardens and parks.

2. A website based around weird animations, usually crap) flash games and a weird (really weird) storys.

3. Home of the Billy ChroniclesTo pond - to have sexual intercourse with someone affectionately.cool water where people go to cool off - located on a farm. a place for sexual explorations. 

it is also a secret meeting place on hot summer nights, for college homosexuals.A body of water similar in size to a pool. Larger than a puddle but smaller than a lake, ponds usually have some time of small lifeforms living within.What the boyfriend of a duck lover calls his girlfriend's vagina.To Brutally own someone. In the use of ownage.
Formed from the words Pwned, Pwnt, Owned, and Ownt.A place where you go pick up dogs.  (dog pound)the past tense of "pwned" which is technically already past tense but who cares(Always all caps)
A replacement for the words [PWN], [PWND], and all derivatives.A term formerly useful for describing websites consisting entirely of intentionally fabricated news stories, but now used to describe virtually anything that does not mesh with one's own views.Any news reported by mainstream media which is deemed unflattering, incriminating or otherwise hitting too close to home for Donald Trump and/or his cabinet of lap dog Republicans, regardless of it's actual factualness or validity.Fake news is produced by web sites or tabloids for the purpose of attracting viewers to ads. Fake news are sensational false (fiction) news-like stories created purely to attract readers.

Comedy shows, like the Daily Show, commonly mix real news with humor, including fictitious humor. But the news part of it is real. True, people who fall for fake news sites are very gullible, and perhaps can't tell which parts of the Daily Show are fiction, but those people aren't the Daily Show's target audience. Fake news has come to mean fiction for fiction's sake.

Fake news should also be distinguished from false news, also called dishonest news or lies that are told for political purposes. Many of the anti-Hillary stories were created by fake news sites, but then posted as lies on sites like Fox and Breitbart.Used to defend an illogical position, or a way to avoid using critical thinking skills when a news source does not match a personal or ideological bias.Any statement or report that truthfully exposes the lies, ignorance, conflicts of interest, erroneous statements, megalomania, and racist, misogynistic, illegal, traitorous and tyrannical activities of the so-called President Trump and his administration. Syn. Newspeak., Ant. propaganda1) False or otherwise extremely exaggerated news stories used to generate money from ad revenue by using [clickbait] titles or used to sell tabloids in the grocery check-out line.

2) A term for a news article that doesn't validate one's political opinion.Typical coverage from Fox News.  Their reporting contains so many exagerations, falsities, and interjected opinions, that it can in no way be considered proper and informative.Normally typed in ALL CAPS, It is the only type of news that Mr. Trump loves.Print or online information that make [President Trump], his advisors, and his administration look like dishonest or incompetent policymakers or office-bearers.Fake News is a term for news organizations that constantly put out fake or modified stories to control their viewers and readers perceptions. Fake News intentionally manipulates and controls the main stream narrative with misinformation and censorship to serve the agenda of promoting a progressive new world order. This is the primary reason we have liberal bias among all major news organizations. The following list is FAKE NEWS.

ABC,AP, AURN, BLOOMBERG,BUZZFEED,CBS,CNBC,CNN,HUFF POST,LA TIMES, MSNBC,NBC, NEW YORK TIMES,NPR, POLITICO,REUTERS, THE HILL,WALL STREET JOURNAL,WASHINGTON POST, MEDIA MATTERS,SNOPES.a dirty pirate hookerA voluptuous female pirate type woman, usally with a firey attitude, and usually seen around taverns and bars, seaside fishing towns, and wherever pirates roam.a beautiful women who engages particularly in duties concerning domestic affairs, kitchen cleaning, or ale serving

the object of a pirate's affection

usually found in sea faring ports, in the back of the kitchen scrubbing pots, passed out under a pirate ship's deck, or tending to the wash.A [stout], [voluptuous] [maiden]. Usually associated with the [Rennaissance] and [tavern]s, where the wench is pictured as a bar-maid, boldly flirting with the [swashbuckler]s and [pirate]s.

Is a softer, less-[offend]ing version of [bitch]. 

A [mispronunciation] of "wrench".historically a non-derrogatory word for a woman who was not a lady. thus a waitress in times of yore was a "serving wench." more modernly synonimous with bitch or slut but slightly less ofencivePeasant girl. Can also be used as a slightly and less aggresive version of bitch.An admired woman in your crew, a talented warrior seductress, that can inspire adventure or take a bland situation and make it rife with excitement.a slightly less offensive term similar in meaning to "bitch"Local term for women or girlsA Wench is a loose (not necessarily literally) yet powerful woman. The Wench is part of a growing sisterhood devoted to torturing men in the nicest of ways.

1. If men require an "adjustment" after kissing you? 
2. If your tongue can be registered as a precision surgical instrument? 
3. If you have you been accused of smuggling melons across state lines?
4. If you really know what a sponge is for?
5. If "Soak a Bloke" is considered your time off?
6. If you think it's wise to use ice cubes and menthol together?
7. If you know that whipped cream is more than just a dessert topping?
8. If men lose the power of speech when you adjust your bodice or breath deeply?
9. If you are vertically challenged but horizontally gifted?
10.If you like to play with your food? 
11.If when removing your bra on Monday, you find enough loose change to buy breakfast? 

If you answered any 3 of the questions above with an "oh yeah," then you are obviously a woman of distinction, a product of excellent breeding, possessed of stunning (if not vaguely dubious) talents and appetitesA tattoo above a woman's ass crack.“Tramp Stamp” is a derogatory term referring to a tattoo which a women places on her lower back.  It is especially popular among women born in the late 70’s, 80‘s, and even early 90’s.  Fair or unfair, these tattoos have a socially constructed connotation associated with them.  These women are labeled as tramps, whores, or other derogatory sexually promiscuous terms.  Although these are often bias generalized claims, there have been sociological studies done by the American Psychological Association, Federal Bureau of Prisons, and other demographic researchers showing strong correlative evidence associating tattoos with high risk behavior, illegal substance abuse and sexual promiscuity.  These risk factors are greatest in the age range which these types of tattoos are gaining main stream popularity.  Some have also jokingly stated that by 2050, the “tramp stamp” will be renamed the “gramp stamp”.1. a tattoo located above a womans ass.
2. a girl who has been certified by your neighborhood, frat or group of friends as a slut.A tattoo on the small of a woman's back... a good clue if you should wrap it up or not.a horribly cliche, or common tattoo that makes girls look like dumb bitches.  Found on the lower back, and usually a butterfly...sometimes a happy flower of some sort.A tattoo on the lower back of a female. Denotes the perceived correlation between having a tattoo in this location and being sexually promiscuous. The larger the tramp stamp, the more promiscuous the female, goes the common lore. Popular designs include butterflies, flowers, vines, tribal designs, wings....A tattoo on a woman's lower back.  Just think of it as a target.Tattoo usually positioned on the lower back of a exotic dancer and or a female. Usually accompanied with low rising pants with a "Thong" underwear exposed.The Tattoo found on the lower region of a womans back. Often a tribal symbol or artwork that is wider than tall, such as angel wings, vines, and butterflies. It origins are believed to have started with early indian tribe(s) when a male would place his 'brand' on his female partners lower back to discourage other males, where the strategically placed brand would be seen during sexual acts, such as the 'doggie style' position. 

Ironically, today it is usually understood by society as associated with sexual promiscuity and commonly reffered to using derogatory terms. Popular with women in their 20's, and frowned upon in their later years.A lower back tattoo on any female.A kick ass 24 hour place to get waffles.  Popular in the [dirty south][sketchy] sketchy restuarant that is defined by it's sketchiness.  has a certain culture about it: "great" coffee, hasbrowns scattered and smothered, and the classic waffle.  frequently visited in the middle of the night by drunk and/or high college students.1. a 24-hour dive with underpaid waitresses, classically bad juke box music, bathrooms a la truckstop, and food that no respectable arteries woulc bear.
2. the only place to go-- besides [Wal-Mart]-- after 11pm in Arkadelphia, Arkansas and similiar ends of the worldThe only reason to go to disney world. An exact opposite of the magic kingdom and a lot more enjoyable.to be left in bed with covers that equal the size of a waffle house napkin.The poor man's IHOP. An interesting place for a first date. The only place you could imagine going if your drunk/high and it's 2 a.m. You almost ALWAYS see someone you know at the Waffle House (three of the last four times I went I saw people I knew). The waitresses at Waffle House are way better than the ones at Hooters.A crappy diner where you can buy food or meth at 3 a.m.A slang term meaning "female prison."the greatest fucking breakfast place ever, open 24-7, breakfast all day, good shitThe place to go when you want some good waffles at an economical price. Also a good late-night place.Zord is like the empasis of making something more elite than it is. It is similar to the word "zors" also. It is actually a suffix such as zors. The meaning is very similar except zord is a unique word because it is like the show power rangers.

The way this came out is that one's user name named PandaBoyx kept saying Zors while his friend started saying "WOW its like zord from power rangers!" ever since, they all started saying zord. Similar as "z0rs", you may also use the suffix "z0rd".A colossal assault vehicle used by the Power Rangers.  

See also [Megazord].Childhood game of fashioning the largest clunkiest legos into crude spacecraft. To play the game, two children slam their "zords" into each other and whoever's breaks first loses.A word... or half a word... that you add on the end of words... to make them more wordy... and generally more... [AWESOME]!!! ...in every way...Also an expression requently used by stoners and hippies for something of high quality.sticky, hairy, stinky, and highly potent marijuana.really potent weed, produced by proper slow drying of harvested plant material, usually requiring curing (putting plant material in paper bag, folding over top, placing that bag in another bag. Thus reducing air and light contact on said plant materials, so when you go to retrieve some of said plant materials, it is still moist, green and sticky because the resin glands are still intact and 'sweating'.1. Potent weed.
i.e. [Krippy], [KindBud], [Bomb Nugget]
2.Adjective meaning good.Formerly used to denote really potent weed, it now means really or awesomeHigh quality weed (chronic).high quality, really strong weedDank, is an adjective which is over-used by people in general and mostly by people trying to appear cool to their stoner friends. Dank means dark, sticky, gooey, and potent. It was originally a common word to describe disgusting basements and caves ect. Then the world of pot took it over and was using it very correctly to describe very potent strains of marijuana, seeing as the definition of dank meets all the qualities you find in good marijuana. Then "squares" and people who wanted to look cool to stoners started using it to describe anything they think is "cool" which in turns makes them believe they themselves are "cool" as well. In reality it makes them seem as illiterate as an ape. M&M's are not dank, chips are not dank, and your clothes are definitely not dank, you need to stop overusing and killing the word.a word used to describe good weedThe word dank can be:

An adjective describing unpleasant dampness or humidity. 

a word used to describe high potency [cannabis] that is still moist. 

An adjective describing something as positive or awesome.A state of mind which occurs after smoking enough marijuana to the point where the user stares blankly into whatever catches his/her attentionThe ultimate state of mind.To be under the influence of [marijuana]. Usually associated with bloodshot eyes, the [munchies], and unexplained laughter.the greatest feeling in the world. it is the state you are in after hitting a nice big bowl of marijuanna or hash. I personally prefer pipes, but you can  smoke out of anything, i.e. a bong, spliff, joint, vaporizer, popcan, pop bottle, parachute, hotboxing is always fun. im quite high right now. 1.sometimes you laught alot, 2.other times you stare at absolutley nothing, 3.other times you get into indepth discussions about aliens and the CIA,4. or you think youre capable of things like backflips.

all of the above i have experienced and so much more, so todays lesson kids, is smoke as much marijuanna as you damn well please. goodday younglings.a time when you come up with the funniest quotes in the world and your a fucking genious but dont remember any of it in the morning...when you smoke so much marijuana that you are unmotivated to even move-  and every muscle in your body feels like it's being weighed down by a huge weight like a stone  (hence the word STONED) you feel really heavy and have intense, very enjoyable tactile hallucinations and usually feel complete euphoria so you just stare off blankly and enjoy it.The greatest feeling in the world followed by engulfing a bag of doritos and reeses pieces.when you're so high that you almost feel unable to move your muscles.  everything feels weird and you kind of just sit back with your mouth agape staring off into space and enjoying it.  contrary to popular belief, "stoned" and "high" are different in that, the word "stoned" originated from the idea that you feel like you're being weighed down by big heavy stones.The art of dying by geology.The very slow, yet rapid course of time in which you may find yourself reading and creating these definitions for words that quite simply seem to be the most hilarious thing you've seen in a recent while. (The word "egg" for example, let it sink in if you are high at the moment)

Contrary to popular belief, you will not be "raiding" the kitchen, and refrigerator, rather, you will likely see a Quiznos commercial which will either A) Remind you of the cold cuts you have in your refrigerator and proceed to make yourself 5 sandwiches, as you will not be able to tell when you're "full", or B) you will immediately rush to the nearest Taco Bell, because at one point you will forget why you got in the car, at which point a Taco Bell will present itself along any major highway.

You will be less likely to go to the movie theater, as instead your first person experiences will be as if you are viewing yourself through a television set, so watching movies will only cause you to lose control of yourself, as you will be uncertain of whether you're watching a movie, or whether you're watching a movie of a person watching a movie. (That person, being you)

You will giggle when I remind you of the word "egg", and that will cause you to go onto some intellectual brainstorm about things completely unrelated to eggs, such as poison dart frogs, discovery channel's Deadliest Catch, or how you managed to read all of this definition.1. A psychopathological condition characterized by delusional fantasies of wealth, power, or omnipotence. 
2. An obsession with grandiose or extravagant things or actions.1)Someone obsessed with power

2)A kick ass song by incubus1)A person obsessed with greed and/or power.
2)A great song from one of the greatest bands in the world; Incubusan insane person who is obsessed with power, one who thinks they are beyond greatnessA megalomaniac is a self-centered, power-crazed egomaniac that is obsessed with their goals for conquering cities and countries and world domination, they're rather over-obsessed with power rather than actual conquest. They also often fantasize of greatness, fame, wealth, grandeur, omnipotence predominate and servitude. Because of all the power driving them to becoming critically insane their minds are separated from reality since they also don't care what happens to anything at all as they care about themselves.

Despite having the word maniac in the name of them being a megalomaniac, it does not mean they are always clinically insane.My Definition is a belief is so strong that I am so powerful even more powerful than god  
I am paronaid of all things and make sure all my phones are not tapped
I say bring it on to take over the world
Any one standing in my way is un patroticone who has dillusions of granduer, such as one who thinks they are jesus or that they are the air to the seceret leader of the illuminati.A symptom of mental illness marked by delusions of greatness, wealth, etc. See also, Glenn BeckA bad-ass song by the founders of industrial rock, [KMFDM].Megalomaniac = George DubyaA girl who gives really good head, but her very annoying personality slowly sucks away your soul.They guard the prison of Azkaban. They suck all the happiness out of people and you'll feel like you'd never be happy again when a dementor comes near you.The worst part of prison, according to Prison Mike.dementors,scary creatures who gaurd azakaban.they attacked harry mostly in the third movie because of his tragic past.1. n. A fictional creature from the Harry Potter series. Dementors guard the wizard prison Azkaban and suck all of the happiness from anything in their presence. Their worst weapon is called the dementor's kiss, which is when a dementor sucks a person's soul out through their mouth.

2. n. A person who kills a good moment or sucks all of the fun out of a situation.Creatures of everlasting darkness. These creatures are the only things born evil.

Just being in proximity with a dementor drains all happy thoughts away from. They make you relive your worst memory.
They also take away anything warm, whether they be thoughts or the accual tempature.
They are also some of the only creature that do not sleep, they also never walk. They are the only known creature that can suck the very soul from a living thing.
Because of these special abilities they are used as gaurds to the wizard prizion of [Azkaban].

The only know way of fighting a dementor is to use a petronus charm.Someone who is in the fringe of your group of friends who is tolerated because it would be a shame to tell them to Fuck off!
They also have some strange ability to turn even the funniest momements into akward ones and sap all happiness from those around.Woman's [menstrual period]. Goes along with Blast-ended Skrewts (cramps) and Azkaban (uterus).
It sucks.1. A really really hot chick. She's so hot she's scary. It can also be a really really hot guy, but it mostly for women. This dementor makes something silvery come out of your wand.The most Ballin Drink you can make, Brass Monkey a 40 of Old English with Purple Drink, called the Dementor because it resembles "Dementor Piss" according to Jonny Haworth. WARNING: you will feel like you just got the kiss of death from a Dementor if you can conquer this beast.(1) slang: to disrespect someone (to [diss]); to make fun of someone; used by a third party after a first party makes fun of a second party. Brought back to life by the ever-popular [That 70's Show].

(2) slang: to smoke [marijuana] or any other [drug] used with fire, to get [high]. see [burn out]

(3) verb: to char or scorch something using fireAn exclamatory response, generally used by a third party after someone has just received an insult.To be thoroughly humiliated or insulted to the point where you cannot return with a comeback.smoke weedAn exclamation used to imply that one has just been insulted with no chance of rebuttal.slang for a serious insult; verbal ownage1. v. to infect someone with veneral disease.
2. to add data or music to a blank [CDR]
3. to set something on fireslang: to disrespect someone (to diss); to make fun of someone; used by a third party after a first party makes fun of a second party. Brought back to life by the ever-popular That 70's Show.to lie or make up an entire story involving something that never happened.

Noun- a lie or totally made up story.The [Bard] surname of the worlds greatest bard [Rabbie Burns] or [Robert Burns] [Scotland]s Finest.1. (verb)  To engulf a piece of property into flames, with the intent of destruction.A good hobby to take up.some thing evilWhat Korean people do on impulse when they feel agitatedAdjective describing an extremely intense mosh pit.to destroy someone's reputation. to sell goods or merchandise at a lower price of a competitor without the competitor's knowledge. to take, steal, or destroy.The cool thing for hot guys to do (Ian).When someone is out to seek revenge on everyone due to some past experience.(n) (1) A person who doubts the sincerity of motives.
(2) A word commonly misdefined by pessimists who think they are cynics.Someone who genuinely doubts a persons true motives.
-If a hobo asks a cynic for money, the cynic would just ignore him, convinced that the hobo doesnt really want money to get back on his feet, but to get some drugs which were the reason for him being homeless in the first place.

-A cynic is the guy who never had a girlfriend until he was in college, because it didnt take long for him to realize that High School relationships never last the better part of two weeks. He also sometimes feels like the only person in his school to notice this, and probably is.

-If you read a romantic poem to a cynic about the beauty of trees, the cynic would just stare at you and say something to the effect of "Birds and Squirrels fuck in them, and they make big noises when cut down to build yet another highway. Otherwise nice poem (b-_-)b".

-A Cynic is usually someone with above-average awareness, especially if they develop such views at an early age. Being a Cynic through Junior High and High School can save you a LOT of hurt, since you will definetly be able to talk your way out of anything. No arguement can beat cold hard facts, which are what cynics thrive for.

-Cynics are not neccesarily pessimists, and while they do generally have low expectations, they dont blow minor problems out of proportion, since they really dont care in the first place.One who doesn't believe in innate human virtue. Cynicism, contrary to popular belief, does not entail being an offensive and ignorant idiot. Only the offensive part, because most people don't like how cynics criticise them and would rather live happily ever after in the magical world of pixies and gumdrops and rainbows and unicorns. Sadly, that view on cynicism has caused a lot of people to regard the philosophy in a negative way.A person who boldly tells it like it is.  A person who sees the world without a blindfold covering the eyes.An idealist whose rose-colored glasses have been removed, snapped in two and stomped into the ground, immediately improving his vision.A cynic is a typically jaundiced person who has the rare ability to be able to see through common belief and see the truth and faults in today's society. Cynics are non-believers and do not conform, and have no interest whatsoever, in conforming to everyday society. 
Cynics are usually disliked for their jaded and negative views on the way the world runs, and often beleive that the world runs according to selfishness and is driven my greed and money.(1) An [idealist] robbed by the experience of the realities of life.
(2) A person who has adopted a functional attitude that allows for survival in the postmodern world of late capitalism.a cynic is someone that understands people only give a shit about things they benefit from. life is all about self-preservation and nothing else.Inside Every Cynic is a disappointed [idealist]
~George CarlinSomeone who looks at the world without the blindfold of modern day society. Cynics look at the world like a critic, always judging it. They aren't afraid to speak their minds and give the facts without embelishing them.[Hell]. as simple as that, No more no lessa forced labor camp in which poor people are forced to complete useless tasks at the beckoning of five bazillion bosses each having they're own stupid idosynchrocies.Commonly mistakened for the concentration camps where Hitler would persecuit jews. Instead of killing people at kroger though, they force them to do mind numbing work, such as pushing large metal objects, many at a time. This is forced upon the victim until death ensues or genocide of the supervisors.Kroger is a grocery chain headquartered in Cincinnati Ohio. There are stores throughout the southeast and [Upper South].A code name for strip club. Effectively lets you and your friends talk freely about the titty bar without turning any heads.a grocery store in the southeast. also a euphemism for taking a shit, or the product of one, usually taken in a krogerarium (bathroom).An extremely financially selfish grocery store known for overcharging customers who don't have their "plus" card, paying their employees as low as the law allows them to, and providing the lowest quality food/drink products out there.Describes poor quality. The word is derived from Kroger Stores. The motto is "Quality Garanteed". It is a sarcasim.(noun) One who [kroge]s.  Krogers can often be identified by their long, curved nails, which they grow and trim specifically to make their kroging more productive. 

It is not known what, if any relationship exists between kroging and Kroger (the supermarket), but showing up to an interview with a nice set of kroging nails probably wouldn't hurt your chances of employment with the company.(Noun) A quantity or amount of goods, irregardless of weight, that may be contained in a plastic grocery sack. Heard in the [Upper South] in [Dayton], Ohio when a person is recycling the grocery bag to use for another purpose. These bags may or not come from an actual [Kroger] store. 

This term may be used in other areas such as [Cincinnati], [Lexington], [Louisville] and [Bowling Green] Kentucky where the [Kroger] supermarket chain prevails.A store where you can buy a shot gun, ammunition, a ski mask, a baseball bat, a meat cleaver and a chainsaw, but you can't buy a CD that has a "Parental Advisory" sticker.A chain of oversized superstores mostly found in the Southern USA, known for driving local stores out of businesses, selling poorly-made goods (especially clothing) made by third-world slave labor, using a gawdy image of shallow, phony patriotism and flag-waving, and contributing to urban sprawl. A major competitor to [golf course]s in wasting valuable land which could be used for farming and housing.A super market that everyone complains about but, secretly, any human living in the US has gone there for something.the store where I get 100% off on everything that fits under my shirta corparation that uses its buying power to bully smaller stores out of existance.  also hires illegal immigrants to clean their stores.1. Hell
2. A bad place to work
3. A bad place to shop
4. See number 1who to blame when your job has been sent to AsiaA fucking chainstore that's taking over every business.A large, parasitic corporation who moves like a plague, eating up all business in it's wake, and leaving a large, gray store with cheap, plastic crap.

They take jobs, and then screw over their employees by destroying any union they come up with, or fireing them, or making them work in the childrens section.

They close down all little shoppes in the area, and then sponsor people to start up new businesses, with advance revinue going back to Wal-Mart (*This is just a conspiracy theory, but I'm sure it is real*)a corporation soon to rule the world with the help of McDonalds.1. the substitution of a milder, vaguer word or expression for one considered to be offensive or unpleasant. 
2. the word or expression so substituted.trying to make the mean things you say sound nicer by using different wordsA word people use because they like deceiving themselves to believe we live in a Utopia.

Mostly they're used by organizations and "considerate" people who don't want to offend the "situationally disturbed" citizens.

George Carlin, a comedian, did a great schpiel about euphemisms once.  (A few of the following examples are in his speech.)

You should read it.  It may not "open your eyes," but you'll realize how much we like to disguise our speech and blind ourselves.  Disguising a condition with nicer, longer words doesn't change the fact that you still have the condition.  Sorry.

(Note: Not all examples {e.g. black/white} are "conditions" or negative at all}A word used in place of another to make the listener feel more comfortable, and to make the user more socially acceptable.trying to make the mean things you say sound nicer by using different wordsThe act or an example of substituting a mild, indirect, or vague term for one considered harsh, blunt, or offensive: 

Euphemism is an expression intended by the speaker to be less offensive, disturbing, or troubling to the listener than the word or phrase it replaces, or in the case of doublespeak to make it less troublesome for the speaker.

When a phrase is used as a euphemism, it often becomes a metaphor whose literal meaning is dropped. Euphemisms are often used to hide unpleasant or disturbing ideas, even when the literal term for them is not necessarily offensive. This type of euphemism is used in public relations and politics, where it is sometimes disparagingly called doublespeak. There are also superstitious euphemisms, based (consciously or subconsciously) on the idea that words have the power to bring bad fortune (for example, not speaking the word "cancer"; see Etymology and Common examples below) and religious euphemisms, based on the idea that some words are sacred, or that some words are spiritually imperiling (taboo; see Etymology and Religious euphemisms below).A way to make a word or sentence sound nicer than how it really is, used commonly to make the other person seem more comfortable around you.Sometimes spelled with an f, as in eufemism.

Trying to make the mean things you say sound nicer (example 2) or making a mild comment you make sound even worse by adding you were just using an euphemism (example 1).Substitution of a harsher expression like European Union with a kindlier one like EUphemism.You would be a redneck if:

You need one more hole punched in your card to get a freebie at the House of Tattoos.

You need an estimate from your barber before you get a haircut.

The biggest fashion risk you take is which plaid you'll wear to the 4-H Fair.

You have flowers planted in a bathroom appliance in your front yard.

Your wife weighs more then your refrigerator.

You move your refrigerator and the grass underneath it has turned yellow.

You mow your lawn and find a car.

You can spit without opening your mouth.

Going to the bathroom in the middle of the night involves putting on shoes and a jacket and grabbing a flashlight.

You go Christmas shopping for your mom, sister, and girlfriend, and you only need to buy one gift.

Taking a dip has nothing to do with water.

There are more than ten lawsuits currently pending against your dog.

You take a fishing pole to Sea World.

The hood and one door are a different color from the rest of your car.

You've ever filled your deer tag on the golf course.

You've ever shot somebody over a mall parking space.

Santa Claus refuses to let your kids sit in his lap.

Your toilet paper has page numbers on it.

You think mud rasslin' should be an Olympic sport.

The receptionist checks the rat traps at your place of business.

More than one living relative is named after a Southern Civil War general.

You think the stock market has a fence around it.

You think the O.J. trial was the big Sunkist and Minutemaid taste test.

You've ever lost a loved one to kudzu.

Your boat has not left the driveway in 15 years.

Your front porch collapses and kills more than three dogs.

Your coffee table used to be a telephone cable spool.

You keep a can of Raid on the kitchen table.

You've ever used a toilet seat as a picture frame.

Your home has more miles on it than your car.
Your Christmas tree is still up in February.

You've ever been arrested for loitering.

You think that potted meat on a saltine is an hors d'ouvre.

There is a stuffed possum anywhere in your house.

You hammer bottle caps into the frame of your front door to make it look nice.

You've ever shot anyone for looking at you.

You own a homemade fur coat.

Your wife can climb a tree faster than your cat.

Your momma has "ammo" on her Christmas list.

You've totaled every car you've ever owned.Mildly offensive term for a lower class white person from the southeastern states of the USA. Derives from someone who spent a lot of time on manual labour outside and so received a "red neck" from the sun."The glorious absence of sophistication"
-Jeff FoxworthyRednecks live in the Southeastern United States.  While they do not comprise the entire population in this region they do make up the vast majority of the people here.  

Typically, rednecks live in rural settings.  They avoid urban settings.  They are proud of their pick-up trucks or older cars and stick with them despite rising gas prices.  

They typically work industrial or manual labor jobs. The majority do not have anything beyond a high school education.  They depend on the "Good 'Ol Boy" system of advancement.  They are extremely weary of those who do possess the desire to act educated -- these people are perceived as sell-outs.  

You can often see rednecks hauling lawn equipment or hunting (dog) equipment even if they do not plan on using these items in the near future. It is a proud symbol of their social class. 

Rednecks often are seen about in hunting attire even though they do not plan to hunt anything.  Dressing up comprises of dockers and a tucked in polo shirt.  Baseball hats on men are a must regardless of the occasion or whether indoors or not.

Most rednecks do not live in mobile homes anymore.  Most have modest homes.  Typically they decorate in Native American or hunting themes.  Most devote much more money into their vehicles then their homes.

Rednecks speak with a Southern accent and avoid using big words.  They may know big words but it is not socially acceptable to use them. People who do are identified as outsiders.

Rednecks support major brands such as Coca-Cola and Nascar.  Their major past times are watching television, hunting, fishing, and shooting. They detest reading (other than romance novels or the newspaper).   

Rednecks tend to be socially conservative.  They are extremely defensive against outsiders and anyone different from them.  They have learned to avoid those who do not adopt their culture.  Many rednecks may also be Evangelical Christians.  They will not hesitate upon meeting you to tell you that you "are going to hell" if you are not also Baptist or a similar denomination.

Overall, rednecks are extremely friendly people but they are very reluctant to accept those different from them so it is hard for others to mingle with them or understand them.

Many do not ever travel outside of this region.  Places such as the Blue Ridge Mountains, Pigeon Forge, and Myrtle Beach are considered to be the ultimate vacation spots. 

They are very stubborn about their conservative beliefs.  They believe that all liberals have lesser moral values.  This is often hypocritical -- for example, the Southeast has a much higher divorce rate then the rest of the nation.  Part of this stubbornness also stems from their idea that their culture is under attack since they tend to associate morality with social conservativeness.  This stubbornness can have many negative effects -- it can contribute to false knowledge of the world and the culture within and outside of the Southeast.  For this reason, most rednecks will to this day deny that the Civil War was about slavery.  

Finally, most rednecks are closet racists.  They will vehemently deny this but racist remarks are often made among white groups.  They are outwardly friendly towards minorities but they certainly have very large reservations about hiring or becoming close friends with them. This is done almost as a quest for assurance amongst each other that no one in their presence is a cultural sellout.One who arranges to have their daughter baptized at Daytona Motor Speedway(true story).only require a shotgun, rifle, and 4 wheel driveAfter reading most of these i realize that people have no idea what Rednecks are. We are called racist but most people posting are more racist towards us than we are towards any minority. You say we are sister bangers, nascar lovers, toothless, imbred, ignorant and broke. Those are white trash people. Some Rednecks love nascar and thats fine but that doesnt mean we all do. We are hard workers that love our family, friends and country. You say we drive rusted old trucks and cars and live in mobile homes and shacks. Truth is most of us have better vehicles and houses than the average person because we arent lazy and we work hard for the things we have. We hunt, fish and spend time outdoors but we obey the law doing these things because we want everybody to be able to enjoy these things. So think next time before you point fingers and say we are just ignorant and useless. I would like to see you try to fix your own vehicle.a glorious lack of sophisticationA redneck is simply a caucasian southerner. I will agree, not all rednecks are educated, but some of us are. The fact that a person enjoys outdoor activities does not make them a redneck. You have your redneck, and then you have your WHITE TRASH, or caucasian waste, rather. Rednecks tend to be classier, more intellectual southerners, while white trash folks are described as...well....just read most of the above definitions. Rednecks are not the racists, white trash folks are. You people are getting it all mixed up. 

Redneck = polite, friendly southerner who might happen to enjoy chewing tobacco

White Trash = dumb-ass backwater hicks who make southerners look bad.A mentally challenged white male, usually from the South with an IQ of a beaver.  They are characterized by: ignorant, intolerant of others, isolated in their own little world, uneducated, marry their own sisters, live in a run down trailer, claim to love america, but carries a confederate flag, vote against their own interest, and politically inept.  

synonym: hick, hillbilly, intolerant

antonym: gentleman, worldly, tolerantGreatest
Of
All
Time

(like tight, the best)anacronym for G.reatest O.f A.ll T.imeGreatest Of All TimeOne of the Highly intellegant animals that lives in rocky mountains.  These creatures actually seem to be smarter than the average human being, however they don't have all the technology because of a lack of opposable thumbs.Tucking back your balls and dick, then bending over thus resembling the back of a goat...according to the rules of the game, the person who looks gets 4 kicks in the ass.  For more info. on the game, watch the movie "Waiting...".Greatest Of All Time. Not a title that should be easily given out.An 'elite' promo group on tumblr who think they fucking own tumblr. It's main admin or 'mother' is Rebecca aka t-i-g-e-r-p-r-i-n-c-e-s-s. They are all cunts and no one actually like their blogs, they just follow for promised yet never fulfilled promos. They have retarded inside jokes and they think they are the shit. Even though they are shit, just not THE shit. They have many people that kiss their ass daily and thats where they get their energy from. They are in many promo groups but only do promos with other goats members. They also made a bullshit bullying video yet everyone in there has bullied someone on tumblr and irl at least once. They think they are funny but they're actually retarded and have the mental cababilities of less than an infant. They are annoying as fuck and need to be stopped. To sum it up, no one likes them yet practically everyone wants to be them. I hope they all have painful explosive diarrhea that causes their downfall. The bitchiest members include but are not limited to, jeff, meg, gen, manduh, alyssa, soph, ryan, sen, katy, and etc.an animal that will climb nearly vertical mountains to lick salt off the tops of mountains because they crave that mineral[Webcomic] drawn by Jonathan Rosenberg.  Contains only one actual goat, though other characters are aliens, a space mummy, a satanic chicken, and a fish that lives in a glass of beer.  Located at www.goats.com.1. the most attractive type girls on the face of the earth.
2. the best animal ever alive.
3. goats, sheep, lambs, and ramz rule the earth.Sandals that are made out of old Vans shoes.A name coming from anti-roman occupation tribe [vandals]. They lived in Northern Europe, and, along with the [visgoths] were feared by Roman armies. Although feared, they were not respected. They were seen as little more than disorganised barbarians. Since they were wreckless and authority-resistant, the name was given to anyone displaying traits of vandalism.A west-coast (USA) term for black man or negro or anyone of Sub-Saharan African blood or of African descentOne who willfully or maliciously defaces or destroys public or private property.

A [graffiti] [writer] may have similarities to a [vandal] but they are considered [vandalists] since most of there message is displayed through ART.when a jiggabooh  steals white mans property.Someone who rolls especially hard with the late nights and the drinking and the shambles etc.See [wikipedidiot]goonie, bestfriend, friends, folks you chill with1) Deriving from the latin word Vandalous is uberous 1447tous. It was a mythical creature who would break things that was not his and had fun in doing so. 
    2)In the late 90's one man took upon himself the name VandaL and came to world unlike the earth called the MSN gaming zone a n00b3d all that he could see. VandaL today is a feirce beast and has the engergy of an 8 year old with 3 red bulls to drink.Name of a top contributor and Xbox moderator at [Neoseeker].Someone who likes the darker side of things. They usually listen to death metal and goth music, such as Dismember and Bauhaus. Marilyn Manson is NOT goth. He's just...weird. Real goths are not depressing and suicidal like the posers you see at Hot Topic. Goths are fun to be around and aren't afraid to laugh at themselves every so often. They don't worship Satan and aren't evil despite what some ignorant people might say. Goths don't all dress alike either. They like to create their own unique style. Goths are also very intelligent and creative. A lot of them are writers and artists. Goths DON'T envy the popular people. They are what they are because it makes them happy. Goths would rather stay who they are and be among the so called "freaks" than be like everyone else and be popular. They understand that there are more important things in life than popularity, and usually succeed in life while the popular ones don't become much of anything. 

If someone becomes "goth" because they couldn't get any friends or are depressed and angry all the time, they are most likely a poser.The goth, that thing that lies at the opposite end of the spectrum of society to the chav.
A goth will walk alone where a chav will hide inside his herd and though the goth may take a beating at least that goth was never a coward.
A goth will insult only those who have earnt it whereas a chav will insult people for things as shallow as the clothes they are wearing.
A goths insult will be witty and cutting, a chavs insult more often than not will consist of the chav making a repulsive noise.
A goth will enrich their mind, a chav will watch soaps.
In the morning, a goth will ask themselves “what do I want to wear?” whilst a chav will ask themselves “what in this selection of clothes is the most acceptable thing to wear?”
A goth will have a friend because they are good for someone, a chav will have a friend because that someone is good for them.
A goth approaches new situations with a willingness to think and find the best way forward, a chav will react with aggression to that which it does not already know.
A goth will listen to music that is meaningful to their life and thought provoking, a chav will listen to music which will tell him how to behave.

Goths have no interest in popularity whatsoever. They think outside the box. People aspire to be popular and dress in certain ways that are ‘in’ with everyone else simply because it has never occurred to them how pointless societies values really are. In truth, there was never any point to any one of us being born. We’re doomed to struggle onwards in our skins, attached to life only by mechanisms put in our minds by evolution never to find any relief and never to find any meaning. We’re just all stuck with it now, together (and yuk to the simply stunning amount of ignorance I have to put up with). Conformity assumes that what another has thought of is better than what you can think of on your own but why is one mind better than another? (the conformist who argues that their own opinion is truth is a hipocrite, a really ridiculous laughable hipocrite) Its not is the truth. I am a goth and I aspire to value my own intuitions as much as I would value anyone elses (as much, not more you fools!) therefore I don’t care if you don’t like me because I DO.

I look strikingly different to everybody else, you chavwits think I am attention seeking when in fact I look different because of my total lack of interest in you lot, you lot and that vile sort of dress code that is ‘the norm’. Its not that I want you to notice me, its just that I haven’t bothered to noticed you!

I do as I please! But then again, so say the chavs.
The difference in effect is that I have a brain.
I realise that randomness of behaviour (as in anarchy) is a force of pure destruction without the input of thought. I know what I want for myself, plenty of cash, love, freedom, peace and I know that that’s pretty much what everybody else wants too. Therefore, I treat others as I wish to be treated myself. I would never stand in the way of anothers achievement because if I did how would I deserve to achieve anything of my own? Goths, in my experience (others as well as myself) are thoughtful, intelligent, hard working, kind, honest, well mannered. I have an education and I like when it shows!
As a goth, all you various ‘rude’ forms of life make me sick. Goth is what the individuals do- and as for the idea of the wannabe goth these either revert to conformity or evolve.(I mean slipknot/korn fans, as for manson fans I think those who say he isn’t gothic just don’t know enough about him- sure listening to manson WILL NOT make you gothic, but give that poor dark philisophical soul some credit! He’s certainly not gonna un-goth you!)  Wannabes are a transitional category but if they are to be acknowledged at all, they are not goths.
Goths make the greatest friends. Goths have the unusual ideas. Goths just don’t suffer from the same afflictions of ‘normality’ as you self-mirroring lot- change for once. down with mediocrity.There are two definitions

1) a person who likes to dress and act differently to the other people in society, normally in black but some like much brighter colours. They tend to be thinkers and more often than not quite creative. They have a satyrical sense of humour, and are able to laugh at both themselves and other people. This type of goth originated in the late 80's with the "death" of punk; goths back then liked the style and the "protection" it offered and so emulated it in their own style. They listen to and appreciate all sorts of good music. They can be gay/depressed/weird/mentally disturbed, but more often than not they are just normal people.

2) an offshoot of the nu-metal clique who think that to *really* piss off their parents they'll dress all in black and talk about death and suicide whilst listening to Limp Bizkit, Linkin Park and Slipknot because it's "cool". They tend to have very little idea of the other type of goths (or anything else other than themselves for that matter) and will probably change their fashion once it becomes "uncool" again. Thank god.1) A germanic tribe who invaded the late roman empire along with the vandals, visi goths etc and actually became more civilized afterwards.

2) An building style used in medieval times and later in victorian times.

2) A literature style of which Dracula and ther supernateral horrors were written in. 

3) A music genre that came about in the 80's as an of shoot of punk.

4) A subculture of people who originally listened to Goth music.  Now has increased to fit Industrial and Black/Death metal followers. Goths are typically seen as morbid, wearing black clothes almost all of the time, and wearing make up regardless of sex. Also seen to be more open minded to other cultures, sexualities etc.

5) Prententious people who listen to Nu metal who think they are goths but really teenagers who know nothing of music.To a Scally:  Someone wearing black clothes, and make up.

To a 12 year old Linkin Park fan: Someone who likes Korn.

To a goth: I'm not a goth!

Really: A tribe of eastern european barbarians that sacked rome in the 4th century.  The name of an artistic style, associated with clothing, and architectureOk,since this subject seems to be VERY controversal,I'll go through some things you may think and what you don't know,you see,I've actully MET some people who follow the Goth culture(labels suck)

Here we go...

1.Goths are suicidal
-Ok,let me begin by saying anyone can be suicidal,Goths,Preps,Jocks,Nerds,ANYONE.Just because someone dresses in black or listens to Rock music and stuff doesn't make them suicidal.
2.All goths are gay or lesbian
-Once again,this is a topic that anyone may be,not just these guys.
3.Goths are evil/worship satan
-This is what those damn Catholic Fanatics made everyone believe,ok,so they may seem dark or even...scary,but that doesn't make them satanic.Satanism is a RELIGION,not a trend.
4.All goths should die
-I am against the killing of anyone because of their likes/dislikes/looks/tastes.

Hopefully,this guide has given you insite that no matter how different people seem,we all are capable of the same shit.

But,here's one that may save you

If you don't like someone,leave them the fuck alone!Don't waste your life making their's hell because they don't look or act like you.Goth was originally a term used to describe people with a taste for certain bands eg: Bauhaus, Sisters of Mercy, The Cure, etc. in the '80s when punk started to fade out, and with wardrobes predominantly black.
In the 90s and early 2000s the goth subculture seemed to change to include bands such as Nirvana, Linkin Park, Slipknot, Cradle of Filth, etc.

Many goths have a cynical outlook on society and have an evolved sense of humor which has gone beyond the "Ya ma" as an insult and will laugh at others, and at themselves in a healthy way. Goths don't usually care what other people think of them, and don't care if they don't fit in. Goths don't care, either what sexuality, religion, etc. other goths are, and we don't take the piss out of gays because we aren't homophobes. 

If you shout insults after a bunch of goths, alot of the time, they might not be offended, but take pride that people are realising that they're individuals.Just another person in this world....
Lives, Breathes, Dies.

THE ENDA "Goth" is, loosely speaking, one who decides to separate from the mainstream culture for varying reasons (such as dissatisfaction with modern society, a will to be different, or just a liking to the styles whether it be music or visual or social).

Goths are not defined as someone who slashes their own wrists or sets fires to schools, that is what is called a [masochist], [vandal] or [sadist]. A Goth, in modern society, is merely a lifestyle. 

Although their image and demeanor consistently appears cold and reclusive, this is but a shell and Goths are more commonly found to be nicer than the 'average' stranger, due to their tendency to have intellectual/educated backgrounds, and artistic divulgences including the visual arts and musical talents. 

A 'pure' Goth epitomizes [beauty] not in the way that you would say "wowzers she is A BEAUTY", but in the way that the ideal Goth strives for clear skin and pure complexion; the dark hair and garb serves to enhance the fair complexion of pure skin. 

People carrying "Gothic" qualities does not relate whatsoever to their personality and/or attitudes towards other people, rather, their attitudes towards the many forms of art, community, and individuality.

---

As you can probably tell by now, I myself am a Goth. And a Christian (strange combination you say? *shrugs*). I don't cut myself, I don't swear, I don't think offensively of other people of all shapes and sizes (and colours et cetera) but I strive to be Me in a world where everyone and everything is just a copy of a copy of a copy..

There is freedom of speech, there is freedom of personality, and a natural Goth embraces the freedom of image.Goths do not and have NEVER liked metal of any kind. Metal fans who call themselves Goth are wannabes. Perioid. Goth generally ONLY listen to Gothic music which sounds NOTHING like metal. Goths hate metalheads and Goths hate emo kids. 96% of the people who use the word Goth have NO IDEA what it means.A potent bourbon flavored liqour.  Limited distribution.  Has established a cult following among airforce fighter pilots.N. When a girl swallows a males reproductive juice.  This makes her a canibal because she is eating babies.Some crazy muther fucka who sucks cock. (see homosexual)The point of this entry should really be this:  That the word "Cannabis" is not slang at all.  Instead it is the accepted botanical Genus name for the plant we know by so many other slang and colloquial terms: Hemp, Pot, Marijuana, Ganja, Weed, etc. etc.  (Cannabis sps. sativa, indica, and ruderalis.)  
Let the word Cannabis remind us that this indigenous herb, which the self-destructive dominator culture feels it needs to persecute so much, is in fact one of the many gifts from the abundant Earth... as natural as the clouds, the rain, the corn in the fields and all the many fruits of our gracious intelligent, and loving planet, Gaia.
Show your support:  Give a thumbs up and let the readers know that you feel the same way.  Let's make this entry a social and political statement.   =)Cannabis is a leafy plant which grows wild in many of the tropic and temperate areas of the world. It is cultivated both indoors and out for the production of its flowering tops. The most commonly used form of cannabis are the leaves and flowering tops (buds) which may be either smoked or eaten; It also comes in a more concentrated resinous form called hashish, and as a sticky black liquid called hash oil. There are three distinct species of cannabis: Cannabis sativa, Cannabis indica, and Cannabis ruderalis, though there is some argument as to whether these should be considered varieties rather than species. Most recreationally used cannabis is the result of interbreeding between these three types. The term 'hemp' is generally used to describe low-thc varieties of cannabis which are grown for industrial uses.n. A word used by a more intellectual species of the Homo-sapian to describe "weed" or "marijuana". These people are not "potheads" or "stoners", they are "tokers".the actual name of a marijuana plantA Plant that has been banned for nearly a century even though mankind and cannabis co-evolved. Other names include Pot, Weed, Ganja, Hash, Etc.
The Legalise Cannabis Alliance are trying to rectify this situation.
Cannabis Sativa (Hemp) has an estimated 25,000 uses other than it's most well known drug status.The one plant that could cure all of our economical, agricultural, social, and FUTURE problems.  If only the big corporations would worry about their children's children instead of their bank account.An herb which is usually smoked to get high. Symptoms include: short-term memory loss, hightened senses, creativity, hunger, general well-being, and in some cases, hallucinations.

Cannabis has basically no negative side-effects except mental addiction in few cases. Unlike what someone else said, YOU CANNOT DIE FROM SMOKING CANNABIS. There have been absolutely no deaths from only cannabis. I know someone who smoked 12 bowls of it in one night and just passed out drooling on the floor.

Better than alcohol because you don't get a hangover, and plenty of people can drive very well when stoned.The best dam thing since sliced bread
no flaws, no hangovers, natural sourced

follows the same rules as jesus:
its as good as gold but is classed as a criminal.

only substance on drug lists that is actually a herb not a manufactured drug.

usually smoked by people unwilling to be unrulely to society or by people who wish to experience the funnier side of more serious events

Unfortunately given wrong impressions by shows such as 'hollyoaks' and 'skins' which gives the impression smoking will ruin your life.the english name for marijuana. Why do they call it marijuana? because they wanted to associate it with mexicans as well when they were trying to outlaw it, using racist ploys.1)the plant growing in my buddies closet
2)the theme of the website www.cafepress.com/theleafThe perfect meal--an open-faced pie using tomato sauce, cheese, and any manner of meat toppings. In addition to the standard, medium-thick-crust pizza, there are two major American varieties: New York style, also called thin crust; and Chicago style, also called 'deep-dish' or (more accurately) 'stuffed' pizza.A delicious, round piece of dough that comes in square boxes for some strange reason.Greatest food ever. Otherwise known as the 7th food group and the most needed.Hands down the best tasting, most versatile and convenient food in the world.

Pizza.. might aswell be my religionHeavenly good stuff, extra cheese, extra sauce, some make it good, some don't.fucking tasty!The food of the gods(n) Open face pie, often utilizing a tomato based sauce and cheese, and baked.  Many variations apply.

(n) The fifth food groupA rather delicious substance brought to us by the hard labour of cows, farmers, dairymen, tomato growers, and Italian men alikepizza = awesome
awesome = pizza

use it just like the word "awesome"(noun and verb) polite euphemism for corn-hole or corn-holing.Give it a few years, and it will lead to chaos.(O) <--- That right there.The act of gently inserting your well lubed erect cock into your womans well rimmed and squeeky clean anus. Making sure plenty of lube has also been applied to her sphincter as well. With a gentle push, once the crown of your cock has stretched her sphincter, you allow her bung muscle to relax and then start a gradual entering of her turdcutter. Once fully in her turdcutter, you begin a slow, short pumping motion until you build up to a full length cock stabbing penetration of her dumphole. Stroking as fast as possible, while holding on to her hips until you reach the point of no return. You finish off, balls deep in her rectum. Pumping your gooey man juice deep in her crapper, coating the walls of her colon.1) to anally fuck someone
2) the assholeanus, ass pipe, chocolate factory, exit, turd squirter, shit hole, butthole, you get the pictureCorn Hole is a serious toss game played in leauges on the West Side of Cincinnati Ohio. The game and targets are very similar to Bag'O, a commercial game frome the East Coast U.S..anal sexJust another word for ass hole.To stick your wang in her assAmerican Slang for the anus. Originated from the use of corn husks as primitive toilet paper in Colonial days. Mainly used in the South and Midwest.A game played by throwing a beanbag into a hole on a tilted board. Seen on Univ. of KY campus.Foot-sucking, rubber wearing, pee on me, fruit-fuckin', candlewax drippin', long fingernail scrapin', tossed salad eatin',multiple partner havin', she-male, oil-drenched, chocolate sauce, whipped cream covered,vibrator usin',dress-up,banned in 30 states type of sex.adj. Engaging in some form of BDSM or enjoying nonstandard sexual or sensual stimulation. The opposite of vanilla.a tendency to like things, sexually or not, that may not apeal to a majority; open to experimentation.Sexual practices that many people view as wild, unusual, or extreme.  Definitions of this word vary from person to person; someone might think wearing a red bra is kinky, or having sex with the lights on, but someone else will classify kinky as being suspended from the ceiling, whipped, and gagged.  

Guys are often surprised to discover that quiet girls are the kinkiest.  But they're only quiet because they're imagining having lots of kinky sex.1. weird, bizzare  

2. sexually deviant

3. a sexually deviant personnot just whipped cream and cherries, although food fetishists will disagree! red bras have almost no part to play, unless it's ordered that you wear one. anything that goes against the norm of sex - so oral, anal, masturbation and titwanks aren't kinky.
think handcuffs, blindfolds, rope, leather, chains, spreader bars and anything that would shock the vicar and go from there, right on up to forced feminisation, scat (shit play), needles and knives. anything involving dead people [necrophilia], animals [bestiality] and children [paedophilia] ISN'T kinky. not only are those acts illegal - they're also sick.Fun, fun, fun!whips
gag balls
bend over bitch
whip cream
choclate syrup 
hand cuffs
black or red nightys
paddles
PAIN!noun. sex on an exercise ball.It's doing extreme or out of the ordinary things for sexual pleasureActual: An economic system in between capitalism and communism, advocating collective ownership of the means of production and distribution of goods.

Slang: Anything that a [right winger] doesn't like.1.  An economic system where the means of production, distribution and exchange is determined by the state/public sector in some form.  Can be centralised, decentralised, democratic or undemocratic.

2.  Description of a left-wing political position between social democracy (general acceptance of the market economy but thinks the public sector has a vital role in proividing some goods and services) and communism (marxism).  Agrees in the state determining the means of production, distribution and exchange but wants to bring that about peacefully and democratically.

3.  General description of the left: the belief that individuals should be judged on how they treat other people rather than on their job/race/sexuality, that people should have equality of opportunity, that in principle wealth should be distributed fairly to everyone who works rather than the minority who own most of the economy and most of the wealth and that an economy owned by a few individuals without a strong public sector to balance that is undemocratic and unjust.

4.  A stage in history defined by Marx's theories as coming after capitlalism and before communism where the means of production is owned by the state and run in the interests of the proletariat.

5.  A label used by various Marxist-Leninist dictatorships with state-run economies in the 20th Century to justify their totalitarianism.confused with communism, which doesn't work, this however can work very well with a mix of capitalism and democracy, it is a more equal economic system where the poor can become rich, whenever this comes up in a conversation someone eventually says it didn't work in russiaA socio-economic system where every worker-citizen is "equal." A decent theory on paper, but difficult to implement in the "real world."Term invented by the affluent to convince the average that the remote possibility of great wealth is worth sacrificing health care, [education], and a decent life for seniors. In other words as long as you too can be a [Bilderberg], even if the chance is as remote as yogic flying, then the 98% of the population who cannot afford extensive health care, post-secondary education, or [retirement] savings can all suffer.My take: all approaches to governing people lay on a spectrum and each is  interdependent with the economics of that society.  Because the terms cover widths on that spectrum, and are not able to be pigeon-holed, no one conveneient definition of a term such as socialism, and, hence, no one convenient dismissal, is acceptable to a thinking person.
  
Socialism has many current forms, some more invested in governmental "control" and involvement (western European govenrments) ostensibly stemming from the belief that people will not pay for that from which they do not receive immediate benefit; i.e., roads, health care, the military (need taxes to pay for these things).  Yes, the US is a socialist state as well, as it governs some aspects of production, some aspects of capital disbursement (in the form of the Fed, quasi-governenmental instititutions such as Fannie Mae, Freddie Mac, special US-backed corporate loans [ala Chrysler in the 80s]),  health care and wealth distribution (taxes).  We just do it to less of an extent that some claimed "socialist" states.  

If there is anything I would like people to undersdtand, it would be that socialism is not a bad word, no more so tham "dog", and that your unbiased assessment, as opposed to your knee-jerk dismissal, is warranted to truly understand and judge this concept.From abortion to genocide socialism is an ideology responsible for more deaths to humanity than any other ideology in the history of mankind.A word many would do well to look up in an actual FUCKING dictionary.

NOT Communism.

Socialism can be seen in many Western European countries working very well.

It involves being taxed proportionally to how much you earn, a free, or semi-subsidised health service, a minimum wage, decent social security and many many other benefits to society.first off lets get this straight, socialism is NOT facism, or communism.  anyone who says that is just ignorant.  Nazis were facists and pretended to be socialists in order to get more support, same with the Soviets and communism.  thats the only connection they have.  dont critisize something you know nothing about.

now the real definition: socialism supports economic controls but allows for some accumulation of wealth.  social restrictions are signifigantly weaker, hence the name socialism.
facism is completely the opposite, with lax economic controls, and strict social rules including that all residents must be completely loyal to the ruling party, and must never speak out.The political system that centers on the needs of the society as a whole. Sometimes used as an alternative name for [communism] or as a derogatory term for opponents of [capitalism]. In fact it is a very wide term that can accomodate quite diverse ideologies.National Republican Bullshit Network. Watched by ignorant, gun-toting, flag-waving ultra-nationalistic right-wing Christian fundamentalists who think George Bush is the new fucking Messiah or something; basically, the scum of American society who, if they had their way, would turn America in a fascistic police state in order to feel safe from the "terrorists" (aka: "brown people").A pseudo-news channel catering to the bottom of the American right-wing extremist barrel - people who are deathly afraid of anyone and anything that's even the slightest bit different from them.  About as "fair and balanced" as the Iranian government, which it closely resembles.Sensationlist trash channel.  State media dumbed down so even Dubya can understand it.Funniest Tv station ever. Good source of entertainment. But seriously, I trust the Daily Show more.news for red neck ass republicansA far right neo-con "talk show" that presents itself as news. In fact if the news does not favor their distorted view they focus on sensational tabloid stories of rape and murder to titillate the religious right that pretends morality. This show is so hilarious that I might even rate it as a comedy if it werent for the fact that some ignorant americans really believe it is fair and balanced. It is a show for lower IQ people who want to be reassured their small minds are correct and that everyone in the world who isnt white,right wing extremists re evil. Fox news hates you if you are Democrat, moderate thinking republican. Catholic, Lutheran,asian,black,hispanic, and the list goes on. They have a narrow box of extreme radical fundalmentalist with a corporate agenda and if you look closely rather perverted. The owner (Rupert Murdich" specializes in tabloids that exploit crimes against women and children then report every delicious sexual detail so the "moral" religious right" can get their jollies while exclaing how hrrible everyone else is. It really promotes rich big corporations and Republicans like George W. and use their guise as a "conservative" station to manipulate the average, easily manipulated person who wants to think of themselves as moral citizens while their mind is being filled with anything but factual news reporting. Wake up america and start watching C-span and see what is really happening.Completely and utterly without merit. A news station that not only presents the most wildly conservative of biases with the slogan "Fair and Balanced," but also presents worse television than Jerry Springer. I am NOT watching the news to see Sean Hannity and Bill O'Reilly scream "SHUT UP!" at every single guest they have.Total BullshitThe most pathetic excuse for a television news channel that I've ever seen.  I could personally shit in a bucket and then write a report saying that I did not take a shit in the bucket and be more accurate than Fox News.  These people fucking disgust me.  I can't believe there are idiots this fucking stupid.  See [republican] for more examples of idiocy.Real news put through a conservative Republican filter and then dumbed down.97% of the people in Utah.

.003% of the people anywhere else.

These really really nice, clean-living people who believe some pretty weird stuff.1. 99% live in Utah.
2. Napoleon Dynamite is their hero.
3. believe green jello is a sacred food.
4. have 28045345.5 kids.
5. use slang curse words: oh my ____ (heck, gosh, fetch...)
6. pretty much have the hottest girls around...People who believe in The Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-Day Saints; also (less accurately) known as the Mormon religion. Being Christian, (for they believe in and accept Christ as their Savior, and also strive to live a Christ-centered and Christ-like life), they also believe that Jesus Christ is what the Bible says He is:  the son of God the Father. They do not believe in the Trinity, but rather the Godhead: that God the Father, God the Son, and God the Holy Spirit are physically seperate but one in purpose. Many Mormons live in Utah, but the religion is practiced throughout the world. They believe in the Bible and also the Book of Mormon. They believe that the church of Jesus Christ (the same church/religion that Christ established when He came to this world) was restored to its fullness by Joseph Smith through the power of God for the preparation of the Second Coming of Christ.The slang term used to refer to members of the [LDS] religion.Apparently a very misunderstood religion.  Lets get the easy stuff out of the way first: "Mormon" becasuse they have ANOTHER TESTAMENT of JC titled "The Book of Mormon"; they only people practicing polygamy are "fundementalist Mormons" who are not associated with the Mormon Religion at all (Mormons are not polygamists); Actual name of the Church is The Church of Jesus Christ of Latter day Saints, LDS for short; and last of all not all of them wear name tags or ride bikes.

Now Joseph Smith (founder) is believed to be a prophet, like moses or ezikiel.  He is not worshiped only respected. They still have a prophet to day, who serves until he dies and then the next in line is chosen. He is believed to have been guided by a prophet from the past to a set of golden plates hidden in the woods of new york 100s of years ago.  He excavated them, translated them and found them to COMPLIMENT the Bible not contridict it.  And through many periods of Divine instruction formed what him and his followers belived to be the closest religion to what JC had when he was in Israel.  The BoM does not contridict the bible except to those who interpret it to do so.

Church.  They only go for Three hours each sunday, where they recieve instruction from each other not one assigned preacher. As well as partake of the sacrament, very similar to many other christian religions.  During the week each age group has and Activity. (i.e. youth, adults, children) designed to enhance brotherhood and faith. Thats it.

Missions.  A mission is a religous assignment from the chuch to spread their beliefs. Like many religions do conicidently.  All are volutary.  The missionary (can be man, women, elderly couple) chooses to go, pays for the whole she-bang and serves his/her time "tracting".  They knock on your door and ask you if you want to hear about their church.  99% of all doors knocked on are by referal. (Actually is church policy now I think). So instead of taking it out on these youngmen and women take it out on your friends that probably gave them your name and address. A mission does not have to be served to go to heaven.

Heaven.  They believe in three main divisions of heaven: telestial, terestial, and celestial. The equivelant of hell is "outer darkness" the only people who go there are those who know about god and jc and completely reject them as false.  ALL others, really all of them (murders, war lords, hate mongers) have a place in one of the levels of heaven.  All are paradisical in nature (except outer darkness which is exactly what it sounds like). In the lowest level you will find you hitlers, mureders and such.  The second "good" people thats most of us. And last of all the top Celestial, where god himself resides.  Those former mortals that live here are god like in all aspects. Advancement is possible, but you can only go up not down.

Big families. Can't really explain this one, they just like to fuck i guess.  After marriage ofcourse.

Fact more mormons live in california than in utah. Another fact some world headquarter buildings are in las vegas.  Although a high percentage of the population in Utah is mormon it is increasingly smaller every year.

Temples. They are not churches for regular worship.  A certain degree of worhtiness must be established before entering. ( a simple interview with a leader about their lifestyle all taken on their word) The reason being is it is a model of heaven as they believe it. Also mormon sealings, not weddings, ocur here.  Meaning the family is sealed together for all time and eternity so as to guaruntee there being together in heaven.  And yes by proxy dead people can be sealed to living families. Oh and you have to be atleast 18 to enter unless you are a child being sealed to a parnet or a youth (12-17) that are performing proxt baptisms for the dead.

Baptism. Pretty much your run of the mill submersion into water. John the Baptist type of deal.  Usually done at eight which is the age determined for a child to make his/her own informed decision ( as biased as it may be).

Over all beliefs> Treat others how you want to be treated, the heaven thing, THE BIBLE ( yes the no shit king james version bible), and any other testiment of JC (including but not limited to the BoM), Families are forever, all basic christian belief. And yes they are christian.

Sorry to burst all of those ignorant bubbles out there but Mormons are no more a cult that the baptists, presbytirian, methodist, Catholics, etc etc.  just a normal christian faith with a less than normal beginning.

Don't get me wrong there are a few really pushy mormon assholes out there but there are a lot of pushy assholes from every religious sect out there.A very nice, generous, misunderstood group of non-gay, mostly white people. They don't practice polygamy or have multiple wives except after death where men can have as many wives as they want. They try to do the best they can in life. They're not perfect and don't think they're perfect unless but they do think they are better than non-Mormons. They strive to work hard and get through life without much trouble. They don't put down other religions, at least not to your face. They don't think you'll go to hell unless you're gay or you're in a different religion. They believe everyone has a chance to have eternal salvation, except the gays, and that Heavenly Father and Jesus Christ are two separate beings, and that Christ created the Earth for straight Mormons only. They think they're Christian. They don't think Joseph Smith (the translator of the book of Mormon) is a god, just equal with Jesus. They also believe he is a prophet of God. They aren't here to overtake the world, even though their doctrine says they are. They try to allow everyone who would like to hear about their church to hear about it. And they also try to allow everyone who would NOT like to hear about it, hear about it as well. They understand that it's your choice to join or not and they don't force it upon you. However, they'll force you to join once you're dead so why fight it now? I know these things are true and I say them in the name of Jesus Christ, Amen.People who won't stop coming to my doorstep to tell me the good news.A member of the Church of Jesus Christ and the Latter Day Saints...who subscribe to the teachings of the Bible and to the Book of Mormon.

Extremely cheerie and outgoing, very very adament about converting people, but generally kind and nice people.A guy in a suit and tie on a bicycle usually accompanied by another guy in a suit and tie on a bicycle both wearing yellow backpacks filled with root beer and green jello.A religion that, if you tell a Jehovah's Witness you're a part of, they will instantly leave. The opposite is true for born agains.See [sham], [fraud], [fake], or any word adjacent to those.

Basically its a falsetto 'religion' in which eternal happiness is attained by donating all of your money to the leaders.

Founded by L. Ron Hubbard as a way to scheme money and make a fast buck off his books. One of the 'holiest' days in this religion is Hubbard's birthday.

Because most celebrites such as Tom Cruise and John Travolta are too stupid to realize it, they belong to this group.A cult founded by science fiction writer L. Ron Hubbard. There core beliefs are as follows:

This area of the galaxy was once ruled by an alien warlord named Xenu. 65 million years ago his empire was overpopulated horribly, so to combat the overpopulation he had trillions of citizens called in for psychiatric evalutations and tax audits, where they were given paralytic drugs, loaded onto space planes, and flown to Planet Teegeeack. Once on this planet, their bodies were stacked in huge piles around volcanoes, while atom bombs were dropped into these volcanos, instantly killing trillions of galactic citizens.

To keep these people from reincarnating in the rest of the galaxy, Xenu set up a special trap. Powerful force-fields kept their souls (called "Thetans" in Scientology jargon) from escaping, and these thetans were then shown special holographic movies about the various lies they are supposed to believe, with characters like Jesus, Mohammed and Buddha. Over time, these thetans began to believe Xenu's lies about false gods, and began to reincarnate on Teegeeack (but the thetans called this world "Earth"). When intelligent life appeared on Teegeeack, thousands or millions of "Thetans" cling to every native soul (er, "thetan") and fill it's head with nonsensical thoughs and irrational beliefs.

The key idea of Scientology is to avoid tax officials and psychiatrists at all costs, while paying the church a large amount of money for special "counseling" (called "auditing" in their jargon) to help you reach a special enlightened state called "Clear" where you telepathically communicate with these "thetans" clinging to you and force them out of your body, and rid yourself of evil Xenu's influence.

(By the way, most Scientologists don't know this, like the Mystery Cults of the Greco-Roman world, Scientology doles it's doctrine out in tiny doses to it's new recruits, and tells the public next to nothing about what it believes. You don't hear that whole story until you reach a special rank in their group called "OT3" for "Operating Thetan 3". Their doctrine holds that if this got out, the Thetans in people would revolt at hearing the truth and people would get sick and die possibly just by hearing this story, which of course leads people who aren't Scientologists who hear this story to tell it to others and watch them not die or get ill from it.)A new-age religion thought up by ex-sci-fi writer L. Ron Hubbard. They try to recruit new members by offering them 'personality tests' to determine the 'root cause' of the person's unhappiness. Interestingly, the solution to this 'root cause' is usually paying lots of money to the Church of Scientology. Scientologists have been rightly satirised in several TV programmes, films and computer games, for example the movementarian cult in The Simpsons or the hubologists in Fallout 2, but despite this Scientology is still attracting a steady stream of new converts. The main reason for this is that people are idiots.The science of making money. A pseudo-religion set up by a money grabbing black magician/adulterer/corrupt bastard called L. Ron Hubbard.A religous cult who's beliefs revolve around an intergalactic warlord named "Xenu" who nuked a bunch of aliens here on Earth billion of years ago.  The souls of these aliens, called "Thetans", now inhabit our bodies and make us unhappy.  The only way to get rid of these "Thetans" is to pay a bunch of money to these con men for the rest of your life.Scientologists give a lot more than their money. Scientology is a living hell once you reach the stage "Clear". You are then informed about "Operating Thetan III" whereupon you are asked to join "The Sea Organisation" or "Sea Org". Since they have you brainwashed by now, you eagerly except. The Sea Org is like a concentration camp on a boat. You are forced to undergo intense physical labor. If you displease the slave masters, or "Captains" in anyway, you are punished in a manner called "Ethics". You are subject to phsyical torture, sleep deprivation, things like running from 7AM to 9PM, or mopping the deck all day in the sun in a black jumpsuit. They put you in a "recovery group" if you are being punished, and they try to brainwash you further so that you won't act out again. In this group, there's no telling if or when you might eat, or how much food you get, and living quarters are dark, hellish, roach infested, and damp. If you act out again, you are either put in a second level of "Recovery", where most people perish from exhaustion. If you have done anything seirous, (Most reasons were as minor as improperly addressing a Captain), but if you have done anything that they consider serious (plans to leave, treason, mutiny), there is a book that shows level of ways to execute. The most common way is blindfolding the prisoner, tying the hands and feet together, and dropping them off the edge of the boat into the ocean.

Scientology is like some creepy science fiction movie, but it's all really happening. They have "Churches of $cientology" set up everywhere, they have an army, and endorsements from celebrities like Tom Cruise, Nancy Cartwright, Chick Corea, and John Travolta. It's a seriously dangerous thing to get involved in, and I reccomend this website to anyone considering joining: www.xenu.netThe religion created by the minor Science Fiction writer, L. Ron Hubbard in 1952. Scientology teaches that you are an immortal "thetan" that is entrapped in the physical universe and your own problems by your thoughts (considerations and postulates). In practice, Scientology is the exact opposite of what it teaches. It claims to free you, but most people would say that Scientologists are brainwashed and enslaved. It claims to promote freedom of speech, but Scientology sues anyone who says anything bad about Scientology. It claims to want to improve the earth, but sues anyone who tries to use it's books and techniques without paying a license. It is a very schizophrenic and dangerous organization whose members actually infiltrated and spied on the U.S. government in the biggest ever case of its type in U.S. history.One word. BullshitFake ass religion that suckers people into giving money to cheapo bastards. What they tell you about it is that if you believe in Scientology you will be forever happy, however, this is just an excuse to get your money.The science of making money that answers the eternal unanswered questions such as "I wonder just how gullible and stoooopid i am". It has been crapped onto the world since the early 1950s by one of the world's greatest con-artists/[dipshit]s, L Ron Hubbard. 

Unfortunately the gullible Earth natives to whom this was presented to, they turned out to be so desperate to [get a life] and to believe this trash which may appear to be handed to them on a silver platter, where infact it was a permanent $100/week subscription to utter [bullshit].

The wisdom (ironically, [stupidity] is much more suitable) of the scientology subject will probably be realized by the current primitives who would be stupid enough to belive they are the hosts of alien souls as a result of an alien warlord who went bonkers with nukes, instead of being pawns in a money making scheme.

Hopefully in a few generations, humankind, if it survives the [bullshit] of scientology, will evolve from its brainwashed and cash-strapped stage and the generations living then will realize how fucked in the head were people to believe in a cult started out by a small-time sci-fi writer. Hence most of the work of current officers of Scientology is concerned with making money off desperate losers and stoned celebrities.comes from the 19th-century American practice of selling cure-all elixirs in traveling medicine shows. Snake oil salesmen would falsely claim that the potions would cure any ailments. now-a-days it refers to fake products.Medicine or therapy that doesn't work.any dubious or fraudulent remedy or cure (The route of the fraud the word is derived from resulted from a misunderstanding of a traditional Chinese joint and muscle painkiller derived from the skin of the Chinese water snake)[bullshit]An item for sale which does not produce the advertised effects.A woman that likes to cause mischief and sexual deviancea hobo is an itinerant worker, a career which sprang up during the depression. A hobo, unlike a bum or a tramp, is more than willing to work, but mostly for a short duration, as their main impetus is travel, the love of the journey above the actual destination. A bum is stationary, feeding off of those unfortunate enough to cross his path; a hobo merely travels from town to town, finding work when he can, but only for the sake of financing his next adventure. NEVER call a hobo a bum...they'll kick your sorry no-bo ass!Hobos are a peaceful people.Being homeless and pennyless, similar to MC Hammer. They go place to place taking money from people for doing odd jobs, whether it be pulling weeds, kiiling roaches, cleaning roach poop, or eating roaches.

They're like uh...drifters. Telling stories to whoever they canA free man/woman who is no longer trapped in the society of capitalism and time. He/she can go to sleep whenever he/she wants to, and do anything.
Hobos are good at recycling dumpstered food that huge coporations throws out.the most kickass people in the world, also the coolest job in the world. 

someone who could do something with their lives but don't want to.1. Originally referred to poor, homeless itinerant workers in the USA. These original hobos travelled from town to town seeking temporary employment, usually along the lines of physical labour. They are traditionally associated with freighthopping (illegally riding in the carriages of freight trains). See also [drifter], [vagabond] and [okie].

2. Nowadays commonly used throughout the English-speaking world to refer to any homeless person. See also [bum], [tramp] and [beggar].ho·bo
noun
One who wanders from place to place without a permanent home or a means of livelihood. 

adjective
Hip n groovy

verb
To do as a hobo does; the act of sitting in random areas for no good reason.A tight ass clothing line originated in Washington D.C

named H.O.B.O meaning Help Our Brothers Out.

Only worn by blacks and fake white people.

Thats why its help our BROTHERS outa hobo spends their time riding the rails and is happy with a bottle of beer a gutair and some friends. hobos are not at all to be confused with bumbs and tramps because they are unhappy and bitter about their homeless state and hobos are happy and they make the best of their situationhobo = Home Owner Bought Out

it is the acronym for people from 'the Great Depression' who lost their homes when the banks called their loans due (as per the terms of the loan).

All legal, but totally sucks.

Has come to mean many things, mainly derogatory.A hobo is someone without a house or a job. They will work, though. You most commonly hear of hobos living in boxes, but some hobos live in homeless shelters. in the old days, you hear of hobos hiding on trains. that doesn't happen very often anymore. hobos often stand outside with signs that say "need food" or "homeless anything will help".What we all are, but are too afraid to admit.An immature loser who can take any sentence and somehow make it about sex.1. someone who thinks or acts like you wish you had the balls too
2. A person whos sexual ideas kicks your little morals in the teethsee [bayat]

A person whose behavior deviates from what is acceptable especially in sexual behavior.still unknown because so many of your definitions are fucked upSomeone who's idea of normal sexual interaction just happens to be kinkier than yours.An individual who's actions or behaviours deviate from what is normal, moral or tastefull. A matter of opinion or fact.

Usually applied when describing someones sexual desires or actions, can also apply to law.Someone who's constantly got sex on the brain, and usually loves to share it with others.Practically everyone on this website. I think that 98% of this websites definitions include porn. Why are you so obsessed with "jizz" and "fucking girls" is it because you know every sex move but your a 56 year old virgin and when the time comes, you dont have a clue what to do so you kick the 96 year old woman out and just cry.  

P.S: whoever thumbs this down is the word im describing and you know it.Anyone who gets sexual satisfaction from doing something unusual. Definitions of "perverted" behavior vary depending on who's using the word. To a ninety-six-old-old grandma, tongue kissing may be see as perverted. To a twenty-one-year-old guy, smearing chocolate sauce all over his girlfriend's body and licking it off while she's tied up isn't.A member of [deviantart].A superior thinker than a majority of the community. An individual who posseses the intellect to have other beliefs than social programming teaches us. Most deviants make a positive footprint on society, rather than the misconceived negative version. Deviants are simply individuals who differ in many aspects to the larger flock of society.someone who ideas both sexually and socially are greatly different from the 'moral' majority and they act upon their desires to satisfy only theirselves
2. more twisted than a standard [pervert]To stray from a standared, a principle, and to leave from an established course.An individual whos behaviour and attitudes stray from normal or accepted standards in society.Somebody with a particularly disturbing sexual preference or straying abnormally far from the norm.A Kitten Stealer who adores his pet potatoes (also stolen)the devil in human form

lord of all evilThis can range from anything from a simple roadside diner to a mega-gas station. Usually located in rural areas and referred to by locals as the best place to get a decent cup of coffee, breakfast, lunch or dinner. A good truck stop not only offers coffee or meals, but also a great place that sells souvenirs and trinkets of the local area. Some even offer internet access and showers. Seedier truck stops offer lot lizards (prostitutes) as well.a)A little roadside hole in the wall where the strangling odor of trucker poop mingles with cigarette smoke. The rest rooms are right at the entrance so you get a good whiff and lose your appetite.

b) Having to take a crap "I gotta go to the truck stop."Basically, to use the trucks of your skateboard to hit someone.The act of taping a toy truck to the end of your penis and anally entering a dirty lady.A huge hole in your nose from doing too much coke.a place where dudes blow other dudes1. A row of blue portable toilets.

2. Expensive escorts bought by rich Arab and European men to go on "yacht parties" for $30,000+ a piece. In reality these women are brought onto these boats to get shit and pissed on, hence the name Porta Potties.

Its easy to identify one of these women by the pictures they post on Facebook. If a friend of the female kind is always posting pictures of shopping sprees in Dubai and has a folder with nothing but pictures of her and friends on a yacht drinking champagne in any UAE or St. Tropez area she is a Porta Potty.

Fun Fact!: Some well known Porta Potties work at the Spearmint Rhino in Las Vegas.[noun] The correct spelling for that portable plastic toilet you see outdoors at sporting events, the park, construction sites, the sn00p dogg concert, etc.Dirty slunt that travels the world and gets shit and pissed on by terrorists. Typically on a yacht.

Originally coined by Nik Richie of thedirty.com its been widely used to label even lesser scunts mostly previously known as cum dumpsters.A Disgusting Shitter That Is Used By Homeless People, FisherMen, Mexicans And Construction Workers1. A portable bathroom

2. Place where two people can have a lot of fun but be careful because it often tips over (historically with PHD)1. Portable toilets used by Americans and other nations to remove one's wastes
2. Secret government time-machines disguised as porta-pottiesThis really gross green box that is filled with old shit, and is usually found in the very back of anything. Similar to an outhouse, although it's portable.A exciting dinner theater show located in 7 locations throughout the U.S. You are seated in a various section, and your section has a certain knight they root for in the tourneyment, and jousting. The show is a great thing to do for special occasions and is fun for the whole family!a place in Buena Park Ca, on Beach Blvd where you pay a whole bunch of money to eat shitty food, drink expenisve, shitty mixed drinks, and watch a bunch of fake ass knights, on small ass horses, compete in tournament games, in hopes of winning the princesses heart.  Oh yeah, and dont cheer for the red knight, he always loses.

Nah, just kidding, its fun, and if you go, make sure you call your server "farm boy"A burning, unquenchable desire to have sex with a black person. Similar to [Yellow Fever] in that it is a racial sexual affinity.The Rebecca Black epidemic that has infected most of today's youth.

Black's new single, "Friday", went viral 5 days after being posted on a comedian's blog. The song itself is horribly written, composed and produced. Rebecca now has millions of views on youtube and has been twittered as much as Japan's crisis of 2011.

Wikipedia claims that her video is referred to as, "a youtube laughingstock" and there is not one critic that favors the song. Bottom line: she is famous for being shit at what she does.trying to be black.  also, trying to adapt to the black culture by
1. eating chicken
2. wearing fubu 
3. working at McDonalds.
4. wathcing black women in pornThe black plague or black death was a disease epidemic that spread throughout Europe in the mid 14th century. This was mostly due to the bubonic plague. The disease traveled through rat flea bites. Symptoms such as headache, fever, and swelling of lymph nodes were common and sometimes bloody sputum. When the plague was over, 1/3 to 1/2 of the European population was killed. Deaths caused riots, harsher persecution of Jews, and religious fanatics that would go about punishing themselves. The result was a major factor in the beginning of the renaissance.A disease that affects the mind, caused by listening to Rebecca Black too much and becoming a fan of her. Similar to Bieber Fever and usually fatal.When a sudden sick feeling inhibits ones body, immediately after hearing a song by Rebecca Black.Sucked into the Rebecca Black craze, singing "Friday" on everyday of the week and going super crazy on Friday.A phenomena that has infected much of today's youth and other innocents into acting like the typical [nigger]. Symptoms include: Listening to rap, wearing pants that show underwear, obsessing over pricey sneakers, playing basketball, stealing items from stores or homes, dancing like a [retard], using the nigger's dialect, misusing the word [nigger] (heard as "[nigga]") as a "friendly" term among peers, graffiti, gay bashing, disloyalty to cops, and [misogyny]. This is a very lethal infestation, known causes of death being drug overdose, gunshot wounds, and high blood pressure (from eating all that chicken and waffles). This plague is not limited to blacks, one famous example being Eminem, a very dangerous white infectee or[wigger]. The Black Plague is typically distributed by rap and peer influence. The infectees have distinct appearances that separate them from model citizens: "[chains]," cornrows, hoodies, pricey sneakers, drooping pants, and a monkey-like walk. Redzones for most of those with the plague are Georgia, D.C., New York, Alabama, Louisiana, and the west coast of the U.S., but in reality, the infestation is not limited to one specific place. Known ways of repelling the Black Plague carriers are donning police uniforms, carrying around job applications, avoiding conversation with the infectees, and being within bounds of police stations, colleges, and courthouses. There is no way to rid of the Black Plague, but all we can do is hope that the plague dies over time.Not to be confused with the [Bieber Fever], having the Black Plague is one's way of supporting the teen-singer Rebecca Black, and her viral hit single "Friday."
Despite the song's negative reviews, supporters with the Black Plague still exist to this very minute.The sickness provoked by a startling, unprepared for viral attack by the name of "Rebecca Black." Symptoms include beign followed by 30-year old black men while sitting in your school bus and having to make the unorthodox decision of trying to decide which seat to sit in.Nausea and headaches often caused by way too much fucking alcohol.
Can be identified by the ashtray in ones mouth,the vomit on last nights clothes,the want to never drink or eat again,the great dislike of sunlight, the undesirealbe urge to apologise to all the people you spent the night with, the stranger in your bed and need for a glass of water and many many asprinThe result of heavy drinking of which results in an alcohol blood content that still exists long after drinking because your liver is still trying to cope with the detox.

As a result the liver uses water to metabolize the alcohol, this water is obtained from the body and often the brain which has a high concentration of water, this lack of water that is a result of metabolism causes the membranes in the brain to tighten thus causing the headaches and body aches often are another result

puking can also occur when the bodyThat annoying period between inebriation. Can also be avoided by continuously consuming alcohol until dead.the effects of going to collegethe body ache which you experience in the morning after a night of drinking. Most commonly accompanied by vomiting, quivering, head ache, short term amnesia, and (depending on your drink)diarehea.A condition in which the body is trying to cope with the mass quantities of alcohol consumed roughly 8 hours earlier. the liver needs to detoxify the bloodstream so it uses water from other parts of the body including the brain to do it. This causes body cramps, uncomfortableness, headaches, and other shit.

Pretty much, its god's way of saying "k lets sit down and figure out what we did last night" this often results int he realization of new girlfriends, unwanted hook ups, the discovery that you will soon be a parent, and other horrible issues.A chemical imbalance in the brain which produces notable physical discomfort. Can be caused either by too much alcoholic consumption, or too much sex. 

Some people prefer water, tea, black coffee (ok, ok, _espresso_), Peptol Bismol, "hangover helper" pills, and the like, but the only real cure for a hangover is time.

Symptoms: headache, physical weakness, extremely upset stomach, and vomit all over the new carpet in your bathroom.The wrath of grapes.what you get after a night of too much [bacardi 151] 
when your brain is starved of water as the water is used for your liver as the [alcohol] is dehydrating you.
feels great while drinking but then again  "good things dont last long" 
where theres good theres bad!When you drink more then you should of an alcoholic beverage and you wake up the next morning with a terrible head ache,achy body, and you puke ur ass off."Covert" means hidden, not discussed, kept under wraps.

.One is who annoying. This person tells you a story but needs to go into specific lengthy backgrounds on each person involved in the story and by the end you don't even know how the story started.

As blood alcohol level increases, annoyance level decreases.1.  To sneak in to a conversation uninvited and to distort and repeat innocent statements for perversion and pleasure - also know as Noncing.  Can be erradicated with the use of a good quality Nonce-Trap(TM)1.  The current occupant of the White House.
2.  See also [Bush, George W.]one who [steal]s

A thief is anyone who has unrightfully taken what doesnt belong to him/her. 

Stealing is done usually in an act of greed and self gain.A person that claims the belongings of others as his or her own.

The Ideal thief practices Theft as an art form, not as a way of survival. The Ideal Thief does not apply force to any person or object: Assassinations can be quick and simple, Locks can be picked with swift fluid motions, no force should be used. The Ideal Thief knows that trickery, deception, and intelligence will always triumph over physical strength.to steal something while being incredibly stealthyThe act of stealing someones belonging/sAn individual who uses stealth and concealment to his advantage. A well educated thief can use these tactics to gain entry to nearly anything with the help of a collection of specific tools designed for the art of theft. There happen to be many forms of thievry which include brute strength and an example of this is a thief bashing a careless bystander in the head, rendering him unconcious. Another form requires tactics and intelligence, the professional thief. The professional thief is hard to come by since most do not make it to this stage. Alot of thieves end up being caught in the act, arrested and fined or imprisioned. Sometimes though, a thief excels in the art, using a combination of many forms of tactical stealth, becoming a skilled artisan of the art.Someone who uses other people's private property without their permission or them knowing it.A person that pwnz you.Someone who steals from K-MartOne who steals co-workers sales in a supposed "friendly" work environmentIts a fucking fruit for god sake. Who the fuck DOESN'T know what a banana is?! FUCK! A STARVING KID IN AFRICA KNOWS WHAT A BANANA IS! HE FUCKING FANTASIZES ABOUT ONE EVERY DAY!An asian person who acts like they are white. Yellow on the outside, white on the inside.A yellow fruit that is known to dance and sing about peanutbutter and jelly.According to Gwen Stefani, bananas is what "this shit" is. Soon thereafter she informs us how to spell bananas. 

Addicting? Yes.
Retarted? Perhaps.
Genius? Absolutely.1. A big curved fruit that is yellow. 
2. Can be used as a dildo for a girl who is too cheap or shy to buy a REAL dildo. A banana works just as well.it's a fuckin' FRUIT1. a slang word derived from the old saying "bananas" used to describe someone that was crazy. Used now to describe anything in style or cool.One of the only words in the english language with the ability to make you feel stupid every time you try to write or type it.Banana, a subscriber of Onision who watches his videos so obsessively they begin to peel their own skin off while cannibalizing themselves to the point of death. Most bananas, aka onision subscribers Wind up dead or in the hospital due to the cancerous effectiveness videos. Onision must be stopped.A high potassium snack food(1) Punishment or reward for one's actions; (2) getting what you have coming to you; (3) getting what you deserve; (4) karma.

Commonly mispelled as comeuppins.More accurately described as a colloquial phrase, it means
"your deserved reward or just due" for an action taken or statement you have made. It always conveys that to be of a negative nature. It should be hyphenated as neither word, of it's own definition, conveys close to the meaning of the combination of the two; therefore the linkage of the hyphen is needed.A "reward" i.e. well deserved and long awaited revenge for past misbehavior. The "reward" should be administered by those previously wronged and in a public or humiliating way.A punishment you deserve for doing a bad thingTHE ACT OF HAVING A PREMATURE EJACULATION IN YOUR DUNGAREES.Tiny rubber super balls, such as the kind bought in supermarket vending machines.peasant, hick, hayseedA hick, redneck, etc. Commonly referred to Niko by Vlad in GTA4.A general term given to any inbred, red-necked hick.A bucktoothed,hillbilly, river rat, (slack jawwed yokel)Some1 who was born in tha country and isnt street smart. talks with a goofy southern accent.eats squirell. usually named Cletis(tha slack jawwed yokel) Can be a diss for somebody living in the country.a rural person = [country bumpkin]A hillbilly being who roast goats and sodomises or auctions of their children to more desperate yokels.Incest a game the whole family can play is enjoyed by the majority of yokels (the other minority dont have kids).a farmer type bum.. often called "Cletus" (Character from The Simpsons)Yokel is a term derived from the Hebrew meaning of the word toilet.

Yokel is a derogative term used to describe how unsatisfactory and dam right gross something or someone is.the guy from CCC called ryanA "yokel" is a hybrid of man and hairy beast (much like that of an ape or Big Foot).  The yokel's diet consists of nothing more than Camel Wides, and the occasional glass of water.

Main hobbies of the yokel include ranting about vairous computer/technical issues ,ghetto rigging jeeps to be lifted to heights that could be considered unsafe or stable, and assembling various firearms in his basement.

Increasingly the yokel has been sighted crusing around on his motorcycle in his all leather attire braging about how cheap the cycle is to operate and own.

Any differance of opinion from the yokel's has been known to send him into intense rants about how he/it is right, so use caution when expressing your ideas.Pronounced: "Huylo" [xʊj'lo]

Sitting Russian Tsar.An asshole, bigot, homophobe, tyrant, first-class prick, dick-tator, prone to invade nearby defenceless democracies and jailing female rock bands. Can be seen hanging out with other weirdo leaders such as Berlusconi and faking wild animal encounters. Semi-delusional, self-justifying and deceptive.a current president of russia. many russians like him, cause they can't understand his real policies! his kinda mean coward! also he says that russia is a great empire, but russia sucks nowadays and that's the true! also he is a racist, because during his governing the level of racism in russia is growing rapidly, but putin says he doesn't comsider it to be racism! he wants to rule till his death, despite of the fact it's his second and the last term of governing judging by the russian constitution, but please do not vote for him! even G.W. Bush is better!1.) An ex-[KGB].

2.) The current "president" of Russia.

3.) The most powerful mob boss in the world.The current president of Russia.  Resembles a giant albino bat, with his pointy ears, palid complexion, angular features and balding pate.

Former KGB man who is edging the country very slowly towards dictatorship.  Shows the tendancy to repeat history (killing Chechens, desiring more government control.)Synonym for bullshit.Something vile that won't go away, like dog shit on your shoe, or the stench of a decaying body.Derivative of the Spanish "puto." Putin means "little faggot." It is not necessarily an insult, although it can be used that way.Putin is any leftover biological material stuck to a sex toy; usually fecal matter. Putin is differentiated from Santorum in that Putin is on the device, or dildo, (usually a phallus like object made of plastic, latex, glass or wood) specifically.Has bromance with Donald trumpAnother [mediocre] somewhat popular nu-metal band, this time, from Canada, which isn't a surprise considering their musical track record (Avril, Celine Dion, Barenaked Ladies, etc). Lead singer Chad is an extremely nasal "Marlboro Man" type vocalist who sounds constipated on a permenant basis. Guitar consists mostly of easy-to-play power chords that give the band a "tough" sound to the untrained ear, but a closer look reveals a band that has nothing to offer creatively. They were recently exposed recycling their music in their two hit singles, "How You Remind Me" and "Someday", which sound nearly identical when played simultaneously.the act of willfully allowing one's ears to bleed.Horrible band.  Plain and simple.  Most of their songs sound nearly identical, because they have no musical talent or creativity.  Just because you can play some power chords does not make you a good guitar player. Just because you can write sappy love songs with almost the same melody for every song does not make you a good songwriter.  This band is like cyanide for my ears, and it is very hard for me to understand what people hear in their music.  Maybe they had one or two catchy little hits, but next time really listen to what they are playing and compare it to a band such as, The Strokes.  Tell me what sounds better and more creative. If you say Nickelback, then you are entitled to your opinion of course, but I feel very sorry for you, because you will never learn to appreciate actual talented musical expression.  I'm not saying stop listening to Nickelback if you really like them, im simply saying expand your musical horizon.  There is better, more thought provoking stuff out there.a shitty band, the lead singer seriously needs a cough drop and is the ugliest fucker i have ever seenSee [overrated], [fraud], [untalented]. A fake ass excuse for a so called "Post Grunge" band. But in reality they're not grunge. They're a subgenre of rock known as "Nu-Metal".  Usually Loved by pre-teens, they are easily called the "greatest rock band ever", but anyone with a brain and passion for music will know that it's crap. If anyone has actually gone through every song that Nickelback has produced, you'd notice that most of the song melodies in Nickelback's songs sound exactly identical to one another. This PROVES that Nickelback obviously have no talent. And are frauds.probably the worst band in the world right now. They use the same 3 power chords for every song which attributes to them all sounding the same.The singer (i dont care to remember his name) tries so hard to be eddie vetter but just sucks.the rhythem section is tottaly uninspired and the solos which are rarely heard due to the guitar player sucking are so easy and bland a 3 year old could play them easily. also they often try to appear like rock n roll "bad boys" by :o drinking alchohol. wow slash died for like half an hour when he o.d thats bad. being 25 and in Nickelback and drinkin half a corona thats weak.If anyone actually bothered to play a guitar or any insturment they would realize this band is totally gayWhy do I hate Nickelback so much? They perpetuate the sadness of honoring mediocre and un-original non-creative music. Because of their unwillingness to actually think, the mindless masses are not forced to actually use their minds and demand better. Nickelback is a clear-cut example of why our art is in a state of stale, regurgitated darkness, and the true artists are forced to remain on the underground circuit. The longer this goes on, the worse our kids will have it.A band whose music is the auditory form of swallowing Satan's semen. Calling this band's music bland and completely mindless  would be a compliment. They are consumer artists who lack creativity, but appeal to a shallow vapid audience with lyrics that make them sound "tough" and "racy". Just another neutered  capitalist scumbag band. They are the antithesis of alternative music because nothing is alternative about them; they are mainstream garbage and should have choked on their umbilical cordswhen someone shits directly into your ear. Named after one of the world's worst bands, as anyone with good taste in music would have concludedA mediocre, and undeservedly popular "post-grunge" band from Alberta. Their dull, uninteresting, dull-as-dishwater, profanity-free music can be heard on pretty much every single radio station in the country, and is the kind of the music I like to call "Soccer Mom Rock." Like I've said before, their songs are boring, lifeless, and all sound incredibly similar to each other(listen to their dreadfully boring "hit" How You Remind Me and the equally dull Someday together and you'll know what I mean), and the Jesus-resembling singer, Chad Kroeger, has an annoying singing voice, and tries too hard to capture the powerful, growling vocals of Eddie Vedder. Listen to Pearl Jam or Soundgarden instead.a person, who after hearing a story, responds with one of their own which is intended to belittle or "top" the previous one. usually, toppper's stories are complete and utter fabrications of their limited immaginations. extreme toppers actually believe their own impossible lies, and fantasize about their mothers.An annoying person who responds to hearing someone else’s experience or problem by immediately telling a similar story about themselves with a much more fantastic outcome. They've done everything you have, only more often... and better than you.Derived from the popular Toppers Pizza franchise, it is used to describe anything mediocre like Topper's pizza itself.the ultimate one-upper. the person who is on top of everyone else regarding anything. and i mean anything.Abbreviation of Topshop.A female who specifically is skilled at most and/or all sexual positions in which she is on top of her significant other.A poo that is so large in the toilet it breaks the top of the water surface.Noun. The last toke you take before you stop smoking weed because you are as high as you want to be.The sexual act of exposing or allowing the fondling of the top half of a female, ie breasts.toon out of pocket player

anyone who buys a maxed out character for a game with there own money just so they can say they have a level capped toon but they dont know how to use it.One who mongs in shit, who is surrounded by shit, and possibly they are shit too.someone who enjoys "mongering" shit. They enjoy hoarding it and/or eatting the shit.

A Diss
the act of calling someone a shit monger.Someone who enjoys creating shit (problems). Someone who enjoys creating trouble for other people. Someone who enjoys watching other people fight.A person who mongs shit.ShitMonger is a independent record label and production company out of Minneapolis, MN.  It has been in operation since 1996.  It has put out releases official, DIY CD-rs, and internet releases for off kilter hip-hop, rock, blues, bluegrass and metal bands in Minnesota and California.

[G-Biz]
P?M: Bluegrass Madness
First Communion Afterparty
Mattastic
Karellen
Ape Lust
Cock Plyers
8=D
Sexicution1. Someone who obsseses over shit. 

2. A fun curse used when in doubt.A shitmonger is a small hairless cat that keeps it's mouth open and forms the shape of a toilet.

Similar to a venus flytrap, however instead waits for a human to sit down to take a shit.A senior at NRHS who thinks he is the shit. Also named as [Grant]

Can also be used as monger of shitpissed, upsetA word originating in Philadelphia generally meaning that you just got played, or are looking stupid, either because of something you did, or something that was done to you.Being angry, agitated, upset.The act of being upset, angry, or bitter as result of being made fun of or embarassed. Also a characteristic of a person who feels out of place or is feeling attackedMad or agitatedTo be mad, angry, agitated, upset.Somebody who contains large quantities of sodium chloride,thus causing them to be upset.[USMC] slang meaning old, faded, or well-used; it has a positive connotation.Slang; A word used in the FGC (Fighting Game Community) to describe someone who is upset. (mainly because of their loss to someone.) Though the word's primary use lies in the FGC, it can also be used in any other context to describe being upset.Angry, agitated, annoyed, upset.the worst talk-show host out there.a)The keeper of all that is evil and wrong in the world of music. 
b)The pathetic poster boy of MTV ignorance
c)the reason for the mute buttonAn annoying jackass That no one is sure why he still has a talk show on the air. He thinks that he is funnier then hell, but he isnt, so he would blame the audience for his crappy jokes, saying that they are infact good, and they just suck.

Even though the audience sounds like theres laughing, and cheering coming from it, its actually just the fake sound, like what they use on crappy sitcoms, that they record of the good talkshows, like The Tonight Show and Late Night.

He is a bragger, that cannot help to not talk about himself. His jokes are fucking stale like shit.

He trys to use current popular things in culture to try to get ratings, but the only people he gets ratings are from people that fell asleep from the commercial bridge from Conans show to his, and left the tv on.

I hate him, you should hate him too.See [Douchebag]That gay ass nose ring he so proudly sportsa super freeeek dudeA reality show on ABC that puts 25 desperate and lonely Bachelorettes in competition with each other over a lonely, desperate Bachelor they don’t even know in the hopes that he will propose at the end of the season. These women are subdued by his looks, success,his charm, and his money, and mistakingly believe they are in love with him when they don’t even know him from Adam. Each week the Bachelorettes are given some time to be alone with the Bachelor, sometimes to the point of having sex with him, in the hopes he will be more likely to choose them. One crazy woman even gave the Bachelor on the last season her underwear upon meeting him for the first time, proving her overhwhelming lonliness and desperation (he eliminated her right away). At the end of each episode, the Bachelor gives a rose to the girls he wants to continue to the next round. In the closing weeks of the season the Bachelor travels to the ladies’ hometown to see her family and takes a weekend trip with her (probably having sex with her). In the last epsiode the Bachelor is seen searching for a ring for the lady he has chosen, and in the final moments finally chooses between two Bachelorettes left as to which lady he wants to be with.The worst show on television. A show of no value and one that propogates the ridiclousness of "reality" tvIn Texas Hold'em - Having The cards J/K off suits ( NOT of the same suit). When you say it together "JacKing Off" - What a bachelor doesA Stupid Reality Show, Just Takes Female Stupidity To A Whole New Level. Bimbos, The Lot Of Them :D.The act of holding the bottom of your shirt in your mouth while you cum on your stomach/happy trail after masturbating. The purpose is to make sure the semen does not get on your clothes.Romantic fantasy porn for women
Always one of the top 10 shows that boyfriends/husbands do not want to watch, talk about, hear about, or think about.
If your boyfriend watches it with you, he's actually your girlfriendA caffeine and sugar induced involuntary bowel movement followed by muscle spasms of the lower body and arms.The worst fucking goddamn show on television at the moment, wait no not even at the moment because the fucking thing was cancelled thank god. This 'TV show' consisted of a Walrus disguised as a human forcing her 6 year old daughter to attend beauty pageants, yes you fucking heard correctly, this terrible excuse for a mother gives me a reason to hate America, and I fucking love America, but this atrocity caused me to hate families like this, the whole goddamn family is so overweight they could be compressed and turned into a wrecking ball, its like they deep-fry lard for their breakfast, lunch and sodding dinner. This is honestly how the rest of the world sees America, not like the normal fucking people there, no, they see Americans as overweight opportunists who would take their 15 minutes of fame and do anything to milk it dry for as long as possible, and don't even get me started on the 'Go-Go Juice'. This fucking thing screams "SPONTANEOUS SEIZURE" in a bottle, you know what this fucking- this- THING contains? Red Bull, Mountain Dew and PURE FUCKING GASOLINE, and a 6 year old is drinking it?- Now I would start calling the Morgue, the FBI, the Police, and the CPA because that shit is UNACCEPTABLE!I just hate this show so much. You know what I'd rather watch? Fucking Justin "I wish you were aborted" Bieber stroking Jennifer Lawrence while licking his lips and staring passionately at the camera, now i know that would never happen but still, I'd rather watch that than... THIS!A sexual deviation where two or more obese people eat an extraordinary amount of food, throw up on each other, and proceed to fuck each others' brains out; Then, one swallows the other's sperm, to make it "sweeter than bacon, child!"A show which features an obese family doing funny,annoying weird shit.a word to describe how much marmots love eachotherFat ass little white girlGrace-Lai Raath a.k.a Squishy and Dweebacus the thirda ghetto petname to refer to your parnter as, its a compound of honey and boobooa girl who is perfect for you and you would never let go! this girl is amazing, cute ,sexy, and beautiful she is a keeper and you'll wanna marry this kinda girl...a pet name that Jason has chosen to call me